The creation of a domestic ELV industry would also maintain a high technology industrial base unequaled in the free world and provide jobs for thousands of workers while adding to the Federal tax base of the U.S. and a number of States. Each commercial launch conducted in the U.S., rather than by foreign competitors, would strengthen our economy and improve our international balance of payments. Further, continuing commercial ELV operations are expected to spawn numerous spinoffs and supporting activities and strengthen the U.S. position in what is projected to be a growing commercial market, thereby providing substantial long-term economic benefits to the United States.

In addition to the general economic benefits, both NASA and the Department of Defense would benefit from continuing commercial ELV production and launch. It would provide a more robust U.S. launch capability and offer a domestic backup for the shuttle at essentially no cost to the U.S. Government. The private sector would assume all costs of ELV production now borne by the U.S. Government. There would also be a market for U.S. Government facilities and equipment that would otherwise be underutilized or no longer required. This would also reduce or eliminate U.S. Government close-out costs for discontinuing its ELV operations. It would provide a potential market for excess flight hardware, special purpose tooling and test equipment, as well as propellants which will become excess as the Air Force deactivates the Titan II ICBM's.

In summary, partnership between the U.S. private sector and the U.S. Government will strengthen the U.S. space launch capability, develop a major new industry, contribute favorably to the U.S. economy, and maintain U.S. leadership in space transportation.

ICBM, of course, stands for intercontinental ballistic missiles. And by comparison, last year alone the Soviet Union deployed more than 1,200 ICBM warheads, which is more than is projected for our entire MX Peacekeeper program. So, we've had a price -- or paid a price for our past unilateral restraint and indecision. And the growing imbalance in strategic forces has weakened the credibility of our nuclear deterrent. Our self-imposed restraint has left the Soviet Union with far less incentive to negotiate arms reductions.

The debate, analysis, and posturing are just about over. Within the next 2 weeks the Congress will decide the issue. They'll determine whether or not our deterrence, the key to peace in the nuclear age, will be strengthened. They'll also decide whether arms reduction negotiations now underway will have a chance to bring about a safer and more secure future.

When the Congress votes on the Peacekeeper program and later on the small missile funds, it'll not be just another vote. Leaders in Western Europe, in the Kremlin, leaders everywhere will be watching, because they know the decision will have a profound impact for generations to come.

The full Senate is scheduled to debate later this week on MX, and the House next week. The specific legislative proposal is to approve flight testing of the Peacekeeper missile and the work necessary for basing it in the existing Minuteman silos. Implicit in the vote is the okay for production of the missiles. And this is the essential first step for deployment of a hundred Peacekeeper missiles, beginning in 1986, and for the development of a new, small single-warhead ICBM which would be mobile.

When I endorsed the recommendations of the Scowcroft commission, I did so in large measure because of its thoughtful integration of three indispensable elements -- modernization, deterrence, and arms control. There's a direct relationship between modernization programs like the Peacekeeper and the twin objectives of deterrence and arms control. Tear the elements apart and you have less security. Keep them together and the future of peace and freedom are strengthened.

Now, this isn't a partisan issue. The Scowcroft commission demonstrated that it's possible to undertake a complex, emotional issue of extraordinary consequence and achieve bipartisan consensus. Leading Republicans and Democrats across the country and senior officials from past administrations joined our call to build and deploy the Peacekeeper and to build the small, single-warhead missile, but not so we can fight a war. They want to build those missiles so America can secure deep arms reductions and preserve the peace. So do I, and so do we all.

Now the question is whether the Congress can also reach a consensus, a consensus that will unite us in our common search for ways to strengthen our national security, reduce the risk of war, and, ultimately, reduce the level of nuclear weapons. The security and well-being of our nation desperately require a lasting, national, bipartisan consensus. We must sustain it from one administration to the next on arms control initiatives, defense policy, and fundamental issues on foreign policy. A vote for the Peacekeeper program can lay the foundation for this consensus.

During the past several weeks, I've met with many Members of the Congress. I've provided written replies to the specific concerns expressed by individual Senators and Congressmen. And now we're approaching the critical moment. In my discussions with the Congress, I've asked all Democrats and Republicans to act responsibly and to act together to endorse the Scowcroft commission's recommendations.

I want to again thank you for taking time from your busy schedules. Your presence proves you understand the stakes involved. But understanding isn't good enough. To ensure that the final decision is a reflection of a national consensus, you must express your views and make your voices heard. I hope that you'll do just that and do it soon.

The legislative clock is about to run out on this particular issue. So, again, I thank you for being here, and again, let me say -- because I'm so frustrated hearing the amateur psychoanalysis of some individuals that I don't really want arms reduction. Well, then, why did I say it over and over again in the campaign? Why did I appoint two commissions that are in Geneva -- one negotiating on the strategic missiles and the other on the intermediate-range missiles in Europe? I do want arms control.

I can't believe that this world can go on beyond our generation and on down to succeeding generations with this kind of weapon on both sides poised at each other without someday some fool or some maniac or some accident triggering the kind of war that is the end of the line for all of us. And I just think of what a sigh of relief would go up from everyone on this Earth if someday -- and this is what I have -- my hope, way in the back of my head -- is that if we start down the road to reduction, maybe one day in doing that, somebody will say, ``Why not all the way? Let's get rid of all these things.'' And that's why any of those fellows up on the Hill, lean on them. Do anything you can to persuade them that we must have this.

I know it sounds silly that -- to build a missile in order to get rid of missiles -- but we're very dangerously close to not having the deterrent that we need to keep the other fellow from using his or at least using them for blackmail. So, we have to modernize to the point that there is a deterrent, that he knows that the damage to himself would be too great to risk pushing the button.

The President. You know, I had a carefully prepared script which I discarded on the way over. I think this room kind of tells the story. And I decided that maybe the best thing would, if I could, would be to relate a little personal experience that has gone on for a great many years, 16 of them so far. And all of you here are testimony to what I'm going to tell you and what I'm going to say.

And I've been very proud for a lot of years that she read something -- she had a job in Chicago, and she left the job, made her way to California when I ran for Governor and went to the headquarters in San Francisco, wanted to work in the campaign, but needed a job. And she was hired, and she worked in the campaign.

And then I became Governor. Judge Clark came with us to Sacramento -- decided that this young lady, from what he had seen in the headquarters and her work, should be a part of the administration. And there came a moment when there was someone needed in my office, and he said there was only one person he knew in the capital that should be the Governor's secretary.

She made all of us admire the people of Austria with this as an example for us to see. But she was more American than Patrick Henry. [Laughter] And the few times that I saw her bristle was when some American was criticizing this country or what it has to offer, and she would even stomp her foot in times about them.

And then one day our Ambassador to Austria came home desperately ill and with the knowledge that he possibly would never be able to return there and came to me and told me that the one person, if he couldn't return, who should be the Ambassador to Austria was Helene von Damm.

Now, I greeted this with mixed emotions. I greet this day with mixed emotions. How do you say goodby to someone who has been so important in your life for 16 years? But, on the other hand, the joy of knowing that from the Prime Minister on, they are looking forward to their former citizen returning to be the Ambassador in their country.

Mr. President, dear friends, thank you very much for sharing this very special day in my life. It is a little bit overwhelming to think that in less than a quarter of a century, a humble immigrant can progress to become Assistant to the President and now is sworn in as the United States Ambassador to her native country.

Reagan. [Laughter] That's, of course, not literally true, but it is in the sense of my knowing what it means to be an American, what it means to be dedicated to the principles that are the hallmark of our nation -- individual freedom, personal dignity, equal opportunity.

In this sense, it all began, as the President said, one day in 1965 when an address he made so moved me that I followed him halfway across the country determined to get on his team. Well, since then, my life has been very rich on goals, satisfaction, personal growth, through 8 years of the Governorship, the disappointment and heartache of `76, the triumph of `80, and, now, of course, the continuing challenge of the Presidency.

During this time I also found my wonderful husband, Byron, whose love and understanding has been an immeasurable source of strength and happiness to me and whose support I know I will need as I meet my new responsibilities.

In looking back, what I treasure most -- I should say cherish most -- about the American people is their incredible generosity. With all the initial handicaps of a new immigrant, I never felt anything but total acceptance and support as I tried to make my way as a citizen here in the United States.

Whenever there was a bridge to cross, there were outstretched hands helping me across. That was particularly true with the Reagan family -- Nancy Reynolds, Lyn Nofziger, Mike Deaver, Ed Meese, and of course Bill Clark, who initially brought me into the Reagan administration. They all not only became my friends but became my mentors as well.

Mr. President, I cherish the memories. I feel very privileged to have been a part of this magnificent adventure. Nothing has been quite as inspiring and illuminating than getting to know the President and being at his side. While history books may record him as a strong leader, as a principled President, I feel very fortunate having known him as a human being whom I so much admire and respect.

To say that I am grateful to you, Mr. President, to my adopted country, and that I understand in a very personal way the meaning of the phrase, ``only in America,'' barely begins to express the emotions I feel today. It sometimes is difficult for those who have always experienced freedom to really appreciate how very lucky we are here, and how people around the world who are so much less fortunate and suffering do look to America as a shining beacon for hope and encouragement.

When I was a young girl, experienced war, occupation, uncertainty, I, too, saw that beacon. And now, I'm more aware than ever how important it is that we have men like the President who make sure that America continues to live up to the responsibilities that go along with all our many blessings.

The President. Instead of the usual chit-chat here now while the cameras are on us, I'm going to make a little statement in their presence because of an event that took place this morning, and that was the agreement that's been drawn between Lebanon and Israel and was signed this morning and, I think, is a positive step toward peace in the Middle East.

Begin and their colleagues for the courage and statesmanship that they've shown. But also I would like to extend, and I think on behalf of all of the country, the heartfelt thanks for our Secretary of State, George Shultz. On top of the long-term efforts of our Ambassadors Habib and Draper, who are working over there, George went over and, I think, set some kind of a record for going without sleep or rest in a real nonstop shuttle.

Lebanese people. It'll initiate a process which will culminate in the withdrawal of all external forces from Lebanon and of restoring Lebanon's sovereignty, independence, and control over its territory. And this will enhance the security, I think, and well-being of Lebanon and all of its neighbors.

It deserves the support of all of Lebanon's friends in the Middle East and around the world. And the way is now clear for others whose forces are in Lebanon to agree to withdraw as well. And this opportunity shouldn't be allowed to slip away. The risks if withdrawal fails are far greater than the risks of completing the withdrawal. And we will stand firmly beside Lebanon as this effort continues in the weeks and months ahead.

The high level of competence and dedication of the members of the management profession has contributed significantly to the success of the American economy. Management skills are particularly important at the present time because of the need for increased productivity to allow our goods and services to compete more successfully in both domestic and world markets. We urge those with management responsibilities to continue to improve their skills.

It is important that we acknowledge the essential role of management in ensuring the strength of the American economy, both in the past and for the future. We hope that public recognition of the vital role managerial personnel play in furthering the goals of our society will encourage and inspire young Americans to consider management as a career.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 17th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The American way of supporting the arts is so different from that in many other countries. Our arts do not derive from national academies. Their support doesn't come from royal courts or ministers of culture. Ours is a much broader cultural base. It reflects the kaleidoscope of individuality, diverse land, ethnic population, and civic pride that are America. And they also reflect the great American volunteer tradition.

At the Federal level, we support the work of the National Endowment for the Arts to stimulate excellence and make art more available to more of our people. But the Endowment also encourages private support. We owe a great deal of thanks to the members of the National Council of the Arts, many of whom are here today, for their help in these areas.

While the purpose of this gathering is to honor six of our leading artists and six art patrons, its also an appropriate forum to call for a renewed commitment to private giving. Last year I appointed this Committee to help in this effort, and Nancy agreed to serve as the honorary chairman. Under the able leadership of Andrew Heiskell, I am glad to report that the Committee has accomplished a great deal. We hope that through events like this we can inspire others to join our cause and in doing so lift the spirits and enrich the lives of all our people.

The arts must be supported not only for themselves but for the joy they bring to Americans everywhere. So, I urge all of you here today to contact your friends, associates, and neighbors -- to commit yourselves with corporations, foundations, and community groups -- to the private giving that we need to assure that art continues to play an integral part in our national life.

Mrs. Reagan. First, we would like to recognize the Texaco Philanthropic Foundation, represented today by John McKinley. For 42 years, Texaco has sponsored the Metropolitan Opera's Saturday afternoon radio broadcasts, the longest continuous sponsorship in the history of radio. These broadcasts have brought opera, and Texaco, into countless American homes. The Texaco Foundation celebrated the Metropolitan Opera's 100th anniversary by pledging an additional $5 million toward the Met's endowment drive. This is symbolic of the giving of corporate foundations.

Frederica Von Stade is one of this country's great young opera stars. Born in New Jersey, she worked as a secretary and salesperson to pay for her singing lessons. She made a sensational debut at the Met in 1970, and she has since appeared all over the world. I might add, we were lucky enough to have her sing at the White House last year.

Although James Michener is primarily known as a successful writer, he's also an arts patron, having contributed millions of dollars to help younger writers. Discovering that many talented students couldn't afford the University of Iowa Writers' Workshop, he established an endowment providing fellowships each year. He's also a founder of the National Poetry Series, which sponsors a yearly competition for poets. Mr. Michener sets an example for all those who've achieved success in the arts by aiding young and aspiring artists of the future.

Czeslaw Milosz is one of the world's great poets and thinkers. Born in Poland and a leader of the avant-garde poetry movement in the 1930's, Mr. Milosz is an opponent of oppression. He was a member of the Resistance during World War II and after the war resigned from Poland's diplomatic service to protest Communist repression. Mr. Milosz, now an American citizen, teaches at the University of California at Berkeley. He was awarded the Nobel Prize for Literature in 1980.

Frank Stella is a painter and sculptor whose work is represented in major museums the world over. He was only 24 when he astonished the art world in 1960 with severe striped paintings that seemed to mock the Abstract Expressionist movement that then dominated the American art scene. His shaped canvases of the 1970's are now replaced by monumental aluminum wall sculptures. We salute in Frank Stella an artist who has not yet made his final statement.

And next we honor the Cleveland Foundation, represented here by Stan Pace, who's also president of TRW. The Cleveland Foundation is our oldest and third largest community foundation. Recognizing in 1977 the need to develop a long-range plan for Cleveland's performing arts, the Cleveland Foundation formed a committee of community leaders and raised over $11 million. The Cleveland Foundation is a fine example of a foundation binding a community to its arts.

Philip Johnson is a world renowned architect. He grew up in Cleveland and is currently engaged in designing the new Cleveland Playhouse. His mark, however, is everywhere. His annex of the Museum of Modern Art and the Seagram Building in New York, the Amon Carter Museum in Fort Worth, his own Glass House, are all extraordinary. A major pioneer of the international style, Philip Johnson is now an advocate of what is known as Post-Modernism.

National Center of Afro-American Artists in Boston. Miss Lewis has devoted most of her adult life to training aspiring young black people for careers in dance, opera, and theater. The recipient of more than 17 honorary degrees, she represents the spirit of the volunteer and over the years has helped hundreds from minority communities participate in the arts.

Luis Valdez of California created El Teatro Campesino to dramatize the plight of California farmworkers. It has since received numerous awards, including an Obie and three Los Angeles Drama Critics Awards. And his 1978 ``Zoot Suit'' was the first play by a Chicano playwright and director to be presented on Broadway. Because he's traveling today, his award will be accepted by Andy Heiskell.

Zukerman entered New York's Juilliard School in 1961. Six years later, he embarked on a brilliant worldwide career. In 1982 he received his third Grammy Award. His versatility has enriched American music, and his artistry as a soloist and as music director of the St. Paul Chamber Orchestra have delighted audiences everywhere.

And thank you all for being here today. I would also like to thank Andrew Heiskell and the other members of the Committee for their leadership. You're an inspiration to all of us, and you represent the very best in our society.

Your contributions benefit not only our citizens today but also our children and our children's children. I hope this luncheon will be the first of a series recognizing artists and scholars and their supporters.

I've asked Frank Hodsoll as Chairman of the National Endowment for the Arts to explore the possibility of establishing a medal to recognize the Nation's best in this area. We'll continue doing everything we can to encouraging growing private support for the arts. And with your help we'll demonstrate the commitment and appreciation of our people and our government for artistic excellence.

And let me just say one last word about this whole element of voluntarism, which so many of you here exemplify today. It's been amazing to me that in this time of economic hardship and need throughout the country -- yes, the need was greater, but obviously the resources must have been less. But records have been broken all over.

The spread of volunteer efforts all over this country is just inspiring -- and one little example I have to tell you. The other day there was a little awards ceremony in the Rose Garden. I was giving some awards to Peace Corps volunteers. And one of them was a nun, very tiny, quite elderly, who'd come back from Ghana, where she has a hospital and a canteen there, and where they're battling the disease and the hunger in that area.

We made one phone call. And before the afternoon was over, 3,000 pounds of flour were on their way to that canteen in Ghana. And it's been that way all through the days that we've been here and inspiring this. So, I know that Nancy and I both feel very grateful to you all for what you're doing, and congratulate all of those winners and all of those donors.

The President. Good evening. I have a statement. I'm gratified that a bipartisan consensus on arms control is emerging from the recommendations of the Scowcroft commission. Their report combined into one package three of our top priority goals -- modernization, deterrence, and arms control. And I'm integrating their arms control recommendations into our START proposals. I will also support their proposal to develop a small, single-warhead missile for more stable deterrence in the future.

Many in the Congress have shared their thinking on arms control with us. Close cooperation can show the Soviets that we Americans stand united, ready to negotiate in good faith until we succeed in reducing the level of nuclear weapons on both sides.

Working together and exploring initiatives such as a proposed mutual builddown of strategic nuclear forces, we can keep America strong and achieve arms reductions that strengthen the peace and benefit all mankind. I congratulate both Appropriations Committees for their bipartisan approval of the MX Peacekeeper missile, recommended by the Scowcroft commission. I look forward to prompt approval of this vital program by the full House and Senate. It'll be one of the most important arms control votes of the 98th Congress.

The Scowcroft commission demonstrated it could take on a complex issue and achieve bipartisan agreement. The question now is whether the Congress can also reach a consensus with a resolution and unity to strengthen our national security, reduce the risk of war and, ultimately, achieve reductions of nuclear weapons.

Another subject. The Senate will soon reconsider -- or consider -- no, reconsider is the proper word -- a budget resolution. Some say the congressional budget process is at stake. I say the stakes for the American people are greater. The real question is, do we keep our hard-won economic recovery moving forward or do we stop recovery by reversing course? The answer for most Americans is clear.

In January I proposed a commonsense budget to reduce deficits through defense cuts and a domestic spending freeze, but with virtually no new taxes in 1984 or '85. The House and the Senate Budget Committees said no. They have voted to increase domestic spending and to raise the people's taxes by over a quarter of a trillion dollars. That's a $3,550 tax hike for a typical family over the next 5 years -- enough to pay for nearly 9 months of grocery bills.

I tried again, supporting the so-called ``Domenici compromise'' with less defense and more domestic spending than I really wanted, and to no avail. It is time to draw the line and stand up for the people. I will not support a budget resolution that raises taxes while we're coming out of a recession. I will veto any tax bill that would do this.

American people didn't send us to Washington to continue raising their taxes, spending more on wasteful programs, or weakening our defense. They sent us here to stop that, and that's what we're going to try to do.

The President. Helen, I think the fact is in February of '81, we were speaking the tone of all of the economic advisers there are, and no one foresaw the falling off the cliff that took place in July.

We had been in a recession since 1979 in this country, and no one knew or believed that it was going to take that big dip that it took then, and which many people referred to as a ``separate recession.'' We altered, naturally, our estimates on that. We know that we're going to have to have a sizable deficit in '83 and in '84. But what we're trying to do in our budget planning -- and running into some objections -- is set us on a path of decreasing deficits to where we can look down the road a few years and see ourselves approaching a balanced budget.

This was what the '84 budget -- that I have mentioned here, my remarks, and that I submitted to the Congress earlier this year for '84 -- was designed to do, to set us on that kind of a path. Of course, about 50 percent of the budget deficits, we have to say, are made up or are based on the recession. And as we have recovery and begin to come out of this, that will have an effect, also, on the size of the deficits.

The President. Well, in the budget that I submitted, we called it sort of a freeze at the time. And what it was based on was the 1983 budget, the present budget, plus 4 percent across-the-board for domestic spending. And this was on an estimate that we could bring inflation down to a 4-percent figure. So, it was going to be for '84, the '83 budget adjusted for inflation.

Well, we have inflation down to less than 4 percent. And so if we adopted that budget, we would be giving a real increase, over and above inflation, of the '83 spending. And I don't think we've done badly in '83, and that's why I still think that it is a budget that should be considered, because that budget would have set us and started us on the line of declining deficits.

Q. Mr. President, with the Syrians balking at joining the Middle East negotiations, how will you and Ambassador Habib [Philip C. Habib, the President's Special Representative for the Middle East] manage to encourage them to take part in the withdrawal? And, really, what reason do you have to be optimistic that this will take place?

The President. Well, for one thing, the Syrians are on record. They were invited by Lebanon to come in and help them in the troubles that were going on in Lebanon, and now Lebanon has said they're no longer needed and has invited them out. But, at the same time, the Syrians have repeatedly said that when the other forces leave, when the Israelis leave, and so forth, they, too, will leave Lebanon. Now, I grant you they're saying some different things today, but I also know that a number of their Arab allies are urging them to stick with their word and to leave when all forces are prepared to leave. And I can't believe that the Syrians want to find themselves alone, separated from all of their Arab allies.

Q. Mr. President, to follow up on Jim's question, what specifically is the United States willing to do to encourage Syria to leave? For instance, is the United States willing to offer a negotiating role to the Soviets, if that would help, or willing to offer U.S. military and economic aid to the Syrians to encourage them to withdraw their troops from Lebanon?

The President. Well, I think that we'd make the kind of -- I think they should be able to see that they would have the same kind of relationship with us that other countries there in the Middle East have. I don't think that the negotiations should include inviting the Soviet Union into the Middle East. I don't see what reason they have to be there. Possibly there is pressure on the Syrians coming from the Soviets, who now have several thousand of their military forces in there in addition to the missiles and so forth.

Several recent episodes suggest that some administration officials are putting self-interest ahead of the public interest. I refer specifically to an Assistant Defense Secretary's promotion of a weapons system after receiving a $50,000 consultancy fee from the manufacturer of that weapons system; to an Assistant Commerce Secretary's recommending that government weather satellites be sold at the same time he was negotiating for a job with the company likely to acquire those satellites; and to the U.S. Information Agency's practice of giving high-paying jobs and choice assignments to children and friends of top administration officials. How do you feel about all this, sir? Is this acceptable practice in your administration?

The President. Well, I think since every one of these things that you've mentioned is being corrected, or the people themselves involved, simply because there might be a perception of wrongdoing, have offered their resignations -- I think it goes back to what has been an attempt on the part of some to portray our administration as always being involved in this sort of thing.

But I would like to cite that in almost all of the cases back over these 2 years and several months, none of the allegations were ever proven, and everything turned out all right. But then as time goes on, there's a tendency to refer back, and it reminds me of a producer in Hollywood once, who refused to hire a director. And the picture that he refused to hire the director for turned out to be a failure. And the next time the director's name came up, the producer said, ``No, he was associated with one of the worst failures I ever had.'' I think there's something of that tone that goes on with what we've been doing.

Now, the people that were hired by USIA -- I think it is being well managed, and I think there's been a vast improvement in that agency under its present direction. And the young people that were hired were hired because they were eminently well-qualified for the jobs. And I think in many cases, like most of the people that we've appointed to government, they took those supposed high-paying jobs at something of a sacrifice in relation to what they could get out in civilian life.

The President. Well, isn't almost anyone that you appoint to a position in government someone that you either know or you know through someone? Because, how else do you find the kind of people that you want for the jobs?

Q. Mr. President, your big four advisers have been at odds for some time on policy and tactical matters -- the pragmatists versus the true believers. And this, at times, has been something of a bitter feud. If the in-fighting is over in the White House staff, how did you end it? And if it's still going on, what are you going to do to bring peace into this house?

Now, I think any time when you have an administration, and you have a number of people, and you've got issues in which there are varieties of options and so forth, you're going to find times when some will be on one side of one option, some on the other. And I make the decisions, and so sometimes some are losers and some are winners. But I don't think there's anything that can't be worked out and hasn't been worked out there among our top staff.

Q. Mr. President, do you subscribe to the theory that large budget deficits in the range of $200 billion and such, as your '83 budget itself would project, will keep interest rates high, particularly long-term interest rates? And, if so, do you not feel that this is as great a threat to recovery as more taxes?

The President. If interest rates were to go up, of course. But I do not see any sign of that. And they have come down considerably, as I have repeatedly said, to half of what they were just a short time ago and when we started.

And I know that perceptions in the marketplace can sometimes influence the people in the marketplace. And we have to watch out for things of that kind. But all of the economic indicators are such that I see no reason why they should be going up. As a matter of fact, I think in the very near future we're going to see a further drop in interest rates.

The President. Sam, as I have said before, we don't discuss the possible appointees that face us until the time comes. And when the time is right, why, we'll get together on that subject and decide what our course is going to be.

The President. No. I do not think it's that. And, as you know, I had always disagreed with using grain as a single economic weapon, back when it was imposed as an embargo, and lifted that embargo. All that we have done is agreed to sit down with the Soviet Union to explore the idea of a long-term agreement. And I think that there are a couple of reasons for this.

One of them, it will, I think, restore something of what we lost with the embargo in the eyes of the world -- restore us as being viewed as a dependable provider. That is one thing. Another thing is that I think the benefit will accrue to us, certainly, as much as to them. And, if you want to look at it another way, this is a case in which the Soviet Union which has extended itself so far in building up its military buildup -- we're not offering any credit deals or anything of that kind.

Q. Sir, if I may follow up. Since it will result in more grain being exported to the Soviets, how do you justify that with our position, our pressure on the European allies to restrict our trade, Western trade with the Eastern bloc?

The President. No. The only conversations we've had -- and I think we've resolved them very well; there's peace among us with regard to East-West trade. And the only problems we had were subsidized credit and trade that was going on in which the Soviet Union was being allowed to purchase at below market value. And so this and -- just as this is different than the gas deal. In that instance, our allies were making themselves dependent on the Soviet Union and were providing cash badly needed by the Soviet Union. So, there's a little difference between buying and selling.

He had never committed a crime of any kind before. He was not, in any way, a ringleader or a great activist in the deed performed. He served his sentence and since then has lived up to the letter of the law and been a very fine, productive citizen. And those are the terms for pardoning someone, so we pardoned him.

Now, it appears that the withholding will go through the Senate as it went through the House today by a margin that's large enough to override a veto. You threatened to veto it before. Will you still?

The President. Well, I'm not going to comment on that, Bill, because I understand that there is some talk of a -- something or other of a compromise in it, and I'm going to wait and see what they come up with there on the Hill.

Q. Mr. President, 6 weeks ago you said that there were serious grounds for questioning Soviet compliance with arms control agreements and that you might have more to say about that. And since then, the United States has confirmed that the Soviets have again tested the missile that has been raising U.S. concerns. With the talks resuming today with the Soviets on a new arms control agreement, don't the American people have a right to know if you believe the Soviets have violated past ones?

The President. It isn't so much as to whether we believe, it's a case of whether you have the evidence to actually pin down an infraction. And you said they tested the weapon again. We, even, aren't sure that this is the same weapon or that they're not testing two weapons. But with the information that we have, from our own trying to verify what is going on, yes, we have reason to believe that very possibly they were in violation of the SALT agreement. And we have appealed to them for more facts, more information on the weapon they tested. So far, they have not provided that information to us. So, all we can tell you is that we have a very great suspicion, but again you can't go to court without a case and without the solid evidence. And it's just too difficult, and we don't have that.

Q. Mr. President, you recently received a report on education which stated that if an unfriendly foreign power had imposed on America the mediocre educational performance which exists today, we might have viewed it as an act of war. In your '84 budget request, you asked for about $13\1/2\ billion in Federal funds for the Department of Education and over $235 billion for the Department of Defense. Isn't it time, in light of the report, to reassess your priorities?

Federal Government, and the total budget for education in the United States is far greater than the defense budget. As a matter of fact, the Federal Government actually provides less than 10 percent of the cost of education through the Department of Education.

And for that 10 percent, one of the things that's wrong with the school system -- and if you want to talk to some local school board members, many of them will confirm this -- is that for the 10 percent or less of funding, the Federal Government has wanted about 50 percent of a voice in dictating to the schools and running the schools.

Now, I appointed a Commission to study and bring back a report on what we felt was a decline in education in our schools. They brought back a masterful report. And in that report there's very little suggestion for more money. What they're talking about can be corrected without money. It takes some leadership. It takes some return to basics. It takes having students that now have to learn what they're supposed to learn in a class before they're moved on to the next class, just because they've come to the end of the year. And there's an awful lot of that goes on.

We think there's some common sense that is needed. And so we've proven that money, throwing money at it isn't the answer. And the Federal Government can never match the funding of schools at the local and State level, where we've created the greatest public school system the world has ever seen, and then have let it deteriorate. And I think you can make a case that it began to deteriorate when the Federal Government started interfering in education.

Q. If I could follow up, I realize that many of the things in the report could be done without further increases in funds, but that also recommended more school days, longer school hours, better qualified teachers. I think many public school systems would tell you they don't have the money to do that. Where are they going to get it?

The President. Well, I don't know that so many of those things -- there would be some increase in money there, I'm quite sure. But again, how much is being wasted on some things that aren't contributing to their education that could be transferred to that? And I think that -- well, right now there are three -- Time magazine, just a few days ago, had an article in there about three inner-city high schools: one in the Bronx, New York, one in Los Angeles, one in Austin, Texas.

And just by changes from the principal's office down, in leadership, these schools have become what schools are supposed to be, to the extent that students are leaving private schools to transfer to these public schools.

Q. Mr. President, you've described the Sandinista regime as being oppressive and inimical to our interest in the Western Hemisphere. Why don't we openly support those 7,000 guerrillas that are in rebellion against it, rather than giving aid through covert activity?

The only objection that we have to them is, they're not minding their own business. They are attempting to overthrow a duly elected government in a neighboring country. They are supplying direction. They are supplying training. They're supplying arms and everything else that is needed to guerrillas that are trying to overthrow that government.

But here is a country, a government, that was not elected, that then threw out part of its own revolutionary forces because they wanted legitimate democracy, and yet at the same time that it's complaining because those same forces -- those are not remnants of the Somoza government that they threw out of office; those are some of their former allies. And all they want from them is for that government to keep the promises it made to the Organization of American States, which were to have elections, to restore human rights, to observe all the democratic principles.

The Miskito Indians are also fighting because they were chased out of their villages, their villages burned, their crops were destroyed or confiscated by this revolutionary government, and the Miskito Indians are fighting for their lives. But what we've said to them is, and will say again, if they'll just start minding their own business, they can get along with all the rest of us.

Q. Mr. President, given the uncertainties about whether the withdrawal agreement in Lebanon will succeed, what are the prospects for getting our own U.S. Marines out of Lebanon and, is it likely that the number of American troops may, in fact, increase in the near future?

The President. Well, you have to remember what the multinational forces went in there for. The multinational forces are there to help the new Government of Lebanon maintain order until it can organize its military and its police and assume control over its own borders and its own internal security. So, it could be that the multinational forces will be there for quite a period.

And we have to remember 8 years of Lebanon being totally divided with, literally, warlords, and their own independent militias, and so forth, and that's the function and the purpose for them being -- for our multinational forces being there.

Q. Mr. President, Louis Harris recently announced a survey he conducted for Atlantic Richfield found that almost 90 percent of those who responded said that government should approve such things, for instance, as new toys for safety before they could be sold, and almost 70 percent said that government should bar TV ads that are misleading. And, overall, the poll showed that people want government to interpose itself in the marketplace, especially in the area of consumer product safety. And in light of your oft'-said assertion that Americans think themselves overregulated, what do you make of Mr. Harris' poll?

The President. It's a case, also, of which government level is the best one to do this and whether this requires a gigantic Federal bureaucracy. When I was Governor of California we did that at the State level, and very effectively. And there are also private sector things -- Better Business Bureaus -- that do much the same thing. But I have to -- as you know, I'm a Johnny one-note on this. A lot of things that are suggested for the Federal Government, I want to make sure that they aren't the legitimate function of another level of government and that they can't be better done by another level of government.

Q. There have been some recent reports, Mr. President, raising the possibility that you might abandon black voters in the event that you seek reelection. Of course, that's been denied by some officials in the White House. Even so, considering the backlash to your administration policies in such areas as the budget and civil rights, how do you see your chances with black voters in the event you seek to run again?

The President. Jerry, I'd have perfect confidence in our chances with black voters in America if we could get the truth to them. I know that, again, that word ``perception'' has been carried on, and what the perception is. First of all, you're hearing another official from the White House telling you that, no, we're not casting any voters aside. And, yes, I do think we have a lot to offer.

Now, among the perceptions that somehow our budget cuts have affected the black community more than any other -- in our changes in social programs, all we have done is remove from the rolls people that we believe are at an income level that is above what is required for them to be getting some benefits at the cost, or at the expense of their fellow taxpayers. We have increased our ability to help those truly at the lower earning end. And the very fact of what we've been able to do with inflation: a family that had $10,000 in 1979 and 1980, if we had left the inflation rate where it was then, that $10,000-a-year family would only have $7,900 in purchasing power. And that's like cutting their income by $2,100.

I think that as to -- you mentioned about civil rights -- we are enforcing civil rights at a record level with regard to the charges made for criminal violation of civil rights. The same is true of our ability -- the money that we have regained in wage disputes for people that have been denied their fair wages. We're setting a record in that. We're out ahead of what has been done in the past in any number of those items. We have conducted some 21,000 inquiries into voting, what we think are suspected voting violations. And as you know, we have extended the Voting Rights Act for a longer period than has ever been done in history.

What I think is that a pretty good hatchet job has been done on us. And a great many people sincerely and honestly believe something that just is not true. And my belief has always been, and long before I ever got here, that wherever in this land any individual's constitutional rights are being unjustly denied, it is the obligation of the Federal Government -- at point of bayonnet, if necessary -- to restore that individual's constitutional rights.

The President. Jerry, you're misreading to this extent: That's a decision that is not going to be made yet. But I think it would stand to reason that if the answer were no for me, that Republicans would still be under the cloud that I have just described. And I think that I would be very vocal in a campaign on behalf -- well, I intend right now to support congressional candidates, senatorial candidates, to the best of my ability, and gubernatorial candidates.

River Compact Commission. This is a new position. Mr. Healey is a rancher in Davis, Okla. He is also a partner in Heritage Resources. He is a member of the senior advisory council of the Oklahoma Cattlemen's Association. He is married, has three children, and resides in Davis, Okla.

The bold and penetrating voice of Andrei Sakharov is now in danger of being stilled. Not only is he denied his freedom but his health is in danger, jeopardized by constant harassment and by the lack of decent medical attention. That's why we've gathered here to honor him, to acknowledge the world's debt to him, and to do all in our power to prevent him from being silenced.

Members of the Congress who passed this resolution, like all of you who are here, are individuals of greatly differing backgrounds and persuasions. We're especially pleased to have with us today Mr. Sakharov's daughter, Tatiana, and his son-in-law, Efrem, as well as the congressional sponsors of this resolution, Senators Dole and Moynihan and Representative Kemp.

The diversity of this distinguished group is testimony to the appeal of Andrei Sakharov's life. It's also a tribute to the majesty of his principles, the principles he stands for. But Andrei Sakharov's voice is not just the solitary voice of principle of one man with courage; it is also the free voice of his people -- a great, good, and noble people who long for freedom and just rule.

Andrei Sakharov speaks for those in the Soviet Union and elsewhere who yearn for fulfillment of their human rights. No one knows this better than those who now attempt to stifle his spirit, to silence him. Rulers of totalitarian states, however great the danger that they pose to the rest of mankind, are aware of the shakiness of their rule and the fragility of their claims of legitimacy.

The words of Andrei Sakharov that I quoted earlier remind us that speaking the truth is more than a right or privilege -- it's an obligation and a duty. In this, we must follow his lead. So, today we bear witness to these truths: that Andrei Sakharov is a man of uncommon courage and decency and that all who value freedom and human dignity must speak out now in his defense and in his behalf.

Today, we call upon the Soviet leaders to give Andrei Sakharov his freedom. The world needs his learning, his wisdom, his nobility. In observing National Andrei Sakharov Day, May 21st, we urge the American people and all the peoples of the world to speak for him, for in doing so we speak for ourselves, for all mankind, and for all that is good and noble in the human spirit.

Dr. Andrei Sakharov has earned the admiration and gratitude of the people of the United States and other countries throughout the world for his tireless and courageous efforts on behalf of international peace and on behalf of basic human freedoms for the peoples of the Soviet Union. In recognition of this work, Dr. Sakharov was awarded the Nobel Prize for Peace. Soviet authorities prevented Dr. Sakharov from receiving this award in person by prohibiting him from leaving the Soviet Union.

In the face of continuous harassment and mistreatment by the Soviet authorities, Dr. Sakharov has continued his work for peace and individual human rights. Despite his exile to the remote city of Gorkiy on January 22, 1980, and despite continued efforts by the Soviet authorities to deny Dr.

Sakharov Day'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that day. On this occasion, Americans everywhere are given the opportunity to reaffirm that, despite attempts at repression, the ideals of peace and freedom will endure and ultimately triumph.

The President. I want to take this opportunity to thank Senate Majority Leader Howard Baker and Senators Stafford and Randolph for their successful efforts in expediting Bill's confirmation. I personally appreciate their efforts as well as the unanimous vote of confidence that was given Bill by the Senate.

Agency was formed to preserve and enhance the quality of America's most precious assets -- our air, land, and water. Its creation signaled a new awareness of the ecology and the impact of urbanization and industrialization on the quality of our lives.

EPA was fortunate to have as its first Administrator an extraordinary public servant who gave direction and momentum to the fledgling environmental agency. His assignment, not an easy one, was performed with dedication, integrity, and a balanced understanding of the Nation's needs. He soon became known -- and with good reason -- as ``Mr. Clean.'' And today, at a time when we're opening a new chapter in the history of this agency, I can't imagine anyone who's more qualified or better suited to be at the helm once again than ``Mr. Clean,'' Bill Ruckelshaus.

You helped set this nation on a course we still follow today -- a course that has brought many tangible signs of progress. The quality of air in the United States, especially in our cities, is better today than it was 13 years ago. Streams, rivers, and lakes all across the country are becoming cleaner. Regulations are now in place that come to grips with the problems of hazardous waste disposal. Progress is being made in cleaning up the abandoned chemical dumpsites which mar the countryside. And yet, as you and I have discussed, we must do even more to protect and cleanse our environment.

First, many of us, both here and in Canada, are concerned about the harmful effects of acid rain and what it may be doing to our lakes and forests. So, I'd like you to work with others in our administration, with the Congress, and with State and local officials to meet this issue head-on. At a time when spending in other areas must be curtailed, we've already asked for an increase of 112 percent in research funds for acid rain. People on both sides of the border must understand that we're doing what's right and what's fair in this area.

Second, accelerate efforts to put the Superfund to good use, cleaning up those hazardous dumps that present an imminent or serious threat to human health. We've made progress, but we must make still more. Let's pledge that no American will be held hostage or exposed to danger because of bureaucratic snafus or legal disputes over responsibility.

Third, consistent with the point I just made, we need a sorting-out process to determine the areas of authority between the various levels of government. I've always thought that protecting the environment was something in which the State and local governments could and should play an important role. When I was Governor of California, I was proud that our State led the way in many aspects of this battle, including the laws concerning air pollution. I hope you can focus on this and provide us with a better idea of who is best equipped to handle specific areas of responsibility.

Bill, recently a fine group of EPA career professionals came to the White House for an informal meeting with members of my staff. We had an opportunity to spend some time talking about the ways EPA can be improved so as to better fulfill its mandate. I was impressed with their professionalism and dedication to the mission of the Agency. I will restate for you what I told them: You have my total support in your difficult job of enforcing and administering our nation's environmental protection laws.

With your leadership and the assistance of EPA's fine career professionals, and with a good working relationship with State and local environmental agencies, I'm confident we will accomplish our goal: the protection of the health and well-being of the American people. Too much time has already been wasted in fault-finding, recrimination, and innuendo. Today we mark a new beginning.

So, Bill, I'm counting on you, in your daily performance of your duty, to reaffirm this administration's firm commitment to a sound and safe environment and an EPA that is trusted and respected by all. And I thank you very much for taking this assignment.

Many of those who have come here today were present at the creation of EPA some 12\1/2\ years ago. And it was at that time in a ceremony similar to this that I accepted the charge from then President Nixon to launch EPA.

My daughter, Cathy, who held the Bible for me this afternoon, was 10 years old and in the fifth grade. And next month she will graduate from Princeton. She ably represents our family, many of whom, including my wife, were here last week waiting for the Senate to act. [Laughter] The budget took precedence, and they're now in Seattle, but with us, certainly, here in spirit.

Mr. President, you were then Governor of California, a State with an environmental record that was lighting the way for the rest of the Nation. It was your leadership in California that provided the spur to the Federal Government and got the whole country moving toward coping with environmental degradation.

Since 1970 the highlighted problems of EPA have changed, but its basic mission is the same: to protect the public health and the natural environment. Recognizing the importance of this mission, Mr. President, you have provided me with the basic tools necessary for success. You've charged me with helping you find the best people available to do the job and with assessing the needs of EPA and asking Congress for the resources necessary to carry out their statutory mandates.

You've told me to operate in the sunlight, so that all can understand and participate in EPA's policy formation and decisions. Mr. President, while we both think the basic laws of EPA can be made to work better, we recognize the final arbiter of the shape of the law in this country is the Congress. That body, so ably represented by those present here today, makes the laws. It is my job to enforce them as written.

I pledged to the Congress in my confirmation hearings, and will do so here again today, that I will consult closely with them in seeking to administer and refine our statutory base. Hopefully we at EPA can regain the trust of Congress and achieve the administrative flexibility that I, and others before me in this job, believe is essential if the public interest is to be served.

Mr. President, today you have charged me with some specifics: Get on with the problem of acid rain and toxic dumps; make sure everyone understands the laws will be enforced; and help sort out the role of the Federal and State governments so the people at both levels can stop second-guessing one another and get on with their job. I take these charges very seriously. They will be vigorously pursued.

As you noted, in your remarks, EPA has impressive professionals with a high dedication to their mission. Many of the able people of EPA were there when we started over 12 years ago. We have much to learn from their collective wisdom, and with their help this country can continue to progress toward our environmental and health goals.

Mr. President, it is my sense that the people of EPA who have stayed with it from the beginning are there because of their belief in the fundamental importance of their mission. EPA was not created to deal with the usual mix of social problems, whether they be poverty, jobs, housing, education, crime. In a real sense, EPA's mission transcends all of these. That mission is the preservation of life itself. The career people of EPA recognize better than the rest of us the necessity of harmonizing their mission with the essentials of the life they're trying to preserve.

They know the single-minded pursuit of any social goal to the exclusion of all others can cause severe societal distortions. They are willing and uniquely able to help our country avoid those distortions if so charged.

You have charged us here today, Mr. President. You have told us to pursue our mission with wisdom and dispatch. We accept your direction. I can say to you, Mr. President, and to the Congress, which confirmed me, that I appreciate your support and trust. And as I pursue the public interest, which is often so elusive at EPA, your support will sustain me. And in that pursuit, I pledge to you and to the Congress and to the American people that I will never break your trust.

It's that still photo that captures the essence of the moment and sticks in our memory. If the written or broadcast media could capture the truth as consistently and accurately as you do, the American people might have a better perspective on many issues of the day.

Over the years, those wearing the uniforms of our services have played a critical role in the preservation of America's security and freedom. They continue to do so. While enduring the hardships of family separation and service in faraway lands, they stand ready to ensure the security of our country and the preservation of freedom in peace. In observing this year's Armed Forces Day, we should make special note of our Armed Forces in the Middle East and elsewhere whose contributions and sacrifices give hope for a more peaceful tomorrow.

The pride in service to our country is expressed not only by dedication to military duties but also by service to fellow citizens. Wherever they are stationed, our military forces have earned respect and admiration for freely volunteering their time and energies to help their neighbors. They are loyal citizens of their nation, good neighbors in their communities, and courageous defenders of our way of life.

We are blessed to live in a society that fosters such unselfish service. On this special day, let us all join in expressing our gratitude and appreciation to our fellow countrymen and women who serve so nobly in the Armed Forces.

When I promised the American people to ``follow every lead, root out every incompetent, and prosecute any crook who's cheating the American People'', I did not grant the Department of Defense an exemption.

Today Joseph Sherick, who has been heading the Office of Review and Oversight, was sworn in as the first statutory Inspector General for the Department of Defense. He is a 33-year government veteran of financial and budget management, and this experience, combined with the proven integrity and conviction of purpose, earns him my complete support.

Sherick, in 1982, established the Defense Criminal Investigative Service as a separate investigative unit concentrating on white-collar crime. It currently has 355 open investigations, of which 152 are contract fraud cases. Before that time, only limited and uncoordinated efforts were made to detect whi| -- -collar crime.

Mr. Sherick has a proven record of achievement in both detecting and preventing fraud, waste, and abuse, and I am pleased to have him join my team of Inspectors General, our first line of defense in attacking fraud, waste, and abuse.

And I can't help but think, though, seriously, how much of the problem that's on all of our minds, how much of it is evident -- there is a sermon or a speech in the menu, because is there anyplace in Cuba, outside of maybe the Presidential Palace, where that menu could still be served?

Just before boarding the plane this morning I was handed a little report, and Cuba is not even able to meet its quota now for its customers in its principal crop, sugar. And I've been told since I've been here, they're importing that. And if ever there was an explanation of the difference between freedom and what they now have there, it's all told in what we've been eating here in the menu, because that's no longer available there.

It's a great pleasure for me to be with a group of Americans who have demonstrated how much can be accomplished when people are free. Many of you arrived in this country with little more than the shirts on your backs and a desire to improve your well-being and that of your family. You came with a willingness to work and, yes, a consuming passion for liberty. There's a name for this kind of spirit. It's called the American spirit, and there's no limit to what it can do.

But let me interrupt myself here and say something about that American spirit. We could also say it's a Western Hemisphere spirit, because one of the great, unique things about this Western Hemisphere is that in all of our countries -- yours, from the islands of the Caribbean to South, to Central America, and to North America, from the South Pole to the North Pole, with all of our countries, we can cross the boundary line into another country, and we're still surrounded by Americans, because we are all Americans here in the Western Hemisphere.

Examples of this spirit abound. Jorge Mas, chairman of the Cuban American National Foundation, came here 20 years ago, worked as a milkman to support himself. Today he owns a construction company that provides hundreds of people with meaningful employment. And when he isn't running his country -- or company, he's immersed in activities like this one, trying to protect the freedom that has been so important in his life. Jorge Mas, thank you for all that you've done and all you're doing.

But Jorge's success story is no isolated example. There are so many. You know them -- people like Armando Codina who came here alone as a child, his parents unable to leave Cuba, so he was sent to an orphanage and then to a foster home. It took courage for this little boy to begin his new life. But now, at 35, he has a string of business accomplishments of which any individual many years his senior would be proud.

Twenty-five years ago, there were those who thought Miami had reached its peak and was on the way down. The economy seemed stagnant. There was little hope in sight. Today, Miami is a vibrant international center, a gateway to Latin America.

About 10 million people still live in Cuba, as compared to about 1 million Cuban Americans -- people with the same traditions and cultural heritage, yet the Cubans in the United States, with only one-tenth the number, produce almost two times the wealth of those they left behind. So, don't let anyone fool you: What's happening in Cuba is not a failure of the Cuban people; it's a failure of Fidel Castro and of communism.

Cuban Americans understand perhaps better than many of their fellow citizens that freedom is not just the heritage of the people of the United States. It is the birthright of the people of this hemisphere. We in the Americas are descended from hearty souls -- pioneers, men and women with the courage to leave the familiar and start fresh in this, the New World. We are, by and large, people who share the same fundamental values of God, family, work, freedom, democracy, and justice. Perhaps the greatest tie between us can be seen in the incredible number of cathedrals and churches found throughout the hemisphere. Our forefathers took the worship of God seriously.

Our struggles for independence and the fervor for liberty unleashed by these noble endeavors bind the people of the New World together. In the annals of human freedom, names like Bolivar and Marti rank equally with Jefferson and Washington. These were individuals of courage and dignity, and they left for us a legacy, a treasure beyond all imagination.

But today, a new colonialism threatens the Americas. Insurgents, armed and directed by a faraway power, seek to impose a philosophy that is alien to everything which we believe and goes against our birthright. It's a philosophy that holds truth and liberty in contempt and is a self-declared enemy of the worship of God. Wherever put into practice, it has brought repression and human deprivation. There is no clearer example of this than Cuba.

But the people of Central America, with our support, have chosen a different course -- freedom, pluralism, and free economic development. They, and we, are committed to this course and will not tolerate Mr. Castro's efforts to prevent it. They, and we, want Central America for Central Americans, and that's the way it's going to be.

The declining Castro economy continues to make a grotesque joke out of the ideological claims that Marxism is for the people. Nearly a quarter of a century after the Cuban revolution, the Cuban people continue to face shortages and rationing of basic necessities. Once one of the most prosperous countries in all of Latin America, it is rapidly becoming the most economically backward in the region, thanks to the Communist system.

States as well as Cuba. Eighty-five years ago, we joined together and fought side by side, shedding our blood to free Cuba from the yoke of colonialism. Sadly, we must acknowledge that Cuba is no longer independent. But let me assure you: We will not let this same fate befall others in the hemisphere. We will not permit the Soviets and their henchmen in Havana to deprive others of their freedom. We will not allow them to do that to others. And some day Cuba, itself, will be free.

The United States stands at a crossroads. We can no longer ignore this hemisphere and simply hope for the best. Jose Marti, the hero of Cuban independence, a man who spent so many years of his life with us in the United States, said it well: ``It is not enough to come to the defense of freedom with epic and intermittent efforts when it is threatened at moments that appear critical.

Now is the time to act reasonably and decisively to avert a crisis and prevent other people from suffering the same fate as your brothers and sisters in Cuba. Ironically, our biggest obstacle is not foreign threats, but a lack of confidence and understanding. There are far too many trying to find excuses to do nothing. If we are immobilized by fear or apathy by those who suggest that because our friends are imperfect, we shouldn't help them, if those trying to throw roadblocks in our path succeed and interpose themselves at a time when a crisis could still be averted, the American people will know who is responsible and judge them accordingly.

But as I told the Congress a few weeks ago, we've still got time, and there is much that can be done. The Congress can, for example, enact those trade and tax provisions of the Caribbean Basin Initiative that will put the power of free enterprise to work in the Caribbean. The Congress rightly believes that we must not totally focus our efforts on building the military capabilities of our friends. I agree. That's why 75 percent of what we've asked for is economic, not military aid.

But we must realize that our friends cannot be expected to stand unarmed against insurgents who've been armed to the teeth by the Soviet-Cuban-Nicaraguan axis. Any excuse for not providing our friends the weapons they need to defend themselves is a prescription for disaster.

Let there be no mistake. What happens in Latin America and the Caribbean will not only affect our nation but also will shape America's image throughout the world. If we cannot act decisively so close to home, who will believe us anywhere? Knowing this, I recently nominated a special envoy, a strong leader, an individual eminently qualified to represent us in this vital region and to work closely with the Congress to ensure the fullest possible bipartisan cooperation. He's a man in whom I have the highest confidence and respect, a man you know well, former Senator Richard Stone.

When Senator Stone is confirmed, he will be directly involved with those seeking regional solutions to the problems in Central America. We are fully supportive of good faith efforts like the so-called Contadora Group, seeking to calm tensions and avert conflict. We hope that they'll be able to make progress, and we welcome the participation of all nations in the Americas who have a vital stake in Central America.

There is, of course, one top priority item on the agenda I've yet to mention. The Cuban people, as is the case in most Communist dictatorships, have been cut off from information. Many of the folks who've come to America in recent years, for example, didn't even know that Cuba had tens of thousands of troops in Africa, much less know about the casualties they've suffered. The greatest threats to dictators like Fidel Castro is the truth. And that's why I'm urging the Congress to approve legislation for the establishment of Radio Marti.

And let me state one thing for the record. There have been certain threats made about jamming the frequency of our domestic radio stations should we broadcast to Cuba. Such threats are evidence of the frightened and tyrannical nature of Castro's regime. Well, I can guarantee you today, we will never permit such a government to intimidate us from speaking the truth.

Cuban Americans play a unique role in the preservation of our freedom. Your Hispanic heritage enables you to better relate our good will to our friends in neighboring countries to the south. But you also have a responsibility here at home. I think one of our most dangerous problems in America is that many of our own people take our blessed liberty for granted.

You know, I couldn't help but think when those beautiful young people were here singing our two national anthems, so many -- and so many of you -- only know about the Cuba that some of us know about, the free Cuba, from hearing us talk about it. And you have a great responsibility to make sure that your sons and daughters, growing up, know of that other Cuba and share in your hopes and dreams. And we all have a responsibility to see that our young people in America who have come along at a later time know about a Cuba that was free.

Perhaps the best gift that you can give to your fellow citizens -- and you've already contributed so much to our well-being -- is a better understanding of that which they cannot see -- the human freedom that surrounds them. Perhaps you can help them understand something that you know instinctively -- the awesome responsibility that we have as Americans. For if we fail, there will be no place for free men to seek refuge. I'm counting on you to help me explain the threats in Central America, the threats you recognize so clearly.

National Foundation, an independent, nonprofit organization that hosted the celebration in recognition of Cuba's independence from Spain on May 20, 1902. The President then held a separate meeting at the auditorium with Florida Hispanic Republican leaders.

Tonight, we are celebrating not only Bob's birthday but his anniversary. This is the 42d year that he and the USO have been serving those who faithfully serve us: the men and women in America's Armed Forces.

You know, there are some pleasures in being President. But one of the things that makes me proudest is our men and women in uniform. You've seen some of them here tonight. We have a number of ceremonies at the White House with honor guards and well-turned-out troops. And on such occasions, I look at them, and I find myself thinking of where these soldiers, sailors, and marines hail from: the cities, the small towns, and the farms all across this land. And I find there's something moving about that. I see them doing their part for our country, and I want to grab their hands and tell them how much the Nation appreciates their services -- tell how honored we are to have them defending us. You can't look at their faces and do anything but burst with pride in these young people. And that's why, as President, I'm trying to do all I can for them. And that's why Bob and the USO have done so much for over 40 years.

I want to thank the more than 40,000 USO volunteers who generously give of their time and of themselves. Thank you for reaching out to our men and women in uniform, letting them know that, even though they're far away from home, we think of them. And we care.

I've been sitting here as the protocol was recognized of acknowledging all those distinguished people who are here, and then, before I could think of anything proper to maybe avoid that, Pearl Bailey, as she has done to so many for so many years, topped anything that I could think of. Ditto.

I thank you all, though, very much for inviting me here today, and I'm deeply honored by the degree that you've chosen to confer on me -- and especially so because I'm sharing it with two people I greatly admire. Gary Nardino is a man of true achievement in an industry that has played a big part in my life. And Pearl Bailey is a great lady and a long-time, dear friend who combines the wonderful gift of entertaining with an even more precious one, the ability to lift the human spirit and inspire it. And I'm honored to be in such company.

At the same time, as has been acknowledged today, that you are here, filled with mixed emotions; so am I. This honorary degree -- you see, I've nursed a feeling of guilt for a half a century that the first one I got was honorary. [Laughter] Besides, if there's one place where I always feel at home, it's an athletic field -- [laughter] -- even if you don't play football on it anymore. [Laughter] Come to think of it, I don't play football anymore. [Laughter] Anyway, I understand that the baseball team has a good season.

Louis has been outpaced by rockets to the Moon, and today's high technology makes the radios and the films and industrial efforts of that earlier day seem as remote as the Stone Age. I know there's some of you probably think that my first degree was engraved in a stone tablet.

Ours, too, was a time of great change and uncertainty. Many of the things that our parents had taught us to take for granted suddenly seemed very fragile or even lost. Economic excess, lack of vision among world leaders, and the forces of change had brought on a Great Depression and unleashed evil and extremism in many parts of the globe.

I know that on this day, you look forward with some trepidation, wondering if there's a place for you in a world that is sunk in a deep recession. Well, the classes of 1932 faced a world in the very bottom of the Great Depression, when unemployment was greater than 25 percent. The situation was the same for the class of '33. It hadn't changed any. The Federal Government used radio with regular announcements every day urging people not to leave home seeking work, because there were no jobs. But here we are a half a century later, and it's been a half a century of ever-increasing opportunity for us and adventure. And we've found that life has been good.

Well, these qualities of faith and common sense and dedication, if you can cultivate and keep them, will see you through lifetimes that will not only be rich in meaning for you as individuals but which will also leave behind a better country and a better world. And that'll make all the effort that you've put into your school years and all the sacrifice of parents and other loved ones who've helped to see you through worth many times their cost.

You who are graduating have taken virtually your entire lives to reach this moment. To you it seems like a very long time. But there are others here today, parents and grandparents who share this day with you. And as they look back, it seems as if the journey only started yesterday. As a matter of fact, they can remember when if you took their hand, your hands were so tiny they only could encompass one finger. But you left an imprint on that one finger that they can still feel today. So, for everyone, it's a day of nostalgia, of looking back on a montage of memories and, for you, looking ahead, perhaps a little fearfully, seeking a clue to what the future holds.

And possibly that explains the paradox of calling the day ``graduation'' at the same time that we call it ``commencement.'' For even as you graduate today and commence life's journey in the outside world, you draw closer to the day when you, in your turn, will be the parents of another generation of young Americans. And, not long after that, your children will begin their own schooldays.

What kind of a world is it that you face now, on the brink of a new chapter in your lives; and what kind of a world will your children, in their time, face? Someone once said of our country that ``We soared into the 20th century on the wings of invention and the winds of change.'' Well, in a few years' time, we Americans will soar into the 21st century, and again it will be on the wings of invention and the winds of change. And you will have been responsible for much of that change.

In large measure, the quality of your individual lives, and your children's lives, will be determined by the quality of the education that you've received -- at home and at school -- to prepare you for this new world of challenge, innovation, and opportunity.

Abraham Lincoln is supposed to have said that the best thing about the future is that it comes only one day at a time. In this modern age, it often seems to come a little more quickly than that. Our nation is speeding toward the future at this very moment. We can see it coming, if not in sharp detail at least in broad outline.

In your history books you've read about the Industrial Revolution. Well, today, we're living the beginnings of another revolution -- a revolution ranging from tiny microchips to voyages into the infinity of space; from information retrieval systems that can bring all of the great literature and films and music within reach of a family video unit, to new methods of health care and healing that will add years of full active existence to your lifespans.

The other day I was shown a little tiny piece of fiber. It looked almost like something of a decoration. I was told that this was part of a satellite system that can transmit the entire Encyclopaedia Britannica in 3 seconds.

But for you to take advantage of all these awesome new advances -- and for your children to -- we must forge an education system capable of meeting the demands of change. And the sad fact is that, today, such a system does not exist in its entirety. Oh, there are plenty of outstanding schools -- present company included -- and thousands of dedicated teachers and school administrators. But, taken as a whole, we have to feel that many of our high schools are not doing the job they should.

Thirty-five of our States require only 1 year of math for a high school diploma, and 36 require only 1 year of science. When compared to students in other industrialized nations, we've begun to realize that many of ours place badly. And it's been estimated that half of our country's gifted young people are not performing up to their full potential. That's a criminal waste of our most precious natural resource, you, our sons and daughters.

Now, there was a time, not too long ago, when the solution to this problem would have been summed up by most politicians in one big five-letter word: ``money.'' Just pour more money on the problem, the conventional wisdom went, and it would go away.

Well, they tried that approach and it failed. In spite of all those stories you may have been hearing about spending cutbacks, total expenditures in the Nation's public schools this year, according to the National Education Association, are expected to reach $116.9 billion. Now, that's up 7 percent from last year and more than double what it was just 10 years ago. So, if money was the answer, the problem would have been shrinking rather than growing for the last 10 years.

Well, I couldn't agree more. And I know that former Secretary Califano also spoke for thousands of parents, teachers, students, and school administrators who have found themselves caught in a tangle of conflicting, time-consuming Federal regulations. The road to better education for all our people simply cannot be paved with more and more recycled tax dollars collected, redistributed, and overregulated by Washington bureaucrats.

But there is much that the Federal Government can do to help set a national agenda for excellence in education, a commitment to quality that can open up new opportunities and new horizons to our young people. I'll have a little more to say about that in the weeks ahead. But on this special day, let me just cite a few commonsense goals and guiding principles. Some of them may be familiar to you. They should be, because they've helped to make the teaching that many of you have received here at Seton Hall and in your primary and secondary schools outstanding. And they can make the teaching your younger brothers and sisters and your children receive even better.

To begin with, the time has come for a grassroots campaign for educational renewal that unites parents, teachers, and concerned citizens. We spend more money per child for education than any other country in the world. We just haven't been getting our money's worth. And we won't until we reverse some of the dangerous trends of recent years. And that means restoring parents and local government to their rightful role in the educational process.

Perhaps the biggest irony about the problems facing American education today is the fact that we already know what makes for good schools -- leadership from principals and superintendents, dedication from well-trained teachers, discipline, homework, testing, and efficient use of time.

One of the best ways to do this -- and, unfortunately, it's opposed by some of the heaviest hitters in the national education lobby -- is by rewarding excellence. Teachers should be paid and promoted on the basis of their merit and competence. Hard-earned tax dollars should encourage the best. They have no business rewarding incompetence and mediocrity.

And we can also encourage excellence by encouraging parental choice. And that's exactly what we're trying to do through our programs of tuition tax credits and vouchers, allowing individual parents to choose the kinds of schools they know will be best for their children's needs. America rose to greatness through the free and vigorous competition of ideas. We can make American education great again by applying these same principles of intellectual freedom and innovation -- for individual families, through the vouchers I mentioned and tuition tax credits, and for individual public school systems, through block grants that come without the redtape of government regulations from Washington attached.

And although I know that this idea is not too popular in some supposedly sophisticated circles, I can't help but believe that voluntary prayer and the spiritual values that have shaped our civilization and made us the good and caring society we are deserve a place again in our nation's classrooms.

And I -- and speaking for those people over there in that particular section -- tell you, you'll be amazed a half a century down the road at how clearly and how warmly the memories of these last few years will stay with you and how much they'll mean to you.

With an economy that's growing healthier every day, with a country that's still strong in freedom and growing stronger in opportunity, your lives can be as good and productive and as meaningful as you are willing to make them.

Well, so, too, can each of you, for we are still a young nation. And we have a place to take in the world. I know of no nation in a better position than to lead the world out of the morass of hatred and rivalry and to freedom for all mankind than the United States.

Now, I know there are certain cliches and things that go with commencements, such as a graduation speaker is supposed to tell you you know more today than you've ever known before or that you'll ever know again. I won't say that. [Laughter] But if I could do something else that probably is all too often done, would you listen for a moment to a little advice and based on personal experience?

Great Depression, I remember, diploma in hand, going back to my summer job that I'd had for 7 years, lifeguarding on a river beach out there in Illinois. And I remember all -- you didn't think of career, listening to those announcements I mentioned a little while ago on the radio -- all you thought about was how, how when the beach closes this fall, where do I go? What job is there?

And I was fortunate. A man who had survived the Great Depression until then, and was doing well out in the business world, gave me some advice. He said, ``Look, I could tell you that maybe I could speak to someone and they might give you a job. But,'' he said, ``they'd only do it because of me.'' And then he said, ``They wouldn't have a particular interest in you.'' He said, ``May I tell you that even in the depths of this depression,'' and so I will say to you even in the depths of this recession, there are people out there who know that the future is going to depend on taking young people into whatever their undertaking is and starting them out so that -- whether it's business, industry, or whatever it might be -- it will continue on.

But he was right. And so I say it to you, I pass on his advice to you. Don't get discouraged with the situation of the world. Things are getting better. And believe it, we need you. We need your youth. We need your idealism. We need your strength out there in what we're trying to accomplish today. So, welcome to the world.

Note: The President spoke at 10:40 a.m. on the university's athletic field. Prior to his remarks, he was presented with an honorary doctor of laws degree by Msgr. John J. Petillo, chairman of the university's board of regents.

Their job is unusually difficult not only because it involves hardship and danger, or because it requires long periods away from families and loved ones, or even because it may demand the giving of one's life in defense of our nation. The difficulty of the military profession grows out of all of these, plus the fact that our service men and women are always faced with several of the most fundamental questions we ask as individuals and as a nation -- the questions of war and peace and the use of force in the world.

Americans have asked these questions again and again for more than 200 years. They're still debating them today. Perhaps the reason these questions persist is because there are no easy answers. The answers lie in seeming paradoxes, underlying truths that may appear contradictory on the surface.

The most fundamental paradox is that if we're never to use force, we must be prepared to use it and to use it successfully. We Americans don't want war and we don't start fights. We don't maintain a strong military force to conquer or coerce others. The purpose of our military is simple and straightforward: We want to prevent war by deterring others from the aggression that causes war. If our efforts are successful, we will have peace and never be forced into battle. There will never be a need to fire a single shot. That's the paradox of deterrence.

The men and women in our Armed Forces also live with a second paradox. They spend their entire time in service training to fight and preparing for a war which we and they pray will never come. As individuals, these men and women want peace as much as we do as a nation. In fact, they want it even more, because they understand that war is not the romantic heroism we read about in novels or see in the movies, but the stark truth of suffering and sacrifice and the slain promise of youth.

Today, Americans are again asking important questions about war and peace. Many have been debating two very important questions: How could we prevent nuclear war, and how could we reduce American and Soviet nuclear arsenals?

The answers to these questions are not found in simple slogans, but again, in paradoxes. To prevent nuclear war, we must have the capability to deter nuclear war. This means we must keep our strategic forces strong enough to balance those of the Soviet Union.

It must be absolutely clear to the Soviets that they would have no conceivable advantage in threatening or starting a nuclear war. In seeking to reduce American and Soviet nuclear arsenals, we must convince the Soviet Union that it is in our mutual interest to agree to significant, mutual arms reductions. And to do that, we cannot allow the current nuclear imbalance to continue. We must show the Soviets that we're determined to spend what it takes to deter war. Once they understand that, we have a real chance of successfully reaching arms reduction agreements.

Last month I sent to the Congress a proposal to modernize our intercontinental ballistic missile force. By building the MX Peacekeeper and small, single warhead missiles, we will not only preserve our ability to protect the peace, we will also demonstrate that any Soviet quest for nuclear superiority will not work, that it is in everyone's interest to end the arms race and to agree to mutual arms reductions.

There's a direct relationship between modernization programs, like the MX Peacekeeper, and the twin objectives of deterrence and arms control. The MX and other modernization measures will help us to achieve our fundamental goal, and that is to strengthen the peace by seeking arms reduction agreements that make for more security and stability by reducing overall force levels while permitting the modernization of our forces needed for a credible deterrent.

I know that the paradox of peace through a credible military posture may be difficult for some people to accept. Some even argue that if we really wanted to reduce nuclear weapons we should simply stop building them ourselves. That argument makes about as much sense as saying that the way to prevent fires is to close down the fire department. It ignores one of the most basic lessons of history, a lesson that was learned by bitter experience and passed down to us by previous generations.

Tyrants are tempted by weakness, and peace and freedom can only be preserved by strength. So, let us resolve today, as we honor the brave men and women who serve in our Armed Forces, to give them the support they need to protect our cherished liberties and preserve the peace for ourselves and our children.

America and the world are increasingly alarmed and dismayed at the persecution and severe repression of the Baha'i's in Iran. Recently we have learned that the Government of Iran has sentenced 22 prominent members of the Baha'i faith to death. This is in addition to the more than 130 who have been killed since the beginning of the revolution in Iran, including one man executed January 1, 1983, and three hanged in Shiraz on March 12, 1983.

These individuals are not guilty of any political offense or crime, they have not plotted the overthrow of the regime, and they are not responsible for the deaths of anyone. They only wish to live according to the dictates of their own consciences. I strongly urge other world leaders to join me in an appeal to the Ayatollah Khomeini and the rest of Iran's leadership not to implement the sentences that have been pronounced on these innocent people. Sparing their lives would be a step forward for Iran and the world community.

But your parents are proud of you. Obviously, General Motors and the television stations are proud of you, and that's why they're sponsoring these events. But you might be interested to know, I think, that the Nation is proud of you.

One of the figures in this report indicates that, compared to the students of other nations, on the average, we are way below the students of those other nations. But applying directly to you here, who are the leaders, the top 9 percent of American students rank equal to or above the top 9 percent in all those other countries. It is only the overall average that reflects what we think has been a decline in education. And you're in that top 9 percent.

So, one of these days, you're going to be the leaders that we'll turn the country over to. And anytime I've had an opportunity to meet students like yourselves, I find myself coming home reassured that the country's going to be in good hands when it is turned over to you for your leadership.

Now, rather than my going on with a monolog that'll sound like a graduation speech -- and you have to listen to one of those -- I think that we could have a dialog rather than a monolog -- and with the limited time that we have. And I see that there's already a lineup, and since there's more on the right than there are on the left, I'll start with on the right and then exchange microphones here.

The President. Well, you have the one disadvantage in that there is an unemployment problem that is -- we've been talking about it here at this table -- that is due, in part, to the recession and due, in part, to a structural change going on in our country of new industries coming up and some older industries that will not require the same number of employees.

But I think that you have a great opportunity because of that structural fact and the new industries coming up. That's why we're emphasizing in government now retraining, rather than government programs for just make-work to give people an income through the hard times -- to retrain for these new industries and the high technology industries and so forth that are coming along, and the communications industries.

And I would say that you -- and I know that most of you will probably continue your education on, but those who don't, there is a great opportunity now to take training for jobs in these new upcoming and growing industries. And back there in that period so long ago in which I kind of ignored the number of years, it happened to me. There was a brand new industry then called radio. And I made up my mind that's what I wanted to be, and that's where I started my career and wound up broadcasting major league baseball and big-time football and so forth. But it was a brand new industry, and brand new industries like that are seeking young people that they can bring them in, in the ground floor, and train them and bring them up believing in the future of their industry.

The President. Yes, as a matter of fact, it has already taken place. There are training programs going on at the private sector. Our government job training program, which I asked for quite some considerable spending, even in these hard times when we're trying to hold government spending down, is one in which the training will take place with local officials, government officials, and private business at the local communities, training people for the jobs that are available in that community and that area, rather than just some general from-Washington-ordered job-training program that ignores what might be the particular needs in any community.

Task Force. And they have been working with the private sector and with other levels of government, local and so forth, throughout the country on what can be done to meet some of the problems, utilizing the power of the private sector. And the response is wonderful and is amazing.

And incidentally, those parents are not all loaded. As a matter of fact, in the inner-city schools, the parochial schools, the actual financial level, the average level of the families of those students is lower than the average level of those attending public schools.

They're getting still that same full amount of tax money. And you have to ask yourself -- part of this help will also go to the schools. Some of these independent schools can afford then, with tuition tax credits, to raise the tuition without penalizing the parents, because it will, in effect, come out of what would have otherwise been tax dollars. And they will -- there has been a great attrition rate. Many of those schools are closing. And in this respect they will be able to stay open.

So, I know that there's been a lot of information and everyone keeps talking budget cuts, because we're trying to reduce the rate of increase in Federal spending. But today there has been no such thing as a budget cut. The government is spending more today than it has ever spent in its history.

Suppose you had a moment of silent meditation in which you could do whatever your nature informs you to do. But there has been a tendency in recent years to indicate that the Constitution in the separation of church and state -- that this really meant separation from religion. The Constitution says that the Congress should make no laws that interfere with the practice of religion.

Now, what my feeling has been is that by ruling that this was outright not permitted in schools, we have in effect diminished the importance of religion and thus of morality in the minds of students and of people and of young people growing up by saying, ``Well, we just won't allow it in the schools.'' And, as I say, it's not a compulsory prayer. It wouldn't be one particular church's prayer. In fact, for those who didn't want to pray, it wouldn't even be a prayer. They could just take the minute and think about what they were going to do when the minute was over or whatever -- [laughter] -- they wanted to think about or what they did last night.

But I don't know. I just feel very strongly. I don't know of anyone that was ever hurt by it. And I do believe that, if you look back -- speaking again of history -- if you look back to the collapse of great civilizations like the Greek and the Roman and all, you'll find that one of the characteristics of those civilizations was they began to desert and abandon their gods. That was one of the first signs of decline. And I think we have to keep in mind we are a nation under God. And if we ever forget that, we'll be just a nation under. [Applause] Thank you. Thank you all very much.

I just -- again, remember this. There's a responsibility that goes with where you are today. You're leaders. And if sometimes you get a little worried and the world looks big and awesome out there and you think, ``How do I know I can ever make it.'' Let me just tell you something. You've made it so far. You've made it in the company of all your peers and all your generation. And you've been the leaders. What makes you think you won't continue to be leaders if you keep on doing the same things that you've been doing in school? And your responsibility is: Our nation needs leaders, and we're counting on you.

I know the high-risk, rough-and-tumble world of business that you come from is no rose garden, so, you deserve to spend some time here once in a while. As a matter of fact, there are some words of hospitality from our Latin American friends, Mi casa, su casa. My house is your house.

Since this is World Trade Week, there couldn't be a better time to receive you and to present the well-deserved ``E'' and ``E Star'' awards for achievement in exporting. America's future growth and prosperity depend on how well we find and open and compete in foreign markets.

Already, one out of eight manufacturing jobs and one in three agricultural jobs relate directly to exporting. Yet, 90 percent of American manufacturers -- 90 percent -- do not export at all. We believe there are tens of thousands of American enterprises, many of them small- and medium-size businesses like some of yours, that could compete successfully in foreign markets, but they don't.

We have the talent, the skills, and the products to compete. We just need to encourage American business to take up the challenge. Those of you here have been in the forefront of the export effort so far, I know. We hope your highly successful and profitable examples will encourage others.

Our administration has a plan to help our exports. First, we're laying an economic foundation of noninflationary growth, incentives, and thrift. Second, we're working with our trading partners to open more markets to you and to move toward trading practices that are at once more free and more fair. And third, we've taken the lead in assisting international financial and trade institutions.

Enacted last year, it's already providing thousands of small- and medium-sized businesses with new opportunities in foreign trade. By removing impediments to trade and permitting more efficient sale of American products abroad, we believe this act will increase our exports by up to $11 billion by 1985. And that could translate into hundreds of thousands of jobs for our people.

But the real key to export expansion lies in the efforts of people like you who have the vision to see an opportunity and the gumption to take the chance. We're all grateful for your initiative and cheer your success. Congratulations to not only the awards you present today but on the hard work that won them for you.

The first awardee: Atlantic Antibodies, Inc., Scarborough, Maine. This company is an excellent example of a successful, smaller exporter. It developed a very effective export marketing program, overcoming many problems such as tariff barriers and foreign competition in exporting its diagnostic products used in clinical and research laboratories. And, accepting the award, Mr.

Mr. President, our second awardee is CRS Group, Inc., Houston, Texas, an architectural engineering firm that exports well above the 14.7-percent average for the top 500 firms in the design industry through innovative marketing techniques that successfully deal with a multitude of nontariff obstacles and through perceptive understanding of local needs and customs. Particularly significant is this company's specifications calling for U.S. materials and equipment which generate billions of dollars of exports for other American companies. Accepting the award is Mr.

The Colonial Beef Company, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. This small company, in addition to exporting 25 percent of its own meat products, is actively working with the U.S. Meat Export Federation and the United States Government to pursue furthering meat exports from all American companies. And accepting the award, Mr. Louis E. Waxman, president.

Manitowoc Engineering Company from Manitowoc, Wisconsin, increased its exports of crawler cranes and excavators to 41 percent of its total sales at a time when that industry's exports were declining. Making arrangements for training and spare parts, which are often overlooked by many American firms but certainly not our foreign competitors, attributed to their success. And accepting the award is Mr. P. Ralph Helm, the president.

The next awardee is the National Association of Export Companies, receives an ``E'' award for export service. This organization has done an outstanding, painstaking job assisting small- and medium-sized exporters and is now working with them to establish export trading companies.

Beech Aircraft, Wichita, Kansas, has done such a steadily superior job of exporting its general aviation aircraft and aerospace products that this is its second award -- the President's ``E Star'' award for continued excellence in exporting. This large company is making a major contribution to our balance of payments through the dollar volume of its sales. And accepting the award, Mr.

Presidential ``E Star'' for export service in recognition of its continued excellence in promoting exports in the State of Florida, and serves as an example for other States to follow in promoting their exports. Accepting the award, Mr. Wayne Mixson, lieutenant governor and secretary of commerce.

Angeles, San Pedro, California, has provided a large number of marketing and promotional and educational services to all exporters, and especially assists and encourages smaller and new exporters. Growth in cargo exported from the harbor should continue to increase at a rapid rate as a result of development of a container-transfer facility, a coal exporting facility, and ocean container terminals. And accepting the award, Mr. Ernest Perry, executive director.

I also transmit, for the information of the Senate, the report of the Secretary of State with respect to the supplementary convention transmitted herewith. The reasons for the substitution mentioned above are explained in that report.

The force modernization programs that we're preparing, the deep strategic and intermediate-range nuclear arms reductions we're seeking, and the confidence-building measures we've proposed in START, INF negotiations, at the U.N., and elsewhere are all designed to achieve this goal.

Over the years, the United States has taken extraordinary steps unilaterally and bilaterally to reduce the possibility that an accident, miscalculation, misunderstanding, or misinterpretation would somehow ignite armed conflict.

For over a year now, this administration, in close consultation with the Congress, has been studying the feasibility of a broad range of further measures to reduce that possibility. On April 12th, this year, '83, the Department of Defense delivered a report to the Congress which proposed four new confidence-building measures to strengthen communications and cooperation, thereby reducing the chances even further that war, especially nuclear war, could come about by accident or miscalculation.

It gives me special pleasure today to announce my endorsement of significant additional confidence-building measures. These confidence-building measures have the potential for reducing the possibility of unintended war and the outgrowth of close bipartisan consultation -- or they are the outgrowth, I should say, of close bipartisan consultation with the Congress. Three of them are designed to strengthen and broaden communications between the United States and the Soviet Union. They include the upgrading of the hotline between myself and General Secretary Andropov by adding a facsimile transmission capability.

And, third, we propose improving the existing diplomatic crisis-controlled related functions of both the United States and the Soviet Union by upgrading the communications links between Washington and Moscow and each nation's embassy in the other's capital.

Any one of these measures would significantly strengthen our existing crisis communication network. Together, they add new dimensions to our communications efforts, allowing us to contact each other rapidly at political, military, and diplomatic levels, improving our capability to contain crisis situations.

I encourage the Soviet Union to carefully examine these proposals. Extending the range of rapid direct communications between the United States and the Soviet Union would make an important contribution to stability. It's in our best national interest and in the best interest of all mankind.

The fourth recommendation we propose is an international agreement, open to all the world's governments, providing for consultation in the event a nuclear incident is precipitated by an individual or group. Establishing procedures among all interested nations in the event of such an incident would complement the steps that we already have taken in the 1968 Non-Proliferation Treaty and the 1980 Convention on the Physical Protection of Nuclear Materials.

I endorse the proposal, not because I foresee an increasing risk of nuclear incidents -- I do not -- but because I believe that it is prudent to have in place the means to facilitate international communications should the unthinkable happen.

In the coming days, I intend to consult closely with those Members of the Congress who've shown a great personal interest, such as these gentlemen here today, and especially Senators Nunn, Jackson, Warner, and Tower. Additionally, we intend to consult closely with the international community concerning these measures. These are reasonable proposals, and we will work diligently to reach early agreement on them with the Soviet Union.

The President. It's a privilege for me today to play a part in honoring 12 Americans who've made outstanding contributions to our way of life through science and engineering. And as I read over the list of their activities, I'm impressed not only by the profound intellectual achievements that are represented but also by the wide range of their expertise. We have before us leaders in the fields of physics, biology, agriculture, chemistry, aircraft design, engineering, and mathematics.

It's fitting that we're taking special care to honor the recipients of the National Medal of Science award at a time when our technological leadership is being challenged from abroad. In the past, too many Americans tended to take our preeminence in science and engineering for granted. We must never forget that what we enjoy now is the result of superior professionals like those that we're honoring. And today, as never before, these individuals have international competition.

I would hope that today's event does not go unnoticed by America's young people and that many of them will be encouraged to emulate the example of these distinguished citizens. We as a nation cannot rest on our laurels in this vital area of concern, and American young people need to know their well-being depends on our continued progress in science and technology. Only by excellence in this vital area can we hope to maintain technological momentum -- momemtum so essential to our freedom and our prosperity.

America as their adopted land and have found here fertile soil for their talent. Many scientists and engineers come to us from places where repression stifles creativity, chokes off opportunity for expression and development. America has gained so much by the infusion of such talent, and today all our citizens are better off because of it.

Mr. Keyworth. First we'll begin with the biological sciences. Seymour Benzer for elucidating the fine structure of the gene and unifying the classical and molecular concepts of gene structure and function.

Now, in chemistry, Albert Cotton for contributions of unique range, depth and importance to inorganic and structural chemistry, especially the discovery and elucidation of multiple metal-metal bonds and the application of group theory to chemical problems.

Gilbert Stork for his contributions as one of the world's most innovative and productive synthetic organic chemists, whose discoveries have made possible the synthesis of some of the most complicated and important biologically active compounds.

In the engineering sciences, Edward H. Heinemann for his outstanding contribution as a creator-designer and engineer responsible for the design and production of a series of famous aircraft for the military forces of the United States and allied nations.

In the physical sciences, Philip W. Anderson for his fundamental and comprehensive contributions to the theoretical understanding of condensed matter, most notably his work on electron localization in highly disordered solids and the nature of localized magnetic states in metals.

Edward Teller, for his outstanding contributions to molecular physics, understanding the origin of stellar energy, the theory and application of fusion reactions, the field of nuclear safety, and for his continued leadership in science and technology.

Charles H. Townes, for fundamental contributions to the understanding of matter through its interaction with electromagnetic radiation and the application of this knowledge to the service of mankind, most notably in leading to the invention of the maser and the laser.

Islanders from New York who won the Stanley Cup. [Pointing to a table next to the podium] And that's the Cup. And they have won it four times consecutively, four times in a row. The record, held by the Canadiens, a Montreal team, is five times in a row. And it would be awfully difficult for me to wish you the good luck of breaking the record when, in order to do that, you would have to beat the Washington Caps again. [Laughter] And there are two representatives of the Caps here with us.

We now look to the Senate to send this same message by supporting the resolution the House passed today. The challenge before us remains great, and I will continue to consult and work closely with Members of the Congress on both sides of the aisle.

A longtime supporter of civil rights, Dr. Bunzel was honored in 1974 by the board of supervisors of the city and county of San Francisco when he was awarded a certificate of merit for ``unswerving devotion to the highest ideals of brotherhood and service to mankind and dedicated efforts looking to the elimination of racial and religious bigotry and discrimination.'' Dr. Bunzel earned his undergraduate degree from Princeton University (A.B., 1948), his masters degree from Columbia University in 1949, and his Ph. D. from the University of California at Berkeley in 1954.

Each year hundreds of thousands of American families are confronted with a unique tragedy -- a missing child. While most of these children return home safely, far too many are exposed to serious danger and exploitation. Often the child's fate is never known. During the child's disappearance, the family faces an ordeal of imagined horrors and unknown consequences.

The striking mobility of our society has created special difficulties for the law enforcement agencies that must deal with crimes involving children. The solution to this problem demands the attention and cooperation of all our law enforcement agencies, city, State, and local.

It is of paramount importance that those involved in recreational boating recognize that observance of proper safety practices is essential to the enjoyment of boating. In order to protect their families and friends, all persons who use our waters should be courteous and well-versed in safety rules and the techniques of safe boating operation.

Since learning the fundamentals of safe boating adds to the pleasure of boating, participants should take advantage of the many boating courses offered by Federal and State agencies and private organizations.

In addition, all persons should wear a personal flotation device while on the water. Seventy-five percent of those who died in boating accidents last year might have been saved had they worn these devices.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 25th. day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

We also support the fundamental principles of the OAU, embodied in Article III of your charter: sovereign equality of all member states; non-interference in the internal affairs of states; territorial integrity; peaceful settlement of disputes; condemnation of political assassination and subversion; dedication to the total emancipation of still dependent African territories; and genuine nonalignment. We believe the OAU has made a positive contribution to stability and progress in Africa over the past twenty years, and that it has the potential for even greater accomplishments in the years to come.

The United States remains supportive of African efforts to seek a cessation of conflict and violence, as well as efforts aimed at meaningful economic progress. And we firmly agree that African problems can best be solved by African solutions. We applaud when your Organization moves forward to meet serious challenges on the African Continent, as was demonstrated by the OAU's peace-keeping force in Chad.

We are confident, however, as most OAU member states must be, that the Organization can and will continue to provide the unique forum for continental cooperation. We wish the OAU well on this important day marking the Organization's first two decades, and we wish it well in all the years ahead.

Fellows serve for 1 year as special assistants to the Vice President, members of the Cabinet, and the President's principal staff. In addition to the work assignment, the fellowship includes an educational program which parallels and broadens the unique experience of working at the highest levels of the Federal Government.

The program is open to U.S. citizens in the early stages of their careers and from all occupations and professions. Federal Government employees are not eligible, with the exception of career Armed Forces personnel.

I salute Republican and Democratic Members of the House and Senate who have made a decisive, historic contribution to our nation's security. Thanks to them, America is blessed with a new bipartisan unity that can make us both stronger and safer than before.

As we prepare to leave for Williamsburg and confer with other leaders of the free world, I can think of no more welcome message to give them than the one Congress has just given me: back-to-back votes of confidence in the recommendations of the Scowcroft commission to modernize our strategic forces and carry us forward on the road to genuine arms reductions.

In coming weeks, the Members of the Congress will be asked to reaffirm their votes of yesterday and today. I pledge to them my full cooperation and consultation. I also pledge to continue working closely with the Congress in pursuit of a reduction of nuclear arsenals.

We understand the task ahead. We have demonstrated our unity and courage. We have reason to hope for a more secure and peaceful future. My fondest wish is for the eventual elimination of nuclear weapons. In this spirit, I urge the Soviets to join us at Geneva in taking that first giant step -- an equitable and verifiable agreement that substantially reduces the level of nuclear arsenals on both sides.

President Reagan to talk about some of the subjects that will be coming up at Williamsburg. There are six of us here, television journalists from networks in the six countries whose leaders will be meeting with the American President.

Mr. President, since this is, after all, an economic summit, let's start with the economy. There's good news there; the economy is picking up. But if the leaders whom you'll be dealing with have one thing in common, it's that they're worried about the size of the budget deficits that your administration is running up. They're afraid that it will abort the recovery. What is your reaction, sir, to this, especially since you're an old foe of deficit financing?

The President. Yes, I am. And I think about half of our deficit is due to the recession, which, as we know, is worldwide, and the other half, I think, is structural. This is the thing we've been trying to deal with with the Congress, regarding reductions in spending. But the main way that we can handle the deficit, I think, is the program that we have underway right now, and that is to restore the economy. There's a limit to how much you can achieve in reducing spending. There's a limit to how much you could achieve if you try to do it with taxes, in addition to which you're threatening, then, the recovery by removing the incentives that I think have brought about the start of the recovery.

The answer does lie in economic growth. If we, for example, could for the next few years -- if we were 1 percentage point higher than our estimate in the growth of the economy, it would reduce the deficit by a hundred billion dollars a few years from now. So, we're proceeding. And we think that our program is right, because we started with interest rates that were more than twice as high as they are now. We started with an inflation rate that was more than three times as great as we've brought it down to. And, of course, it is the inflation which contributes to the high interest rate. A lender has to get back the depreciated value of his money, plus real interest earnings on it.

Congress with regard to our budget and contingency taxes for the out-years -- once we have established the recovery as definite -- that we would be willing to assume, which would lead to a declining pattern of deficits in the out-years and, down the line, a balanced budget.

Mr. Schlesinger. But to follow up, sir, right now the way the deficits are structured, they may soak up as much as 70 percent of all the net savings in the United States. In other words, $7 out of $10, instead of going into the investments that you're talking about, to create jobs, are going to go to service that deficit.

The President. On the other hand, maybe not that much, because we have -- with the tax programs that we've put into effect -- we have seen an increase in the percentage of personal savings of billions of dollars that over these same next few years, I think, are being underestimated as to what they will contribute to the pool of capital that is available for investment.

Mr. Hidaka. Mr. President, I'd like to ask you about East-West relations, sir. Your government is taking much stricter anti-Soviet line compared to other allies. And recent news reports said you are not going to meet Mr. Andropov this year. My question is, how do you plan to present this problem to the leaders at the summit?

The President. Well, first of all, there seems to be a misperception that we're interested in some kind of a trade war with the Soviet Union, and we're not at all. The very fact that we have told the Soviets that we're willing to sit down and negotiate a long-term grain agreement is evidence of that.

But what we are concerned about is the Soviet expansionism, and particularly when it comes into the Western Hemisphere. There have been several Soviet vessels, recently, unloading weaponry in Nicaragua and for the use in the effort to overthrow the Government of Salvador. We don't look upon those as friendly acts.

But the East-West trade -- I think we and our allies are in very much agreement on that. There have been constant consultations in the year since the Versailles summit in which we have come to agreements on the trade that we don't want to extend to the Soviet Union -- is high technology that can contribute to their further military buildup. And, as I say, we're in great agreement on things of that kind.

We don't believe that while they're devoting so much of their resource to this military buildup that we should engage in trade in which we, in a sense, subsidize our exports to the Soviet Union, or give them favored treatment with regard to low interest rates on longtime credit, and so forth. On the other hand, selling to them and their having to put out cash as the rest of us do in order to buy is going to take that much money away from their ability to add to their military forces.

The President. No. We have contact with the Soviet Union and communication with them at several levels and channels, all the way to the top. There's been no evidence on Mr. Andropov's part that he is ready for such a meeting. He is engaged, as anyone would be in his position, in settling himself into his new position.

And I think just to have a summit meeting -- which might raise the hopes of people all over the world -- simply to get acquainted, and then nothing positive comes from it, makes no sense. It's been tried before and with sad results for our own country and for the world. I am perfectly willing to meet with him when there is an agenda and when there are legitimate issues that could be resolved to the benefit of all of us, worldwide.

Mr. Telmon. Mr. President, the scenario for recovery is not uniform at all. The American engine is going strong. The Italian economy is not moving yet. Do you expect the recovery will benefit all our nations?

The President. Yes, I think it will. I do believe that -- well, believe, I've been told by leaders of our allied states -- that recovery must begin in the United States. Evidently, we are that much of a factor in world commerce. And they are pleased to see it beginning here and believe that it is aiding their own recovery.

For example, the United States will be importing to such an extent that we'll have a $55 - 60 billion trade imbalance, that we will be buying that much more than we're selling, which should be of benefit to our trading allies.

Mr. Telmon. There are less optimistic forecasts -- of a short recovery. Do you plan to coordinate at Williamsburg with the other leaders all the necessary measures to remove the obstacles to a strong recovery?

The President. This will be one of the principal subjects at Williamsburg, at the summit meeting, discussing how we can bring convergence of policies together, because all of us need a long-term recovery, and that's what our plan is aimed at -- not the what I call ``quick fix'' that has been tried in the past, since World War II, and each time has only been temporary and results in a worse recession a few years later. And I think this means all of us doing a job together to reduce inflation worldwide.

We have been through the longest period of worldwide, sustained inflation in history. And it has been worldwide. And I think the very fact of our success in bringing inflation down as rapidly as we have is going to be helpful in the other countries, as well. And as long as we can stay on that path, not of quick fixes, but all of us seeking long-term, solid economic recovery -- sadly enough, the last thing ever to recover from a recession is in the unemployment situation. But even there, there are beginning signs. And that is the ultimate goal of all of us -- is to put our people back to work.

Ms. Ockrent. Mr. President, you have repeatedly stated that France is your best ally, at least on defense issues. Why then respond with indifference or benign neglect to French and European alarm over the rise of the dollar and the interest rates? Isn't it time the United States realized they cannot pretend to political leadership of the West if they do ignore their economic responsibilities?

The President. Well, we're not ignoring our economic responsibilities. We didn't ask for the strong dollar. The strong dollar came about because of our success, so far, in reducing inflation in our country in comparison to the decline in inflation in other countries.

But the figure that I just used a moment ago, the fact that we will have a $55 billion to $60 billion imbalance in trade this year, is an indication of the penalty that we suffer from a strong dollar. It makes our exports higher priced and, therefore, not as desirable. And it also is beneficial to the other countries that are selling to us.

But we'd like to have a better trade balance. But I think the relationship between the currencies must be resolved by this general recovery and by more stability and more closeness as to inflation rates worldwide.

We're pretty much all agreed upon our participation in the international funding groups such as the International Monetary Fund, the World Bank, and so forth. And I think we honestly are going to come together in an effort to find ways that we can have that convergence I mentioned, where we can try to go forward together in the policies that we're following to get over inflation.

The President. I don't think they quite understand what the situation would be. Incidentally, we have been in full consultation with the leaders of all of your countries on the INF negotiations and will do nothing without consulting first with them. This has been one of the great steps forward that I think we've made in these last 2 years. And I've had the gratitude expressed by your leaders for the fact that we are in this close contact on all these major issues.

I don't know that the walk in the woods would have been acceptable even to the Soviet Union with its proposal. But let me point out something. The SS - 20 has three warheads each, so it would be three times 75. It also, once the button is pushed, arrives at the target in about 5 to 7 minutes. The cruise missile is an in-flight vehicle that would be in the air, you might say, in a matter of hours and is, therefore, subject to the same kind of conventional defensive weaponry -- anti-aircraft type weaponry, picked up on radar and aimed by radar and so forth -- that an airplane would be.

It wasn't very much of a deterrent. And what we're seeking is not a counterweapon that we want to use against the Soviet Union. We're seeking a deterrent. The closest thing is the Pershing II missile, which the allied countries asked for. You know, this isn't something we volunteered. And they asked for it as the Soviets continued to build these intermediate-range weapons aimed at the Western European target.

Mr. Brezhnev said that they had achieved parity with us, now, we had nothing, and when I say we, I mean NATO forces on the Western front, to match their weapons -- but they continued to build. And they have added several hundred more warheads during the time, the brief time of these negotiations. Today they've got over 1,300 of those warheads targeted on Europe.

I believe that deploying on schedule, when the time comes later this fall, this winter, that the schedule calls for in the deploying of our weapons, will be the thing that will bring the Soviets legitimately into negotiations. Right now they seem, with their propaganda, to have pinned their hopes on preventing our deployment. But any proposal they make is one in which they still have a monopoly, and they view us as having nothing on our side.

I think once they see that we and our allies are determined to go forward with the deployment of these weapons, then I think they might meet us in legitimate negotiation. They will probably -- this will be for a reduction in the numbers of those weapons, such as we have proposed in what we call an interim solution. I would hope that as we advance on that, that they would see the value of total elimination, zero on both sides, which is what we originally proposed, and leave Europe free of those weapons which could almost instantly target the other countries.

The President. Oh, this is what we hope very much. But in the meantime, what we and the allies must maintain is a deterrent. I don't think that any one of us ever contemplates a first strike or making war, and we don't want the other side to have a first strike or make war. Therefore, what we must maintain is not necessarily superiority, but enough force in which the result of a first strike would result in unacceptable damage to the Soviet Union and its allies.

This is the deterrent. And so far, the deterrent has worked now for almost 40 years that there has been peace in Europe. And this is what we're seeking. I think it would be destabilizing if we ourselves sought what they might look at as giving us the potential for a first strike, and there's no point in us doing that. All we need is enough that they have to weigh the consequences to themselves, regardless of what damage they would do to us.

Mr. Suchet. Mr. President, a major issue in the British general election is the basing of American cruise missiles in Britain. Mrs. Thatcher has said in Parliament that she has received an explanation from you as to who will be in control of firing these missiles, but you, as yet, have said nothing publicly. Would you tell the British people now who is ultimately in control of firing these missiles, you or Mrs. Thatcher?

The President. Well, let me say that we will -- I don't think either one of us will do anything independent of the other. This constitutes a sort of veto power, doesn't it? But we have an understanding about this and would never act unilaterally with any of our allies on this.

Mr. Suchet. I think the British people are very concerned about the basing of these missiles in their own country. Perhaps they deserve to be all the more so, since you seem reluctant to say that the power to fire them does not rest with you.

The President. Well, they can rest assured. But my reluctance to say anything is based on the fact that we get dangerously into the area of telling others not friendly to us what our policies might be. And I don't think we should do that.

Mr. Schlesinger. Mr. President, some of the opposition to your defense policies, whether it be the stationing of Pershing II's in Europe or the testing of cruise missiles in Canada, stems not so much from what you're doing as much as what you're saying. There is a perception out there among many people when they hear you talking about the immorality of the Soviet system, about the Russians lying, that you're bent more on a crusade than pure defense, that you're too warlike.

The other day, Prime Minister Trudeau, in defending the testing of cruise missiles in Canada against considerable opposition, said that you and some of the people around you have, as he put it, given some justification for fears that you cannot be trusted to look for peace.

The President. No, and -- well, he talked about that particular interview and suggested to me that it did not correctly represent his views. Sometimes words can be taken out of context. I have called him to thank him for the open letter to all the Canadian people that he delivered to all the press of Canada in which there it is, with nothing out of context, and you can see how he feels.

I know that there's been an effort to express doubt as to whether I really mean it about arms reductions. Let me assure all of your audiences right now, I campaigned over and over again saying that I would stay in negotiations as long as it took to arrive at a real, legitimate reduction of these nuclear strategic weapons; that I believe this is the only future for the world. I not only believe that, but I would like to think that if we can get the Soviet Union to start with us down that road of reductions, they then might see the common sense in going all the way.

I cannot conceive of the world going on endlessly, future generations, with these horrible weapons poised and aimed at each other. The risk is too great. And their total elimination should be the goal of all of us. And I will persist in this and try for this with every means at my disposal.

So, I can't at the same time ignore, nor should the civilized world ignore the conduct of a country that today is bombing helpless women and children, is using chemical warfare, places like Kampuchea and Afghanistan. I don't think that we can remain silent, as too many of us in the world did when Hitler was coming to power, in the face of this kind of conduct. I don't know whether your television networks carried the program that we saw one day of Soviet soldiers being interviewed in Afghanistan, soldiers that have deserted and gone over to the Afghan side.

And if I speak frankly about those things, it's because I believe that we in the Western World, in the free world, must make it clear that, yes, we want peace and, yes, we're willing to sit down and work out agreements with the Soviet Union, but we want them to know that we're not going to forsake our principles that are based on a love of humanity in order to achieve this.

Mr. Hidaka. I ask you about trade now. You have said you're going to veto the local content bill even if it passed the Congress. How do you think about, personally, to exclude a Japanese or a foreign-made automobile out of the United States?

The President. No, I am opposed to protectionism. Protectionism is a two-way street. And I think our Congress knows that I am. And this will be one of the subjects at the summit. And I've been in close consultation with your Prime Minister Nakasone on this whole matter, and I appreciate very much his feeling and his approach to fair trade and free trade among nations. So, I will oppose any efforts here in our own country at unwarranted protectionism. We had that.

I may be the only one old enough to remember the Great Depression. That, too, was worldwide and far greater and deeper than this recession has been. But at that time, a part of what kept it going and fed the fires of that Depression was protectionism throughout the world and our own Smoot-Hawley tariff bill which was passed at the beginning of that Great Depression. That is not the way to go. Open trade, fair trade, is what we must have.

The President. The future of them? Well, I am hopeful that Syria, reluctant now, could be persuaded to do as the Israelis have agreed and leave, as they promised they would. The peacekeeping forces -- yours, the French, our own -- are there at the invitation of the Government of Lebanon to help keep things stable while Lebanon, after all these several years of division and dispute, once again assume sovereignty over its own soil. And, therefore, my own feeling is we should be willing to maintain them there until the Government of Lebanon says they have things under control and no longer need them.

To you, is it a signal not to increase your military presence in that area or, on the contrary, a reason to do so? And, if so, why is it that American democracy in that part of the world always seems to support the extreme right?

The President. Well, in this instance, pardon me, the reverse is true. There's no question, the past history of El Salvador has been a history of military dictatorships, as has been true in so many of our neighbors to the south, but this is a government, now, elected by the people. They had elections last year. More than 80 percent of the people turned out to vote, and they voted for peace. They voted for this government and an end to the guerrilla activity which is backed and sponsored by Cuba, by the Government of Nicaragua, and by the Soviet Union.

This tragedy, this young man being murdered, follows reports that we've had that the guerrillas were going to move in with terrorist groups, and move in closer to the capital, and try to bring terrorist acts right to the very heart of the capital of El Salvador. It is not going to change our attitude about the necessity to continue both the economic and the military aid which we're giving.

The contrast is in Nicaragua, where a revolutionary government did overthrow a right-wing government. And our country -- I wasn't here then, but my predecessor did not lift a finger to help that right-wing government; indeed, when the revolutionary government came into power, immediately offered financial and economic aid. But what happened in that revolution was -- built, as it was, of a coalition of forces -- they ousted the democratic forces. And the group that is in power now in Nicaragua is as totalitarian as any Communist country. And they are seeking -- they are aiding the guerrillas that are trying to overthrow the democratic government of El Salvador.

And the guerrillas that are fighting in Nicaragua are parts not of the government that was thrown out of power, they are formerly allies in the revolution who are seeking to restore the original goals of the revolution which were democracy, elections. Incidentally, El Salvador is going to have another election before this year is out to elect a President. So, we're not supporting right-wing governments.

The President. Well, I know that in the ministerial meetings that have been held so far, there has been great agreement among us about the need not to trade, as I say, in high technology, which aids the Soviet Union militarily; not to give low interest, long-term credit for their buying. And so I would feel that, with the communications that I've had with your Chancellor, that they're continuing on that line with what would be legitimate and normal trade of the kind that we've proposed with our own grain agreement.

Mr. Suchet. Mr. President, Mrs. Thatcher is putting in what can only be described as a flying visit to the Williamsburg summit. You, obviously, hope it will be worth her while. In what way might it be?

The President. Well, I'm sure that it will be. And I must say, being now a veteran of only two previous summits -- the one in Canada and the one in France -- your Prime Minister makes a very valuable contribution to every one of those summits. I have great respect for her and so do all the others. And it was going to be a great loss to all of us if, because of the election, she had felt that she could not be here. And we recognize the sacrifice she's making in the behalf of all of us and appreciate it very much. But I know that she will be a solid contributor on these subjects we've talked about -- on the need for continued economic recovery, on the need for fair trade without protectionism and, again, on the East-West situation.

The President. Thank you very much. It's going to be a little different than in the past, and this meets also with the approval of all of our leaders. I wanted them to not be so rigid as to agenda that they would write a communique in advance of what the meetings accomplished. We're going to throw the floor open for legitimate, informal discussion on all subjects.

The President. Prime Minister Fanfani and I have had productive discussions today covering a wide range of issues. We confirmed the broad consensus that exists between our two countries on matters concerning the Middle East, Western security and solidarity, international economic cooperation, and world peace.

I took this occasion to thank the Prime Minister for Italy's continuing vital contribution to the Western alliance, particularly in regard to INF, on which Italy's support has been exemplary. I can say without reservation that the United States regards Italy's role in NATO as second to no other member of the alliance and our friendship as a precious asset.

In recent months, Italy has been demonstrating its courage and its admirable sense of responsibility in the multinational force and observers in the Sinai and participating in UNIFIL and as a part of the multinational force in Lebanon. And Italy has been doing its share and more. This burden, as must be expected, has not been without cost. I expressed to the Prime Minister our deep regret over the death of Italian soldier Filippo Montesi and the wounding of several more Italians in Lebanon. These brave men stood side by side with our marines serving the cause of peace in that troubled country.

Italy has also been in the forefront of endeavors to promote harmony in the horn of Africa and in seeking tangible progress to alleviate world hunger. In the important area of East-West economic relations, the Prime Minister and I confirmed the significance we attach to current discussions aimed at achieving a broad transatlantic consensus. As we proceed on to Williamsburg, I'm most grateful to have the continuing benefit of Italy's wise counsel and advice.

We Americans share the values of democracy and individual choice. And since Italy's spectacular liberation of General Dozier from his Red Brigade captors back in 1982, the general feeling around Washington has been Viva Italia. The genuinely friendly nature of our relations and Italy's tangible commitment to preserving peace and freedom cause me to repeat that sentiment today.

America is proud to have Italy as a friend and as a partner in meeting the challenges ahead. And I personally look forward to having the continued counsel and support of Prime Minister Fanfani and other Italian leaders.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, at the White House in the past, with President Eisenhower in 1958 and then again with President Kennedy in 1961 and 1963, I had already experienced those possibilities of understanding which exist between the United States and Italy. I thank President Reagan who, by his courteous invitation, has afforded me the opportunity to ascertain again how solidly the friendship that was so successfully promoted by Alcide de Gasperi has been maintained.

In his cordial welcome, President Reagan has pointed out some important aspects of this friendship, the Atlantic alliance, which commits us also with respect to intermediate-range nuclear forces, ensures peace through the necessary arms balance. Our common action in the Sinai and in Beirut facilitates the settlement of difficult situations. In Geneva, Vienna, and Madrid, we are seeking just solutions to the problems of disarmament and respect of human rights.

I also wish to recall two beneficial effects of this longstanding cooperation of ours: the rise of Italy from the situation in which it found itself at the end of the Second World War amid all the destruction, to the position of being one among the seven most industrialized countries in the world; and the cooperation given to the United States also by Italy in order to avoid that the 1962 Cuban missile crisis become the first nuclear war. These are two effects of a common action for progress and peace.

Today there are two major causes for concern for all people -- the economic crisis and the threat of a nuclear clash. The exchange of views with President Reagan allows me to consider today's meeting as useful in order to strengthen two great hopes -- the hope for economic recovery, which is to be consolidated at Williamsburg, and the hope for a constructive conclusion for the missiles negotiations currently taking place in Geneva.

With the fulfillment of these two hopes, the world's economy will benefit from the recovery we all seek. Peace, even today uncertain, will become finally secure. Millions of individuals will return to work. All peoples, especially those from the Third World, will resume the path to development. Funds, which will be subtracted from armaments, will given a decisive impetus to the third industrial revolution.

The clearing of the horizon will make the citizens of the United States and of Italy realize once again that cooperation between their two countries continues to be an important factor for peace and progress.

Today, as in the past, there are problems that must be solved and challenges that must be met. We can tackle them with our full strength and creativity only because we are free to work them out in our own way. We owe this freedom of choice and action to those men and women in uniform who have served this nation and its interests in time of need. In particular, we are forever indebted to those who have given their lives that we might be free.

All these were honored in their generation, and were the glory of their times. Their bodies are buried in peace; but their name liveth for evermore.'' As a tribute to their sacrifice, let us renew our resolve to remain strong enough to deter aggression, wise enough to preserve and protect our freedom, and thoughtful enough to promote lasting peace throughout the world.

I was surprised to read in the press that the NEA considered my remarks calling for teachers to receive pay based on merit, rather than seniority and number of college credits earned, as a ``disgraceful assault on the teaching profession.'' My intent was to support the recommendations of the National Commission on Excellence in Education and to raise my voice on behalf of the thousands of outstanding teachers whose compensation is held down by pay scales that fail to recognize and reward many distinguished teachers by paying them commensurate with their worth.

The Commission's report makes clear that this panel of distinguished educators, scientists, and scholars uses the term Master Teacher to identify those individuals particularly deserving of recognition, rewards, and additional responsibilities. As you know, Secretary Bell has been calling for adoption of the Master Teacher concept for over two years. This Administration is concerned about our teachers and we want to be helpful in achieving some badly needed reforms.

University. I favor the use of an effective evaluation system to guide decisions made in the retention, promotion, and tenure of teachers. Additionally, as the Commission points out, teachers should have a voice in these decisions, through a peer review system that includes teacher participation.

I cannot understand how the NEA concluded that these remarks, intended constructively to support the Commission's recommendations on how to improve the teaching profession, constitute an assault on teachers. In my view, the teaching profession has suffered for years from lack of recognition and reward of our most talented teachers. I would think that the NEA would join in this endeavor rather than strike out with criticism of these important recommendations.

But I was disappointed to learn that this proposal was not enacted largely because of the vigorous opposition by NEA and its State affiliate, the Tennessee Education Association. Secretary Bell has been working with governors, State legislators, school boards, school administrators, and teachers on the Master Teacher concept, and we believe that the Tennessee plan would have been a great first step.

My Administration is deeply concerned about the condition of the teaching profession. We are neither attracting nor keeping sufficient numbers of bright and talented citizens in the teaching profession. Until NEA supports badly needed reforms in salary, promotion, and tenure policies, the improvements we so desperately need will only be delayed.

I am responding to your public comments concerning the merit pay proposals with the hope that your organization might be persuaded to change its position on merit pay scales for teachers. I fear that NEA's long-standing opposition to new ideas like the Tennessee Master Teacher proposal has been a major obstacle to paying our outstanding teachers what they deserve.

I sincerely hope you will reconsider your position. This is the key to improved learning opportunities for the nation's schoolchildren. This was the intent of my remarks. We have an unprecedented opportunity to make great strides in education now that this panel of distinguished citizens has made such an outstanding report to the American people. Let's all join together and improve teaching and learning in America. I agree with the Commission: Our nation is, indeed, at risk. Because of the nation's 45 million elementary and secondary schoolchildren, we should all pitch in and take the first crucial step to improve the teaching profession. I hope the NEA, of all the organizations in this nation, would be a leader in advancing this long overdue reform.

Nancy and I and all the members of the White House staff are deeply saddened today at the news of the death of our dear friend and respected colleague, Joe Holmes. In mourning Joe's passing, however, we can't help but admire the courage and tenacity with which Joe battled his cancer, always maintaining his sense of humor and conducting business from his bed until the very end.

Governor, he was responsible for coordinating my media program and earned the respect of all who knew and had the privilege of working with him. As a spokesman during the campaign, Joe always articulately and honestly answered the questions posed, and as Coordinator of White House Audio-Visual Services, Joe made a significant and lasting contribution to history and did so in a manner which exemplified the best of public service.

The bill establishes a foundation to perform a variety of functions that are within the scope of those vested by statute in Uniformed Services University of the Health Sciences. Although not mentioned in the bill's statement of purposes, the Senate committee report indicates that the Foundation would be designed primarily to receive gifts, grants, and legacies from private sources and channel them to the University, and thus to further the University's teaching, research, and services without additional government expenditures. I am in full sympathy with this worthy purpose behind the bill.

The bill provides, however, that of the nine members of the Council of Directors, the governing body of the Foundation, four ex officio members of the Council are to be Members of Congress and the four operating members of the Council are in effect to be appointed by the congressional members.

The Attorney General has advised me that this reservation by Congress of the power to appoint the officers who are to discharge the legal responsibilities of the Foundation with the intent to remain involved in the direction and supervision of the Foundation constitutes a violation of the principle of the separation of powers. The separation of powers requires that after a statute has been enacted by the legislature it may be enforced or interpreted only by the executive or judicial branches.

I fully support proper effort to shift to the private sector some of those functions and funding methods which are now being performed by the government. However, this valid and worthy objective should be carried forward consistent with the principle of the separation of powers under our Constitution. In this regard, the sponsors of the legislation have agreed to give full and fair consideration to constitutional concerns. Accordingly, with this understanding, I have approved S. 653.

Q. Mr. President, I know there is no prearranged communique for this. You must have one or two things you'd like the summit to take note of. What's of particular interest to you and the United States that you'd like some sort of agreement on?

If you have people feeling pessimistic, you're going to find a holdback on investments. You're going to find people basing and businesses basing actions on mistrust of the future, rather than confidence.

Q. Mr. President, in taking this more free-form approach to the actual transactions down there, aren't you running a risk of missing an opportunity? I mean, for instance, on the energy front at a time when oil is not in short supply, couldn't the U.S. and its allies be looking for more concrete things to do in unison that would help head off future energy shortages insofar as import duties or other measures?

The President. Well, when you discuss the whole subject of energy -- and, as I say, this is just one of a number of issues that I think there, that we've been discussing at the ministerial level over the year -- I think, yes, there are a number of facets to it long-range. The matter of nuclear nonproliferation, to see that we're all together on this and conscious of the threat that this could be to the other things we're trying to achieve in world stability and peace.

And that's the idea of this, that you have some issues that we know our ministers meet on and have talked about. But to put them out there without some prestructured meeting that's going to follow a definite agenda, and, who knows, there may be some one of them that's got some particular questions that they think should be taken up by the group. It'll be that kind of a discussion.

Q. Mr. President, in preparing for the summit, I'm told that you went to extraordinary lengths to brief yourself on the issues and to become well versed in the complex questions of international economics. That being the case, I wonder whether, in this whole process of preparing for Williamsburg, you're thinking about any of these issues has undergone any change, any modification or new subtleties that you may not have had before?

The President. No, much of the extensive preparation is because, being the host, I'm going to be in charge. I'm going to be the, well, you could call it moderator or whatever. And this has been a case of talking to the people that have been in the various meetings, all the discussions that have been going on, so that I won't in the series of meetings overlook anything.

The President. Oh, no, this was a thing that's particularly under American law. Where there is a particular industry in an emergency situation and that must have help in order to make itself able to be competitive, it is a temporary situation. And our law provides for that, and that's what that was all about.

Q. Mr. President, do you see any major differences with the European problems that need to be solved before you can come through to a successful conclusion to the summit? Any major differences with the European allies that need to be resolved at the summit before you can have a successful conclusion?

The President. I don't foresee anything, really, of a confrontational nature. I'm sure there are going to be differences of opinion and approaches and so forth. But I have been in communication with all of the participants -- in fact, several exchanges between each one of us. I'm having individual meetings with each head of state as they arrive; one just later here this morning with Prime Minister Nakasone of Japan. Yesterday I met with Fanfani of Italy.

Q. Mr. President, given the general concerns about protectionism, would you consider, as has been suggested by the former French President Giscard d'Estaing that the summiteers sign a formal communique not to introduce in the next 2 years any new protectionist measure or any new trade restrictions? Sort of a formal document to that effect.

Congress, for example, you will veto -- but would you be prepared, given the realities of high unemployment here and the fact that next year is an election year, to sign a formal communique saying, all right, no document with any further restrictions or trade tariffs will be signed?

The President. Well, now this is something that I'm sure is going to be a matter of discussion, based on my own communication with all of them. I think, from these conversations, that all of us are going to be on the side of not only resisting protectionism but looking into where it presently exists, how much we can do to lessen it. In fact, I've found agreement among everyone that this is not the way to go, that the more we can go toward free trade the better off we'll be.

Q. Well, supplementary to that, given the interdependence of the Canadian and American economies, it's being discussed again in Canada, the question of totally open, free trade between the two countries, no restrictions of any kind on anything, what do you think of that idea?

The President.  --  -- you're asking me in advance of the discussion. I'm going to be very anxious to -- or interested in all of us laying out our views on this, because, as I say, I think that basically all of us are agreed that we're opposed to protectionism.

The President. We would like, of course -- the original proposal we made, that the ultimate answer to this would be an end to those kind of missiles on both sides. If we have to take an interim step, we also would hope that it would be global, because many of the missiles we're talking about are mobile, and just driving them over some place else doesn't mean they can't be moved back. This may have to, as an interim solution, result in restriction on numbers, as we ourselves have said in an interim step we're willing to go to.

You're getting into an area that is very difficult for answers at this time, because we're getting into the area of what do you negotiate and how do you negotiate. And I don't think you can do this, particularly when the people you're going to be negotiating with will have this information available to them. So, strategy of negotiations, what you're going to demand, what you're going to try to do, that I can't talk about.

Q. Mr. President, on the economic issues, you are optimistic, and I think most of your advisers are optimistic about this economy. And I think it's true that a lot of the people from the other allies are optimistic that there is a recovery going on. But I think they're very worried about budget deficits here.

Now, you seem to be saying that, yes, you want to get the deficits down, and, yes, it's Congress fault because they're not cutting spending, but a lot of people think that if you -- and you seem to be saying that deficits are really tolerable if you have to get them down by increasing taxes. The allies really don't care which way you get at it, I don't think, but they just want them down. Are you prepared to take a certain amount of pressure on that, and do you think you're going to get it there?

The President. No, I don't -- well, I'm quite sure they're going to want to discuss that and what our plans are. There is no way that you can cut enough in spending or increase taxes enough to eliminate the deficits. You can certainly help, particularly with the cutting in spending, because there's no question but that we have automatic built-in increases in our budgeting, which virtually have the budget out of control.

The only way, really, is the recovery of the economy, and this is why we've followed the course that we followed. To those who suggest you do it by taxes, they are suggesting the thing that would kill the recovery before it gets underway. You don't raise taxes and reduce the money in the private sector, as they would have us do, without setting back the recovery.

As for cutting, the budget proposal that we submitted to the Congress, and which in both Houses they refused to consider, actually would, while we will have a large deficit this year and next year, actually would have put us on a declining deficit with a projection down in the future where you could see a balanced budget coming up.

Republicans, because they're afraid of the 1984 election retaliation, if you can't get them to cut the spending the way you want it to, aren't you on dead center? And what does that say to the allies, when they know that the longevity of the recovery here is what's going to have to be in place to bring them along? I mean, you can't stay on dead center.

The President. Well, but the other thing is that since our plan is working, I don't care what the pessimists say and what the opponents say about it. Let somebody explain to me why interest rates have gone from 21\1/2\ down to 10, why inflation has been cut to less than a third of what it was, why industrial production is up, why housing is up, why automobile production is up, why retail spending is up, real income for the first time in several years is up, and an increased rate of savings. All of these things have taken place, and they didn't just come like locusts because the seasons changed; something must have been going -- we must have been doing something that was right.

Q. I think what they're scared of is continuing that. Do you not believe that the deficits are going to cut that short if you don't have a plan in place this year to cut them short in the next 2 years?

The President.  --  -- and they did project out into the out-years a contingency tax increase that they could pass now based on certain, the economy meeting certain levels. In other words, the recovery would have had to be definitely established 2 years down the road from now, so that a tax increase would not be counterproductive, things of this kind. So, we were willing to meet on those two issues.

But the main thing about keeping the recovery going -- and this was the last sentence I wanted to add to all those other things -- is the recovered economy is the way to eliminate the deficits. If, for example, the growth rate in the economy should turn out to be 1 percent, just 1 percentage point higher -- not 1 percent -- 1 percentage point higher than we've estimated, 5 years down the road that would mean $100 billion less in deficit. If it were 2 percentage points higher, it would mean a surplus.

Q. I think what you're saying, if I can ask just one final question on that, is that the other heads of state seem to be saying, and some of your own advisers seem to be saying, that you're going to have a slower growth rate if you don't get those deficits down; you're not going to get that extra boost from the higher growth rate.

The President. But we are doing, as I say, all three. We're preserving the tax policies that have brought about in large part the economic recovery. We're asking for further reductions in government spending. We do recognize the possibility of a tax increase, once this recovery is on a solid footing, and if it should turn out to be necessary. All of this is going to result in reduced deficits in the out-years on a downward pattern, with the deficits going down. And, at the same time, the economic recovery is going to make, then, the biggest contribution in eliminating the deficits simply by the improved and restored economy. And so far we're leading the world in the recovery that we've made.

Q. Mr. President, one economist for Data Resources pointed out in testimony to Congress yesterday that the structural deficit which you've mentioned several times lately is at some $90 billion this year. Even calculating at full employment of 6 percent, that structural deficit will grow to $180 billion in 1988, due primarily to increases in defense spending, to increases in entitlement outlays because of demographic factors, and because of the indexing that will go into place in 1985. In other words, this recovery, even if it were to get us to 6-percent full employment, does not look strong enough to get at that deficit reduction projection through those years.

The President. Well, that's one economist's voice on this. I challenge some of the points that he made, for example, defense spending as being a major factor. Already, on our own, from our original February 1981 estimate of the 5-year program of defense spending, on our own, by finding legitimate savings and so forth, we have reduced that once-projected $116 billion increase over the projection of the Carter administration for the same period. We've reduced that down to about $50 billion. We've actually made savings of about $66 billion.

The other thing they don't stop to figure is that defense cuts of the kind that some are advocating, you're only going to get 50 cents on the dollar, because you're going to lose another 50 cents, the other 50 cents, in increased unemployment in the industries that would be affected and the lack of tax revenues that brings about.

Now, as to the figure on the structural part of the deficit, that's the structural part of the budget that I've been talking about and the one where we've had the least success in getting cooperation from the Congress. They have been the most reluctant to make the changes, those built-in increases. As for indexing as a means of increasing revenue, then for this administration, that has been referred to as unfair, more than three-fourths of that increased revenue will come from the middle- and lower income earners in our society, and I don't think that's a way to bring about a recovery. The indexing will, the relief that will be provided to individuals, three-fourths of it will go to those middle- and lower income earners.

House come a budget proposal that would increase deficits tremendously. Out of the other they've seen something of an effort of compromise. If you envision the normal legislative process of trying to get together on those two, you come down to a budget resolution that does mean increase to the deficits, and yet it is not binding as far as the executive branch is concerned. And I think that the financial markets understand what I have said repeatedly, that I will use a veto on both appropriation bills and any proposals on tax bills to prevent this extravagant budgetbusting or this wasteful spending to go on.

Q. But doesn't that mean, Mr. President, that effectively speaking, for the balance of this term, your first term, a lot of us are assuming, from your viewpoint, that you're not going to be able to make any kind of breakthroughs on entitlements or any other kinds of major changes, so that for the next 18 months it's just going to be this guerrilla warfare over this veto and that veto, and that you will not be able to make a dent in the deficit?

The President. I have had a letter from each House with pledges to me regarding the sustaining of some of my vetos. And I think that the same process that led us to a bipartisan agreement on how to salvage the social security program, the same bipartisanship that has brought about the victory with regard to the MX missile, I think there are enough people up there in both parties that want bipartisanship and that want to find a solution to these problems.

Q. Could I get back to the Williamsburg summit? Mr. Mitterrand, the French President, has said recently that he thinks he might just as well stay at home. He's also said that if he doesn't get satisfaction, particularly from the United States, on an exchange rate's intervention level of the dollar in the future, he doesn't think any further summits are worthwhile. And I wondered what you think you'll be able to do to persuade him that he isn't wasting his time at Williamsburg?

The President. I think he'll find out he isn't wasting his time. He'll have every opportunity to express himself there, and I do know that, again, at the ministerial level on this very subject, they have been meeting at great length. There's every intention that they go forward on this problem of exchange rates. This came up at the Versailles meeting, and the result of the Versailles meeting was the increased level of consultation at ministerial levels on this subject as well as others. And I don't foresee a confrontation.

The President. Well, the level of the dollar really is because we have been so successful in reducing inflation. And this is not an unmixed blessing for the United States, because we will probably have a 55 to 60 billion dollar trade imbalance this year because our dollar is so solid and so sound. It has made our export products expensive for the rest of the world.

Q.  That brings me to ask, Mr. President, whether, in studying this whole thing, you've come to believe that these countries can, in fact, coordinate their national economic policies in some kind of rhythm that helps each other?

In other words, all of us recognizing that basically our economic structures are the same and going forward in the same programs of helping recovery, stimulating incentive to investment, to increased productivity, eliminating inflation, which then brings down the interest rates which are causing concern. This is the thing that we're aiming for, is this kind of convergence. And we will find that many of the exchange rate problems will disappear as we attain that.

Q. I was going to ask, as far as the question on the exchange rates, isn't that going back again to the, you know, your advisers have been redefining what inflation is, and they're now saying it's not inflation -- I mean, interest rates are not too high because you really have interest rates minus the expectation of inflation. The expectation of inflation is there because you've got the budget deficits. The interest rates are what keeps, you know, the money coming into this country from France and from other countries. Isn't that going back to the same collision over the deficits?

The President. No, and it is true that when you have a dollar as strong as ours and these interest rates remaining there, yes, there's going to be a movement of currency. But the funny thing is they're not helping us pay our deficits, because right now the level of foreign ownership of our bonds is lower than it has been for many, many years. The money that's coming in from outside the country, the United States, is being invested in our economy, out there in the private sector.

Q. Yes, I just -- this first killing of a U.S. military adviser in El Salvador seems to be sort of a milestone, symbolic if not otherwise. And with the Soviets increasing their direct intervention there with arms, are we reaching a point where we may have to consider increasing our involvement there, perhaps even thinking about committing combat troops?

The President. Well, so far, there's been no indication or no hint from any of those countries that this is what they want. I would like to have the cooperation of Congress in going forward with what our plan has been -- three times as much economic aid in that area as military aid, but allowing us to proceed.

Q. Don't you think you're going to get a lot of questions on that at Williamsburg, over dinners, if not for putting in a communique? They're worried about this becoming another Vietnam, aren't they? I mean, isn't that what they're worried about, too, as much as people here?

The President. Yes, there must be the worry of that in our hemisphere here and the stepped-up aid. There has been as much aid by the Soviet Union, as much shipped into Nicaragua in these first 5 months as there was in the entire last year. And that has to be of concern to all of us.

Nakasone and I began in January. And since today is the Prime Minister's birthday, we were especially honored that he could lunch with us here at the White House. And, Mr. Prime Minister, let me just once again wish you a very happy birthday.

The Prime Minister and I had wide-ranging talks. We agreed that cooperation between our two countries continues to be essential to promoting our goals of international peace and democratic values in government.

Williamsburg summit. We're in complete harmony on the central questions, especially concerning the necessity of the industrial democracies to work together to ensure that economic recovery is strong and lasting.

In our common endeavors, Japan and the United States are fortunate to be able to draw on durable and resilient ties extending over 30 years. Today, we've renewed those ties, and I'm sure that the Prime Minister agrees that together we will succeed.

President, for your invitation and the most kind hospitality extended to me and my colleagues. I am very happy to be back in Washington to renew my personal friendship with the President and many other good friends in this country.

The President and I have just completed a very productive meeting in which we have fully exchanged views on the issues of our common concern. This meeting was a part of the intensive consultations taking place between the President and myself since I became Prime Minister of Japan last November.

We have reviewed with great satisfaction our overall bilateral relationship, which has made further progress since my last visit here in January. We reaffirmed our conviction that any issue between our two countries can be solved through close and reasonable consultations between us, since Japan-U.S. partnership has its strong basis on shared values and interests. We have also agreed that we will continue to expand our cooperative relationship in such areas as foreign aid and the fight against cancer.

Further, the President and I have discussed East-West relations, the recent development of situations in Asia and the Middle East. We renewed our determination to keep working closely together to contribute to the world peace and prosperity.

We also agreed that the Williamsburg summit, which is to start tomorrow, will bear a very important role to restore hope and confidence to the world economy, when some encouraging signs are beginning to appear in some parts of the major economies, including that of the United States.

My visit to the White House today has been one of the most memorable occasions in my life, for today happens to be my 65th birthday, and the President has graciously celebrated my birthday at today's luncheon. Once again, I thank you very much, Mr. President, and all my good friends, for remembering me in such a heartwarming manner.

Our main purpose is twofold -- to discuss how we can broaden the economic recovery that's now underway and to reinforce the enduring values in which our close relationships with the other summit nations rest.

My summit partners and I approach this meeting, the ninth in as many years, in a spirit of realistic optimism. We take heart in the evidence that the United States and others are now recovering from the most serious global recession since World War II. Recovery is what this summit is all about. We're convinced that the growing convergence of domestic economic policies among the countries to be represented here will help sustain recovery and expand it to the rest of the world.

With inflation increasingly under control, we can turn our collective attention to solving such problems as protectionism and unemployment. At the same time, we can lay the basis for growth among the less developed countries in whose welfare and prosperity we all have an important stake.

Our work will not, of course, begin or end here in Williamsburg. We don't underestimate the nature or the magnitude of the problems that confront us or the difficulty such problems cause among the less fortunate sectors of our populations. With 22 million people unemployed in the summit countries, we must not flag in our efforts to ensure a recovery that's durable, noninflationary, and rooted in the democratic values that we, as free peoples, cherish.

These efforts are part of a long-term process, addressing the most pressing concerns of what we've come to call ``the successor generation'' -- our children and our children's children. Our work here in Williamsburg is, therefore, not only for the present; in a very real sense, it is for posterity.

I'm confident in the ultimate success of our task. The leaders who will join me here tomorrow have prepared extensively for our summit. I anticipate the closest and most candid discussions with them on what we can do together to help the people in our countries and throughout the world. And now, as always in the long history of democratic tradition, we confront the challenges before us in a spirit of hope and confidence -- a spirit that flows most abundantly from free peoples living under freely elected governments.

Renewed armed conflict serves no one's interest. And the interest of all would best be served by a withdrawal of all forces from Lebanon so that the country can reassert sovereignty throughout its territory.

We understand that the Israelis who had previously been drawing down troop levels have begun to restore those levels in direct response to Syrian attacks on Israeli aircraft and a substantial buildup of Syrian troops in the Bekaa [Valley] and along the border.

Over this Memorial Day weekend, while most of us turn our thoughts to picnics and family outings, an annual summit meeting is taking place in Williamsburg, Virginia, one that's important to our future. It takes place at an appropriate time. A bipartisan majority in the Congress has just demonstrated its support for the recommendations of the Scowcroft commission to modernize our strategic forces and carry us forward on the road to genuine arms reduction.

This is a reassuring signal to our friends and allies meeting in Williamsburg. Here in this old colonial capital, the cradle of so much early American history, the leaders of the major free industrial nations are meeting to discuss the problems, the challenges, and the opportunities that our countries and our peoples share.

Since the last summit in France a year ago, we've made important progress. Today, America is leading the world into an economic recovery that's already being felt in many of the other countries represented here.

Another encouraging development is that more so than any other time in the recent past, the economic policies of the individual summit countries are converging around low inflation and improved incentives for investment, a good sign for a sustained worldwide recovery.

We still have our differences. Friends always will. But they're fewer and less critical today than in a long time. I think most of us are agreed on not only where things stand today but what we must do in the weeks and months ahead. All of us seek the same goal -- a healthy, sustained economic recovery that will revive troubled economies in North America, Europe, and the rest of the world.

That means more and better jobs. And the way to achieve this is to ensure that the new recovery does not rekindle inflation. We're doing this. And we're seeking trade between our countries that is open and free of protectionist restraints, so that both industrial and developing nations can profit from an expanding, rather than a contracting market.

Here at home, our economy is already strongly on the mend. The rising tide of recovery is also beginning to reach to many of our friends and allies. But to keep it going, and to extend its benefits to others still in the grip of the worldwide recession, we must all stick to anti-inflationary, high-productivity policies that adapt new technology, retrain workers, and increase efficiency. The worst thing that could happen now, and one that could stall or at least slow the recovery that's currently underway, would be a political resort to ``quick fixes'' that could trigger a new round of worldwide inflation and rising interest rates.

Now, I know that all of this sounds like economic shoptalk -- a little remote, perhaps, from the everyday concerns of the average American. But while this is an economic summit, the topics it is considering have an impact on almost every phase of our lives -- jobs, low inflation, and the opportunity for a better future for ourselves and our families. For when you get right down to it, freedom is at the base of the enormous productivity of the industrial West, a freedom that has spawned more progress, more individual rights, and more security and opportunity than are enjoyed by any other people living under any other system.

And it's our shared belief in freedom that is the strongest bond uniting each of the seven nations meeting here in Williamsburg this weekend. Each of our nations recognizes the rights and dignity of its citizens. We all believe, in the words of our Founding Fathers, ``that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable rights.'' That's a simple enough phrase, but it represents an incredible leap forward from the tyranny and injustice that still haunts too many other parts of the globe.

And because we, the nations meeting at the summit, are united in our love of personal and economic freedom, our common commitment to maintain peace and defend liberty is that much stronger. There's been a lot of speculation about what will come out of this weekend's summit. I'll leave the detailed analysis to the Monday morning quarterbacks, though for this one they'll have to wait till Tuesday morning. But I'm confident that we and our friends and allies will leave this meeting more, not less, united, that we'll leave it with fewer, not more, differences, and that while it would have been a good session, much will remain to be done.

For the issues we address here in this beautiful and historic setting in the spring of 1983 will still be with us for many years to come. The Williamsburg summit is not the end of our work, but it marks the beginning of a new, more stable period of the free developed world learning to work together, devising long-term strategies to meet the problems we face, and handing over a better world to the successor generation, the young people born in the postwar era who must carry and protect the torch of freedom as America approaches the 21st century.

As host for the summit meeting of industrialized nations at Williamsburg, I have been pleased to receive several communications from leaders of the developing nations, including Prime Minister Indira Gandhi of India and President Belisario Betancur of Colombia, who wrote on behalf of other countries. They have expressed their concern about serious economic problems in developing countries and their hope that these problems will be discussed at this summit.

We meet here in Williamsburg in a spirit of common purpose with all free nations of the world and a common dedication to achieve sustained noninflationary growth and an improved international trading and financial system. We are mindful, in particular, of the circumstances and concerns of the poorest countries who need our cooperation most.

The concerns of the developing countries have been an integral part of the preparations for this meeting, and I look forward to a full discussion with my summit colleagues of both the problems and the opportunities that arise from the close interrelationships between the economies of the developing and industrialized nations.

It's bad enough to have to interrupt a very lovely, festive evening by making a few formal remarks, but it is even worse when I find that by coming up here I have had to shut off the music of the New Orleans Preservation Jazz Hall Band that was flown up here from New Orleans for the occasion -- a very historic group. But I would like to extend a very warm welcome to all of you to this latest of our series of economic summit consultations begun so constructively 8 years ago at Rambouillet.

It's encouraging to note that in the year since we last met in this forum, the underlying economic situation of the industrialized countries has improved markedly. Although many problems remain, we have made steady efforts to restore conditions for growth in our national economies and international recovery is now underway. Against this background, we can all look forward to a most productive session.

Rather than concentrating on a single issue, this summit will take an integrated view of the domestic and international aspects of the world economy. Broadly speaking, we are dedicated to achieving noninflationary, sustained growth and continued improvements in the international trading and financial system.

There are in our view several basic relationships in the world economy upon which we should focus -- the relationship between growth and an open, international economy; between domestic economic policies and exchange rate stability; between finance and trade; between enhanced access to markets and long-term management of the international debt problem; between investment, public and private, and economic growth in the developing world; and between economic strength and security. These are all matters of deep concern to our group of countries.

We look at the world economy against a background of many common interests and shared values. These are invaluable ties which I'm sure this gathering at Williamsburg will serve to strengthen and reinforce. And in this spirit I, like you, am looking forward to the discussions of the next few days with enthusiasm and confidence.

Note: The President spoke at 8:30 p.m. He hosted the reception and dinner for the heads and members of the summit delegations. Following the reception, which was held on the terrace overlooking colonial gardens on the banks of the James River, the President escorted his guests into the mansion, where dinner was served in three different rooms to the heads of delegations, the foreign ministers, and the finance ministers.

At the dinner, the President and the other heads of delegations discussed security issues. Prior to the President's departure from Carter's Grove, he and Secretary of State George P. Shultz briefed the foreign ministers on the discussions. The President then returned to Providence Hall.

It has been inspiring to meet with the leaders of the seven major industrial nations in this beautifully restored village of the past. Here we have tried to shape the positive and common approach to our economic future. These democracies feel special responses for -- or responsible for the world economy and for the democratic values we all share. And so, we came together determined to do something about some of the world's toughest problems.

Our meeting has shown a spirit of confidence, optimism, and certainty -- confidence that recovery is underway, optimism that it will be durable, and certainty that economic policy and security ties among us will be strengthened in the future.

The United States has been privileged to host this meeting from which a message of hope can be sent to the people of the world and to future generations. Together the summit partners are facing today's enormous challenges head on and not settling for quick fixes. We are the guardians of fundamental democratic values, the values that have always united us.

The meeting will conclude with tonight's dinner, and may I just add a heartfelt thank you to the wonderful people of Williamsburg who have been so warm in their greeting to us, so gracious and so kind, and that have made this, in addition to a hard-working session, a distinct pleasure. And I think I speak for all of us in saying this.

Our nations are united in their dedication to democracy, individual freedom, creativity, moral purpose, human dignity, and personal and cultural development. It is to preserve, sustain, and extend these shared values that our prosperity is important.

Nevertheless, the industrialized democracies continue to face the challenge of ensuring that the recovery materializes and endures, in order to reverse a decade of cumulative inflation and reduce unemployment. We must all focus on achieving and maintaining low inflation, and reducing interest rates from their present too-high levels. We renew our commitment to reduce structural budget deficits, in particular, by limiting the growth of expenditures.

We recognize that we must act together and that we must pursue a balanced set of policies that take into account and exploit relationships between growth, trade, and finance, in order that recovery may spread to all countries, developed and developing alike.

Our discussions here at Williamsburg give us new confidence in the prospects for a recovery. We have strengthened our resolve to deal cooperatively with continuing problems so as to promote a sound and sustainable recovery, bringing new jobs and a better life for the people of our own countries and of the world.

I. We have examined in the light of our experience the procedures outlined in the undertakings agreed at Versailles last year which seek to ensure greater monetary stability in the interest of balanced growth and progress of the world economy.

II. We reaffirm the objectives of achieving non-inflationary growth of income and employment, and promoting exchange market stability through policies designed to bring about greater convergence of economic performance in this direction.

A. We are focusing on near-term policy actions leading to convergence of economic conditions in the medium term. The overall medium-term perspective remains essential, both to ensure that short-term policy innovations do not lead to divergence and to reassure business and financial markets.

IV. We shall continue to assess together regularly in this framework the progress we are making, consider any corrective action which may be necessary from time-to-time, and react promptly to significant changes.

As I noted at the outset -- that our countries were linked by a multitude of mutual interests and by a shared commitment to freedom and democracy. Williamsburg, as a site, was the site of the first representative assembly and the second university in the colonies which then became the United States. It has been a particularly appropriate place in which to rededicate ourselves to these principles.

The preservation of the values we share must strengthen our domestic economies, seek advantages of vigorous international trade, and deal intelligently with the problems of crises in the developing world. And while doing this, we must also give appropriate attention to our security interests. These objectives are complex, sometimes seemingly contradictory and always difficult to achieve.

This meeting has, in my judgment, achieved that objective. It has left me more confident than ever of the basic health of our free way of life and our ability and cooperation to lay a sound foundation for our children and our children's children.

In that spirit, I want to toast all of you, who in the last few days have participated in this chapter of a vital and unceasing effort. And so, therefore, I think we can drink to the causes that have brought us here, to the success that we've had, and to our dream of continuing on this road as far as we all can see.

But in connection with the question also on structure, the difference was that I've been -- the summits that I've been to before, each head of state would make a statement and that would be it then. Whether they agreed, disagreed or not, they had made their statement. Well, the difference was, here, you'd open up a subject -- let us say that the subject had to do with trade, we'd open up the subject, and everyone could express their views and so forth. And then we kept going and discussing to see what we could all agree on as a consensus of what we would do with this in the area of this subject that would further benefit not only us but the world.

The President. Not really. The whole idea of convergence, that the answer is that you can't have one nation recover without the others, that this is a world recession, that what we do affects each other, and that, therefore, we must have more surveillance, more constant communication, particularly at our ministerial level, on the progress that we're all making. And this included the developing countries also, that they cannot be out here on the other side of a door, that their good economic situation, their prosperity is vital to us as ours is to them. And, as I say, there was great agreement on this.

But what then did happen was you had the thoughts of others that contributed to come into a consensus as to how we were going to go about this, what we were going to do. And remember that the idea of the subjects wasn't just chaos of anyone coming with what they thought. A lot of this was based on the fact that at the ministerial level, OECD [Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development], the NATO summit, in the discussions on the international monetary funds and all, we were well prepared in advance of knowing what was on the minds of each other.

The President. Well, in that as I interpreted the question there, was there any sudden situation where you had just diametrically opposed ideas, say, a way to bring about prosperity. Well, no, everyone recognized that -- for example, in our own problems of deficits and interest rates and the bad effect that they have had on the economy -- there was general agreement on all of these things. And then the thing was how, for example -- well, it's in that statement that came out, differing than some conferences where the statement was written in advance and before you'd had the discussions. That statement was the result of the discussions.

Q.  --  -- in the United States. But I know you were told by some of the leaders in there that despite the best expected performance of the economy, unemployment is going to remain high for some time to come; recession may even deepen in some countries. And there are people who are concerned about the political and social upheaval that this can cause and, therefore, might favor some kind of quick fix, at least to avert the kind of crises the United States faces. Did that discussion not temper your views about at least some quick fixes some way?

So -- and there is great willingness on the part of all of them, that they realized that they had to face up to some social changes in order to get control of excessive spending. And, as I say, the document attests that -- the statement to the outcome.

We didn't leave any subject up in the air and say, well, you know, ``We're differing on this; let's move on to something else.'' No. We stayed until we'd worked out what we all felt was a way to go on the particular subject. And there was no vote taken. There were no winners or losers. There wasn't any case in which five said, well -- to two, ``You're out-voted and this is what we're going to say.'' No. Before we settled on it, all seven were in agreement.

Q. Mr. President, your administration wasn't -- it's well known that your administration wasn't enthusiastic about an international conference -- monetary conference. Did you modify your views during the summit?

The President. The funny thing was in the conversations, it isn't so much a modifying of views as it is a learning of what the views really were. For example, the principal proponent of such a conference opened by making it plain that he had not meant in any way that we go back 40 years and follow a pattern of something that was adopted 40 years ago -- the world has changed -- but that it was something to be looked at. Well, we ourselves had come with the idea that just as out of the Versailles summit -- and while many people have been quick to say that nothing good came out of that, a lot did. We have had since the Versailles summit a relationship at the ministerial level on several subjects that has been ongoing and that has made great progress with regard to trade, the East-West situation, all of these things.

And so, the idea that these same ministers will now, as they go forward in this surveillance -- mutual surveillance to make sure that we're not getting off the track in some country or other that might set back for all of us the recovery, that this they will look at very closely and see if such a conference would be a help in what we're trying to do. Now, it's going to depend on what they all decide and what they recommend.

The President. There's no question about the value of the dollar, that it results from our success with reducing inflation. And, of course, we want to go on reducing inflation. But we also want to see, as the others progress, that this levels off, because, remember, the high dollar is not an unmitigated blessing for us. We will have a trade deficit this year of probably $60 billion simply because the high value of the dollar has priced us out of many foreign markets.

We'd like to see a better balance. But we believe the better balance will come through convergence. And so, here again, out of this has come the decision that we're going to monitor each other closely on how we're progressing on this.

Q. Mr. President, you indicated in an interview last week that the Soviets were stepping up their aid to Nicaragua. I wondered whether you see the possibility of a superpower confrontation developing in Central America, and whether increased Soviet aid requires an increased response from the United States.

The President. Well, it is a little off the summit. I did, in one session, simply explain as well as I could the entire situation in Central America. And many of them admitted that they had not been clear on some of what was going on.

There has been a step-up in Soviet activity as to bringing in supplies. But we still believe that our plan of economic aid and such military assistance as we think is needed there in the line of supplies -- training, mainly -- should go forward. But again, call attention to the fact that our economic aid is 3 to 1 in value over the military aid. We want, indeed, a political settlement if it can be reached.

Q. Mr. President, from a very general point of view, now that you have heard the opinion of all the other leaders at the same time, what is your feeling on the future of relations with Russia? Is it going to be an ever-increasing tension and hostility, or there will be a point where there will be a thaw? I'm not asking about your hopes, but about your gut feeling of what actually is going to happen.

Sitting at that table in this summit were the representatives, the heads of state, of nations that not too many years ago were deeply engaged in a hatred-filled war with each other. And here we were, sitting as closely as we're sitting, with a really warm, personal friendship that has developed among us, but more than that, with a friendship between our peoples. And, what is the cause of disarray in the world -- if we had been able to do this with our erstwhile enemies, doesn't it sort of follow that we are the ones who want a peaceful world? I don't mean, when I say, ``we,'' the United States, I mean all of us -- the people who were around that table -- that we are the ones who are striving for peace and have been successful in healing those terrible, deep wounds. But that one country that was an ally in that great war is the cause of tension in the world, and that the things that we had to think about with regard to our own national security, all dealt with our national security vis-a-vis that particular country.

Soviet Union. We are going to -- we've been forced into having to view our relationship with our own security in mind. But I couldn't help but think several times, why in the world isn't that other so-called superpower -- why didn't they have someone sitting at that table able to get along with the rest of us?

The President. Well, detente, as it existed, was only a cover under which the Soviet Union built up the greatest military power in the world. I don't think we need that kind of a detente. But all of us, we're ready at any time that they want to make it plain by deed, not word, that they want to join in the same things that are of concern to all of us -- the betterment of life for our peoples.

East as well, I understand, with your partners. And, most recently, there has been an increasing tension between both Syrian and Israeli forces in Lebanon right now. You have an agreement between Lebanon and Israel for a troop withdrawal, but the Syrians are not cooperating. Really, without their cooperation, you have very little. What is the next step? And can you tell me, with the increased tensions, have you been in contact with the Soviet Union to get the Syrians to cool it?

The President. Well, this is hardly a summit meeting thing, but let me say we're continuing what we've been doing all the time, and that is trying to persuade the Syrians, who had made a statement in the very beginning of all these talks that they would withdraw when the others did.

And as to whether there were several meetings, there was just one meeting in which I summed up and gave my -- well, no, I didn't. I'm sorry. I was thinking there -- I was talking about something else.

No, on the Middle East, we did have one session and a dinner session, and actually it was more of a -- there was no quarrel with what we're doing. It was total support. But there was more a report on some of those who had been closer to the situation back over the years, our European neighbors, giving their views on some of the things that were at issue there and some of the problems.

The President. I don't think you can predict on anything there without getting into the dangerous field of discussing strategy. Frankly, my own opinion is that the negotiations won't really get down to brass tacks until they see that we are going forward with the scheduled deployment.

General Secretary Hu, and Chairman Deng, I would like to express how they were happy to have the opportunity to once again get to know you and to have had cordial meetings with you. Before you leave, I would like also to convey their best wishes to you.

As for myself, I am very happy that we were able to exchange views sincerely and frankly on international and bilateral problems. And I think that your visit has enhanced understanding and improved relations between our two countries. So, I would like to congratulate you on the success of your visit.

The President. Hello. Yes. Mr. Premier, Mr. Zhao, let me just echo what you have said about the great pleasure in this exchange and our hopes for the future. Mrs. Reagan and I couldn't be happier. We enjoyed meeting and being with you, and our discussions, and with our colleagues there. Please extend to them our warmest regards. We leave with many warm memories and a warm feeling for you and your people, and we shall do our utmost to continue the relationship that we feel has been established.

The President. Premier Zhao, again our regards to you. And I convey to you Mrs. Reagan's warmest regards. And we will look forward to one day visiting again, and we would come with great pleasure, believe me. Thank you for all that you have done for us and for making this trip so enjoyable and so fruitful.

The President. Well, any communism -- I obviously have never approved of the system, and they understand that we have our differences about it. However, I must say there -- I think here -- the modernization program, the thing we saw this morning and the indication of results are very -- I was impressed with them, with what they are accomplishing with this modernization.

Q. We asked Premier Zhao how he felt having you in his midst being such a virulent anti-Communist, someone in the past who has denounced his government. He said that you knew that ideology was not the basis for establishing relations one way or the other. What do you say?

The President. Well, I say that, too. And I tell you something that I think we ought to get clear about my position in the past on China. When Richard Nixon went there and made the opening, I immediately supported him in that and publicly went to bat for the value in doing what he was doing. And I think that we -- there have been now three Presidents who -- he opened it; two others have carried on, trying to further this relationship. And I think frankly that we arrived at a new level and a new stage now in the relationship. They understand where -- how we feel -- or where we feel about that system, but we understand how we feel about ours. But we still found there are areas of agreement with regard to peace, opposition to expansionism and hegemony, and we found we could agree on a great many things.

The President. They never said any word about that, and I never put it as preaching to them. I -- that was part of -- I felt that if we're to get along, they've got to understand us and what we believe. That's why I did that.

The President. Well, there's no question but there is -- we've reached an understanding. There were some areas where they had misunderstandings, and we cleared those up. In these meetings today -- in these last few days, why I say we reached a new plateau -- we went beyond the nuts and bolts of a tax agreement or the things that we signed the other day -- that was valuable. They are things that we -- practical things that need to be done. But we moved into a level of general understanding about international relations there on the global level, regional spots of possible trouble, and so forth, and found ourselves in -- in great agreement on many of those.

The President. Well, Sam [Sam Donaldson, ABC News], he certainly had no disagreement with us on what we're doing in our buildup. He was in agreement with that. I would rather not quote him on anything he might have said about another -- about another government. That's up to them to keep their relations.

The President. Very good. I think they have an understanding and a confidence in us. They might not have had that confidence if I had backed down and not said things that I believed -- and they likewise -- and we went forward from there. I feel very good about it. I really believe we've reached a new level of understanding.

The President. You mean physically? Yes, I have to give -- pay my compliments to that doctor who has written the book about conquering jet lag. We followed that program, and I have never made a trip across several time zone changes as successfully as this one has been with regard to instantly being on their time when we arrived. You see, under this doctor's plan, by the time we arrived in China, for 2 days we had been eating our meals on China time, so that it makes a great difference that when you get off, dinnertime is the dinnertime that you've been on, and thus bedtime kind of automatically becomes the normal.

The President. I read these and was surprised, myself, to hear that there were some recommending that. No, I feel very strongly that this is not something we should do. This should be part of the negotiation. Jerusalem has to be part of the negotiations if we're to have peace talks.

The President. Not particularly. I've always had an admiration for the Chinese people no matter where they live. They've proven their great capabilities, their industry, and all of that. I was gratified by the warmth of the reception by all of the people.

The President. Well, we moved right in, and I -- we both expressed our feelings. And it was there particularly that I had an opportunity to correct some misapprehensions they had about us and what we were doing here or there in the world. I think the greatest indication of success was that the luncheon was supposed to be a working luncheon, that we were to continue. By the time we got to lunch we had closed out the agenda, and we had a social lunch.

The President. Well, things having to do with -- such as our attitude in the Middle East and what our goals were. I don't think they quite understood how far we have gone in our relations with the Arab States in trying to bring about peaceful negotiations and so forth. And I think they were very pleased to hear that.

The President. Oh, I gave them orally his regards and greetings that he -- I had talked to him as well as others before I came here, and he, knowing all of them -- as you recall, Premier Zhao called on him while he was in America -- and so I relayed his greetings to him.

The President. Well, evidently, our people tell me there was never any negotiations about that or whether I would, whether anything they carried -- whether it would be word for word or not. I don't feel -- I feel that was their right to do, whatever their reasons may have been, and, uh, just as it was my right to say what I wanted to say when I was over there.

The President. Frankly, I think it had something to do with a very favorable outcome. I think they believe in me, and they have confidence in me they might not have had if I had kind of tried to pretend I was something I wasn't.

The President. Well, I -- I don't think it can hurt. But there certainly was never any consideration of this before, or with regard to election, because all of this was being arranged and was going on long before I'd ever got around to saying what I was going to do.

The President. Twenty-five years late? Would he suggest that we should have sat back and approved when they were calling us imperialist running dogs? You've got to remember that this has been a great change in the leadership and a change in the last 12 years in their position towards us.

Q. I thought you were conscious of saying what you wanted to say, that the speech you gave -- you thought that out quite deliberately, about saying precisely what you wanted to say about America and so forth?

Thank you very much, Frank. Let me just say I'm proud of Alaska's congressional delegation and grateful for their help and support and for the way they represent their State in Washington. And on behalf of Nancy and myself, and from the bottom of our hearts, thank you all for your very warm welcome.

Beijing, Xi'an, and Shanghai. We saw the wonders of that country and the fine antiquities of the old civilization. But I think the best moment was late last night -- or I should say, early this morning.

Now, I had it all in mind that I was going to talk about coming through the darkness and then finally seeing the lights of the coast of Alaska down below -- [laughter] -- and the coastline there, and that we knew that we were seeing America again, and we were home. Well, there was a cloud cover all the way over the Pacific Ocean. [Laughter] So, the lights that we saw were the lights of Fairbanks, and believe me, we knew we were home, and it was just fine.

We went to China to advance the prospects for stability and peace throughout the world. And we went to illustrate, by our presence, our sincere desire for good relations. We went to meet again with the Chinese and review our concerns and our differences. And we went to China to further define our own two countries' relationship -- and, by defining it, advance it.

And I feel that we have progress to report. I had long and thoughtful meetings with the Chinese leadership, comprehensive meetings. We each listened carefully to what the other had to say. We discussed and agreed to cooperate more closely in the areas of trade, investment, technology, and exchanges of scientific and managerial expertise. We concluded an important agreement on the peaceful uses of nuclear energy. We agreed that in this imperfect world, peace in its most perfect form cannot always be reached -- but it must always be our goal. And we, the people of China and the United States, must make our best efforts to bring greater harmony between our two countries.

It's a good thing for the world when those who are not allies remain open to each other. And it's good to remember that competitors sometimes have mutual interests, and those interests can make them friends.

I told the Chinese leaders, as I told the students at Shanghai University yesterday, that we must continue to acknowledge our differences, for a friendship based on fiction will not long withstand the rigors of the world. But we agreed that there is much to be gained from mutual respect. And there's much to be gained on both sides from expanded opportunities in trade and commerce and cultural relations.

I was heartened by some of the things that we saw. The Chinese have begun opening up their economy, allowing more farmers and workers to keep and sell on their own some of the fruits of their labor. The first injection of free market spirit has already enlivened the Chinese economy. I believe it has also made a contribution to human happiness in China and opened the way to a more just society.

Yesterday, before we left, we sat in a Chinese home at one of the now-called townships -- they were once called communes -- the farm communes where they raise the foodstuffs for all of China, but now there is a difference. They owe a portion of what they produce to the government, but then over and above that they can produce on their own and sell in a free marketplace. And in this home, it was most interesting. This young couple, their little son, his mother and father living with them, and he was telling us all the things -- and he built that home himself, and a very fine job it was -- and then told us of how they're saving and what they're saving to buy next. It could have been in any home in America, talking about the problems of making ends meet and that they were saving for this or that for their future.

And I was also impressed -- not only by them but by all of the Chinese that we met -- by their curiosity about us. Many of the Chinese people still don't understand how our democracy works or what impels us as a people. So, I did something unusual. I tried to explain what America is and who we are -- to explain to them our faith in God and our love, our true love, for freedom. They'll never understand us until they understand that.

It was a breathtaking experience and in some ways, I think, a groundbreaking experience. But for us now, it's very fitting that we return home here to Alaska -- the only one of our States that is equidistant to Asia and Washington, a westward facing State, and a State, may I say, from which we've received strong support.

When I was in Beijing, I explained to the Chinese that our attempt to build up our defenses, after more than a decade of almost constant neglect, is an attempt to preserve the peace and preserve freedom in the world. No one has helped us more in our efforts to rebuild our strength than the members of your Alaskan congressional delegation. And I thank them, as always, for their efforts and their good sense.

But it's wonderful to be here, and I thank you again for your very warm greetings. We'll take them with us tomorrow when we meet here in Fairbanks with a great man of peace -- Pope John Paul II, who is also on his way to Asia, to South Korea. His continuing mission of peace is a service to all humanity, and I look forward to seeing and having a few moments with him again, as we had once before in Rome.

Governor Sheffield, thank you very much. Reverend clergy, Senator Murkowski, and the distinguished mayors and the officials of the university, the lovely ladies here at the head table, and all of you, Nancy and I thank you very much for this welcome.

I couldn't help but think when the president of the university was speaking here about this institution that yesterday I was on another campus in Shanghai, Fudan University, speaking to several hundred students, all of whom spoke English. There are a number of American professors there, some American students, but also there are some 10,000 Chinese students attending colleges and universities here in our country. And I took questions in one class from some of the young people there. And I couldn't help but think that if we, in our generation, can continue and hold this peace and do what we're doing, there is the hope -- because I looked at them and I saw the president of the university, Chinese, but a graduate of Smith College and MIT in America; head of the economics department -- I met another professor, Chinese, his degree was from Columbia University. Those young people, they are growing up and learning and having a compatibility with each other across the oceans that can mean peace for the future if we, when we turn it over to them, if we have managed to preserve the peace and give them that kind of a start.

Your State, Governor, is contributing so much to our national well-being. And without Alaska's oil and mineral wealth the United States would be in a far more vulnerable position than it is. The strategic role that you play in our defense is invaluable. And if your congressional delegation and the President have anything to say about it, you bet it's going to continue being a part of Alaska's life. But even more, the spirit that you represent reinforces our self-image as a nation. To most of your fellow Americans, you exemplify that frontier spirit, strength of character, and sense of adventure that all of us claim as our own.

My visit to China has bolstered my belief that our future is bright. And I'm more convinced than ever that we're living in an incredibly exciting time. America is on the edge of a new era of peace, prosperity, and commerce -- and you Alaskans will be playing a major role in shaping this bright future.

The region of the Pacific Basin is expanding with commerce and creative energy. If we can maintain the peace -- and if we're diligent, there's no reason why peace should not prevail -- then the people of our country can expect great leaps in their quality of life in the next century, just as we've enjoyed in this 20th century.

Our trip to China demonstrates how much progress is really possible. Who would have thought that 20 years ago genuine friendship would be developing between our two countries? And I can't help but believe -- after the many hours of meetings that we've had with the Chinese leaders, with the attitude that we saw on the part of people on the street -- that we have that friendship started.

During our visit, I was impressed with the sincere desire of the Chinese people to strengthen our cooperation for the mutual benefit of both our peoples. And I expressed to them on your behalf and on behalf of all the people of the United States our commitment to a more peaceful and prosperous world. And I told them that we're anxious to live and trade together as friends. I found that same sentiment true with the Chinese people everywhere we traveled.

Now, I know there's been much said about my anti-communism. Well, I'm an anti-Communist if you talk about communism for the United States. And in some Communist regimes, I'm very critical of their violation of human rights and so forth. But I have never thought that it was necessary for us to impose our form of government on some other country. The Communists don't share that view; they do seem to be expansionist. Except that I found that our Chinese leaders I was talking with have no expansionist ideas at all. They're resistant to that.

But if our economy is to be vibrant enough to take full advantage of the future opportunities, if we're to compete with the economic powers now emerging in the Pacific, we must follow responsible taxing and spending policies here at home. We have a few things to do.

With murderous inflation, economic stagnation beating us down, a spirit of pessimism totally inconsistent with our national character permeated the land. Our ills were not a product of some uncontrollable cycle. And they were not, as some suggested, a symptom that America was in decline. Our woes were a direct result of going extremely wrong in our taxing policies, big taxing, big spending, and inflation, policies that we have been attempting to change.

By bringing down the rate of growth in Federal spending, by preventing our people from being mauled with higher and higher taxes, by relieving the regulatory burden and by bringing inflation down and keeping it down, we've put our country back on the road to growth and progress.

From the darkness of pessimism, a new, more vital and confident America is emerging. The gross national product was up a healthy 6 percent last year, up at an annual 8.3 percent the first quarter of 1984. Productivity, which will keep us competitive and add to our standard of living, jumped 3\1/2\ percent last year. It fell in the 2 years before we took office. Another signpost of future growth is venture capital. It rose at less than a billion dollars in 1980, and last year it shot up by $4 billion.

There are still challenges to meet. How we come to grips with the deficit problem means a great deal. Any solution that places the emphasis on raising taxes is no solution at all. It's a formula for failure, because we'd be taxing ourselves right back into a recession. If we become overconfident and permit the Congress to fall back into the same ``something for everyone'' spending habit, then we will also end up in the same boat.

I want to take this opportunity to give a special word of congratulations to the members of your congressional delegation -- one of them with us today; the other two, I guess, are tending the store -- Senators Stevens and Murkowski and Congressman Young have been fighting the good fight. And I want to thank all Alaskans for sending them to us.

In the international arena, we face great challenges. We're trying to restore a balance of military power, making up for more than a decade of almost constant neglect of the defense needs of our country. We would rather negotiate agreements with the Soviets than build new weapons, but we cannot negotiate with empty chairs when the Soviets walk away, as they have, from the bargaining table.

In Central America, our friends are not only struggling for democracy; they're battling for their lives against a Soviet-sponsored Nicaraguan power play. Our nation cannot afford to permit Soviet-sponsored guerrillas to shoot their way into power and turn Central America into a string of Marxist-Leninist dictatorships.

Tomorrow I am meeting with Pope John Paul II, a man and spiritual leader for whom I have enormous respect and affection. Pope Pius XII, Eugenio Pacelli, has noted the burdens that we Americans carry. He was the Pope at the time of World War II. And right after that war, he said of us, ``The American people have a genius for splendid and unselfish action.'' And he added, ``Into the hands of America God has placed an afflicted mankind.'' Well, we're proving to the world that the American spirit is alive and well. Together we'll keep America the land of freedom and opportunity that God intended it to be.

Afghanistan. These new Soviet military actions are unprecedented in several respects, including the large force levels being employed in the Panjshir Valley against the Afghan resistance and the use for the first time in Afghanistan of high altitude bombing, which will bring untold new suffering to the civilian population.

Afghanistan, further highlights the brutal anticivilian tactics being used by the Soviet Union in its efforts to subjugate an independent country. It worsens the instability of the region and raises serious questions concerning the sincerity of Soviet statements that nations should undertake not to use force against each other.

The U.S. remains committed to achieving these internationally agreed objectives. It is past time that the Soviet Union respect the wishes of the world community and bring to an end the terrible ordeal which they have imposed on the Afghan people.

The President. Well, now, I want to welcome Your Holiness to the United States and, on behalf of the American people, say how pleased and privileged we are to have you among us. We're just returning from a mission of peace, and I can think of no more fitting close to this journey than to be here in the presence of Your Holiness, who has worked so diligently for recognition of the rights and dignity of the individual and for peace among nations.

I can assure you, Your Holiness, the American people seek to act as a force for peace in the world and to further the cause of human freedom and dignity. Indeed, an appreciation for the unalienable rights of every human being is the very concept that gave birth to this nation. Few have understood better than our nation's Founding Fathers that claims of human dignity transcend the claims of any government, and that this transcendent right itself has a transcendent source.

But no one knows better than Your Holiness that the quest for human rights and world peace is a difficult, often disheartening task. In the face of turmoil and tragedy in our world we must always remember the central message of your own ministry -- that the quest for peace begins with each of us. When I began this journey on Easter Sunday, I asked the American people to join me in a prayer for peace, a prayer that the nations of the world would renounce the agony and heartbreak of war and learn to live in love with each other. We must never underestimate such efforts. Far more can be accomplished by the simple prayers of good people than by all the statesmen and armies of the world. Only when the fellowship of all men under the Fatherhood of God is recognized and acknowledged, only then will the world finally know true peace and understanding.

To us, Your Holiness, the Holy See and your pastorate represent one of humanity's greatest moral and spiritual forces. And your visit is particularly significant, coming as it does soon after the reestablishment of relations between the Holy See and the United States. For over a century we maintained warm and fruitful, but informal relations. Now we have exchanged Ambassadors, and we hope to build on this new relationship to our mutual benefit and to the benefit of peace-loving people everywhere.

In a violent world, Your Holiness, you have been a minister of peace and love. Your words, your prayers, your example have made you -- for those who suffer oppression or the violence of war -- a source of solace, inspiration, and hope. For this historic ministry the American people are grateful to you, and we wish you every encouragement in your journeys for peace and understanding in the world. I also want to say how grateful I am for this opportunity to meet personally with you to discuss matters of vital concern to the Holy See and to the United States.

Mr. President, dear people of Alaska, esteemed citizens of America, it gives me great pleasure to visit Alaska once again and from this northern State to send a greeting of special warmth and affection to all the citizens of the United States of America. As you know, today I have begun a pastoral journey that will take me to Korea, Papua New Guinea, the Solomon Islands, and Thailand. And I am delighted that this pilgrimage enables me to stop here in Fairbanks and to be among you.

I am deeply honored by the presence of President Reagan who, himself, is just returning from an important trip to China. Mr. President, I thank you for your kind welcome on my arrival, and I wish to reaffirm, through you, my friendship and esteem for all the citizens of your great nation.

When I arrived on my first visit to your beautiful State, dear people of Alaska -- and it is beautiful, your State -- I remember being welcomed by a lovely little child, Mary, who reached out and handed me a bouquet of forget-me-nots, your State flower. Shortly afterwards that little girl was called home to her heavenly Father, but her loving gesture is not forgotten, and her memory is held in blessing.

I found in what she did at that time a living truth about the people of the vast Alaskan territory -- that in your thoughts and in your prayers, you remember the Pope. Today I'm here in person to give you the assurance that I have not forgotten you. Even when I am miles away, I hold the people of Alaska and those of the whole of the United States close to me in my heart. I do not forget you, for we are linked together by bonds of friendship, of faith, and of love.

In some ways, Alaska can be considered today as a crossroads of the world. President Reagan is returning from visiting the beloved people of China, even as I am making my way to a neighboring area in the Far East.

The city of Fairbanks reminds us also of another direction, for it is called ``the heart of the golden north.'' Here in this vast State, 65 languages are spoken, and peoples of many diverse backgrounds find a common home with the Aleuts, Eskimos, and Indians. This wonderful diversity provides the context in which each person, each family, each ethnic group is challenged to live in harmony and concord, one with the other.

To achieve this aim requires a constant openness to each other on the part of each individual and group -- an openness of heart, a readiness to accept differences, and an ability to listen to each other's viewpoint without prejudice. Openness to others, by its very nature, excludes selfishness in any form. It is expressed in a dialog that is honest and frank, one that is based on mutual respect.

Openness to others begins in the heart. As I stated at the beginning of this year in my message for the World Day of Peace, if men and women hope to transform society, they must begin by changing their own hearts first. Only with a new heart can one rediscover clear sightedness and impartiality with freedom of spirit, the sense of justice with respect to the rights of man, the sense of equity with global solidarity between the rich and the poor, mutual trust and fraternal love.

Here in Fairbanks, you have the opportunity to rediscover such values and express them in your harmonious relationship with your neighbor, which reflects the stupendous harmony of nature which pervades this region. May God grant you the strength to express this harmony in your own lives, in your relationships with others. May He give you the courage to share generously and selflessly the blessings that you yourselves have received in abundance.

The President offered to send a Presidential mission to Rome to discuss economic development and humanitarian assistance with Vatican officials. The mission would explain U.S. foreign assistance and economic and humanitarian programs. In turn, the Vatican would brief the mission on its development and humanitarian activities throughout the world. The goal of the Presidential mission would be to begin a dialog that could lead to U.S.-Vatican cooperation in the effort to alleviate hunger and disease and to promote peace worldwide.

As school sessions come to a close, students will have greater opportunities to drive on our streets and highways. Students, like all motor vehicle operators, have a responsibility to adhere to the principle of ``safety first.'' Driving while under the influence of alcohol and other drugs is destructive not only to the irresponsible driver, but to others -- those who are injured or killed in the resulting motor vehicle accidents. Whether the victims are close friends or total strangers, the injury and loss of life are tragic.

We are losing lives unnecessarily, and the economic cost to America is billions of dollars each year. These statistics cannot reflect the devastating grief of families and friends as they view the senseless loss of their loved ones. This grief is repeated many times. Alcohol-related accidents kill twenty-five thousand persons each year.

Our young people are particularly vulnerable when they combine youthful exuberance and lack of driving experience with alcohol- or drug-impaired judgment and reflexes. Alcohol-related accidents are the leading cause of death for our young people between 16 and 24 years of age.

Against Driving Drunk (SADD), and the activities of numerous other citizens groups. Also, over the last decade the U.S. Department of Education has developed alcohol and drug abuse education programs which have reached approximately five million students and indirectly affected millions more.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Settlement Agreement of January 19, 1981, continues to make progress in arbitrating the claims of U.S. nationals against Iran. Since my last report, the Tribunal has rendered 36 more decisions for a total of 118 final decisions. Eighty-five of these decisions have been awards in favor of American claimants. Sixty of these were awards on agreed terms, authorizing and approving payment of settlements negotiated by the parties and 25 were adjudicated. Total payments to successful American claimants from the Security Account stood at over $193.1 million, as of March 31, 1984. Of the remaining 33 decisions, 16 dismissed claims for lack of jurisdiction, 3 partially dismissed claims for lack of jurisdiction, 11 dismissed claims on the merits, two approved withdrawal of a claim and one was an award in favor of the Government of Iran. As of March 31, the Tribunal had held 143 prehearing conferences and 88 hearings on the merits and had scheduled another 19 prehearings and 17 hearings through the end of September.

The Tribunal has rendered a number of significant decisions for American claimants. It has held that expropriation may be either de facto or de jure and that compensation for expropriated property must be prompt, adequate and effective. It has also decided that noncontractual Iranian counterclaims based on taxes allegedly owed by the U.S. claimant are outside its jurisdiction. As I reported in my last report, the Tribunal has requested Iran to stay court proceedings in Iran against at least eight U.S. nationals who have filed claims at the Tribunal on similar issues, but to date Iran has not complied with these requests.

Charles N. Brower has replaced him. Mr. Brower, who had previously been named a substitute arbitrator, is a well-known international lawyer who has served as a senior member of the Office of the Legal Adviser of the Department of State. Mr. Mosk is now acting as a substitute arbitrator. In addition, Carl F. Salans and William H. Levit, Jr. have been appointed substitute U.S. arbitrators. Mr. Salans, a member of the law firm of Salans Hertzfeld Heilbronn Beardsley & van Riel in Paris, France, has an extensive background in international adjudication, arbitration and negotiation. Mr. Levit, an experienced litigator, is a senior partner in the law firm of Godfrey & Kahn, Milwaukee, Wisconsin.

Iranian Assets Control Regulations to continue in effect indefinitely the prohibition of that section on any final judgment or order by a U.S. court disposing of any interest of Iran in any standby letter of credit, performance bond or similar obligation. The prohibition was promulgated to facilitate the ongoing implementation of the Algiers Accords and, especially, to allow the resolution before the Iran-United States Claims Tribunal of the many claims and issues pending before it involving letters of credit. The prohibition was extended indefinitely because it is not possible to predict how much time will be required in order to resolve these claims.

Affairs. He would succeed Theodore George Kronmiller, and the rank would pertain only during periods of his representation of the United States at international conferences and meetings on fish and wildlife matters.

Americans have distinguished themselves by rising to the challenge of adversity. It is in this spirit that voluntarism has become a cornerstone of our way of life and a fundamental part of our country's continuing progress.

The American people are deeply proud of this long tradition of neighbor reaching out to neighbor with a helping hand. In the continuing need to solve community problems, the compassionate actions of the private sector reflect the sense of essential decency and concern that has so often been a hallmark of our national character. Truly there is no finer expression of the values we cherish than our united efforts to address problems through the creativity and the initiative of the private sector.

By acknowledging gratefully our heritage of voluntarism during National Volunteer Week, I hope all Americans will vigorously participate in their community's efforts to better the lives of their fellow citizens.

Guam, and the Northern Mariana Islands, which soon should formally acquire commonwealth status, make the United States of America a permanent part of the area. In addition, we continue to have a special relationship with the Federated States of Micronesia, the Republic of the Marshall Islands, and the Republic of Palau.

Our relationship with the Pacific island region is a partnership. We share a strong belief in freedom and democracy, respect for human rights, and faith in the power of the free market. We want to build on these values to establish even better relationships with the new nations of the Pacific. And we want to help the islanders keep the region free from tensions and rivalries as it has been since World War II.

The President. We intend to maintain a helpful development assistance role, supplementing the larger programs of Australia and New Zealand. We anticipate that future U.S. aid to the region will be at modestly increasing levels.

Our assistance is available indirectly through the Asian Development Bank, the United Nations, and various regional institutions. There are grants to local and U.S. private voluntary organizations for programs in the individual countries, and of course, we have the U.S. Peace Corps. This system seems to work quite well. This approach provides a broad range of U.S. assistance on a regional and individual country basis.

I should also add that private business can and will play a larger role in the economic development of the Pacific island region than aid from any government. This theme was stressed in my message to the South Pacific Conference held in American Samoa 1\1/2\ years ago. The free enterprise system is the best way to promote growth and development. As far as Micronesia is concerned, we are the primary donor, and if Congress approves, we will continue to support the economic development of the Micronesian States under the Compact of Free Association.

Q. Vanuatu has recently established full diplomatic relations with Cuba. The Solomon Islands has adopted a policy of looking to Southeast Asia for partners in its economic development. Western Samoa has full diplomatic relations with the People's Republic of China and a significant cultural exchange program. Kiribati is receiving some material aid from the People's Republic of China.

Kiribati have the right to choose their friends. We share a community of values and interests with the islanders. We try to understand their activities in light of our common interests. We hope they take the same approach with us.

Q. Some heads of state from South Pacific nations have complained that not enough attention is paid to them in Washington. Is there still a residual attitude in Washington that writes off the islands because of their comparatively small populations?

United States began responding to the changing situation in the South Pacific more than a decade ago. We initiated Peace Corps programs, educational and cultural exchanges, and established consulates. As more states became independent, we upgraded the consulates to embassies and accredited ambassadors. This process is continuing. We are now considering additional diplomatic representation in the area. These posts symbolize our recognition of the importance of the Pacific island nations. Also, recently, we began a regional development assistance program and stepped up our contributions to the work of the South Pacific Commission.

States Congress and the international community will recognize that self-government for the peoples of the Trust Territory should not be delayed. I have sent the Compact to Congress with a message urging its approval. We expect close examination of the Compact by the Congress. The democratic process and public review of the Compact will benefit the Compact and the people of the region.

Palau. It is an internal constitutional problem that has prevented Palau's government from approving the Compact and implementing the mandate of the Palauan people. The primary issue has to do with nuclear materials.

Free association is a partnership. Under the Compact the United States has responsibility for regional peace and stability, while Palau would have self-government, substantial economic assistance, and autonomy in foreign affairs. This partnership requires the United States to perform a security role. Therefore, I have asked the United States Congress to approve the Compact with the Marshall Islands and the Federated States of Micronesia at this time. I will request congressional approval of the Compact with Palau only after that government has confirmed that its internal constitutional approval process is complete. We will cooperate with the Palauan Government, but ultimately it is an issue for the Palauans to decide.

Presidents of the Federated States of Micronesia and the Marshall Islands in signing the Saipan accords, which call for prompt approval of the Compact by the U.S. Congress and early termination of the trusteeship.

The President. We are meeting that challenge head on. The United States supports the operations and economic development of these governments under U.N. trusteeship. A long-range capital improvement program devoted to basic requirements such as power, water and sewage systems, docks, roads, and airports, is near completion. Looking to the future, the Compact of Free Association provides substantial grants for government operations, social services, capital improvements, economic development programs, health, education, telecommunications, energy self-sufficiency, and other needs.

This assistance will enable the Federated States of Micronesia, the Marshall Islands, and Palau to work toward the economic goals they have established for themselves. I would like to highlight the point that the elected leaders of the Micronesians will establish the economic policies under the Compact. This will put decisionmaking authority and economic resources in the hands of Micronesians and their leaders.

The President. During the initial term of free association, the Micronesians will have the tools and resources to make significant progress towards economic self-sufficiency. Much will depend on the priorities they establish and their ability to exercise fiscal restraint. The Compact provides an opportunity for them to move toward their goals and objectives.

United States already has important air and naval bases on Guam. They will continue to be the principal U.S. facilities in the Central Pacific. In addition, we exercised our option for a long-term lease of land in the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, which will ensure added flexibility to meet any change in our base and logistics requirements. Although current plans are to use the area only for training, we will also have the option, under the Compact, for limited harbor, airfield, and training sites in Palau. The only other defense installation in Micronesia is our testing facility at Kwajalein. Use of this facility is set by the Compact for 15 years, with an option for an additonal 15 years. We do not anticipate the need for any major changes.

Marshall Islands, and Palau during the years of negotiating the Compact of Free Association with them. In the meantime, many people in the U.S. Pacific territories of American Samoa, Guam, and the Northern Marianas are complaining that they are being overlooked -- not enough U.S. private capital, not enough technical assistance. Do you think these complaints are justified?

American Samoa, Guam, and the Northern Marianas are parts of the American family. We have done much to guarantee that their specific problems receive special assistance. And we will do more. We are working with the three territories to diversify and expand their economies, particularly with the help of the private sector.

The territories do need more technical assistance and a major effort is underway to establish long-range technical assistance objectives for major programs in each territory. Once the objectives are established, needed resources will be better defined. During the last 2 years the U.S.

But there still is not enough U.S. private capital available to the territories. We are exploring ways to make financial capital more available and accessible. We are working closely with the territories to identify and make changes in Federal regulations and legislation that will promote economic development.

The most important thing to remember is that the people there are our fellow U.S. citizens and nationals. They enjoy great benefits and carry the responsibilities of citizenship. They have, and should have, the full resources of the Federal Government available to them. The challenge -- and one I'm sure we can assist -- is to tailor those benefits to their unique circumstances.

In spite of our well-known objections and renewed negotiating efforts in early 1982, the Law of the Sea Conference adopted the convention on April 30, 1982, although, after nearly 2 years, it has not yet come into force. I would also point out that many major industrialized nations share our concerns. As to amending the convention, at this point it would be most difficult, and we are not aware of any move to do so.

Nevertheless, the convention contains many positive and significant accomplishments. We are prepared to accept and act in accordance with international law as reflected in the Law of the Sea Convention that relates to traditional uses of the ocean. We are willing to respect the maritime claims of others, including economic zones, that are consistent with international law as reflected in the convention, so long as the international rights and freedoms of the United States and others in such areas are respected.

The President. The United States is sensitive to the nuclear concerns of the island people. We share the desire to protect the ocean from pollution. The United States is a party to the London Dumping Convention and other international agreements aimed at protecting the health of the oceans. Our domestic laws regulating ocean dumping are even more stringent and are vigorously enforced. The United States is also a member of the Nuclear Test Ban Treaty, which bans nuclear weapons tests in the atmosphere, in outer space, and under water.

Q. The passage of U.S. Navy ships that are nuclear powered and that are capable of carrying nuclear weapons is also of concern to the people of the South Pacific. Can you clarify the U.S. position in this regard?

The President. U.S. nuclear powered warships have an unparalleled record of safe operation since the first nuclear-powered ship became operational in 1955. U.S. nuclear-powered ships have accumulated over 2,700 reactor years of operation without a single nuclear mishap. This record reflects the very strict control exercised over the design, construction, operation, maintenance, and repair of our nuclear-powered ships and the careful selection, training, and qualification of the personnel manning the ships.

Over 40 percent of our Navy's major ships are nuclear powered, and they are among our most effective ships. Access to all areas of the oceans by U.S. nuclear-powered warships is essential to maintain the peace.

The ability of the United States to deter aggression and to help maintain peace throughout the world depends on the ability of its ships and aircraft to travel the ocean spaces, including the South Pacific. The presence of the U.S. Navy ships does not pose a danger to the interests of the people of the South Pacific; rather, it helps guarantee their continued peace and freedom.

The President. As a Californian, I am particularly aware of our Pacific interests. I would like to have our administration remembered as one which fully recognized the importance of Asia and the Pacific. Focus is shifting increasingly to the Pacific, which is now -- as I said earlier -- the fastest growing economic region of the world. We want to build on the good relations we already have and make them stronger. We want to do our part to encourage regional cooperation. And we want to continue our security role, a role that permits the islands to develop politically and economically according to the wishes of the islanders themselves.

Recently, meeting at the White House with a group of Americans of Asian and Pacific heritage, I had a chance to reflect on the contributions to American society that derive from the people of this region. It's part of what you might call ``the spirit of America.'' Back in the fall of 1980, I attended a rally held in the shadow of the Statue of Liberty. And there were many nationalities and ethnic groups there, all reminding us that we're all descendants from immigrants who came here looking for freedom and opportunity. And, while our country had its flaws and we still have them, the American dream was real.

America needs its Asian and Pacific American citizens. They've enriched our national culture and our heritage. They've held the beliefs that account for so much of our economic and social progress. They've never stopped striving for excellence, despite times in the past when they experienced terrible discrimination. We will continue to fight against discrimination, wherever there are any vestiges of it remaining, until we've removed such bigotry from our entire land.

Our relations with our Pacific and Asian friends and allies have never been better. First of all, as I indicated in answering your first question, it's not all foreign policy. The United States of America is part of the Pacific. There's Hawaii, American Samoa, Guam, and the soon-to-be commonwealth status of the Northern Mariana Islands and our special relationship with the Federated States of Micronesia and the Republics of the Marshall Islands and Palau. It is my hope that our administration will be remembered as helping the people of the Pacific Basin achieve their hopes and aspirations, and that together, we will bring a pacific, tranquil future to the region.

When I spoke to you a week ago we were in China working to strengthen cooperation between our two countries, increase opportunities for jobs and a better life for our people, and improve the prospects for a more peaceful world. As I told the citizens of Alaska when we arrived back in the States, I feel we made significant progress.

Today I'd like to speak about our efforts toward another goal, one that might not get the headlines of a trip to China, but that nonetheless has an important impact on our lives. I'm talking about reducing waste, fraud, abuse, and mismanagement in government -- problems that for too long were permitted to grow and spread like an unchecked cancer, plundering your pocketbooks and hindering government's ability to provide essential public services in an efficient and timely manner.

That's why we're pushing comprehensive measures like Reform '88, which involves over 1,000 different projects to upgrade the management of the Federal Government; and why we're moving to implement recommendations of the Grace commission, which I established and which has identified billions of dollars in wasteful government spending.

First, debt collection: For too long Washington seemed only to care about handing money out, not collecting debts owed. In fact, collection practices were so bad the Federal Government didn't even know how much was owed and how much was overdue. We inherited a delinquency rate that was growing at the shocking rate of almost 30 percent a year. In the $8 billion guaranteed student loan program, 1 student out of 10 defaults on his or her loan. These defaults each year equal enough money to give loans to about 700,000 eligible students.

Well, with support from the Congress, we're taking a tough new stance on collections. We're not singling out any individuals or groups, but we can, we must, and we will go after the cheaters who profit from the system at the expense of honest citizens like yourselves who live by the rules.

For instance, one military surgeon in Hawaii refused to pay his student debt, even though he made over $50,000 a year and owned seven pieces of real estate. After being threatened with litigation, he paid in one lump sum the $11,500 that he owed.

Tens of thousands of Federal employees have been reneging on their student loans. They will get one last chance to pay up before finding their July paychecks smaller. Call it enforced repayment through cuts in take-home pay.

Justice Department officials are now aggressively pursuing those who default on loans by putting new emphasis on collection of debts and fines. Our U.S. attorneys collected $201 million last year, a return of $24 for every dollar invested.

The second area -- waste, fraud, and abuse -- is the byproduct of mismanagement. Our management improvements, together with the tremendous accomplishments of our Inspectors General, are a one-two punch taking steam out of the waste and fraud that was eroding faith in our government.

Not only have billions in waste and fraud been rooted out, but preventive actions are nipping problems in the bud before they occur. We're making a very determined effort to crack down on white-collar crime, those who abuse positions of power for their own benefit. Both the Department of Transportation and the Environmental Protection Agency are pushing nationwide investigations of bid rigging in the awarding of contracts for Federal highway and waste-water treatment facility construction. The Justice Department has already initiated 270 criminal prosecutions in highway bid rigging involving 255 corporations and 256 individuals in 20 States.

You've all heard of the problems at the Pentagon with spare parts suppliers charging outrageous prices. Well, what you haven't heard is that this waste was actually uncovered by Department of Defense auditors working for the Inspector General I appointed. We are the first administration which has faced up to these abuses and taken action to correct them.

The progress we've made is a good start, but it's little more than a ripple in the river of waste, fraud, and abuse that's been rising for years. That's why it's clear the way to reduce the deficit is by strong economic growth and by reducing wasteful bloated government, not by raising taxes on you, the people.

The CDE arises out of the ``Helsinki process,'' in which we and our allies seek balanced progress in both the security and human rights areas. The CDE negotiations began last January and are a promising new part of the dialog on European security issues. The participating countries include the United States, Canada, our European allies, the European neutral states, and the members of the Warsaw Pact.

The CDE is an essentially new approach to European security. We and our allies seek an agreement on practical, meaningful ways to reduce the risk of surprise attack and to reduce the uncertainty and potential for misunderstandings over military activity in both the East and West.

During the recess, we have consulted closely with our allies and other participating nations. At my request, our Ambassador to the CDE, James Goodby, has just completed senior level consultations in several capitals, including Moscow. He had a full and useful exchange of views with Soviet officials.

It is important now to engage in serious negotiations on the concrete proposals which the West presented during the first round. Those proposals are designed to increase mutual knowledge and understanding of military forces and activities in Europe; reduce the chance of war by miscalculation; enhance the ability of all to deal with potential crises; and minimize the possibility that military activities could be used for political intimidation. The Western nations are ready for a serious dialog on these issues. We hope this is true of the East as well.

Our proposals in the Stockholm Conference are part of our larger efforts to move forward, in a spirit of genuine cooperation, on arms control and East-West relations. Two weeks ago, at the Committee on Disarmament in Geneva, Vice President Bush presented a new American proposal for a comprehensive worldwide ban on chemical weapons. The same week, we and our NATO allies presented a new proposal at the MBFR talks in Vienna. This initiative is designed to break the impasse in the negotiations on reducing conventional forces in Central Europe.

We are striving hard for real progress in all three negotiations. But it is also vitally important to get on with the urgent business of reducing nuclear arms. I strongly hope that the Soviet Union will heed the wishes of the international community -- and of its own people -- and return to the negotiations on strategic and intermediate-range nuclear forces.

The opportunity for meaningful progress in arms control exists. The Soviet leaders should take advantage of it. Our representatives are ready to return to the two negotiating tables on nuclear arms, and we will negotiate in good faith. As I have said before, whenever the Soviet Union is ready to do likewise, we will meet them halfway.

Correctional officers have the difficult and often dangerous assignment of ensuring the custody, safety and well-being of the over 600,000 inmates in our Nation's prisons and jails. Their position is essential to the day-to-day operations of these institutions; without them it would be impossible to achieve the foremost institutional goals of security and control.

Historically, correctional officers have been viewed as ``guards,'' occupying isolated and misunderstood positions in prisons and jails. In recent years, the duties of these officers have become increasingly complex and demanding. They are called upon to fill, simultaneously, custodial, supervisory and counseling roles. The professionalism, dedication and courage exhibited by these officers throughout the performance of these demanding and often conflicting roles deserve our utmost respect. The important work of correctional officers often does not receive the recognition from the public it deserves. It is appropriate that we honor the many contributions and accomplishments of these men and women who are a vital component of the field of corrections.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Photography, the prime visual recorder of human events, preserves memories, emotion, and sentiment for virtually all Americans. It is an established and growing art form which communicates the beauty and diversity of America as well as the vitality of its culture and its people.

Photography has played an important role in our commercial and artistic lives and in the process of government through motion pictures, video cameras, and still shots. Photographs preserve the history of the Nation and the changing panorama of American landscape and culture. Visual records also contribute to the advancement of many fields of science, technology, and inquiry, including communications, meteorology, geography, medicine, justice, astronomy and agriculture.

America's transportation systems are a mainstay of our economy, an essential component of our commerce, an important part of our defense and the means by which our citizens and visitors alike enjoy the freedom to travel throughout our land.

Historically, transportation has opened America's frontiers. Transportation gave our Nation's territorial and industrial pioneers access to the country's resources. More than any other element of our society, transportation has been a vibrant economic catalyst, building cities, generating new industries, spurring ambitions, providing jobs and linking us to the peoples of the world. Our transportation systems and facilities, including America's merchant fleet and road, rail and aviation networks, support the Nation's defense readiness and emergency response capabilities.

As our transportation systems have developed, they have become increasingly safe. The constant commitment to safety, shared by the government and the private sector, is reducing fatalities and accident rates to the lowest levels in our history, saving lives and preventing injuries.

As we vigorously pursue safety efforts, the Federal government is relaxing the constraints of economic regulation, enabling the Nation's rail, airline, trucking and interstate bus companies to compete more aggressively and operate more efficiently. Economic deregulation is a gateway for new carriers entering the transportation field. It is generating new competition, providing lower fares and more choices for consumers, and competitive rates for shippers. America's transportation industries stand today on the threshold of an era of broader opportunities and greater prosperity. We stand, as well, at the beginning of a new era of space transportation, in which the Federal government is fully prepared to assist the private sector in development of a commercial space industry.

Through both its spiritual ideals and its significant practical efforts, the Jewish community has contributed much to our country's greatness. So many of the values and ethics we proudly espouse in America are derived from the laws and traditions of the Jewish people: That there should be one law for the homeborn and the foreigner; that education and self-discipline are to be continually cultivated; and that family and community are the cornerstones of society. And individually -- as committed citizens, soldiers in the armed forces, laborers and professionals, artists and entrepreneurs -- American Jews have given of their heart, soul and might so that this Nation may prosper.

Sinai. Traditionally, Jews spend that seven-week period between these festivals reflecting on their history and heritage. During this period, American Jews also join with their brethren throughout the world in observance of the National Days of Remembrance, honoring the victims and survivors of the Holocaust, the anniversary of the Warsaw Ghetto Uprising, and Solidarity Day for Soviet Jews. Celebration of joyous occasions like Israel's Independence Day also occur at this season.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 7th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The provisions of the Convention are explained in a report of the Acting Secretary of State which accompanies this letter. The major advantages of a multilateral treaty on this subject are that it provides uniform procedures for transfer of sentenced persons and saves the resources that would be required to negotiate and bring into force bilateral treaties with a substantial number of member States of the Council of Europe in whose jails approximately one fourth of our citizens imprisoned abroad are serving sentences.

Well, thank you very much for the applause, but, believe me, today it's the other way around. I'm here to applaud you. And this is a particularly fitting time to be holding this luncheon -- today is the first working day of National Volunteer Week, and we've just ended a National Year of Voluntarism.

Now, I want to begin by expressing my thanks here to some volunteers who've made this occasion possible. I'm talking, of course, about George Romney and Clem Stone. I remember from our days as Governor, how much interest George took in voluntarism, and fortunately for all of us, it's an interest that he's continued with up until this day. And what can you say about Clem Stone? If he doesn't qualify for most generous American, who can?

Now, there's one lady here today who isn't getting an award, but is someone who really ought to be mentioned. Her name is Edith Westerman. And she volunteers full-time and sometimes works a lot more than full-time in our private sector initiatives office here at the White House. And, Edie, from all of us, thanks for your help in today's event and throughout the year.

Some of it -- in fact, a lot of it -- is not exactly the sort of thing that would be your first choice for bedtime reading. But I want you to know that recently I've had a chance to do some reading that not only riveted my attention but filled my heart with pride. It's a feeling I know all Americans would share if they, too, had a chance to see what I see. I'm referring to the citations for the awards that you're receiving today and the descriptions of the incredible work that you've done through your organizations or as individuals to better the lot of others.

What magnificent stories there are to tell about each of you. You've run jobs in health programs; you've helped the unemployed and the handicapped; you held out a helping hand to those who are forgotten or shunned or can't help themselves -- drug addicts and prostitutes and convicts. You've started worldwide relief agencies and community colleges. You've run Vietnam veterans hiring programs and Indian culture schools. You've helped provide orthopedic shoes and braces for crippled children. You've donated clothes and school supplies for underprivileged children.

In fact, I can assure you that every time my staff and I thought we would single out a person or an organization for these citations, we came across somebody else who was just as worthy of mention. Each one of you has made a personal sacrifice to do the work that you did. None of you ever expected any rewards for what you did. Many times I'm sure there were doubts and lots of discouragement, and it took real courage to carry on.

We've had a lot of heroes at ceremonies here at the White House during the past few years -- our shuttle astronauts, for example, or our marines and rangers from the Grenada expedition. But, believe me, you stand as tall in your own way as any of them. What you've done is in the finest traditon of your country.

Well, each of you here today has demonstrated this unique American spirit of voluntarism, partnership, and innovation. In your own way, you're working to resolve issues in a more effective manner than we could do with large Federal programs. Personal dedication and commitment seem to be the underlying key to success in all of your efforts. And in the 3 years since we started these awards, we've seen an ever-increasing rise in people actively helping their neighbors.

So, I want to applaud you today and thank you on behalf of all your fellow Americans. Every one of us is grateful to you. As members of your families and communities and citizens of our country, you've been an inspiration and an example to us. But most of all, we're grateful for the people you've helped, for the people whose lives you've touched and whose burdens you've lifted because you cared enough to extend a helping hand and a warm heart.

I asked the question after an evening some years ago while I was still in California when we had been in the company of the first of the returning POW's from Vietnam. And I said it to Nancy -- where did we find them? -- after hearing them all evening. And the answer came to me as quickly as I'd asked the question.

I have only repeated it or told this with regard to incidents of that kind, but believe me, it fits today. Where do we find such people as you? And the answer is just as it was with those others -- where we've always found them, the product of the freest, the most generous, the greatest social structure that has ever been devised by man. Just the product of Main Street and the farms and the cities and towns of America.

At the end of this month I will meet with the Foreign Ministers of all the NATO countries to mark the 35th anniversary of NATO's founding. The alliance is sound. But continuing disagreements between two vital members of the alliance, Greece and Turkey, are of great concern. Because our friendship with each country is so important, and because their need for one another is so great, special efforts must be made to reduce disagreements and promote harmony -- particularly on the island of Cyprus, which has become a focal point of tension.

General of the United Nations has worked painstakingly to keep the parties talking to one another. In November, after the Turkish Cypriot declaration of independence, the United States condemned the action and called for its reversal, while also working to encourage the parties to move forward in making real progress. On January 2 the Turkish Cypriots responded by proposing a series of goodwill measures, offering among other things to turn over part of the coastal city of Varosha to the United Nations for eventual Greek settlement. A few days later the Government of Cyprus proposed new guidelines for a comprehensive settlement. Turkey itself announced the removal of 1,500 troops from northern Cyprus. And the Secretary General of the United Nations was preparing to meet with the parties to discuss his own plan. We welcomed these developments as positive steps. Movement was at last occurring.

At this point, less than 2 months ago, Secretary Shultz wrote leaders of the Congress to caution that cuts in the Turkish assistance program could risk endangering this progress. Unfortunately, important NATO-related funding for Turkey was nonetheless cut in committee, no doubt in the mistaken hope that this would somehow stimulate progress on Cyprus. As a result, diplomatic efforts quickly ground to a halt.

I understand the frustration in the Congress and elsewhere about the need for progress. Indeed, I believe the time has come to try a new and more positive approach. Rather than punishing Turkey, let us focus constructive energy on ways of encouraging the parties on Cyprus itself, for it is here, ultimately, that differences must be resolved.

The administration and the Congress need to work together to re-create conditions conducive to successful diplomacy. We ask the Congress to work with us by supporting my request for security assistance for our Greek and Turkish allies, and by removing punitive conditions on that assistance. In return, I am prepared to work with the Congress in committing now to a special Cyprus peace and reconstruction fund of up to $250 million. Specific authorizations would be requested at such time as a fair and equitable solution acceptable to both parties on Cyprus is reached, or substantial progress is made toward that end. I intend this commitment to be a symbol of the shared concern of the administration and the Congress for promoting genuine results on Cyprus.

Peace cannot be bought. But peacemakers should know that the United States is prepared to go to great lengths to ensure that their labors are transformed into an enduring achievement. A reunified, stable, and secure Cyprus would be such an achievement.

We need to recognize, however, that our security assistance to Greece and Turkey is not given as a favor, but rather to deter aggression upon NATO. U.S. national interests are at stake. Greek security needs deserve to be fully met. And Turkey -- working to strengthen democracy, curb terrorism, and defend NATO along its vast common border with the Soviet Union -- also deserves every penny we have requested.

The decision by the Soviet Union means that they have disregarded the feelings of most nations and millions of people the world over that the Olympics will be conducted in a nonpolitical atmosphere. It is a decision that will disappoint many.

The allegations contained in the statement by TASS are totally unjustified. The U.S. Government and the Los Angeles Olympic Organizing Committee have done everything possible to facilitate the participation of all nations in the 1984 Olympic Games. We have made exhaustive efforts to meet Soviet concerns about arrangements in Los Angeles, and we have met those concerns.

He is a shared memory. Harry Truman in the pearl-grey Stetson and the light-grey suit and the round-rimmed glasses and the walking stick. Harry Truman on his morning stroll, the brisk cadence of his walk matched by the blunt rhythm of his speech. Plain-spoken, plain-talking, no-nonsense Harry.

He was born in the center of the continent. Lamar, Missouri, was farm country, and as a young man, Harry worked the family farm. It was a hard life, up at the first light working the fields. But there must have been a part of Harry Truman that even then was working on silent dreams. In the summer of 1912, he kept stopping his plow and walking into town to go to the telegraph office to keep up with what was happening at the Democratic Convention. He had great hopes for Woodrow Wilson.

Captain Truman called the sergeants and corporals together and said, ``It's not my job to get along with you. It's your job to get along with me. And let me know if you don't think you can, so I can bust you back right now.'' [Laughter] They knew they had a leader. They adored Captain Harry for the rest of their lives. And many of them were still writing to him when he lived in this house.

When he returned to the States, he made what I suspect he would call the most important decision of his life. He married his beloved Bess. She was, in the deepest sense, his soul mate, as Margaret was his joy.

He opened a haberdashery in Kansas City, did well for a while, and then lost everything. He refused to declare bankruptcy and spent the next 15 years working off his debts. Harry Truman's life found its true purpose when he went into politics. History records his first political job. He was appointed Postmaster of Grand View, Missouri. But he passed the job on to a widow, who needed the money.

On the day he became President, he said, ``I felt like the moon, the stars and all the planets had fallen on me.'' And in a way they had. History handed him the toughest of all tasks -- to explain to his troubled countrymen that all their efforts in 4 years of war had not assured the victory of freedom, that the struggle against totalitarianism would have to continue, and that the victories would not be as clear cut as those of World War II and the battlelines would keep moving.

He could have added that he showed the world the depth of America's commitment to freedom when he started NATO. He could have added that when the war was over, he and General Marshall considered the burned-out rubble of Europe and put together a plan to put our former allies and our former enemies back on their feet. And the Marshall plan saved Europe. It was in its way the most stunning act of American idealism since Lincoln declared his policy of ``malice toward none; and charity for all.'' And you have to go back to Grant telling Lee to keep his sword to find another such moment of American grace.

Hollywood character at the time. And he came to Hollywood to speak at an outdoor rally at one of those dirt tracks for the midget automobile races that were so popular at the time. And Georgie Jessel -- whom, I believe, if my memory is correct, it was Harry Truman had named him as the ``Toastmaster General of the United States'' -- and I rode in the open car to that meeting, in the back seat with President Truman. Open car. Those were a different time than they are today.

Election night, the returns came in, and when it was over, Harry Truman had won by 2 million votes. He held aloft a newspaper headline, smiled his great smile, and gave us a picture we'll never forget, because there just aren't that many photographs of greatness triumphant.

Now, may I say one more thing from my heart. I have lauded Harry Truman for his profound resolve to stop Communist expansionism and for trying to protect the freedom of the West. May I say that in this effort, he received the essential support of a Congress that understood that freedom is not negotiable. And the only response to expansionism is bipartisan agreement to stop it. And in those days, Democrats and Republicans alike were united in their opposition to tyranny.

I appreciate this opportunity to be with you today. You may have heard that I will be speaking to the American people tomorrow evening on the very subject that you are discussing here, our responsibilities in this hemisphere. As members of the Council of the Americas, you've fostered cooperation and understanding between the United States and our neighbors in the south.

Having been Governor of California, I've long been aware of the rich Hispanic heritage of our country. The Hispanic heritage that we appreciate so much in our Southwestern States reflects not just our traditions but on the many things which all the peoples of this hemisphere share.

Simon Bolivar, the Great Liberator, saw this natural bond between all Americans. Early in the last century, he said of us, ``We are a special kind of human being. We have a world apart.'' Well, building the ties between our people and the 380 million people in the 33 countries of Latin America has been of utmost importance to this administration.

Our policies toward Latin America are aimed at achieving three consistent and mutually enforcing goals. First, we seek to encourage the development of democratic political institutions. Second, we want to see all the peoples of the Americas better their standard of living and improve the vitality of their economies. Third, we want to help our friends defend themselves from Soviet bloc and Cuban-sponsored subversion.

Well, that spirit is alive and growing in Latin America today. Right now, of Latin America's 33 countries, 26 with about 90 percent of the region's population, are either democratic or in transition to democracy. A decade ago, less than 40 percent of Latin America's population was so fortunate.

In June of 1982, I was honored to speak before the British Parliament, the living monument to democracy. I proposed that the people of free countries take a more active role in encouraging and aiding in the development of democratic institutions such as political parties and civic groups throughout the world. For many years, we'd been doing something similar to that by helping build democratic trade unions. Well, with congressional enactment of the National Endowment for Democracy, another little noticed yet, nevertheless, giant step forward has been made. The National Endowment is now working to strengthen democratic parties, trade unions, business and civic associations, and other democratic institutions.

We look forward to a cordial and productive working relationship with El Salvador. The fact that the Salvadoran election was held at all rejects the -- or reflects, I should say, the dedication to democracy and personal courage of the people of that troubled land.

The Communist guerrillas warned people not to vote, yet the people defied the threat. The guerrillas mined roads, and still many thousands walked miles to mark their ballots. Each one of these people who braved such threats deserves our greatest respect and admiration.

She was accompanying Members of the Congress and others who were there to witness the elections. She met a young 15-year-old poll watcher and asked him -- 15-year-old -- asked him how he felt about the voting, half expecting a typical, nonchalant, adolescent reply. And instead, he pointed to his heart and very quietly said, ``I feel this voting right here. Well, this is what my country needs,'' he said, ``to defeat the guerrillas and bring peace.'' That lad, and the millions of other courageous individuals like him, people who've maintained their dignity and honor in the face of such adversity, are, indeed, heroes of democracy.

The economic challenges faced in the southern half of this hemisphere appear as monumental as those in the political arena. Yet there's reason for hope. For the three decades after the Second World War, substantial economic progress was made in Latin America. Growth rates, in fact, matched those in the industrialized democracies and improved the standard of living of a significant proportion of the population. At the same time, however, a rapid increase in the population strained resources and left many in dire poverty. The leap in energy prices and the onset of global recession in 1979 was felt the world over. Few places experienced more pain than Latin America and the Caribbean.

While coping with worldwide economic currents must be the primary responsibility of each country, we're doing what we can to help. We increased by over 50 percent the level of bilateral economic assistance over the previous administration. We've continued to support contributions to the World Bank, the Inter-American Bank, and IMF programs, all of which are vital to Latin America. Discreetly, with much care and consideration for political, social, as well as economic consequences, we worked with leaders in government and the private sector to encourage the refinancing of international debts. And your cooperation has been indispensable in this effort.

And last year, the Congress enacted our Caribbean Basin Initiative, a dramatic and innovative approach to progress in Central America and the Caribbean. By opening up one-way free trade to the United States, the world's biggest market, we're bringing the vast resources of the private sector to play in our efforts to improve the lot of 165 million hemispheric neighbors.

There is no magic or instant solution to the economic woes that plague our neighbors to the south, but we can be confident because in the long run, freedom works. During the last century, a Venezuelan intellectual, Andres Bello, noted that ``liberty gives wings to the spirit of enterprise wherever it meets it.'' Well, I believe that. That's what America -- and I mean, when I say ``America,'' from the North Slope of Alaska to the tip of Tierra del Fuego -- what it is all about.

Liberty is, of course, something we can't take for granted. One of the greatest challenges faced by this generation of Americans is in Central America today. If we act responsibly, there's no reason we will not meet this challenge.

As you're aware, a bipartisan commission on Central America, headed by Henry Kissinger, came to that conclusion when they reported in mid-January. In Central America today, freedom-loving people, our friends, are under attack by Soviet bloc- and Cuban-backed insurgents. We're trying our best to help these courageous and decent people develop their democratic institutions and better their economic lot. But if we do nothing or not enough to help them protect themselves, there will be grim consequences to pay. It's not only their security; it's our security.

If the Communists succeed, if we face a flood of refugees and a direct threat on our own southern border, it will not be because we acted, but because we refused to do what was necessary to avert the crisis. And make no mistake, further Communist inroads in Central America will undermine stability in the entire region and make financial problems far more severe. Together, we can make sure that doesn't happen. I'll be speaking more about that tomorrow night.

What a mighty force for good we, the citizens of all this hemisphere, can be. What a potential we have from pole to pole. And yet one should never expect anything worthwhile to come easy. It'll take all of us working together, acting responsibly, and having the courage to face challenges head-on. But have no worry, in the end we can, with God's help, accomplish great things.

White House and to this East Room. Today we pay tribute to the small business owners of our nation. And in a few minutes, it'll be my great pleasure to announce the 1984 Small Business Person of the Year.

You know, not too long ago, I was asked to explain the difference between a small businessman and a big businessman. And my answer was that a big businessman is what a small businessman would be if only the government would get out of the way and leave him alone. [Laughter] But that's what we're trying hard to do -- help the small business men and women of America make it big.

Before the founding of our great Republic, entrepreneurs led the rebellion against excessive taxation and regulation. And with your help, we're doing it again. We're trying to put this economy back in the hands of the people and to give you the incentives to save, invest, and take risks so that you can go as far as your God-given talents will take you and more wealth can be created at every level of our society.

I just have to interject and tell you that on this recent trip, there in the Communist Government of the People's Republic of China, they have recognized the value of incentive. And it was amazing to see what just allowing a certain amount of private entrepreneurism to their people, what it has accomplished and how far they've gone. And it was most encouraging, and I had to believe that things are going to get better as they -- to stand there in the house of a young man with his wife and small son, his parents living with them, and have him tell me how he saved and was able to build his own home there in a Communist country. And we, of course, know an awful lot about that in America.

But from the mess that we inherited just 3 years ago, a strong and a more vibrant America is taking shape. Inflation, once out of control, has plummeted by nearly two-thirds. We're going to keep it down for good. Productivity, after falling for 2 years before we took office, rose 3\1/2\ percent last year, and it's still rising. Economic growth in 1983 was a robust 6 percent, and for the first quarter of 1984, it grew at an amazing 8.3 percent. Venture capital, which lays the foundation for a better tomorrow, rose less than a billion dollars in 1980. It shot up $4 billion last year. That's the money that's there and available for people who want to do what you're doing, to start up -- go into business and have to borrow to do so.

The best news is that we've had the steepest drop in unemployment in over 30 years. Some 5.4 million more Americans have jobs today than just 17 months ago; 106 million Americans are employed, and that's the highest number ever in the history of our country.

Last year alone, almost 600,000 new businesses were incorporated, and that's an alltime high in our history. Now, most of those were small business ventures, spearheaded by individuals like yourselves, proud and independent, taking risks and putting in long, hard hours to earn a living and be your own boss. Each one is just a tiny piece of the economy. But together, America's small business owners represent a dynamo of energy and creativity that can take our country toward unprecedented levels of opportunity and freedom. And perhaps most importantly during this expansion, small businesses, like the ones you own, provided the most new jobs, gave the most employees the freedom to work part-time, and hired the most young people, senior citizens, and women. And that's why we must go forward toward new goals, so this economic expansion can last.

Small business and large industries aren't moving forward again because some big-spending bureaucrats handed out more subsidies. This expansion was created by bringing down inflation and tax rates. We don't need less of a good thing. We need more of a good thing. And that's why I favor -- I'll put in a plug right here -- a line-item veto, the balanced budget amendment, and a sweeping comprehensive reform of the entire tax code.

In California, as Governor, I had line-item veto. And in 8 years I vetoed 943 spending items that had been attached to otherwise necessary legislation. And they never overrode one of those 943 vetoes. Presidents should have that, too.

Conference on Small Business. We'll soon begin the conference process, and I call on all small business owners to participate in State and regional conferences leading to the final session at the White House that will take place in 1986.

Small business employs about half of our private work force, contributes 42 percent of sales, and generates about 38 percent of our gross national product. So, America is small business. Small firms are on the cutting edge of innovation, providing products, ideas, and opportunities for the future. Small business is dreaming impossible dreams and making those dreams come true.

This week, National Small Business Week, provides an excellent opportunity to salute some of our most successful small firms and the men and women who are the real heroes behind America's success. The entrepreneurs here today, you, are from every State and the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico. You represent industries as diverse as printing, nursing home care, furniture, electronics, lumber, seafood, and professional baseball. And they're all pioneers in America's continuing frontier of opportunity -- the free market system.

And now for the most pleasant job that I've had all week, and I'm sure that it wasn't up to me to pick the winners because, believe me, every one of you is a winner, and we're very proud of what you're doing.

Few Americans have heard of tuberous sclerosis, but for an estimated 10,000 of us, this disease and its devastating effects are all too real. For these people, life is a perpetual struggle with convulsive seizures, mental retardation, tumors throughout the body, and other physical handicaps. Because tuberous sclerosis is hereditary, its threat extends to future generations; children of those afflicted with it stand a 50 percent chance of developing the disease themselves.

Tuberous sclerosis has no known cause or cure. Early detection, accurate diagnosis, careful use of anticonvulsant drugs, and support of family and friends can go far in helping a victim cope with the disease. Research to help us learn how to treat, cure, and prevent this dread disease is being supported by the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and by two voluntary health agencies -- the National Tuberous Sclerosis Association and the Tuberous Sclerosis Association of America. Through this sponsorship, scientists across America are working diligently to find a way to track down the gene responsible for the disease, to develop more effective drug therapies for patients, and to discover ways to improve diagnosis.

I urge all Americans to become aware of the pressing national need to overcome the scourge of tuberous sclerosis. In doing so, we can all help our courageous fellow citizens to lead more comfortable and productive lives at home, at school, or in the workplace.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Ever since the Revolutionary War, America's men and women have heroically served their country in times of conflict. In each of America's wars, our prisoners of war have been required to make special sacrifices, serving their country under conditions of hardship. Their burden greatly increased when they were treated in violation of the fundamental standards of morality and international codes of conduct for the treatment of prisoners of war.

Our P.O.W.s and M.I.A.s have earned a very special place in the hearts of all Americans because of their selfless devotion to duty and unflinching courage. We must not forget or fail to honor those who have served their country so faithfully.

Our Nation deeply appreciates the acute suffering and pain experienced by the families of our servicemen held captive or missing in action. The loss of a loved one is a tragic situation under any circumstance, but that burden is magnified when the fate of the loved one is unknown. All Americans fully support efforts to end the uncertainties with which they continue to live.

P.O.W./M.I.A. Recognition Day.'' On this day, I firmly believe that we should recognize the special debt all Americans owe to our fellow citizens who gave up their freedom in the service of our country and to the families who have undergone a great travail.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 9th. day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

In agreeing to come to Washington at my request, you were required to interrupt a distinguished academic career, and I can understand the necessity that impels you to return to Harvard this summer. During the past two years, you have given me the benefit of your great knowledge and experience, and I want to thank you personally for the job you have done.

I know that you share my belief that we must return to the wisdom of the free market in determining the allocation of our nation's human and material resources. You have worked with great dedication for this goal while serving in my Administration, and I am certain you will continue to do so as you return to academic life.

Harvard University has an absolutely inflexible rule limiting leaves of absence to two years. In order to have adequate time to prepare for my teaching before the September term begins, I would like to leave my position on July 10th. By that date I will have completed my work for the midsession budget review.

Although I look forward to my return to research and teaching, I am very sorry that I cannot stay for another year to work with you on your post-election economic program. I would be pleased to help you and my successor and other members of the Administration in any way that I can.

It has been a great honor for me to serve as Chairman of your Council of Economic Advisers and a great pleasure to be able to work closely with you. In the past three years, you have changed the course of America's economic history. Inflation is down sharply and monetary policy is following a course that should prevent a return to increasing inflation. The reduction in government domestic spending that you have achieved distinguishes your Administration from any that has come before. The 1981 Tax Act not only reduced high distortionary tax rates but specifically strengthened incentives for saving and investment.

All of these accomplishments reflect your personal vision of a good society: low inflation, a less intrusive government, less burdensome taxation, and maximum scope for the potential contribution of the free market. I am proud to have been associated with you in your pursuit of these economic goals.

I know that the achievements of your first term will be preserved and extended in your next four years. Thank you for giving me the opportunity to work with you and thank you for all that you are doing for our country.

The President's leadership as Vice President and President has been important to his nation since its independence over 17 years ago. He follows in the distinguished footsteps of Seretse Khama, a friend of the United States and a tireless worker for peace in Africa and progress for Botswana.

I appreciate the President's insights into the issues of importance to the African continent. We admire the economic strides that Botswana has made since independence. It has managed its resources with skill and improved the standard of living of its people. And that progress, due in large part to prudent financial planning and receptivity to investment, is an example to others in Africa who seek to better the lives of their people.

President Masire described to me the serious problems Botswana is facing as a result of the severe drought that has plagued southern Africa for 3 years now. And I, of course, expressed my heartfelt concern and that of the American people for the tragedy wrought by this natural disaster.

President Masire that the United States will continue to seek peaceful solutions to the problems of that volatile part of the world. This will not be an easy task. However, we believe that the recent accord between South Africa and Mozambique, as well as the disengagement of forces in Angola, are encouraging signs. Both Botswana and the United States want peace among the nations of the region, internationally recognized independence for Namibia, self-determination for the people of the area, and a peaceful change in South Africa.

Botswana, which has long lived in peace with its neighbors without compromising its democratic and nonracial principles, has proven how much can be accomplished. Its democratic standards have served Botswana and the region well. As a leader of one of the frontline states, President Masire's views have been particularly instructive to me.

Mr. President, the United States and Botswana are tied by our dedication to democracy and respect for individual rights. These are the bonds that unite all good and decent people. I would like to offer my best wishes and those of the American people for the peace and prosperity of the people of Botswana. And I'm pleased that you were able to accept our invitation to come to Washington, and I look forward to meeting with you again.

President Masire. Mr. President, honorable ministers, and members of the press, we are here at the invitation of the President and the people of the United States. We are very grateful that this invitation has been extended to us because, as the President has said, this has given us the opportunity to talk together on matters of mutual interest and to brief the President and his colleagues on some of the goings on in our part of the world.

Ours is a long association. Since independence, Botswana has had very amicable relationship with the United States. We have had Peace Corps volunteers who have worked there. Some of them initially went there for 2 years, but ended up staying for 10 years or so. We have found not only Peace Corps but other American personnel to be very useful in our development effort.

As you know, we are a democracy. Perhaps we are a little too democratic, because while here, you have only the Republican Party and the Democratic Party, back home, we have something like six parties. And we, much as people have said democracy cannot work in Africa, I think we should thank God that in Botswana so far it has worked. And I think one of the reasons it has worked is that there has been mutual trust and mutual respect. The opposition is treated seriously, because we see it as the means to be a multiparty state. And we know if we treated the opposition shabbily, we will be in trouble when it is their turn to run the show. [Laughter] We, unlike elsewhere, consult on matters of national interest, national security and -- with the opposition.

We are an open economy, market-led economy. People are free to invest. That's one of the things we have talked about, that if there are American investors who would like to come over to Botswana and invest, they must know they are very much welcome. There are no problems about capital repatriation. There are no problems about repatriation of any, so far, of expatriate stuff.

There are no problems of racial discrimination, because, being next to South Africa and knowing just how bad racial discrimination is, we know is just as bad when practiced by whites as when practiced by blacks. And, therefore, we avoid at all cost to be discriminatory.

The President. Well, now, I'm not supposed to answer any questions here in the press photo opportunity, but I think I can't let that go by without saying that, like so many, I have a great feeling of disappointment. I'm sorry that they feel that way, and I think it's unfair to the young people that have been waiting for so long to participate in those games.

And it ought to be remembered by all of us that the games more than 2,000 years ago started as a means of bringing peace between the Greek city-states. And in those days, even if a war was going on, when Olympic year came, they called off the war in order to hold the games. I wish we were still as civilized.

Note: The exchange began at 2:05 p.m. in the Cabinet Room at the White House as reporters observed the beginning of the President's meeting with members of an American team of observers of the Salvadoran Presidential election, which took place May 6.

Mr. Hill is president and director of Berry-Hill Galleries, Inc., in New York City. He is a member of the National Antiques and Art Dealers Association of America and is former secretary and director of the Association. He is also a member of the Art Dealers Association of America, Inc., and the Appraisers Association of America. He also serves as a consultant to several major American collections and museums.

The President. Well, we all feel very good about the trip, and I do particularly. Granted there are differences between us -- in our styles and kinds of government and all -- yet there was a friendliness. We found they and we had the same idea. The things that were important were not the differences, but the things we had in common.

They are as opposed to expansionist policies as we are, attempts to dominate or have hegemony over other areas or other countries. We made it plain to them that we respected their nonaligned situation. They're very serious about wanting to be nonaligned, and we agreed with that, but said that didn't mean that we could not work together on things as two independent countries with the same interests.

And I think between us, the two biggest nations -- the United States and China -- can contribute a great deal to stability in the whole Pacific Basin and East Asia. I was struck by the changes the Chinese are making as part of their modernization, including their welcome to outside capital. It was pretty unusual after recent years actually to go through a plant that was a partnership between a Massachusetts company and the People's Republic, to know that they have now also opened up to investments without partnership, involving the outright ownership of concerns and industries by foreign firms. I think it all was a most successful trip. We found ourselves in agreement on so many things.

They are set up virtually as a township, with autonomous government, local control and all, with their own schools and so on. There are production quotas which they must meet which go to the government. But over and above that, they can sell their surplus produce in the marketplace. We visited the home of a young couple, with their son and his father and mother living with them. He had a new home -- and he had built it. He spoke of how they were able to save money to do this and of how they were now saving for further furnishings for the home. It sounded very American.

Q. Do you feel as a Californian who has just quoted the saying ``Go west, young man'' that you have a more positive view of the Pacific than someone from, say, the eastern seaboard, who still tends to look towards the Atlantic?

The President. I think that's only natural in the Western States of the United States. We started our trip with a visit to the State of Washington, seeing the lumber industry there. Much of their foreign trade -- as far as I could see, all of it is across the Pacific to the west. Yes, we do have that. It does not mean that we downgrade in any way our Atlantic relations or our participation in the North Atlantic alliance. Actually, our parentage, you might say, is basically European. But you cannot help but feel that the great Pacific Basin, with all its nations and all its potential for growth and development -- that is the future.

The President. I have always recognized the importance of good U.S.-China relations. From the very outset of my administration, I was determined to place this relationship on a more stable and enduring footing. I think we have succeeded. We have had some problems and some differences over the past 3\1/2\ years, but we have never stopped communicating with each other.

Improving U.S.-China relations is in the best interests of the American people, the Chinese people, the peoples of the East Asian region, and the cause of world peace. We made substantial progress in working out some difficult problems and then proceeded to advance the relationship in a number of important areas -- technology transfer, trade, student exchanges, and so on.

The exchange of high-level visitors during our administration has been intense, leading to the visit to the United States in January by Premier Zhao and my visit to China. The Vice President, Secretary of State Shultz, Secretary of Defense Weinberger, Secretary of the Treasury Don Regan, and Secretary of Commerce Baldrige all visited China for substantive talks prior to our recent visit. We look forward to continuing this exchange with visits to the United States by Chinese President Li Xiannian, General Secretary Hu Yaobang, and Defense Minister Zhang Aiping.

I had long and thoughtful meetings with the Chinese leadership, comprehensive meetings. We each listened carefully to what the other had to say. We agreed that in this imperfect world, peace in its most perfect form cannot always be reached -- but it must always be our goal. And we, the people of China and the United States, must make our best efforts to bring greater harmony between our two countries.

And there is much to be gained on both sides from expanded opportunities in trade and commerce and cultural relations, and much to be gained through stability and economic progress throughout the entire Pacific Basin.

The President. COCOM is a cooperative organization of many countries, and any changes would need the careful consideration and approval of all its members. COCOM has been processing cases for China expeditiously and has approved many exports to China at higher technical levels than exports to the U.S.S.R.

The steps we have taken on export licensing take into account China's needs and capabilities by providing support for China's modernization programs. We still maintain some controls, as we do for many friendly countries, on very sophisticated items which are essential to our national security interests. But very few exports to China -- less than 1 percent last year -- have been denied.

Q. You have always been known as a friend and supporter of Taiwan, arguing for official recognition during your campaign for the Presidency. What are your feelings about the island today, and do you expect that any agreement reached on the future of Hong Kong will augur well or ill for Taiwan?

The President. My longstanding, personal friendship and deep concern for the people of Taiwan are steadfast and unchanged. I am committed to maintaining the full range of contacts between the United States and the people of Taiwan -- commercial, cultural, and other contacts -- which are compatible with our unofficial relationship. As I have often said, we will not abandon old friends to make new friends.

The British and Chinese are continuing discussions on Hong Kong. I hope the two sides will reach an agreement which preserves the prosperity and stability there. We have an interest in such a settlement, particularly in light of our significant business and investment presence in Hong Kong.

Q. Your administration has emphasized a closer relationship between Japan and the United States as a vital link between the world's two most powerful economies, both married to the principle of free trade. However, during this election year, Tokyo has come under increased pressure from the United States to internationalize and revalue the yen, open its markets to U.S. goods, and limit exports to the U.S. (a strong theme in the Mondale campaign). Are you satisfied with Tokyo's moves to liberalize its market, and can Japan expect a softening of U.S. pressure next year?

The President. Our trade policy toward Japan this year is the same one we have been pursuing all through my administration. It is a simple and, we believe, fair policy. We would like our companies to have the same access to Japan's market that Japanese companies have to ours.

Now, as you pointed out, this is an election year, and there are those who would like to take the easy way out and throw up protectionist barriers around our country. This may seem like good politics in an election year, but I can assure you that it is bad economics, and bad for our country and the world trading system. We are determined to resist this, but we need progress in foreign markets opening to our products.

As for internationalizing the yen, I gave my view in my speech to the Diet last November. Here you have a country that has the world's second largest free market economy and tremendous political stability. We believe that its currency should reflect this and play the same role in the world economy that other major currencies do. Our Treasury Department and the Japanese Finance Ministry have been meeting on this issue since February, and I believe that we have been making steady progress.

Q. Your administration continually exhorts other countries, particularly in the developing world, to practice fiscal and monetary discipline. But would you not agree that it is the United States own unmanageable budget and current account deficits which endanger the world economic recovery and its (still historically high) interest rates which result in the undervalued yen, increase the debt burdens of borrowing countries, and inhibit investment worldwide?

The President. By reviving strong economic growth, while reducing the rate of growth of government spending more than in half, we are beginning to make real progress in reducing the Federal deficit. With cooperation from Congress, we expect further reductions. Meanwhile, the rest of the world is benefiting greatly by the rapid recovery in the United States, which has led to a sharp increase of American orders for foreign goods and services.

The strength of the dollar results from a number of powerful market forces, including the strength of our economic recovery and the confidence of foreign investors who see the United States as the safest and most attractive country in which to invest. It is true that our interest rates are still high by historical standards, but they have been cut nearly in half since the beginning of this administration. And now that we have succeeded in bringing inflation down, we are determined to keep it down. Once this commitment becomes clear, we expect interest rates to decline even further.

ASEAN, as a group, is our fifth largest trading partner and the site of some $10 billion in U.S. investment. We have bilateral security commitments to two ASEAN members, Thailand and the Philippines. If our involvement appears to be less than in other areas of the world, it is only because of the success the ASEAN countries have had in managing the economic and political issues they face, independent of a heavy U.S. presence.

Asia. China's role in the area will be determined by the state of its relations with the region's governments, not by the United States. We will continue to manage our relationship with China so that the interests of our friends in Southeast Asia are not disadvantaged.

Khmer Rouge), U.S. policy increases Vietnam's dependency on Moscow and thus Moscow's leverage over Hanoi, resulting in Soviet naval and air force units using the bases at Cam Ranh and Danang. Just as former President Nixon once helped to open China up, is there any possibility of a Reagan initiative to Vietnam designed to break the Cambodian deadlock?

We welcomed it as a vehicle to press for a settlement based on the ICK (International Conference on Kampuchea) principles. We provide moral and political support to the non-Communist resistance groups, as evidenced by my meeting last September with Prince Sihanouk and Son Sann in New York. We give no support to and have no contact with the Khmer Rouge, whose record of atrocities we have always condemned.

Second, it is not the United States which has isolated Vietnam. Hanoi's policies in Kampuchea have isolated it internationally and left it with almost no friends outside the U.S.S.R. and its most obedient followers. The Soviet Union has been able to trade on its massive military and economic assistance to obtain access to air and naval facilities in Vietnam. Hanoi has chosen its present isolation. It can choose to end it by negotiating a comprehensive political solution to the problem of Kampuchea.

At the same time, we and the Vietnamese have agreed that the question of Americans missing from the Indochina war is a humanitarian matter separate from other issues. Our discussions with Hanoi on this question continue and resolution of this issue could only help to improve the American people's image of Vietnam.

The President. We have recently underscored to President Marcos the deep commitment to representative government and a democratic electoral process which all Americans share. Various steps had been taken in the Philippines to encourage fair and open legislative elections in May.

I'm not in the habit of commenting on events that haven't yet occurred, but I would point out that the United States and the Philippines are treaty allies. The United States, through both Republican and Democratic administrations, has had very good relations with the Philippines. We expect to continue these relations in the years to come.

Your question about the emergence of a military regime is highly speculative when we consider the unbroken Philippine tradition of civilian authority over the military. To my mind, the whole point of elections in the Philippines is to strengthen their political institutions, to assure that they reflect and are responsive to the will of the people, and to enable the country to meet the serious political and economic challenges that it faces.

The U.S. military presence is not a campaign issue in the Philippine elections. Thanks in part to the vast reservoir of good will that exists between the American and Filipino peoples, there seems to be an appreciation by the majority of Filipinos that the U.S. military facilities serve the security interests of both countries and of the region as a whole.

Recognizing that India is a very important country both in the South Asian region and globally, I have met with Mrs. Gandhi three times. During her 1982 visit to Washington, we agreed that there must be a regular dialog between us. This process is continuing. Secretary Shultz visited India in 1983, and Vice President Bush will be visiting India this month. In addition, we have taken steps to strengthen business and commercial relations between India and the United States, which I believe is a very important factor in building a long-term relationship. Furthermore, we are making efforts to increase understanding between India and the United States through major cultural exchanges this year and in 1985.

We have our differences with India, certainly. But I truly believe that India and the United States have reached a point where we can pursue a mature and constructive relationship, based on the values and interests we share rather than on points of difference.

Q. In its past efforts to contain Communist expansion in Asia, America allied itself with many corrupt dictators unworthy of the support of the world's most powerful democracy. This allowed the Communists to claim to represent the ``people'' (although in fact they were manipulating the forces of nationalism). Is not America in danger of repeating these mistakes in backing the present regime of El Salvador and in undermining that of Nicaragua, forfeiting in the process the revolutionary idealism in which America was born and which remains its greatest international appeal?

Belize. Two of the remaining three countries, Guatemala and Panama, are committed to an early return to full democracy. Only in Nicaragua is there a serious exception to this area wide norm, and there the people face a dictatorship of the left.

Those who would look for simple one-sided solutions to the problems of Central America will be disappointed. The issues are complex, and during the past year, the United States has pursued a policy designed to deal with many aspects of the constantly evolving situation. That policy is based on four elements: support for political reform, support for economic development, support for dialog within and among the countries of the region, and security assistance to provide a shield behind which reforms, development, and negotiations can take place.

This balanced, comprehensive policy recognizes the deep-rooted economic, social, and political problems which are the fundamental cause of the current instability in Central America. It also addresses the external sources of the conflict: attempts by Marxist-Leninist forces to exacerbate indigenous problems.

The situation in El Salvador is frequently portrayed as your question implies: a clash between extremes of left and right -- the forces of oppression versus the forces of violent revolution. But this view omits a vital new element: The reformist coup of October 1979 and subsequent coalition governments have created an alternative that offers the prospect of genuinely democratic and progressive reform. A new, liberal constitution was passed by the Salvadoran Legislative Assembly in December 1983, and on June 1, a democratically elected President will be inaugurated. Since 1979 the history of El Salvador has been fundamentally the story of these kinds of efforts for change and reform.

American States to establish a democratic, pluralistic, and nonaligned regime. The United States took a leading role in the international effort to assist the new government in Nicaragua, and the first 21 months after the fall of Somoza, we authorized 117.2 million dollars in economic assistance.

Despite the promises, what we see today are Sandinista leaders who have succeeded in removing from influence everyone who disagreed with them, who have built an army four times the size of Somoza's who have developed close ties with Cuba and the Soviet Union, and who have continued to support subversion in neighboring states, particularly El Salvador. Today there is no longer any serious dispute that Nicaragua is a major source of instability in Central America.

The Contadora peace process offers the opportunity for Nicaragua to address the legitimate concerns of the United States and its neighbors. The United States supports the comprehensive, verifiable implementation of the Contadora Document of Objectives, agreed to by the five Central American states and the Contadora Four countries -- Colombia, Mexico, Panama, and Venezuela -- last September. The principles identified in the Document of Objectives, which include the reciprocal, verifiable withdrawal of foreign military advisers, an end to arms trafficking and support for subversion, and national reconciliation through the democratic process, are the issues which must be treated if there is to be a sincere and lasting peace in Central America.

Q. Your administration has been giving active support to the opponents of the leftist Nicaraguan regime, but little direct help to the Afghani resistance to Soviet occupation. Is the difference a matter of geography or of a willingness to confront Soviet ``proxies,'' but not the Soviets themselves?

The President. I think your question mixes apples and oranges a bit, but you seem to be suggesting that we have not been supportive of the Afghans who are resisting Soviet efforts to take over their country. If that's the implication, I'm afraid I'd have to disagree. The United States has been active, along with the vast majority of the free nations of the world, in trying to help the Afghan people win back their independence. Such support has taken many forms -- diplomatic activity within the United Nations, making Afghanistan an important part of our bilateral agenda with the Soviets, substantial aid for the refugee communities, and firm backing for Pakistan in its efforts to resist Soviet intimidation.

These problems are complex and vary from region to region. So do our responses. But one thing should be clear: Soviet actions in Afghanistan, including recent escalation of warfare there, seriously undermine the search for a negotiated political settlement, based on the four elements of the repeated U.N. General Assembly resolutions: withdrawal of Soviet forces; restoration of the independent and nonaligned status of Afghanistan; self-determination for the Afghan people; and permitting the Afghan refugees who have been forced to flee their own country to return with safety and honor.

The United States remains committed to achieving these internationally agreed objectives. It is past time that the Soviet Union respect the wishes of the world community and bring to an end the terrible ordeal which they have imposed on the Afghan people.

The new treaty provides for a broad range of cooperation in criminal matters. Mutual assistance available under the treaty includes: (1) executing requests relating to criminal matters; (2) taking of testimony or statements of persons; (3) effecting the production, preservation of documents, records, or articles of evidence; (4) serving judicial documents; (5) facilitating the appearance of a witness before a court of the requesting Party; (6) locating persons; and (7) providing judicial records, evidence, and information.

The U.S.-U.K. agreements are similar in objective to the social security agreements already in force with Italy, the Federal Republic of Germany and Switzerland and to proposed agreements with Canada, Belgium and Norway which are expected to enter into force later this year. Such bilateral agreements, which are generally known as totalization agreements, provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other.

Department of Health and Human Services, which explains the provisions of the Agreements and provides data on the number of persons affected by the Agreements and the effect on social security financing as required by the same provision of the Social Security Act.

The President today announced his intention to appoint E. Charles Fullerton to be a member on the part of the United States of America of the International Pacific Salmon Fisheries Commission. He would succeed Herbert A. Larkins.

And President Donald Treadwell and President-elect David Roberts, members of the board of directors, before I say anything, I want to take this opportunity to thank all of you for the support that you've given our efforts over the last 3 years to cut spending and get taxing under control.

When it comes to free enterprise and competition, you represent the innovation, creativity, energy, and community spirit so much a part of small and independent business in America. The principle of private property and its relationship to personal liberty is not theory with you. It's everyday business.

But America's greatest assets are among the men and women who manage private sector businesses of every kind. And the profit motive to spur them on -- they, or I should say, you are providing this country with goods and services with a higher quality and a lower price than ever imagined by the central planners of socialist economies.

Jefferson once said, ``Were we directed from Washington when to sow and when to reap, we would soon want for bread.'' The Founding Fathers were right. As far as I'm concerned, the best thing the Government can do to keep our country growing is get out of the way and let the people run their own affairs.

You know, my favorite story having to do with your business came from a fellow that was building his own home, and it happens to be right near my own neighborhood in California. And he got so fed up one day that he took all the various forms that he had had to fill out with regard to all the regulations all the way up through the branches of government, pasted them all together, and strung them in front of his half-built house on two poles. The ribbon was 250 feet long. You know all about that.

Well, during the last decade, we strayed far from the principles that built our great nation. By the end of the 1970's, we were overtaxed and overregulated. The policies of tax, tax, spend and spend gave us economic stagnation and ruinous double-digit inflation. A spirit of pessimism, totally inconsistent with the American character, permeated the land. And by the time we got to Washington, the prime interest rate was shooting through the roof at 21\1/2\ percent, knocking the legs from under our basic industries. Being in the industry you're in, I don't have to remind you of that.

When we got here, the pressure was on. We didn't go for a quick, short-lasting fix, as you've been told. Instead, I think we've made some fundamental changes in direction. The funny thing was to hear our opponents labeling our efforts a failure and blaming us for America's economic difficulties even before our program went into effect, had time to work.

Seriously, though, the first 2 years of my or any Presidency is spent, to one degree or another, in transition from a predecessor's policies. It isn't until the third year that the seeds planted by a new administration begin to bloom. And if you will forgive me for saying this, I think I've been seeing a few economic blossoms springing up here and there.

By keeping taxes stable with a 25-percent across-the-board cut in income tax rates, by reducing the growth rate of Federal spending, by chipping away at the heavy burden of excessive Federal regulation, and by bringing inflation under control, we put our country back on the road to stable progress. Overall economic growth last year was a robust 6 percent. After a burst of economic activity in the first quarter, we believe America is well on the road this year to lasting expansion.

The savings rate is on the way up again, which will make available new funds for investment. In contrast to the gloom and doom of 4 years ago, there's a spirit of optimism alive in the land. And why not?

The economic expansion is bringing unemployment down and generating unprecedented new opportunities in small business, where two out of three new jobs are created. Last year, 600,000 new businesses were incorporated -- an all-time high. Each one of these is a tiny part of the economy, but together, they represent a dynamo of energy and innovation that is opening a whole new era of opportunity and freedom.

First, reinvigorated companies, after a period of entrenchment, are beginning to move employees to different parts of the country. The Employee Relocation Council says that 35 percent of its member companies are expecting a higher transfer volume in 1984 over 1983. The ERC predicts transfer volume will be up at least 10 percent. I know that that is music to your ears.

The rebound in your industry, as in the rest of the economy, is no accident. When the last administration took over, inflation was running at about 5 percent, and the prime interest rate -- and, my, it's painful to say this -- was under 7 percent. But then everything went haywire. You can't have policies that run 5 percent inflation up to 12.4 and take the prime from 7 to 21\1/2\ percent and expect that housing or any other business, or the country, for that matter, is going to prosper. In the case of the housing industry, the average monthly mortgage payment rose from $256 to 598 during the 4 years of the previous administration.

I firmly believe that the opportunity to own a home is part of the American dream. Almost a hundred years ago, the poet Walt Whitman knew this when he wrote: ``The final culmination of this vast and varied republic will be the production and perennial establishment of millions of comfortable city homesteads . . . healthy and independent, single separate ownership, fee simple, life in them complete but cheap, within reach of all.'' Well, our country was moving toward the fulfillment of that vision when the policies of tax, spend, and inflate destroyed the dream for millions of Americans.

We've made progress. Bringing inflation under control has helped. The increase in personal income has helped. A trimming of Federal regulations has helped. And -- I bet you didn't think I was going to mention this -- and we all know the overall decline of interest rates, notwithstanding the recent upticks, has also helped. But let me assure you, we are not pleased with the recent increases in interest rates, and, frankly, there is no satisfactory reason for them.

Of course, our economic problems have to be attacked from many directions. I believe institutional reforms are badly needed. We can start with something that will give the Chief Executive the power to cut porkbarrel projects that have been attached to needed legislation.

Well, one basic reform that's long overdue is a complete overhaul of our tax system to make it more fair and provide greater incentives for everyone to work, save, and invest. We need to broaden the base so we can bring income tax rates down. In that connection, I know some of you've heard questions raised about whether there might be some plan to do away with the home mortgage interest deduction, which has played such an important role in helping Americans fulfill their dream of homeownership. I'm afraid that story was just another example of someone trying to read into my remarks things that weren't there.

We aren't waiting for the Congress or for institutional change. In the executive branch, we're already moving forward where we can. The Grace commission, for example, provided us with 2,478 cost-saving suggestions, brought in by more than 2,000 businessmen who volunteered their help. Many of these are being evaluated right now throughout the departments and agencies.

Department of Defense. Now, let me mention here that many of you are aware of the horror stories emerging from the Department of Defense about the incredible high cost of certain items, like a single bolt that maybe cost a hundred dollars. Well, these, for the most part, are not stories originating from investigative journalists. These are our figures. These are success stories on where our antiwaste program is uncovering and correcting these wasteful situations. And more progress can and will be made. But don't let anyone tell you that it is business as usual in any department, especially the Department of Defense. They are the ones who found out that that other thing had been going on and are correcting it. There have been hundreds of indictments.

Recently, I accepted a compromise in reducing defense spending. I did this reluctantly and in good faith that substantial cuts in other areas will be made. Those pushing for further defense cuts are rolling dice with the security needs of this country and, at the same time, undercutting any chance for tangible arms reduction agreements with the Soviets.

The Congress is now facing a decision on Central America that could well chart our country's future for decades to come. As I mentioned last night on television, if we are to avert a monumental crisis in Central America, a crisis that would affect the lives of each and every American citizen, we must act. The flood of refugees and loss of innocent life that always results from Communist takeovers can be averted. With the balanced program we've proposed of supporting the economic progress, democratic development, and security needs of our neighbors and friends, we can succeed. And now is the time for the Congress to act. We can prove democracy works and that when it comes to our country's safety, there are no Republicans or Democrats, just Americans.

If we're to have peace, we must stand together in the face of the threats to our freedom and security. We must act responsibly when it comes to allocating our resources. After all, today's expenditures pay for tomorrow's security -- the security of our children and our children's children.

We're now living with -- or, more accurately, I'd say, making up for decisions made during the last decade. We should do better by our next generation than what was passed to us. The 1970's, in many ways, was a period of irresponsibility. Basic American values were made light of and spoken of as if they were relics of the past. Things like family, God, and love of country were mocked. Well, I think some of those who were so flippant about our traditions have grown up a bit in the last few years. America is finding itself again, and we've got every reason to hold our heads high.

I know about your many ``Make America Better'' projects. And I'm proud of each of you. I know about the realtors in Raleigh who are responsible for putting smoke detectors in the homes of the elderly. I know about the Dogwood Trail Days project, with which Birmingham realtors beautified their city; about the help of Manchester, New Hampshire, realtors have been to the Junior Olympics; about the emergency food and shelter the Asheboro-Randolph realtors have provided to people in distress; about the help the Fond du Lac, Wisconsin, realtors have been to the Toys for Tots program; about all the help the Baton Rouge, Louisiana, realtors have been in establishing a home for abused children in their community; about the patriotism projects and the nonpartisan voter registration drive you're planning.

I've often described America as a compact of good and decent people who came here from every corner of the world to live together in freedom. In a free country, what kind of society it is does not depend on the government; it depends on we, the people. Your good citizenship is showing others what Americanism is all about.

Recently, I met with Pope John Paul II on my way back from China. And there in the chilled air of the Fairbanks Airport, he spoke to me and the other citizens who had gathered there to greet him -- some of them Eskimos from faraway villages, some of them city dwellers, others frontiersmen and women from many parts of our country who were there living on the last American frontier.

The President is extremely pleased at this example of cooperative spirit between the Congress and the executive branch. He expresses his deep respect to Congress and particularly to the House for their action, which sends a solid signal of U.S. resolve to support friends in this hemisphere. The President looks forward to working with Congress to take the next step in the process, which is to appropriate the funds this vote authorizes.

Thank you, Dick, and thank you, everyone, you know, hearing others here tonight tell of what you have done and what you've accomplished in this gathering, I kept remembering back in World War II when someone asked General Marshall if we had a secret weapon. And he said, ``Yes, the best damn kids in the world.'' Well, now, if anyone asks me if we, on our side, have a secret weapon, I'm going to say those best damn kids grew up into the best damn people -- [laughter] -- and you're all here tonight.

Think back just 3 years ago. Big taxing and spending had led to soaring interest rates and inflation. Our defenses had grown weak. All over the world, America's reputation was no longer one of strength and resolve, but of vacillation and self-doubt. Many in Washington seemed to forget that the bedrock values of faith, freedom, and family were what made us a great and good people. It seemed for a season as though any sense of justice, self-discipline, and duty was ebbing out of our national life and that our nation was in an inevitable decline.

But on this Earth, there's no such thing as inevitable. And the American people decided it was time to put a stop to that decline, time to give our country a rebirth of feedom and faith, time for a great national renewal. Well, we Republicans took office determined to make a new beginning.

We've knocked inflation down to about a third of what it was. The prime rate has fallen 9 percentage points since its peak the month we took office. And all across the country, a surging economic expansion is taking place.

As a matter of fact, I've been getting letters from some prominent economists who are asking me to stop calling it an economic recovery. They said we've passed that point. It is now an economic expansion. And all across the country, a surging economic expansion is taking place.

Retail sales and factory orders are up. And tomorrow morning at about 8:30, the figures will be released, and you'll find they're up some more. The stock market has shown new strength. Since the expansion began 16 months ago, 5.4 million Americans have found jobs, and the unemployment rate has shown the steepest drop in 30 years. Today more Americans have jobs than at any other time in our history -- 106 million.

Despite the overwhelming success of our economic program, the opposition won't rest. They'll never stop calling our tax cuts unfair. Now, that just shows how the Democrats think. When inflation pushes Americans into higher tax brackets year after year, taking more and more money away from the people who earned it, giving it instead to big government, the Democrats think everything's hunky-dory. But when we pass through a long overdue, 25-percent, across-the-board, personal income tax rate cut, the Democrats scream foul play and say that we gave a windfall to the rich. Well, with regard to fairness, let's take a look at the facts.

Just 20 years ago, the Kennedy tax cuts reduced marginal rates on personal income by an average of 20 percent. Did the rich pay less? No, they paid more. And overall revenues rose. The plain fact is that while our tax cuts spurred the economy on to new vigor, they actually shifted a larger percentage of the tax burden from the middle class to the rich. Today our tax code is fairer than it was under the Carter-Mondale administration.

And now, if you'll just bear with me, for all the Capitol Hill Democrats who'll read this with disbelief in tomorrow's papers, let me say that again -- [laughter] -- today our tax code is fairer than it was under Carter and Mondale.

But just as we've moved ahead on the economy, our administration has taken vigorous action against waste and fraud in the Federal Government. We've taken aim at crime, increasing drug-related arrests, more than doubling organized crime convictions, and setting up drug task forces across the country.

At the same time, we've begun rebuilding our defenses and given our foreign policy a new sense of direction. In Grenada, we set a nation free. In Europe, we and our NATO allies went through months of Soviet bluff and bluster and came out of it more firmly united than ever.

He wrote a letter, and it was tragic. He told me of how, on Christmas Day, his wife passed away from cancer, and his son was home from his boot training with the Rangers and had to leave to go back to camp. And this former ex-marine, this bereaved husband, said that he actually toyed with the idea of suicide, that it seemed that life held nothing for him. And then he said one day the mail arrived and, he said, ``from young men that I have never known or never seen, the members of my son's platoon.'' He said, ``I received these letters telling this old marine to stand up and fight back, that there were people that cared'' about him. And he said, ``All of a sudden,'' he said, ``I thought I was back on the drill field. I could hear the marine hymn. I thought I could feel the breeze on the deck of the Midway where I was stationed.'' And he said, ``all from a bunch of young fellows that I've never known.'' And I thought there sure has been a change. They are the best damned kids in the world today again.

In the Pacific, a trip to Korea and Japan strengthened our ties with our Asian allies. Our recent visit to China improved the prospects for a continued development of this important relationship and produced agreements to cooperate more closely on trade, investment, technology, nuclear energy, and scientific and managerial exchanges. No one should underestimate the differences between China and the United States, and yet the Chinese have chosen not to threaten our interests, but to follow the path of cooperation.

In Central America, our administration has firmly supported the forces of democracy and economic progress. Three out of four American dollars -- or of dollars of American aid to that region have not been military, but economic. And as I said last night on TV, the United States must not allow the free governments of this vitally important region to be overrun by Soviet- and Cuban-backed guerrillas.

And while I'm on this subject, I want to ask those who seem ready to desert the forces of democracy in Central America, name one totalitarian country where the people can practice the freedom of speech that these critics themselves value so highly and that people in free Central American nations now enjoy. Name one country that was taken over by Marxist guerrillas that has held a truly democratic election like the one that just took place last Sunday in El Salvador. And name one Communist country where the people are as free to worship their God as the millions of faithful are in El Salvador, Honduras, and the other free Central American nations. They can't do it, because no such country exists. And that's why I, for one, refuse to sell out the liberty of our hemisphere.

Yes, from the economy to foreign policy we have made a new beginning. It's a record we can take to the people with pride. But we must give the people more than our record; we must give them our vision. We Republicans see America forever free from the evils of inflation. To make that dream a reality, we will enact structural reforms like the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment.

We see a world of peace and ever-growing freedom, so we'll keep our defenses strong, support the forces of progress in Central America and elsewhere, and remain eager to negotiate equitable and verifiable nuclear arms reductions -- not just limitations, an actual reduction. The Democrats can run on gloom, if they want to; we'll run on reality, and the American reality is good.

Our basic industries are gaining new strength, and we're leading the world in a dazzling technological revolution. Our people are once again self-confident, and polls show that Americans are more optimistic about the future of this nation than at any time in the past 5 years. Together we're building an opportunity society here at home and making America a powerful force for peace among nations throughout the world.

The Republican message is simple: Our country's best days are still to come. And with faith, freedom, and courage, there's no limit to what the American people can accomplish. If we do everything in our power to carry that message to the voters on November 6th, they'll respond by keeping Republicans where we belong: on the job, in the House, in the Senate, and in the administration.

I know I should say ``thank you and good night'' right here, but I told my two charming dinner partners here at the table a little incident that happened a week or so ago, and I just think I'll share it with you just to finish.

I've talked here about diplomacy and trips to foreign governments, and everything, but diplomacy can be very treacherous. And a week or so ago, a couple of weeks ago -- well, no, before the China trip -- we had the President of France and Mrs. Mitterrand as our guests at a state dinner.

And after all the guests had gone into the State Dining Room and were standing around the tables, similar to these, then the four of us, Nancy and Mrs. Mitterrand and the President and I followed. And Nancy and the President turned to go to their table, and the diplomatic crisis began right then.

Well, this has been just wonderful and what you're doing -- and we've got to have that majority back, as you've been told, in the Senate. We couldn't have done anything we've done without having that one House, but what a wonder it would be if, for the first time in 26 years, Republicans once again had a majority in both Houses of the Congress. It hasn't happened since then.

We did a little checking the other day and found out that this is the 43d time that I have spoken on education in the past 3\1/2\ years. And that doesn't include such things as White House meetings on education and talks with reporters. And I've given education so much time and used the -- what Teddy Roosevelt said was the ``bully pulpit'' of this office to discuss this issue for a very clear and simple reason: It's because we in this administration view education as central to American life.

It is central as the family is central, as the towns we live in are central, and as our churches are central. If a modern de Tocqueville came searching for the heart of this country today, I would tell him to go to those junctions where family, church, town, and school meet, for that's where America is.

We came to Washington believing that education was key to the American comeback that we wanted to bring about. And one of the first things we did was appoint a National Commission on Excellence in Education. And I asked them to study our schools, define their problems, and come up, if they could, with solutions. And I can say ``you'' because the Commission is right here -- you did just that.

Last spring in your report, you documented 20 years of decline, 20 years of declining academic standards and declining discipline. And you were very blunt. You said, ``If a foreign nation had done to our schools what we ourselves have done to them, we would be justified in calling it an act of war.'' Well, you don't get much blunter than that.

But you spoke of hope, too. You outlined the reforms needed to put us back on the path of excellence. And you gave us old but enduring advice: Get back to basics. And the public response to your report was electrifying. There is a huge and growing public mandate for change. And it's not overstating things at all to say that your report changed our history by changing the way we look at education and putting it back on the American agenda.

Virtually every major national organization in this country has supported some aspect of the reform movement. State leadership has been clear and strong. In this past year alone, 35 States raised high school graduation requirements. Twenty-one States are reviewing steps to make textbooks more challenging. Eight States have lengthened the school day, and seven have lengthened the school year. Many legislatures are carefully -- or currently, I should say, developing workable and fair merit pay plans, and 47 States are studying improvements in teacher certification.

The private sector, too, is doing its part. We have new partnerships between community businesses and community schools. Some businesses are adopting local schools, working with students and teachers to make education more rewarding and more exciting.

The Federal Government is doing its part. We're taking a new look at violence in the schools and how to restore the peace and order without which no teacher can instruct and no student can learn. We're taking a new look at the national dropout rate. Estimates show that we're losing roughly a million students a year in the high schools. Now, that will surely erode our ability to compete in business, and it could lead to a permanent underclass of unskilled new workers who don't have much hope in the job market.

Now, you may have heard about one such case in Indiana. The local schoolboard wanted to encourage better high school attendance, so they offered a $100 reward for any student who graduated with a perfect attendance record their senior year. Well, word got around, and the kids stopped cutting classes. And now the schoolboard has found that close to 200 students made perfect attendance records, and they'll have to come up with $20,000 before graduation day.

The point I'm making is that education is back on the agenda. All over this country, there has been a renaissance of interest in and involvement with the schools. And so much of the spirit of this renewal is directly traceable to your report last year.

And, Dr. Gardner, as head of the National Commission on Excellence in Education, I just want to say thank you on behalf of your country and on behalf of the generations that will benefit from your great work.

And now the high point of my day. One of the things we did this past year was start a new award for students who have strived to reach their potential and worked hard to learn, study, and get good marks. You remember that some years back, President Kennedy was concerned about the physical fitness of all Americans. And a few years later, President Johnson followed up that concern by creating the President's Physical Fitness Award. Well, this year, we instituted the President's Academic Fitness Award. And I am pleased to announce that more than 220,000 graduating high school seniors are recipients of the first awards.

And today, we have here around 60 representatives of all the winners from all the States, and I'm aware of how hard you worked for these awards. You are meeting your potential through your scholarly attainments. You are leaders, good students, and you've worked hard to learn and study.

Asthma and allergic diseases annually result in physical, emotional, and economic hardship for more than thirty-five million Americans and their families. Even though sufficient medical knowledge and resources exist to prevent many asthma-related deaths, thousands of Americans die each year from asthma. Indeed, student absenteeism is due in significant part to asthma and allergic diseases. Furthermore, in some instances, medical patients suffer unfortunate allergic reactions to prescribed medicines.

It is estimated that the American people pay $2 billion per year in medical bills directly attributable to the treatment and diagnosis of asthma and allergic diseases and another $2 billion per year as a result of the indirect social costs of such illnesses.

Recent developments in the study of immunology enable health care providers to diagnose and treat asthma and allergic diseases more effectively. Increased public awareness of these scientific advances in immunology will help dispell many of the common misconceptions concerning these diseases and their victims. With the determination and support of our citizens, scientists hope that continuing progress will eventually lead to the control and prevention of these life-limiting and sometimes life-threatening diseases.

In recognition of the significant importance of increased public awareness of recent advancements in the study of immunology to the health and well-being of millions of American children and adults, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 244, has designated the week beginning on May 6, 1984, as ``National Asthma and Allergy Awareness Week,'' and authorized and requested the President to issue an appropriate proclamation.

As we observe National Nursing Home Week, let us remember that nursing home residents need more than the quality medical and social services nursing homes provide. They also need contact with the people and activities in their communities.

Living in our modern world, we often feel troubled by the rapid pace of social change. Yet, as a society, we tend to ignore one of our most valuable reservoirs of strength, comfort and stability: our older citizens. Their lives, their conversation, and their companionship can give us new perspectives and new insight into events known to us only through books but to them through personal experience.

When our younger and older generations share their understanding, we all benefit. I hope you will visit a nearby nursing home this week and return often. By keeping in touch with our elders, we enlarge our own lives as well as theirs.

The job of police officers is perhaps the most difficult and challenging one of all in our free society. They must protect society from those who would violate its laws, while scrupulously observing the rights of everyone.

All too often, these disciplined and courageous men and women give their lives to the cause of justice. As we pause to remember and reflect upon those who have made the ultimate sacrifice for the good of their fellow citizens, let us pray that no more names are added to the list.

All Americans are thankful that there are those willing to risk injury and death so that the rest of us can live in a nation of greater safety and security. It is our responsibility to continue to strive for a society which will lessen the risks of such tasks. For we are committed to a vision of justice that will ensure that those who have been lost will not have died in vain.

I want to talk to you today about a wonderful thing that's happening in our country. It began a year ago, so it's only just begun. But already it's changing our country, and I think it may change it forever. I'm talking about the recent progress in America's schools.

Commission documented 20 solid years of decline -- decline in academic standards and discipline, decline in authority and in scholastic results. The Commission said a rising tide of mediocrity was wiping out America's reputation for the best education system in the world. That report was electrifying, and its current swept the country.

Parents and teachers got together, marshaled their resources, and began to turn the situation around. So now, 1 year later, we can report that together we have met the rising tide of mediocrity with a tidal wave of school reforms.

Those reforms reflect the Commission's advice: Get back to basics, tighten standards, heighten academic requirements, and remember discipline in the classroom is vital. In short, make sure that Johnny and Mary can read and write, and make sure their school is allowed the peace without which no student can learn and no teacher can instruct.

Twenty-one States are reviewing steps to make textbooks more challenging. Eight States have lengthened the school day; seven have lengthened the school year. And every State in the Union has put together a task force to improve its educational system. School districts across the country are moving toward requiring 4 years of English in high school and 3 solid years each of math and science. Many legislatures are currently developing workable and fair merit pay plans.

The private sector, too, is playing a big part in the reforms. Local businesses are adopting local schools, sending in their executives and employees to work with students and teachers to make education more exciting and more pertinent to the 1980's.

Maryland, a commission concluded students aren't being taught enough about American traditions of freedom and liberty. A bipartisan panel came up with a plan to teach students that most basic of democratic arts, the art of citizenship. In New Jersey Governor Tom Kean had another creative idea -- give scientists and mathematicians in private industry a form of teaching accreditation so they can go into the schools and teach what they know.

This month 220,000 high school seniors, who had maintained high marks and achieved high scores on scholastic aptitude tests, won the Academic Fitness Awards. And yesterday, on the South Lawn of the White House, I personally gave the awards to 60 students from around the country. Just seeing their proud faces spoke a world of words about the importance of education to our country's future and the spirit of renewal that's underway.

This entire reform movement proves how wrong the people are who always insist money is the only answer to the problems of our schools. Well, leaving aside the fact that the 20 years they kept shoveling money in was the same 20 years in which the schools deteriorated, I think it's fair to say they missed the essential point. Money was never the problem. Leadership was -- leadership in getting the schools back to basic values, basic traditions, and basic good sense.

With the leadership of plain American citizens, we're getting back on track. Much remains to be done. Our administration will go forward with our efforts to control school crime, pass tuition tax credits and school vouchers as well. And, once again, I'll continue working for the restoration of voluntary school prayer, for nothing is as basic as acknowledging the God from whom all knowledge springs.

But we can be proud of the progress we're making. And I think this is only the first chapter of a marvelous story about how the people of America came together to re-create a school system that was once the envy of the world. Let's all write the next chapter together.

And throughout all these decades, you've cared for the elderly in our Capital City who had nowhere else to go. You've brought them into a warm and happy home. And you've given them, in addition to the necessities, the thing that only the love of others can bestow: dignity.

I know that for your financial support, you depend on individual donations, and I can't think of any worthier cause than the Little Sisters of the Poor. And on behalf of all those you've done so very much to help, I thank you.

You know, Nancy and I, coming down here from Camp David on the helicopter, we couldn't help but be thinking about this particular day and what it was. I think in hindsight, perhaps, I realize more about my mother than -- and as so many of us do, did not at the time -- Nelle was a little woman, auburn hair, and, I realize now, had a strength through some very trying times that held our family together. We were poor, but the government didn't come around and tell us we were, so -- [laughter] -- we didn't know it. And probably we didn't know it because Nelle was always finding someone that was worse off then we were that needed help.

And my father was hard-working. He had a sense of humor. He also had a very great problem, but my mother saw that my brother and I, from the time we were children, understood that problem and that it was something -- a sickness, and that he was not to be blamed, but to be loved.

And she taught us about life, I think, by her deeds as well as her words. She had never gone beyond -- in education -- beyond elementary school, but she had a different kind of education that I think has been imprinted and a faith that I know now has been bestowed on me.

I'd like to just tell a little anecdote about it. Some years after I was in Hollywood, I was able to bring my parents out there, and she immediately started finding people. And one she found was a county tubercular sanitarium that could provide, as a public institution could of that kind, the necessary care, but certainly failed in some of the homelike atmosphere that was necessary.

But Nancy, at the same time -- and this is a coincidence -- thank heaven, Nancy's mother is still with us -- Nancy's mother, living in Chicago, was one of a kind also. I don't think there was a policeman or a doorman or a cabdriver or anyone like that in Chicago that didn't know Edith Davis, because she, too, was always engaged in good works. And we saw a classic example of that.

And I know there are many of you mothers in this room. I also know that there are others who live as mothers live, the Little Sisters of the Poor, 17 who are residents in this home and together with the 4,500 Little Sisters around the world who have chosen to give of themselves completely in humble service to their fellow men and women. The residents are your family. Your prayers and hard work have made this a very friendly and, it's very obvious, a joyful home.

And, Michael, I have another message from our fans in the Washington, DC, area. They said, we want you back. So, when you begin your greatly awaited crosscountry tour, will you please be sure to drop off here in the Nation's Capital?

Well, down to business. We're gathered here to mark the progress of a shared endeavor and to commit ourselves to an even greater national effort, as Elizabeth told you. On April 14th of 1982, I created a Presidential Commission on Drunk Driving. And since that date, real progress has been made. States have passed tougher laws, arrests and enforcement have been stepped up, and citizens across our country are taking a stronger stand against the tragedies caused by drinking and driving.

Campaign to make more Americans aware of solutions to this national problem. Our campaign will marshal the power of the media, with the help, as you've been told, of the Advertising Council, our Private Sector Initiatives Office, and the Department of Transportation, under the strong leadership of Secretary Elizabeth Dole. This private sector-government partnership brings a message to young people that will touch many lives and change them for the better.

Today we recognize all these fine efforts of voluntarism by the Commission members as well as those of the Ad Council. Helping one another for the good of this country and its citizens and without concern for reward or payment, this is the heart of America -- strong, good, and true.

Michael, you've made it possible for us to warn millions of young Americans about the dangers of drinking and driving. You've done this with your music you've provided to the public service messages as well as through your own personal example. And thanks to your help, Michael, young people from virtually every family in America will hear these messages on television and radio. And they will hear them at one of the most criticial times of the year, when graduations and vacations are fast approaching. Thanks to your help, lives will be saved. And no one can put a dollar value on the precious life of one boy or girl.

Michael Jackson is proof of what a person can accomplish through a lifestyle free of alcohol or drug abuse. People young and old respect that. And if Americans follow his example, then we can face up to the problem of drinking and driving, and we can, in Michael's words, beat it.

Nancy spends a great deal of her time with young people talking about the problems of drug and alcohol abuse, so I speak for both of us when I say, thank you, Michael, for the example that you're giving to millions of young Americans who look up to you.

The President. Our defense policy is based on a simple premise -- I stated it the other night -- that we do not start wars. We maintain our strength to deter aggression and preserve peace. Since the dawn of the nuclear age, we've sought to reduce the risk of war by maintaining a strong deterrent and by seeking genuine arms control. And after close bipartisan coordination with the Congress, the Scowcroft Commission on Strategic Forces last year reaffirmed that we must continue the Peacekeeper program as part of an overall strategic modernization program that includes ambitious arms control negotiations.

There is no more compelling priority on my agenda, and that is why we've been working so hard to convince the Soviet Union to join us in a spirit of genuine cooperation to achieve real and equitable reductions in the levels of nuclear arms. And that's why the United States is continuing to carry out its own obligations and commitments under previous agreements as we call upon the Soviet Union to demonstrate equal restraint.

It's important to remember that since the December 1979 NATO decision on longer range, intermediate nuclear forces, the United States has already withdrawn over 1,000 nuclear weapons from Europe. We will continue to withdraw one additional nuclear weapon for each Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missile deployed. We and our allies have also announced plans to withdraw an additional 1,400 nuclear weapons from Europe. In sum, the United States will withdraw five times as many nuclear weapons as are planned for deployment in the ground-launch cruise missiles and Pershing II programs.

In five rounds of START, the United States has been flexible in exploring all avenues to achieve verifiable arms reductions. The U.S. position was adjusted to reflect the Scowcroft Commission's recommendations to incorporate a proposed mutual guaranteed build-down, and to include trade-offs between the interests and advantages of each side. Negotiations on mutual balanced force reductions resumed March 16th. We tabled a new initiative to break the deadlock with the Soviets over existing force levels. And in the Conference on Disarmament, we're pressing for a total ban on chemical weapons.

Despite all our initiatives, the Soviet Union walked out of the Intermediate Nuclear Force talks and has still failed to agree to resume the START talks. We regret this Soviet action, and we remain prepared to resume negotiations immediately, without preconditions. We must not cast doubt on U.S. and allied reserve [resolve] nor reward the Soviets for their current belligerent behavior towards arms control.

The U.S.S.R. has a comprehensive program to strengthen their strategic force. We cannot afford to delay any longer. Without Peacekeeper, the MX, the incentive for the Soviets to return to the negotiating table is greatly reduced. The Soviets hope that, once again, our modernization efforts will be curtailed. To falter now would only encourage the Soviet Union to ignore our arms control efforts. For our own security and the cause of world peace, we must support the bipartisan national program that we approved last year.

The President. What did I actually talk about over in China? I have thought back on the remarks that were supposedly -- or were censored out or at least, removed. What I said about them was I was contrasting what we have -- we obviously differ in many ways from the Chinese, but I was saying we have many things in common. And I pointed out that on our own behalf, we didn't have any troops massed on their border. We were not pursuing an expansionist policy. We were not invading another country, such as Afghanistan or doing what they're doing in Kampuchea. Now, is that harsh rhetoric, or is that telling the simple truth?

Q. Mr. President, relations between the U.S. and U.S.S.R. have really hit a new low, almost cold war dimensions in the eyes of some experts. What is the real reason for this? What are you going to do about it? Do you think that your rhetoric -- you say no now -- and/or your actions have contributed to this? Or is it all their fault? What are they up to?

The President. Well, Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], sometimes I wonder why we don't ask those questions of them. Why is it that it's almost a pattern that the United States is possibly doing something that might cause the threat of war or that -- what should we -- we didn't walk away from the table. In fact, we made some efforts to bring them back to the table by showing them how flexible we were willing to be in these discussions. And they didn't come back.

The President. Again, you'd have to ask them. The reasons they have given are absolutely false -- and we've been able to prove it -- the reasons that there might not be sufficient security for their visitors, their athletes, and so forth. And we were able to prove no one in the history of the Olympics has ever done as much as we're doing to ensure that.

The President. Well, let's remember the different situation. The Soviets have now announced that they are not going to come because they don't believe that we can offer protection to their athletes. And, as I say, we have been given -- we've given them chapter and verse on what we have done, and there had never been anything like it.

Now, in 1980, the reason for the boycott that was given by the then administration was because the Soviets had invaded -- openly invaded with their own forces -- a neighboring country, Afghanistan, that hadn't done any thing to them or lifted a finger against them.

I think this was a completely different situation. It is true, however, that I went through several stages of thinking then. It wasn't just an automatic accepting of the politicizing of that. I was as angry as anyone, I'm sure, as we all were, and as disapproving of the invasion of Afghanistan -- and still am. But at the time, I did voice a question as to -- I questioned our government setting a precedent of denying the right of our own citizens to leave our borders and go someplace else.

Olympic Committee, the athletes themselves? I went through a stage of thinking in which I said it wasn't so much of their not participating as, I said, shouldn't we -- since the Olympics traditionally were born in and exist on the basis of trying to provide peace between nations -- they, the host nation, having done what they did, should we not consider removing the Olympics from that country and staging them someplace else? And from that I went to exploring what so many have and are exploring now: possibly having the Olympics from now on be in the home of their origin, Greece, and not have them move around the world.

The President. I don't think there's any action that I could take that would be prudent. I would -- naturally, I would do anything if I thought it could have a result, and I have encouraged citizens groups and our people to do this. It is not a government relation problem.

Government to participate in a partisan fashion in that election. There has been overtly, not covertly, aid given to labor unions, to trade associations, within the very framework of the program that I announced before the British Parliament a couple of years ago, and that is the idea of trying to help democracy by strengthening those organizations within a country that lead toward democracy, such as free labor unions, and so forth. And we have helped finance those.

Now, it's possible that some of those groups then, just as our own do, decide to take a partisan stand in support of someone in an election. But that had nothing to do with the helping to fund those organizations, nor do we intervene with what they may want to do.

The President. What I'm saying is that I'm not going to discuss intelligence matters of that kind or what an agency like the CIA may do. But I'm here to tell you that I am assured that we have not tried to participate as a government in any way in the elections in El Salvador.

And I'd like to call to your attention that the group that just went down there to observe this election -- and we've done this every election -- but this last group, completely bipartisan and with some people who admittedly went down there with a different idea, came back and reported to me -- and you can check with any of them -- that they made every effort to view this from the standpoint of eligibility to vote right on up to the counting. And they were totally enthused and convinced that this election was fair, that the people were enthusiastically in support of it, and that they found no evidence of anything, even judging to the point of the suspected thing of the military may be influencing people. They saw only the military in protection of the right of the people to vote. They reported that they were very courteous about answering questions or directing people to where they needed to go and so forth.

Q. Mr. President, many observers think the Soviets have boycotted the Olympics to make a political point -- the point being that they can't do business with you, that you are a dangerous man, and thus, apparently try to hurt your reelection chances. Do you think that's their motive?

News], I have to tell you -- a little thing with you. The other day, I had in my possession a kind of a scholarly type magazine -- I can't even give you the name of it now -- that had been given to me, dated April 1980. And on the plane over in China, I gave it to George Shultz, because I thought he would be interested. It was one of those where there are a whole series of essays in the magazine on various national and international topics. And I gave it to him, because one of the essays was on Soviet-American relations.

And there hasn't been an adjective used or a word spoken with regard to our relations now that I did not see in that article -- where the relations were at the lowest ebb they had ever been. They were frozen tight, and the President -- the then President of the United States, according to the essay, was to blame for this terrible relationship.

What have we done to the Soviets that can compare with any of the things that they are presently doing except tell them that we're not going to let them get so powerful that they can impose nuclear blackmail on us and that we are willing to meet them in arms reductions to the point of total disarmament, if they would be willing to meet in that?

The President. No. The question on the Fed is -- I think that one of the reasons for the interest rates is still a lack of confidence out there that we do have inflation under control. What we want from the Fed is for the -- we want the money supply to be increased at a range that is commensurate with the increase in the growth in the economy and that will thus make possible the continued growth of the economy without a return to inflation. So, therefore, we want no great big upsurges, nor do we want any string-tightening down to the point that there is not enough money supply in the economy.

Now, I have to say also, in behalf of the Fed, we must recognize these tools are not all that accurate that they have to work with. It is possible for there to be for limited times an inadvertent upsurge or an inadvertent decline that the Fed doesn't have anything to do with. They do as well as they can in trying to keep this projected growth.

The President. I think that that was what Secretary Regan was also trying to say. There was a downsurge recently. And that slump could have been -- what I say -- inadvertent. But as far as we know, they are within the two brackets. They have an upper line and a lower line, and they try to keep the increase within those lines.

The legislation would rescind $9.5 billion of the $19 billion appropriated by Congress in 1980 for support of synthetic fuels. It would also limit the use of the remaining funds to those projects whose products will not cost significantly more than the projected market price of competing fuels.

The President's proposal is the result of careful review within the administration and reflects an effort to strike a balance between avoiding unnecessary and wasteful expenditures of scarce Federal dollars and preserving a sound, sensibly scaled national synthetic fuels program.

The administration also announced the President's intent to nominate three individuals to fill the current vacancies on the Board of Directors of the Synthetic Fuels Corporation. A fourth nomination is currently in progress.

Enactment of the proposed legislation would leave the Synthetic Fuels Corporation with approximately $4.6 billion in unobligated funds that could be used to support a wide array of carefully selected private synthetic fuels projects. These projects would be in addition to the four major synthetic fuels projects and other alternative energy grants totaling approximately $5 billion that have received Federal support from the funds appropriated to the Energy Security Reserve in 1980.

But I believe this year's relay is truly special, because it's giving something back to our young people. Thanks to the generosity of thousands of Americans, we now have a multimillion-dollar fund to promote and expand amateur sport training. I'm so pleased that the Legacy for Youth Program will help the Special Olympics, the family YMCA's, Boys' Clubs and Girls' Clubs of America strengthen their commitment to the growth and well-being of young people all across America.

The Olympic torch, the symbol of continuity between the ancient and modern Olympic games, was a proud tradition. It is now in our hands, and the United States is totally committed to upholding the Olympic Charter and the traditions which this torch represents. As the host nation for the games of the 23d Olympiad, we will fulfill our responsibilities. Athletes and Olympic officials of all countries will find a warm welcome in Los Angeles and will be treated equally and without discrimination.

Committee have done everything possible to create a hospitable climate in which all participants will be able to perform to the best of their ability. And I have instructed agencies of the Federal Government to cooperate fully with Olympic and local officials to ensure the safety of all participants.

We consider sport to be one of the finest opportunities for people of all nations to come and to know and to understand each other. And in sport, nothing can match the competition of the Olympics. The Olympics provide the ultimate experience in watching athletes strive through honest effort, fair play, discipline, and determination to reach the top. Athletes know better than anyone that there is more, much more, to the Olympic experience than winning medals. It's the personal striving, the ability to achieve the fullest measure of human potential that counts most.

Athletes look to their sport with a common mind, knowing that they will never go fast enough to say, ``This is as fast as we can go.'' There will always be a new standard to aim for -- that last fraction of an inch, that extra second.

Athletes all over the world live by the Olympic motto: Swifter, higher, stronger. Olympics breed inspiration. Who will ever forget Jesse Owens' achievements in 1936; Bob Beamon's 29-foot, 2\1/2\-inch broadjump in Mexico City? The thrill of striving for excellence in sports, as in other areas of our lives, fires our imagination, stirs us to dream great dreams, and often enables us to achieve them. By embracing the Olympic tradition, we have reason to look to the future with optimism and hope because the Olympic spirit carries beyond the field of competition.

Olympics were started more than 2,000 years ago to hopefully offer a substitute to the constant warfare between the city-states of Greece. They were revived on an international basis nearly a century ago, and again, the goal was peace and understanding. Let us keep that Olympic tradition alive in Los Angeles and resolve that the Olympic flame will burn ever brighter.

President Reagan. Mr. President, it's an honor and a pleasure for Nancy and me to welcome you and Mrs. De la Madrid to Washington. We welcome you with the respect and admiration due to the leader of a great nation. We welcome you also with the warmth and good will with which one greets a friend.

A special relationship between the Presidents of our countries is becoming somewhat of a tradition, and the rapport we build as individuals is in keeping with the finest sense of that valuable tradition. Our ability to meet and, face to face, discuss the issues of the day, honestly and without reservation, is beneficial to both our countries. The trust between us is something of great value which should never be taken for granted.

Mr. President, I well recall first making your acquaintance in June of 1981 at Camp David. And the next time we met, you were President-elect of Mexico, and we agreed then, even before you were sworn into office, to maintain a continuing dialog and to meet and confer often. Your visit today builds upon the professional and personal bonds about which I'm speaking.

We have much to discuss. That is as one would expect between the elected leaders of two countries whose people, by the millions, interact with each other on a daily basis. Not only are our destinies tied, but in ways too numerous to count, our present as well.

Mr. President, we're fully aware of your commitment to overcoming Mexico's current economic difficulties. We applaud your dedication and wish you success in your drive to invigorate your economy and better the lives of your people. Our support represents the best wishes of a friend and more.

Mexico is now the third largest trading partner of the United States. We, on the other hand, are the world's largest market for Mexican goods. The prosperity and happiness of our peoples are inexorably linked by these bonds of commerce and friendship. I hope when you return home that you will bring the message to your citizens that the American people are on your, the people of Mexico's side.

The people of our countries -- Spanish- and English-speaking alike -- represent the values and culture of the New World, a bond shared by 650 million Americans from the North Slope of Alaska to the tip of Tierra del Fuego. It behooves all of us to work together to ensure the peace and stability of our hemisphere.

That is especially true in regard to Central America. Mr. President, I understand your deep concerns about the turmoil plaguing that region. We do not agree on everything concerning this situation. Yet, the level of respect in our relationship remains high, and that is the way it should be between neighbors who trust each other.

Where we do disagree is not on goals or principles. Instead, it is on the means by which to achieve our goals. The magnitude of our agreement, on the other hand, is substantial and should not be underestimated. Both the United States and Mexico are motivated by a love of liberty and independence inherent in our systems of government and embedded in the souls of our people.

As you said in your book on constitutional law while assessing Rousseau's influence, ``Liberty and equality are values incompatible with despotism, and mankind will not benefit from them while there may be oppressors and oppressed.'' Our fundamental beliefs suggest that a lasting peace for Central America must be based on the principles of democracy, on economic development that expands opportunity for all people, on noninterventionism, and on the avoidance of military cooperation with Communist and other aggressor regimes.

We appreciate the creative and energetic efforts to bring peace to the region by the Contadora group, in which Mexico has participated. The Contadora's 21-point document of objectives enunciates the goals we both support. We pray that the consensus that produced the document of objectives can translate what has already been done into sound treaty provisions that can be monitored, verified, and enforced on a reciprocal basis.

For the United States, the conflagration in Central America appears too close to ignore. Like a fire in one's neighborhood, this threat should be of concern to every nation in the hemisphere. We can and should work together to save lives and prevent further destruction.

These totalitarians have been pouring gasoline onto the fire by pumping massive supplies of weapons into Central America and encouraging tyranny and aggression. Thousands of Cubans and Soviet-bloc military personnel have accompanied this flow of weapons and equipment into the region.

President De la Madrid, earlier this year, you visited Buenos Aires where you said, ``We do not want new conflicts and wars in our vast territory. We need peace and well-being. We do not want martyrs from warlike confrontations. We are civilian heroes.'' Well, I agree with that sentiment completely.

Cooperation and respect between the United States and Mexico will do much in our efforts to promote peace and improve the standard of living of our people. As adversaries, our horizons would be limited. As friends, equal in each other's eyes and drawing from each other's strength, a universe of opportunity awaits.

I have come here to continue a personal dialog that we began in San Diego in 1982 and continued in La Paz in 1983. Being constantly in touch has allowed us to become better acquainted and, in our friendly and honorable dealings, to more effectively meet our responsibility to solve the problems and overcome the obstacles in the wide-ranging and complex relations between our two countries.

It is with great pleasure that I transmit through you warm greetings from the people of Mexico to the great people of the United States of America. We Mexicans wish to continue building not only peaceful and dignified neighborly relations but also a fruitful and positive friendship. Our two countries are reliable neighbors and friends, and we know how to conduct our relations in mutual respect for our independence and our cultural and political concepts.

We have learned to solve our problems with serenity and realism. Two peoples with different histories and cultures with imbalances and disparities have found the path of dialog and communication to be the basis for their understanding. The wide range and diversity of our bilateral relations highlight our dialog.

Our talks will cover trade and tourism, financing and investment, the very close relationship between our border zones, and human and labor aspects of the Mexican workers who migrate to the United States, to name only some of the most important topics. Progress has been made in several of these areas since the last time we spoke to each other. In others, solutions are pending, as will always be the case in our dynamic relations. The important thing, Mr. President, is that we must continue to tackle our problems frankly and in good faith, and that we, with imagination and determination, seek the best possible solutions for the benefit of our countries.

I must acknowledge, Mr. President, that I have always found this to be your attitude and that of your associates. Your government has supported various financial programs for overcoming our economic problems, and it has also been willing to help surmount difficulties in our trade relations. We must broaden and enhance this open attitude to dialog and negotiation.

Our exchange of ideas goes beyond solely bilateral matters. Both countries are members of the international community, and we share responsibilities on the American Continent. We are all concerned about threats to peace, the problem of the arms race, and the severe economic crisis that is hampering the efforts of developing countries to pursue their goal of economic and social progress in order to satisfy their people's legitimate ambitions and to banish hunger, unhealthy conditions, ignorance, and poverty.

The United States and Mexico should be concerned, as well, about the specially serious difficulties that Latin American countries are experiencing. Peace has been disrupted in Central America, and the risk of a generalized war, the scope and duration of which no one can foresee, is growing. Every country on the continent must do its utmost to restore peace and avoid war by respecting and upholding the sovereign right of its people to decide their own destiny and by rejecting interventionist solutions of any kind.

To that end, let us apply the principles and rules of international law established by the countries of the American Continent: self-determination, nonintervention, equality of states before the law, peaceful solution of conflicts, and international cooperation for development.

Latin America is suffering the most severe economic crisis of modern times. Its peoples and governments have been obliged to implement harsh economic programs to cope with the situation. We are correcting the internal imbalances that come under our responsibility: the reduction of fiscal deficits and the imbalance in our commercial and financial accounts with foreign countries. The Mexican people are giving ample proof of their vigor and responsibility.

Nonetheless, our determined efforts require international understanding and cooperation in the field of trade and finance so that international conditions do not frustrate domestic actions. The crucial point is external debt servicing and the high and rising interest rates. In the short term, it is necessary to take effective action on the cost of money. The broadest and most far-reaching solution is to recover our payment capacity so that we can meet our debt obligations to regain our purchasing power abroad, to renew the process of economic growth, and to generate employment, thereby strengthening the basis of stability.

Solutions are not easy. It is we who must make the basic effort. We have already shown that we are both willing and able to do so. Now we ask the international community and essentially the industrialized countries to accept that. Since interdependence is an irreversible fact, the imperative of solidarity is a duty based not only on ethics but also on expedience.

Mr. President, I have no doubt that in a climate of frankness and friendship our talks will enhance our understanding of these topics, and we will be able to find new solutions to the problems that concern us. Mr. President, I thank you very much for your warm welcome.

Each year hundreds of thousands of American families face the stark terror of a unique tragedy -- that of a missing child. Our children are our most precious resource -- they are the bond that binds our past with the future. It is for them that we struggle to build a better world. They are the embodiment of our hopes and dreams. To have a child simply disappear strikes an incalculable blow against the spirit and soul of any family so afflicted.

In our efforts to address the nightmare of missing children, 1984 marks the year of a significant step forward. The Department of Justice has awarded a $3.3 million grant to establish a National Center for Missing and Exploited Children. Its purpose is to aid parents and law enforcement agencies in locating missing youngsters and preventing the exploitation of children. By collecting and disseminating information regarding missing young people, the Center will lend major support to those searching for their children.

As a Nation committed to the worth of every individual, there can be no more imperative goal for our society than the protection and safety of our young people. It is hoped that these new efforts combined with the increasing awareness of the seriousness of this problem will encourage greater vigilance by the agencies that work to solve this singular type of crime.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

California. Tonight is reminiscent of the gala evenings in old California, the vineyards, the music, the pride and accomplishments of the Hispanic frontier men and women, individuals who conquered a wilderness, but while doing so, maintained a phenomenal level of dignity. All of this, and more, reflects the character of a people whose legacy is now shared by the citizens of our two countries.

Today we've had frank and fulfilling discussions. Mr. President, I hope you agree with me that although we do not see eye to eye on everything, it is clear that we as individuals, and our two nations as well, remain solid in our friendship and undeterred in our trust.

What will not change are the many gifts and mandates given to us by God that serve as the basis of our societies. I can't believe that the Lord brought us to this level of political, social, and economic development, that He located us -- the Mexican and American people -- in such proximity and did not intend us to be friends.

In the last 50 years, when people of bordering countries in so many parts of the world were killing each other, or were immersed in envy and hatred, the mutual respect and ever-increasing cooperation between our peoples and governments shined in contrast.

Our trade and commerce is a powerful engine for economic progress for both our countries. The cultural and social ties between our people enrich and add diversity and flavor to our everyday lives. Yet the cement with the strongest grip is found in the ideals and values that our people share.

Mr. President, if we can be guided by these principles with our shared values and interests overshadowing momentary disagreements, surely the good will between us will endure, and our relationship will continue to shine as an example to others.

President De la Madrid. President Reagan, Mrs. Reagan, may my first words be to express my gratitude for the kind courtesies that we have received during our visit to Washington today. Both during our work meetings and today, during this dinner, we have seen proofs of affectionate and cordial friendship that both my wife, myself, and the members of my party appreciate very much.

This kind of a dialog is also always fruitful. It makes it possible for us to compare our analysis and evaluation, our perceptions of reality, to agree on our similarities, and also to know our differences.

Friends always seek to extend areas of consensus and to make their differences smaller, to seek formulas to overcome the problems that come from our close, complex, and very broad relationship. Friendship presupposes all of this. There must be sincerity and frankness, dignity and respect in our dealings, careful examination of our discrepancies and above all, it demands good will.

Differences of opinion are natural and can be explained among human beings. They can be explained among us. Even though Mexico and the United States have often traveled the same road, even though they stem from the same roots, there are differences in our culture, and these differences have made our sensibilities also different. It has come to enrich the human race, because it is variation which is needed for this enrichment. It is not good for everyone to be just the same.

In this way, Americans and Mexicans find themselves face to face with a rich culture and a rich and profound perception of our nationalities. But there are not only differences among us -- or between us; analogies are also evident.

Both nations have rooted their political and social systems in the aspiration to live in freedom, to permanently build democracy, and to seek the equality of opportunity for all. Both nations postulate respect for law and justice as a norm for peaceful and dignified coexistence. And that which makes our two countries similar, Mr. President, is that we are not societies that are frozen and opposed to change. We are societies that are open to change.

President Reagan, our conversations have been honorable and cordial. They reflect our common purpose: to extend the areas in which we agree and to reduce our differences. But the road to travel is a long one. The life of individuals has a limit, but the life of nations does not have a historical horizon.

The important thing about this meeting is that we have renewed our will to continue to travel that road as individuals and as nations that are living in good faith. As I said before, during the luncheon that was kindly offered me by Secretary Shultz, we know that you want to have dignified, prosperous, and strong neighbors.

It is very important that a powerful nation such as the United States, which is the most powerful nation of all, can say to the other countries, ``We have neighbors who are dignified; they are not slaves.'' I, therefore, President Reagan, express my hope that this relationship with dignity and cordiality that has been built by the Americans and the Mexicans will always be the common denominator of our relationship, that we shall always be capable with talent and good will to continue to strengthen our friendship to our mutual benefit.

This is the thinking and the will of the Mexican people. And I am certain that there is this same thinking and this same will in the United States. That is why I express my wishes that the relations between Mexico and the United States will always be vigorous, that they may be strengthened by our will to understanding, and because friendship and cooperation is what will bring us together.

I wish to ask you to join me in a toast to the personal happiness of President Reagan and his charming wife, Nancy, to the happiness and prosperity of the American people, and to those values which we cherish, which are freedom, democracy, and justice.

It's hard to believe that 2 years have passed since we last met -- 2 short years, but what a difference. As you probably remember, when we met in the Rose Garden, I didn't have very much good news to give you. The American people had paid a steep price for years of good intentions badly misdirected. And as a result, our national economy had nearly reached the breaking point.

As a result of that crisis that faced us -- well, we weren't, however, pursuing a program based on the shifting sands of government expediency. Another quick fix certainly would have failed. There was only one way to go, and that was use three simple words as our guide: Trust the people.

Lasting economic recovery had to be built on the solid rock of the American free enterprise system. And when I think back to all the critics who cynically said we couldn't possibly get it done, I find myself remembering my previous life in the entertainment world.

Well, I've felt that way quite a bit about some of the people that were so critical of what we were trying to do here. There are still some of them around, and they think what we're doing are bird imitations. [Laughter] But as far as I'm concerned we've passed the recovery stage; we're well into economic expansion. And from the mess we inherited just a few years ago, I think a strong and vibrant America is taking shape.

Purchasing power is back in the hands of the consumers, and that's great news for retailers. And we're doing everything we can to keep it that way. Starting next year, tax rates will be indexed, as you know, so that the Federal Government will no longer be able to profit by inflation. And we're not finished yet.

But I know there's a lot of talk about the monster, inflation, coming back. We don't think that's happening. Consumer prices rose a scant two-tenths of a percent in March, and last month the Producer Price Index didn't rise at all. The pessimists made dire predictions about the economy when it was announced that the gross national product for the first quarter this year expanded at a robust 8.3 percent. Overheating, they warned, would cause a return of inflation. But the economy isn't conforming to their fears.

At 8:30 this morning, it was announced that housing starts in April rose to an annual rate of 1.96 million, and that's an increase of 19 percent over March. And new housing permits are still holding steady at 1.7 million. New homeowners mean more retail business.

Venture capital is up to four times what it was in 1980. Real fixed business investment increased by 13 percent last year, and that's the best increase in 30 years. Bankruptcies declined some 30 percent in the second half of '83, and that was compared with the second half of '82.

We want to see the business community grow and grow. We're working hard to be sensitive to your concerns. The Federal Trade Commission, with Jim Miller at the helm, has built a solid, balanced relationship with your industry. And we're pressing to get passage of legislation which would tighten up consumer credit provisions on Federal bankruptcy laws. I know this issue is important to you, so I hope you'll make your views known.

And we all have an interest in making sure that Federal spending is brought down into line with government revenues. And that's why I strongly favor constitutional reforms like giving the President the right to line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. I have told repeatedly other groups that have been in here, as a Governor, in 8 years, I had line-item veto. And I line-item vetoed spending items that were attached to legitimate legislation 943 times in those 8 years, and never once when they were faced with having to vote for an override on that particular item and hold it up to view, not buried in some other legislation, they never overrode one of those 943 vetoes. And yet it took a two-thirds majority for them to send me the proposal in the first place.

Now, before I close, I want to take this opportunity to thank retailers all across America for the work that you're doing to help our young people find that crucial first job. When America's youth can get their feet on the first rung of the economic ladder, everybody benefits. You're taking advantage of the tax credit for hiring disadvantaged, minority youth. And I'd like to see you take even greater advantage of this program.

And while I'm at it, let me mention that more and more people recognize the problem the minimum wage causes for our unskilled young people. Our youth employment opportunity wage bill will give a much needed boost to those looking for their first summertime job, and it deserves your active support.

We can establish that the imposition of the minimum wage, and then the increases through the years, have been followed in every increase with a further decline in teenage employment in America. And so, we're trying to do something about it. And there's a lot of opposition to it, but I think it's necessary. Those unskilled young people should not have that handicap to overcome.

When it comes to the bottom line, if I can borrow a phrase that's the heartbeat of all retailers, it's a great time to be a merchant. But I believe that the best is yet to come. And I hope that your 46th meeting will be a great success, and thank you all for being here. God bless you.

Well, seriously, it's a pleasure to be here. You know, in Washington, there are a lot of big dinners like this, but tonight is special. I've been around photographers all my adult life, or most of it, and I think that I can say that I've developed an appreciation for your craft. So, it's as an old pro that I admire the work of each of you and that each of you performs. You demonstrate true professionalism and artistry. And time and again, I find myself pausing to admire a wonderful picture that one of you has produced.

And although news analysts might discuss the Presidency, it's your photos that show J.F.K. working in the Oval Office with John-John playing under the desk or me giving a briefing with Nancy waiting in the wings to surprise me with a birthday cake. And pictures like that remind us the Presidency isn't an abstraction, but an office held by just ordinary men who do their job the best they can.

Often, news photos remind us of the first things, the fundamentals of human experience that make us do what we do. Living in the United States, for example, we might begin to take democracy for granted. And then we see a news photo of people lined up at ballot boxes in El Salvador -- simple men and women who've braved death threats to travel into town and cast their votes. We see the care in their faces and the life of hard work in their shoulders and hands, and we remember once again why we strive for democracy and peace.

My admiration for news photographers goes to the root of my political philosophy. In too many countries, photographs of top officials are only released once in a while to show that the leaders are still healthy. But in our country, your right to snap anything you want is protected by the Constitution. And each of you represents a vital part of the great and lively American system of freedom.

George's Medical School. As one student got off the plane, we all know he dropped to his knees and kissed the good earth of the United States, and nearby there was a news photographer, clicked his camera and caught that moment for all Americans to share. Although there will always be some hurly-burly and tugging between the White House and the press, I know that photo captured the way that all of us feel about this great land.

I believe that we both sharpened our perceptions and, at the same time, know we deepened our personal friendship. And like good friends, we spoke openly and with candor on those few issues on which there might have been differences between us. But let me hasten to say that we found that the differences were not with regard to our goals.

We both share a commitment to democracy, to the greater economic well-being, and a secure peace in all the Americas. Our differences, where there were any, were only with regard to the means of reaching the goals and objectives that we share. And both our delegations at the ministerial level worked very hard and, I think, have made great progress on a number of bilateral issues.

And let me just say to all of you here -- and I think I'm really speaking for what was the tone of our conversations -- we must remember that we are all in this Western Hemisphere. Our nations were born of people that were seeking the same things -- freedom, better life in this New World that was here for our forefathers to discover. We've been given great gifts, resources, technology and, above all, that spirit of freedom.

Early in my administration I made a trip down through Central America and into South America and in all of them said the same thing. There have been misunderstandings between us in the past, and maybe there's been an insensitivity on the part of our own country, the United States. But what I wanted to find out was, how could we all meet as partners here in this Western Hemisphere, recognizing that from the tip of South America all the way to the North Slope of Alaska, we are all Americans. We are all related in a sense that is not true in any other part of the world -- that when we cross a border from one country into another, we still have that common heritage.

And if we look at ourselves, 650 million people in North, Central, and South America, and we look at the potential of what we can achieve, we cannot only be a great force for good here in the Western Hemisphere, we can be a great force for good in the entire world.

President De la Madrid. Gentlemen, legislators of the United States and of Mexico, it is a great pleasure for me to be able to greet you at the beginning of a new interparliamentary meeting between the United States and Mexico.

In accordance with our constitutional norms are the relations, the formal relations of our countries are formed through a very complex process that is in the hands of the legislative and the executive bodies. It is one of the most serious responsibilities that this Presidential system gives the heads of the executive branch, both in the United States and in Mexico. But there is no doubt that the political process through which the foreign policy is formed has as one of its basic ingredients the opinions of the Congresses and, particularly, of the Senates.

That is why it is very promising that this meeting among legislators is beginning precisely when the meeting between the Presidents has just finished. I agree with what my friend, President Reagan, has said just a few minutes back. Our dialog has progressed as it should between good friends that work with dignity. Both sides have been led by the main guideline of our conversations, which has been the interest of our peoples, mutual respect and, also, respect for one another's truth.

As President Reagan has already said, we have made progress during these conversations. We have made progress in coming to a better understanding of each other and also in keeping each other better informed and bringing about certain solutions to some of our problems, problems which are every day more complex and deeper between Mexico and the United States.

I have no doubt that the work that you will be beginning today will be another positive and constructive episode. An exchange of points of view within a framework of sincerity, of respect, and of dignity will give each one of our countries new elements of judgment in order to continue to work towards a stronger friendship and a relationship which is every day more cordial and more sincere.

I'm delighted to help kick off this 1984 summer youth employment program. And I want to congratulate all the Presidential Certificate Award winners for their dedication to the career development of America's youth and for their generous support of the 1983 private sector jobs program. It's times like this that remind us America was built by people helping people.

Many of you'll recall that last July we held a similar ceremony right here in the Rose Garden. And since then, more than 3 million Americans have found jobs. In fact, since the economic expansion began 17 months ago, 5.4 million Americans have found jobs, and the unemployment rate has shown the sharpest drop -- or the steepest drop in 30 years. Now, that's why when I'm asked to describe our economic program I do it with three words -- jobs, jobs, jobs. But we can't rest until everyone who wants one and needs one has one.

We must and will go forward to keep opportunities expanding, particularly for the young people of America. No single sector of our nation -- government, business, labor, or nonprofit organization -- can solve the unemployment problem, the needs of our young people. But by working together, pooling our resources and building on our strengths, we can accomplish great things. That's the whole idea behind our youth employment programs' public-private partnerships -- to produce real, not makework, jobs.

Partnerships take advantage of opportunities to help America's youth gain a foothold on the economic ladder. Young people who want to work in the summer deserve the chance, and partnerships can make it happen.

The summer youth employment program includes a $725 million block grant to State and local governments. This grant will give 718,000 young Americans valuable work experience, but it's only part of our effort to help deserving young people get a start. Another program in place gives employers who hire economically disadvantaged teenagers a tax credit of up to 85 percent of the wages paid. The employers get a young employee the company may not be able to afford without the tax break, and the young worker gets a needed job and valuable work experience in the private sector.

What we're trying to do is help our young people find that critical first job. With experience in the workplace, America's youth can develop skills and demonstrate their qualifications and potential -- permanent employers.

But far too often, inexperienced and disadvantaged young people are priced out of the labor market by the minimum wage. Well, Ray Donovan and a lot of other people here today have put together legislation that will give a much-needed boost to those looking for that first job. Today I will submit our youth employment opportunity wage act to the Congress. And Senators Percy and Hatch and Congressman Packard, who have worked hard on this bill, will introduce it on the Hill in behalf of the administration and the American people.

This legislation would allow employers to hire young people at a lower minimum wage during the summer months. The bill would increase summer employment opportunities and provide explicit safeguards to protect permanent employees and sanctions to prevent abuse.

Now, I'm delighted that the National Conference of Black Mayors has endorsed the concept of the youth employment opportunity wage. And now that Mayor Johnny Ford, the past president, and Mayor Marion Barry, the current president of the National Conference of Black Mayors, have endorsed this legislation, maybe we can help Chuck, Orrin, and Ron get this important jobs initiative approved by the Congress.

White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives and the NAB have done an outstanding job in leading this year's effort. And thanks to the support of other business, community, and State and local agencies, we're reaching out and responding to the needs of our young people.

Councils like the Greater Kansas City Alliance of Business are using innovative ideas and modern marketing techniques to develop thousands of summer jobs. Companies like Philip Morris, Coca-Cola, Chevron, the American Council of Life Insurance have donated generously to meet the challenge.

And thousands of caring Americans, like Roosevelt Grier and Dave Winfield, who hit a two-run homer in the 10th last night -- [laughter] -- are with us today pitching in to help make this year's program the best ever.

Yes, America is reaching out with a gift of opportunity, and that's a gift that'll last a lifetime. But there are still far too many young people, particularly disadvantaged and minority youth, who cannot find summer employment. We can and must help them get the chance they so richly deserve.

Let me close by asking America's business men and women two questions. Do you remember your first job? Do you remember the lucky break you received even though you were inexperienced and the only skills you had were enthusiasm and determination?

Mr. Grier. Mr. President and distinguished people up here and you business men and women, I really love this country, and I love this spirit which we have. I know the young people sometimes think that people don't really care about them, and I think today it proves it that you really do care about them. A lot of minority youth have given up. They turn to drugs and other things. And we don't want that to happen to our young people. They have so much to contribute, and we all have so much to give them in inspiring them.

I like it when people like yourself help the young people because they think that no one really cares about them. They don't see their future as we see it. We've all grown up. And we went through our hard knocks, and they're going to do the same thing. But with your help, they're really going to make it.

Mr. Winfield. Ladies and gentlemen, most of my adult life, I've worked with young people. It's just been part of my ideological philosophy. That's just the way I basically am. And I've worked through my Winfield Foundation, and I've worked with kids in health and education and sports and recreation.

You know, we've tried to not only get the private sector involved, but, in fact, that is the main thing we're emphasizing this year, to get involved, along with the corporations. It means a lot, and I know it's encouraging me to work a little harder. But one thing I do know, aside from the clear benefits that the youngsters receive from these jobs, businesses really prosper from their help also.

Note: The President spoke at 10:45 a.m. in the Rose Garden at the White House. Prior to his appearance before the group, Secretary of Labor Raymond J. Donovan participated in the awards ceremony for the 166 business and community leaders who had supported private sector summer jobs programs for disadvantaged youth.

A business cannot be expected to hire a youth unless it can reasonably anticipate that the work done by the youth will be worth the required wage. While some businesses can afford to hire unskilled youth and provide the training and experience expected to pay off in future productivity, such expectations are often unreasonable over a short summer employment span. This proposed legislation would permit employers to pay wages equal to 75 percent of the minimum wage to young people under 20 years of age hired to work between May 1 and September 30.

I congratulate Senate Majority Leader Howard Baker, the Senate Republican leadership, and responsible Senate Democrats for making this victory possible. And for the good of the country, I urge House Members to join their Senate colleagues in moving this package through conference so it can be enacted into law as swiftly as possible.

I want you to know my personal appreciation for your enormous efforts and good work during the time you were able to serve as my Special Representative for the Middle East. It is unquestionably one of the most difficult of assignments and your ability, insight and contributions were invaluable during a critical period.

I very much appreciated your willingness to rearrange your many responsibilities to take this assignment and I am particularly grateful to the Board of Directors of G. D. Searle for making it possible for you to undertake this task.

East, my involvement could only be for a limited period. Secretary Shultz, you and I discussed what that period could be, given my continuing responsibilities as President and Chief Executive Officer of G. D. Searle. As you know, that point has approached and I must proceed on with my other responsibilities.

As we are all aware, the problems in the Middle East are at once both exceedingly difficult and terribly important. The conflicts in the area are deep seated. While a continuation of our steady efforts is vital, you have rightly identified the growth of state-sponsored terrorism and the use of surrogates to mask accountability as profound threats to hopes for progress in the area. A broad public understanding of the nature and magnitude of these threats is necessary. Your efforts to make the world aware of and to develop effective policies for deterring such activities are important steps forward.

Napoleon Duarte as the winner of the May 6 Presidential election in that country. By this act, the people of El Salvador have made clear their choice of Mr. Duarte as the first popularly elected President of that country in recent history.

The voters have chosen as President a man who had dedicated his life to achieving democracy and reform for his homeland. We congratulate President-elect Duarte on his victory and pledge that we will do all in our power to strengthen the ties of freedom and democracy that unite us.

Mr. Duarte carried with him a clear mandate from the people of El Salvador, over 80 percent of whom voted on May 6, that democracy and the vote should determine their future. The United States bipartisan observer delegation noted that, ``This election was fair and honest, and . . . provided a clear and undeniable mandate to whichever candidate is elected.'' Election observers from other countries echoed a similar conclusion.

The people of El Salvador have spoken. We, along with other nations committed to a democratic form of government, must heed their courageous action. We will support their newly elected government in the pursuit of and the opportunity for a better life.

I want to talk to you today about our young people and what we can do to provide them an all-important opportunity -- a summer job. This is a crucial time for young jobseekers, May being the month many firms make their summer hiring decisions.

Why are summer jobs so important for teenagers? Well, because when young people are exposed to the world of work, they can reap a wealth of benefits that often remain with them for a lifetime -- values of personal initiative, self-reliance, and hard work; practical experience which teaches skills that impart confidence in the ability to compete in the permanent job market; the beginning of work history and references, which are vital to successful careers; and, of course, earnings, which can make the difference between going on to college and greater educational achievements or not.

I'll always remember my first job. I was 14 at the time, and I wound up finding work with a construction company that was remodeling homes. By summer's end, I was laying hardwood floors, shingling roofs, and painting houses.

I recognize that a lot of rules and regulations have changed since then. Fourteen-year-olds can't receive those kinds of opportunities today. But what of those who receive no opportunity to work at all?

That is a crushing disappointment not just for these individuals who may lose motivation and, eventually, self-respect, but also for our economy, because we're literally throwing away America's most precious resource -- our next generation.

For some time now, the unemployment rate among black youth has been more than twice as high as that for all youth. And while the current economic expansion has brought the overall unemployment rate down with record speed, the drop in black teenage unemployment has been far less dramatic.

But we want and intend to do much more. Clearly, if the dream of America is to be preserved, we must not waste the genius of one mind, the strength of one body, or the spirit of one soul. We must use every asset we have. And our greatest progress will come by mobilizing the power of private enterprise.

We're supporting an extension of the Targeted Jobs Tax Credit Program, providing major incentives for employers to hire more disadvantaged youth. Employers can receive tax credits of as much as 85 percent on the first $3,000 in wages they pay. Last year almost 300,000 young Americans were hired out of this program.

But one of the barriers to more jobs for youth is the single minimum wage system, because the cruel truth is, while everyone must be assured a fair wage, there's no compassion in mandating $3.35 an hour for startup jobs that simply aren't worth that much in the marketplace. All that does is guarantee that fewer jobs for teenagers will be created and fewer young people will be hired.

But America can do better, and must do better, if we're to bring those teenage unemployment rates down further. I'm asking the Congress to pass our youth employment opportunity wage legislation. But I also want to request that all employers review their operations with the aim of creating more summer jobs. You, the business leaders of America, can make a great difference, and the time to act is now.

The individual who finds his last resting place at Arlington on this occasion will be nameless to the entire world. But to the generations of Americans who left their homes and families to fight and defend the freedom and independence of our Nation, he will be known well by his embodiment of that most noble of all sentiments -- patriotism.

Art flows from and nourishes the human spirit. Through art, we learn to understand ourselves and our potential. For disabled people, the creative experience -- whether as artists, audiences, educators, or students -- is an essential part of leading a full and productive life. It is an important means for the disabled to be integrated into the mainstream of educational and cultural programs as well.

Therefore, it is critical that our cultural institutions, educators, and communities strive to assure that disabled people can participate fully in the arts. The National Committee Arts with the Handicapped, an educational affiliate of the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts, is dedicated to extending opportunities for such participation. It conducts education programs in all fifty States, the District of Columbia, and Puerto Rico. Funded by both the public and private sectors, the Committee is celebrating its tenth anniversary this year. To mark this achievement, the Committee is sponsoring a very special arts festival during the week of May 20, 1984, in Washington, District of Columbia.

During the past three years, Salvadorans of widely differing political views have joined together in a process of building democracy which has moved successfully through the stages of elections for a constituent assembly in March 1982, approval of a new constitution and the presidential elections, just completed. The United States applauds this historic process and proudly welcomes President-elect Duarte as the first freely and directly elected leader of democratic El Salvador.

El Salvador as a period of consolidation of bilateral relations in a spirit of deep friendship as close neighbors in our hemisphere. Both nations will take into account their common interests and problems, maintaining the fullest respect for each other's sovereignty.

Both nations share with other countries of the Americas a fundamental interest in the strengthening of democracy and the firm rejection in this hemisphere of any form of totalitarianism or outside interference in the affairs of sovereign nations. Democracy enhances their individual and collective security. Democratic neighbors are peaceful neighbors, capable of regulating their relations in a framework of cooperation, consultation, mutual respect and peaceful settlement of differences.

It is a fundamental objective of the Duarte administration to broaden and strengthen El Salvador's democratic institutions. And it is the intention of the United States to provide support and assistance to help achieve that objective.

Both Presidents proclaim that democracy, justice and the rule of law require the participation and commitment of all sectors in the political and economic mainstream of the nation. The rule of law requires protection for all against violence and criminal actions. It requires full confidence that the judicial process will produce punishment of the guilty and timely justice with due process for all.

Both Presidents reaffirm their staunch commitment to the promotion of human rights, which are central to the democratic process and our freedoms. They believe that there should be greater support for genuinely democratic organizations from public and private sources in the major democracies, such as in the U.S. National Endowment for Democracy.

The two Presidents pledge to work for the achievement of economic development and growth, and increased regional cooperation, to improve the standard of living of the people of El Salvador and throughout the hemisphere. President-elect Duarte joins President Reagan in support of the comprehensive legislative proposal now before the U.S. Congress which will contribute so greatly, once enacted, to Central American peace and prosperity. The two Presidents express the view that a continuing and healthy economic assistance relationship between the two countries will be needed over the years immediately ahead. Such a relationship will complement broader initiatives, such as the Caribbean Basin Initiative and the National Bipartisan Commission Report, so that El Salvador's interdependent economic and social objectives can be met.

Close collaboration between the public and private sectors will enhance the revitalization of production, improvement in public health and education, reintegration of displaced persons, and national reconstruction. This collaboration is a basis for stimulating domestic confidence, ensuring access to international credit and attracting new international investment.

The consolidation of democracy requires social peace and the protection and improvement of basic reforms begun in El Salvador in the 1980's, including the finding of new ways to stimulate production, ensure clear titles to land, pay adequate compensation and guarantee land reform beneficiaries permanence and tranquility in their new ownership.

Democracy cannot survive or thrive without security. Military assistance and the existence of a strong well-equipped national armed force is essential to shield democratic development. All governments have the obligation to guarantee their peoples full political participation and must have the means to protect democratic institutions against those who would subvert them, be they marxist guerrillas and their external allies or violent internal extremist groups.

The two Presidents share the view that the armed conflict in El Salvador must be resolved through national reconciliation based on the full integration of all its people into the political processes of the country. This participation should take place within the democratic rule which establishes that the only access to power is in accordance with the will of the people expressed through free elections. They particularly welcome the efforts to achieve regional peace undertaken within the Contadora process and reaffirm their full commitment to the principles of the Contadora Document of Objectives.

The two Presidents reaffirm strongly that abandonment of El Salvador and Central America in the midst of a continuing armed struggle serves neither the interests of their two nations, nor those of the community of free countries. They support the development of strong democracies in all parts of Central America, the democratic forces in Nicaragua, and the objective of holding free, fair and democratic elections in each of the countries of the region. On the basis of common national interests and common belief in the principles of democracy and freedom, they pledge to work together toward peace with security and toward human betterment with freedom, for El Salvador and for all of Central America.

To achieve these objectives, the two Presidents have decided to maintain regular and frequent contact to carry out these joint principles, assuring that their relations are guided by considerations of dignity, equality, friendship and mutual respect.

Ladies and gentlemen, my remarks here will be brief, because the issue this bill deals with is so clear that it requires little elaboration. Please, sit down. [Laughter] You can see how much of -- in a hurry I am to -- [laughing] -- finish the remarks and get to the task.

I'm about to sign the Child Protection Act of 1984, a bill which will toughen the Federal laws dealing with the production and distribution of pornographic materials involving children. It strengthens prosecuting authority against the producers and distributors, and it creates stiffer penalties for them.

And I feel very strongly about these measures. There's no one lower or more vicious than a person who would profit from the abuse of children, whether by using them in pornographic material or by encouraging their sexual abuse by distributing this material.

For years, some people have argued that this kind of pornography is a matter of artistic creativity and freedom of expression and so on and so on, and they go on with that. Well, it's not. This pornography is ugly and dangerous. If we do not move against it and protect our children, then we, as a society, just aren't worth much.

In the last few months, we've seen news reports of cases involving child pornography and child abuse on a large scale. We've seen reports suggesting a link between child molesting and pornography. And academics' studies have suggested a link between pornography and sexual violence toward women.

I think the evidence that has come out since that time, plus the tendency of pornography to become increasingly more extreme, shows that it is time to take a new look at this conclusion, and it's time to stop pretending that extreme pornography is a victimless crime.

And so, I want to announce that the Attorney General is setting up a new national commission to study the effects of pornography on our society. The commission will study the dimensions of the problem and what we can do about it.

Sixty percent of the material was child pornography. And just last week the Justice Department held a seminar for nearly 200 Federal and State prosecutors and investigators to train them on how to better deal with pornography cases, including child pornography.

Republican of Michigan. This bill is largely his work. He plans to retire at the end of the current term. And, Hal, I want you to know that your great efforts will be dearly missed in our nation's Congress and by this administration. And, by the way, may I also note that under your leadership this bill passed the House by a vote of 400 to 1 and enjoyed similar strong support in the Senate.

And now, I will sign House resolution 3635, the Child Protection Act of 1984, with great satisfaction and great appreciation for the good work of the Congress on this and a declaration that this administration shares your commitment and will continue to work closely with you on this issue in the future.

We live in times that are unforgiving of mediocrity, poor citizenship and lack of interest in the world about us. Mankind has rarely faced a period in which preservation of world peace and economic vitality depend more upon the able citizenship of individuals. Our world is becoming smaller each day. Lack of understanding about technological developments or events in even the most remote corners of the globe may affect all our lives.

All Americans are aware of this tremendous responsibility, and we are proud to focus on the need for excellence in education. Every child is a precious resource whose potential should be realized to the fullest. Only informed citizens can preserve our priceless legacy of democracy, individual liberty, and the rule of law.

National Commission on Excellence in Education and a number of other studies urgently advocate a national effort to revitalize teaching and learning in the 15,800 local school districts and thousands of private schools in our land. Quality education for teachers, recognition of the best in their profession through merit pay, and the restoration of their authority and that of other school officials to maintain respect and discipline in the classroom are essential to guarantee quality education for our Nation's future leaders. We also need to follow a back to basics approach emphasizing fundamental scholastic achievement. Parental and community involvement must be enlarged, and there must be greater participation by business, industries, and individuals. One way to facilitate the involvement of the private sector is to widen the Adopt-a-School and partnership programs that seek to link a company or companies to an individual school.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Congressman Forsythe was an outstanding conservationist and a strong supporter of the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service. From 1975 until his death on March 29, 1984, he served as the ranking minority member of the House Subcommittee on Fisheries and Wildlife Conservation and the Environment, and he continued to serve in this capacity after becoming ranking minority member of the full Merchant Marine and Fisheries Committee at the beginning of the 98th Congress.

New Jersey, Congressman Forsythe's home State. Both are primarily coastal marsh and were created for the conservation and management of waterfowl. Congressman Forsythe was instrumental recently in obtaining Migratory Bird Conservation Commission approval for a 4,000-acre addition to Brigantine.

In light of Congressman Forsythe's sponsorship of comprehensive wetlands legislation as one of his last acts in Congress, it is particularly appropriate that these two refuges be renamed in his honor. Their designation will stand as a continuing reminder of the legacy of natural beauty and wildlife diversity that Ed Forsythe, with dedication and insight, contributed to the Nation.

Salvador. The President-elect and I yesterday issued a joint statement in which we agreed on three major objectives for Central America: the strengthening of democratic institutions, the improvement of living standards, and increased levels of U.S. security assistance to defend against violence from both the extreme left and the extreme right.

The election of Jose Napoleon Duarte is the latest chapter in a trend toward democracy throughout Latin America. In Central America, El Salvador now joins Costa Rica and Honduras in having a democratically elected government. Democracy in Central America is a fundamental goal of our policy in that region. But continued progress toward that goal requires our assistance.

Most of our aid, three-quarters of it, is economic assistance. But security assistance is essential to help all those who must protect themselves against the expanding export of subversion by the Soviet bloc, Cuba, and Nicaragua.

Also, as I said in my speech to the Nation on May 9th, we must support the democratic aspirations of the people of Nicaragua and oppose the Sandinista aggression against their neighbors and who seek genuinely democratic elections in Nicaragua, as the Sandinistas promised the OAS in 1979.

Peace can only be achieved in Central America if the forces of democracy are strong. We strongly support multilateral efforts toward peace, especially the Contadora process. However, no lasting peace settlement through the Contadora process can be achieved unless there is simultaneous implementation of all the Contadora objectives, including genuinely democratic elections in Nicaragua. The freedom fighters in Nicaragua have promised to lay down their arms and to participate in genuinely democratic elections if the Sandinistas will permit them.

Our Congress faces some historic decisions this week. Those who struggle for freedom everywhere are watching to see whether America can still be counted upon to support its own ideals. The people of El Salvador are watching, the freedom fighters of Nicaragua are watching, Nicaragua's threatened neighbors are watching, and the enemies of freedom are watching as well.

Our balanced policy can succeed if the Congress provides the resources for all elements of that policy as outlined in the bipartisan recommendations of the Kissinger commission. But if the Congress offers too little support, it'll be worse than doing nothing at all. The success of communism in Central America poses the threat that a hundred million people from Panama to the open border on our south could come under the control of pro-Soviet regimes. We could face a massive exodus of refugees to the United States.

The Congress has the opportunity to reaffirm our commitment to brave people risking their lives for the cause of liberty and democracy in Central America. The Congress also has the opportunity to reaffirm our bipartisan tradition, which will tell the world that we're united when our vital interests are at stake. I'm asking the Members of the Congress to make that commitment.

And now, tonight's first question will be from Maureen Santini. And incidentally, this is a double first for Maureen -- her first, first question in her new role as the AP's chief White House correspondent. Maureen?

Q. Thank you, sir. Mr. President, it's been reported that you are willing to provide U.S. air power to keep oil tankers moving through the Persian Gulf. Could you tell us what the Saudi response has been to your proposal and under what circumstances the United States could become militarily involved in that region?

The President. Well, Maureen, I've seen all the stories and a lot of them based on speculation already -- no, what we have -- we have kept in touch and are keeping in touch with the Gulf States and with our own allies. But we have not volunteered to intervene nor have we been asked to intervene. And we've communicated with them regarding that and so far it seems as if the Gulf States want to take care of this themselves. They're concerned, as I think we all should be, about not enlarging the war.

Q. Mr. President, Senator Byrd says that our relations with the Soviet Union have reached the lowest point in 20 years. Did you misjudge the Russians? Are your hardline policies responsible for the boycott of the Olympics, the breakoff of the arms negotiations, stepped-up offensive in Afghanistan, more missiles off our coast?

The President. No, Helen, I don't think I'm responsible for any of those things. And if these are at the lowest state that we've had for 20 years -- not too long ago, just a matter of days ago, I gave to George Shultz one of our very eminent national news magazines for him to see an article on this very subject. And the article -- it was an April issue -- and the article cited that we had the lowest relations we'd ever had and the President was to blame for that -- his vacillation and so forth and so on -- except that it was April of 1980 when they were saying that about our relations with Russia.

And as for the Olympics, the only thing as a government that we did in the Olympics was ensure them and meet virtually every request that they made with regard to their people there of up to allowing their cruise ship to anchor, and we were going to spend about a half-a-million dollars on protection for that ship.

The President. I don't think we are, and I don't think we're any closer or as close as we might have been in the past to a possible conflict or confrontation that could lead to a nuclear conflagration. I think the very fact that we're stronger -- yes, the Soviet Union is unhappy. They're unhappy because, for the first time in a couple of decades, we are preserving our security ability. We're building up our military, and we're not unilaterally disarming while they continue their massive arms buildup. And I'm sure this makes them a little unhappy about that, that things aren't as easy as they once were.

But when they're ready to come back to the table, it probably -- or might not be till after the election, I don't know. But I think that the world maybe is a little safer than it has been in the past.

Q. Mr. President, on the Persian Gulf again, is it true that you have written to the Saudis saying that should they ask the United States for aid, that we are willing to supply air cover to protect the oil tankers?

The President. We haven't specified what we would do, but we have told them, because I made a statement earlier that neither we nor the Western World as such would stand by and see the straits or the Persian Gulf closed to international traffic.

The President. We'd be in the very difficult position, and so would they. But I have great hopes that after President Duarte's visit here and meeting with as many of the Congress as he did that there's some reason for optimism.

Q. Mr. President, there are reports that the administration has gone around Congress and continued to increase military and intelligence activities in Central America by channeling money, through accounting tactics, tricks of accounting, through the Pentagon to the CIA. While you can't discuss covert activities, can you at least assure the American people that you have not had this administration go beyond the will of Congress in increasing the spending for military activities in Central America?

Congress didn't appropriate the money, the CIA-supported contras would run out of money by now. Now Congress has been told that the CIA has enough money to get through the rest of the summer. How is that possible without their getting secret funds?

The President. Well, unless they guessed wrong on the first statement -- I thought that they were closer to being out of money than they apparently are. But I don't think any -- well, nothing of that kind could take place without the knowledge of Congress.

No, I don't think we are. And there are always some pessimists out there. But I think all of the indicators show that, if anything, the economy might be getting ready to level off a little bit from that 8.8-percent bulge that we had for the first quarter, and which I think was a little out of line, but which was probably based on inventory building. The end sales figures did not keep pace with that level of growth, so a great many businesses were building up inventory which accounted for the 8.8. We're still estimating that we think for the year the economic growth will be about 5 percent.

The President. I expressed my belief, an optimistic belief that before we were through with warm weather -- we may have to have a warm September to add to that -- [laughter] -- but summer isn't over till then.

Q. Mr. President, two questions on your upcoming trip to Europe. First, are you concerned in any way that the planned demonstrations in Ireland will mar what was supposed to be a friendly homecoming for the television cameras? And, secondly, you have gone to economic summits for 4 years now and told the allied leaders that American interest rates will be coming down and the deficit will be coming down. Given the fact that interest rates are going up, why should allied leaders believe you if you sing this same song -- or say the same things this year?

The President. I think that the interest rates are one of those things that can be volatile. They slid up here this -- they have, if you compare them to what they were when we started, they are well down. So, there was a little increase recently, which I think represented fear in the marketplace of possible return of inflation. I don't think it was necessary, and I still hold that those conditions or their doing that is really unwarranted.

Reserve -- and it's commensurate with our increased growth, and yet it is not at a point that would add to inflation. So, I am still optimistic that those interest rates -- we're going to see them continue to come down.

As for the deficit, I'm also going to be optimistic and tell you that I think that everyone has been overestimating. Not that it isn't a serious problem -- it is. But I think that they've been overestimating the amount in the outyears in the projections of what the deficit will be.

The President. Well, as I say, maybe they're waiting for the election to be over. But, no, we have built up. On the other hand, they can see, for example, the modernization of our strategic weapons, which are all important -- the Peacekeeper, the MX -- they can see the contest that is going on as to whether that's going to be built or not. And this can't help but be encouraging to them.

But I think it's true they came to the table, and I think they only came to the table because they believed in our determination to continue our military buildup. And they left because their whole propaganda campaign against the deployment of the Pershings and the cruise missiles in Europe -- which was agreed to in 1979 by this country, when NATO requested it, and we're keeping that promise -- but at all the time that they were negotiating with us, they kept on building and adding to their stock of SS - 20's. Now, these are triple warhead missiles that are intermediate range, targeted on all the targets of Europe. But also, they have been adding them aimed at targets in Asia. And it was for this -- in response to this -- that NATO asked for an intermediate-range weapon that could be based in Europe, targeted on Russia. And we're providing that. It won't, in any way, match the 1,350 or so warheads that are in the SS - 20's, but we believe it will be enough for a deterrent.

Use of a deterrent is to have the enemy know that if he's contemplating some rash action, the cost to him might be more than he cares to bear. So, we're going forward with this. They had waged such a campaign to stop it that I think they made this other move to, hopefully -- or in the hope that our allies in Europe might change their mind and cancel out their request. Well, the allies stood firm. I don't think the alliance has ever been more solidly together than it is right now.

Q. But, Mr. President, given the coolness of our relationship right now, do you think the Russians have a problem of saving face, perhaps, in returning to the negotiations? If so, would you be prepared to offer some gesture, to make some overture that would be that positive sign that they asked for in order to come to the table without a loss of face?

The President. Well, Charlotte, I don't think it would be proper for us to do something, some concessions that would make it look that we rewarded their intransigence and their walking out of the meetings. But we have pursued -- and we took the lead in this -- negotiations on a number of other matters between our two countries that have nothing to do with strategic weapons, and we've been making some progress in a number of those negotiations. So, I don't think things are as bad as they're being painted.

Because of the Supreme Court's decision in the Grove City College case, the bill restores all-inclusive prohibitions against sex, race, handicap, or age discrimination at institutions with federally assisted programs. Do you support this measure?

The President. There are some that are watching this legislation very closely. The court decision was based on the way article IX was written by Congress, and it was the way we interpreted it also. Now, if there is legislation to reverse the court decision with regard to title IX -- I said ``article'' -- title IX that will prevent discrimination against women in educational institutions that are getting funds from the government, we support that.

There is legislation that has been proposed -- and I don't know just which they're going to take up tomorrow -- there is legislation which is so broad that actually it would open the door to Federal intrusion in local and State governments and in any manner of ways beyond anything that has ever been intended by the Civil Rights Act. That kind of legislation we would oppose.

Q. Mr. President, you said earlier that if asked, the United States would assist Persian Gulf States in keeping the Strait of Hormuz open. Are there any circumstances where American interests could be so threatened that the United States would act unilaterally or without a request from those states?

The President. Well, again, I can't foresee that. We probably would be -- among all the importing-of-oil nations, we would be the least hurt by any shutdown. It is our allies -- it is Japan; it is our friends in Western Europe -- who would really be in trouble if there was any stop to the Middle East oil.

Actually, only 3 percent of our oil supply now -- thanks to decontrolling oil and increasing domestic production -- only 3 percent is involved in the Persian Gulf for us. And we have increased our stockpile of oil to four times what it was when we came here. So, I can't see a kind of an emergency that would do this.

But also remember, we are in consultation also with our allies, with those nations that would be affected, because we're not contemplating anything unilaterally here. This problem is one that affects all of us.

The President. We have had people in consultations with our allies, and they've been holding meetings on discussing contingencies of this kind. We would not hold back on immediately turning to our reserve, but I'm not prepared to say we've made any specific plans.

Q. Mr. President, some of your top advisers suggest that the interest rate question could be the cutting edge in November for the election, with some of your people saying that the Federal Reserve Board has had too much control of the interest rates, others saying that they haven't had; that they've been too harsh, the criticisms have been too harsh of the Fed. What is your position?

The President. No. As I indicated earlier, Gary, I think they're right on target with it now. It is true that a short time ago there was a dip below their regular line. And I think this was one of the things that caused some panic out there in the money markets, because usually, or in the past, on a number of occasions, such as back around '79 and '80, that -- such a dip was then followed by a real loosening of the strings, such a flood of money, that that's when we went to 21\1/2\-percent interest rates and double-digit inflation for 2 years, and so forth.

But it is possible -- that's not an exact tool, the money supply. Sometimes, and judging on a weekly basis the way they do, sometimes there can be an inadvertent dip or an inadvertent splurge. So, I don't know whether the time when they got below their line was inadvertent or not, but they are back up on target and where they should be, with a normal rate of increase tied to the increase in economy.

Q. Mr. President, the White House and the Pentagon worked very hard yesterday to tell people they shouldn't really worry about the new nuclear missile submarines the Soviet Union says they've placed off the American coast. Can you tell the American people that these new missile subs are not any cause for concern, and is there anything the U.S. must do to respond to the Soviets?

The President. If I though there was some reason to be concerned about them, I wouldn't be sleeping in this house tonight. [Laughter] No, this isn't really anything new. They're announcing and they're publicizing, but those submarines off both our coasts -- they've had submarines in and out and patrolling there for extended periods of time. Maybe there's one or two more than have been there at one time in the past, but I think it's -- I think, again, it is in keeping with their talk about us putting the Pershings in Europe and that they're now going to show us that they can do something in return if we do that. So, they have the submarines offshore. But they're -- no, I don't think they pose any particular threat at all.

Q. Mr. President, if it's any consolation to you, I've written all my relations in County Kerry not to demonstrate seriously until you and I are safely out of the country. [Laughter] But I wanted to ask you if you have any message for the Soviet Government or for the Sakharovs about the possibility of getting them out of the country -- whether there's any deal or any trade that can be made that would save their lives?

She was wounded three times in World War II. She was permitted to leave Russia once and had medical treatment for her problem outside the country, and I think it's only natural that someone would want to go back to the person that had treated them before.

But I can't go further than that, because this is a little bit like when I put a moratorium on myself before I was here in talking about our people in the Embassy in Iran. I just have a feeling that anything I might say publicly could be injurious to her chances. I just hope and pray that the Soviet Union will do the humane thing and let her go.

Q. Mr. President, after the bailout of Continental Illinois Bank, some experts are concerned about the soundness of America's banking system. You have pushed for deregulation. But are you now concerned that your administration will have to bail out more big banks because, like public utilities, for example, they cannot be permitted to fail?

The President. No, this particular bank and this so-called bailout as may be -- is by the banking system itself, and it's been done before. The protection has been offered to the depositors. And obviously everyone would like to hope that there won't be any -- that the bank won't fail, but if it does, the people who would be injured would be the stockholders. And, no, I do not see that this is any threat to the banking system as such. This is one bank that needs some help.

Q. Mr. President, the other day Treasury Secretary Regan raised the possibility that your administration may push Congress for passage of two separate tax bills in 1985 -- one to simplify the current tax code and the second to raise new revenues in order to shrink the budget deficit. If you are reelected, are higher taxes a good possibility next year?

The President. I have to feel -- I haven't had a chance to talk to Don about this -- I have a feeling that he started probably trying to clarify that and make it plain that if we have a reform plan and a simplification of the tax structure, it won't be a gimmick in order to raise revenues. So, he was divorcing any tax increase from that.

Now, speaking of a tax increase in addition to that, the only thing I could think is that he was possibly feeling that if we get to the absolute bottom of where we can get government spending, and it still would then turn out to be a higher percentage of the gross national product than our tax structure provides, then you would have to review the tax structure to see -- if you knew that you could not get any more cuts, reductions in the cost of government, you'd have to make the tax structure match that. I have said that myself. But we're not anywhere near that, and I'm not looking for any tax increase that soon. We've got a long way to go in cutting government spending. Government is taking too big a chunk out of the gross national product, out of the private economy.

Q. Mr. President, you have said in the past that you have no intention of sending U.S. troops into combat in El Salvador, and President-elect Duarte said yesterday that he has no intention of asking for U.S. troops to go there. But despite these denials, the doubts linger. Walter Mondale insists that your policy will lead to U.S. involvement down there. Can you say unequivocally tonight that you would not send troops down to El Salvador, even if it appears that without them El Salvador might fall to the Communists.

American troops. We have never had any consideration of doing that or any thought of doing that at all. I don't know how I can convince anyone that -- but all you'd have to do is look at all our friends and neighbors in Latin America, and probably as a holdover from the past, we'd lose all those friends and neighbors if we did that. They want our help. They know they have to have our help, economically, and in the manner in which we're giving it in military support -- by training and supplies and equipment and so forth -- but they don't want American manpower there.

Q. Mr. President? Sir, people on your staff and people in the Justice Department are well aware of some of the shenanigans of defense contractors -- I refer to General Dynamics and some of their stablemates. If you want specific names, I can give them. But I wonder if you are going to leave this curtain down on this national scandal or you're going to see that it's brought out and that the -- some of the 650 million tax money that was allowed to go in settlement from the Navy to General Dynamics a while back, if you'll see if that's collected.

Q. Mr. President, I was wondering, sir, if you could give us your definition of ``holding firm'' in answer to Charlotte's question. You said our allies in Europe were holding firm in accepting missiles, yet the Dutch Government here is going through a little rain dance here because their people don't want to take the new missiles. Could you sort of tell me how that is holding firm?

Netherlands -- and the Parliament, and they have not yet taken up that issue or made a decision on it. They are slated to get some cruise missiles there. But in the other countries, basically, Italy, Germany, the other NATO countries, are all going forward; England, the bases are being erected for the missiles, including the Pershings and, as I say, not just on that issue alone.

Q. Mr. President, you said a little while ago that you felt that the world was a little more secure place since you've been in power. How do you account for the fact that so many people in so many countries think that during the last 3\1/2\ years the world has moved closer to war, rather than closer to peace?

The President. I would say that that is because that's all that most of the people have been hearing in political dialog from one side, since we've been here in the 3\1/2\ years, that I somehow have an itchy finger and am going to blow up the world. And that has all been duly reported by so many of you that, that is the tone that the people have been getting. And it doesn't do me any good to tell you that, having seen four wars in my lifetime, I don't know of anyone, in or out of government, that is more determinedly seeking peace than I am. And my goal is the total elimination of nuclear weapons. If we can get those fellows back to the table and get them to start down that road of mutual reduction, then they might find out what common sense it would mean to eliminate them.

Vietnamese forces there -- but all those gains that they were making in the few years before we came here -- Ethiopia, South Yemen, Angola -- all of those things, they haven't taken another inch of territory since we've been here.

The President. No, it is as simple as this, the Soviets -- this isn't new for them; they're up at full pitch. I doubt if they could expand their military production anyplace beyond where it is right now, or the rate that it is.

On the other hand, they know that when for the first time in, as I say, decades, they see us determined to refurbish our defenses, they know that they can't match us in -- if there is such a race, which means that the only alternative for them is to watch us catch up or to sit down at the table with us and work out something in which they won't have to run the risk of someone being superior to them militarily.

But I thank you all very much, and it's always a pleasure to welcome the business men and women of America to the White House. I'm delighted to take part in celebrating World Trade Week, which reaffirms the importance to our well-being of trade and recognizes the need for increased export efforts.

America's future growth and prosperity depend on how well we develop and compete in foreign markets. One in eight manufacturing jobs is related to exports, and 25 percent of our farmers' cash receipts come from exports. In fact, exports account for 25 percent of the total value of all goods produced in this country.

But occasionally the interests of diplomacy and the interests of American industry seem to conflict. Well, our administration sees it as our job to reconcile the two and make it easier for American business to open up new markets on a fair footing. And we're working hard in that direction.

In 1982 we passed the Export Trading Company Act aimed at opening foreign trade opportunities for medium- and small- sized companies. The bill removed impediments to trade, permitting companies to sell American products overseas more efficiently and more effectively. We're also implementing an international investment policy to reduce the number of government measures that distort or impede the flow of international investment. Our trade missions have been to Europe, Asia, Africa, and Latin America, seeking to develop new export opportunities.

Now, these are just several of the efforts. We're going to do everything we can to get government out of the way to make sure that you have the opportunity to compete effectively in world markets. And there's something else. Last November I visited Japan and Korea. And last month it was China. And next week it's Europe and the London Economic Summit. I'm beginning to feel a little like an export product myself. [Laughter] But one of the key purposes of these trips is to see that all the export trading doors are opened as wide as possible.

As I told a number of export trade industry representatives last month in Tacoma, when I go abroad I go as something of a salesman and do everything I can to promote U.S. exports except, possibly, wear a ``Buy American'' bumper sticker on my bag.

We're committed to keeping markets open to free trade. We oppose protectionism because, like so many other forms of government intervention, it doesn't work. Protectionism brings higher prices, it provokes retaliation, and it insulates inefficiencies in production. And we'll continue to oppose it.

Government can set the framework for expanded trade, but it can't make trade flourish. That's up to you, the private sector, to make that happen. And that's why it's my privilege to present the ``E'' and ``E Star'' Awards. Our award winners are making it happen in a fiercely competitive environment. And you have good reason to be proud, and we're proud of you.

President's remarks, Deputy Secretary of Commerce Clarence J. Brown announced the names of the award winners, and a representative of each organization was presented with a framed citation by the President.

I visited Berlin in 1978 and again, after I became President, in 1982. The first impression entering the city by air is, of course, that terrible wall which surrounds and divides Berlin. Despite its bright white paint and the flowerboxes placed here and there to soften the effect, the wall's inhuman purpose cannot be disguised.

The wall suppresses man's natural impulse to be free. The angry words of protest splashed across the western side of the wall show the frustration that Berliners feel in living with this symbol of tyranny, knowing that there are Berliners too on the other side.

Berlin is a microcosm of a greater division. The ugly slash that divides Berlin is replicated on a larger scale in a similar division of Germany and in the artificial line cutting off one part of Europe from another. In divided Berlin, as elsewhere in divided Europe, families and friends are separated; contacts severed; freedoms denied.

This first impression, however, does not tell the full story. The tragedy of Berlin is evident even from a distance. One must move closer to see the triumph as well. For Berlin is a triumph of the human spirit. The visitor quickly realizes and admires the enormous courage and endurance of the Berliners. They are the inheritors of a devastated city. A city the Soviet Union once tried to bring to its knees through the Berlin blockade. A city cut in two by that cruel wall. But Berliners, all the while surrounded by a hostile environment, did not succumb to threats of pressure. They have repeatedly come through adversity with bravery, dignity, and grace.

Berliners have had to struggle to maintain their liberty, and their unwavering devotion to freedom is an example for us all. This is the first lesson of Berlin: that we cannot be timid in preserving our democratic way of life. We must stand up for our freedoms. The terrible price of losing them is vividly demonstrated just on the other side of the wall.

The United States stands with Berlin. We are honored to have an important role in the preservation of Berlin's freedom. The United States has a solemn obligation to Berlin which time has only reaffirmed and strengthened. The American commitment to Berlin is firm and unshakable.

This community of free nations, dedicated to democratic ideals, has given Europe a generation of peace. The unity and strength of the Atlantic Alliance provide the protective shield that keeps us free and secure. Last fall, the Soviet Union failed to intimidate the Alliance over the NATO decision on intermediate-range nuclear forces. As in Berlin 35 years earlier, the West refused to bow to Soviet dictates and is more secure in consequence. The Soviet Union now knows that the West will do what is necessary to keep the peace.

A long-standing vital function in which the Soviet Union and the Western Allies cooperate is the coordination of Berlin air traffic. The maintenance of Allied rights and responsibilities with respect to Berlin air traffic is an integral part of the working relationship between the Soviet Union and the Western Allies.

The Quadripartite Agreement of 1971 has helped Berlin become calmer, and more stable and secure. Berliners have found it easier to visit and communicate with friends and relatives in East Berlin and the German Democratic Republic. Trade and travel between Berlin and the Federal Republic of Germany have been facilitated. The Quadripartite Agreement must continue to be strictly observed and fully implemented, in all sectors of Greater Berlin.

The second lesson of Berlin is that it is possible to build constructive and practical East-West relationships on the basis of realism, strength, and dialogue. While we cannot ignore the profound differences between East and West, we can accomplish much that is in the interest of all people.

The applicability of this second lesson extends beyond Berlin -- it underpins the whole East-West relationship. By remaining unified in our determination to defend freedom -- in Berlin and elsewhere -- while at the same time exploring reasonable avenues for improved East-West relations, the West is making an important contribution to world peace. The key is solidarity. As has been the case for more than 35 years, the entire free world maintains its support for the freedom of Berlin. Today, it is important that all of us, Berliners included, show the same support for oppressed peoples in places such as Afghanistan and Poland. If we are to maintain freedom, we must remain united.

I am optimistic about the future of Berlin. Berlin is an extraordinarily vital world city, bustling with prosperity. It has a rich culture and history. The city is blessed with great universities and scientific institutes. Most of all, Berlin is blessed with the Berliners themselves -- whose strength and spirit have served it well. The security guarantee of the Western allies is inalterable and permanent, and American ties of friendship with Berlin run deep. East-West accords have led to practical improvements to make life easier in Berlin. But the barriers to the free flow of information, to human contacts, are still far too high. Even the cultural life of the city is divided -- museums, theaters, symphony orchestras and operas split between two sides.

Such human divisions are intolerable. If peace is to be secured, we must increase our efforts to accommodate the human aspirations of millions of persons in Europe who are not satisfied with the conditions under which they must live. In this regard, I would like to recall my 1982 visit to Berlin. At that time, I asked the Soviet Union to join with the West in working to reduce the human barriers which divide Europe. Rather than a symbol of oppression, reflected in barbed wire and walls, would it not be better for Berlin to be the starting point for the reduction of the human and political divisions which create misery in the world?

British and French officials with their German friends. It was truly an historic turning point, and the United States will be forever proud of its role in saving the freedom of the Western Sectors of this great city. All Americans join me in the hope that it will not take another 35 years to restore the unity of Berlin and that Berliners on both sides of the wall will one day be able to live together in peace and liberty.

Many Americans trace their heritage directly to Ireland. All Americans have benefitted greatly from the distinctive Irish cultural contribution, plus the creativity and enduring effort of Irish people from colonial days to the present.

Many Americans have a special affection for a city on Ireland's western shore, Galway, which this year celebrates its Quincentennial as a mayoral city. For many Americans, the song ``Galway Bay'' has a special place in their hearts. Even those not of Irish extraction are aware that this song encapsulates a bit of the history of Ireland and its proud culture, and serves as a reminder of what separation from a beloved land meant to many Irish emigrants in the United States.

The area of Galway has been inhabited since the thirteenth century. A Franciscan monastic centre was established in 1291 and served as a focus for scholarship and religious activities. The town grew in prominence, and its chief officer was granted the rank of Mayor in 1484. Historically, Galway's relative geographical isolation from the central seat of English power fostered a spirit of independence, which it has nurtured to this day. Galway's importance as an international trading center gave medieval Galway a cosmopolitan flavor, perhaps unique in Ireland. Tradition has it that Christopher Columbus and many other explorers visited Galway on one of their voyages.

The Williamite wars, brought to an end by the Treaty of Limerick in 1691, added further to the decline of the city. The greatest calamity of all to befall the city was the great famine of 1846 - 47, which seemed to mark the end and to relegate the city to the level of country town. The Seaport, which had once rung with the laughter of many tongues in better days, now echoed with the wails of country- and city-folk alike as they left the city for the last time on board the dreaded coffin ships headed for North America.

Galway. The new Irish state encouraged Galway's growth as a university city and industrial center, and once again the city began to expand and develop. Today, Galway is a modern and thriving city, a center of culture, learning and industry. The ``city of the tribes,'' which has given so much to Irish culture and history, rightly enjoys the admiration of all who have a special affection for Ireland.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 23rd day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Today in Vienna, negotiators from East and West resume the talks on mutual and balanced force reductions, or MBFR. The purpose of these talks, in which 18 NATO and Warsaw Pact nations are participating, is to reach an agreement to reduce conventional forces in Central Europe.

On April 19, near the end of the last round, the West presented a major new initiative aimed at moving these negotiations forward. The new Western proposal seeks to overcome the longstanding disagreement over the number of Warsaw Pact soldiers in Central Europe. Our proposal will permit the two sides to focus initial attention on counting just their most highly structured and visible forces, since this is the area where East and West are already closest to agreement.

The timing of this offer gave the Warsaw Pact the opportunity to study it in their capitals during the break between rounds. We therefore hope that the Soviet Union and its allies are prepared now to respond constructively to our initiative and to move the negotiations forward. By reaching agreement on lower, equal, and verifiable levels of conventional forces in Central Europe, we will be able to enhance the security of both sides and to strengthen peace and stability in Europe. The force reductions themselves and the associated verification measures called for in the Western proposal would enhance mutual confidence between East and West.

The MBFR negotiations resume at the same time that another part of the East-West security dialog, the Conference on Confidence and Security Building Measures and Disarmament in Europe (known as CDE), is continuing in Stockholm. There, too, the West presented a package of proposals that would enhance confidence and trust among the 35 participating countries. And in both Stockholm and Vienna, the West is fully prepared to discuss any serious counterproposals from other participants.

The West is doing its part to achieve progress in other areas of arms control as well. In the same week that we made the new MBFR proposal, Vice President Bush presented to the 40-nation Committee on Disarmament in Geneva a comprehensive U.S. proposal for a global ban on chemical weapons. This proposal will again be under discussion when the Committee on Disarmament reconvenes in June.

Soviet Union still refuses to return to the START and INF negotiations which it left last fall. I repeat what I have said on many occasions: We are prepared to resume those negotiations at any time and without preconditions. We again invite the Soviet Union to return to the negotiating table to resume the serious work of reducing nuclear arsenals and the risks of nuclear war.

When President Eisenhower came to this place a quarter of a century ago to dedicate the cornerstone of this building, he spoke of undecorated and unsung heroes. And when I was with you here 2 years ago, I mentioned those words and noted the heroes President Eisenhower spoke about were you, the men and women of the Central Intelligence Agency.

I return to the CIA today with exactly the same thought in mind. Without you, our nation's safety would be more vulnerable and our security fragile and endangered. The work you do each day is essential to the survival and to the spread of human freedom. You remain the eyes and ears of the free world. You are the ``trip wire'' over which the totalitarian rule must stumble in their quest for global domination.

Though it's sometimes forgotten here in Washington, the American people know full well the importance of vital and energetic intelligence operations. From Nathan Hale's first covert operation in the Revolutionary War to the breaking of the Japanese code at Midway in World War II, America's security and safety have relied directly on the courage and collective efforts of her intelligence personnel.

Today I want to stress to you again that the American people are thankful for your professionalism, for your dedication, and for the personal sacrifice each of you makes in carrying on your work. You're carrying a great and noble tradition. And I believe that you're adding a brilliant new chapter to the annals of American intelligence services.

In 3\1/2\ years, significant changes have occurred at this Agency. New and vitally important missions are being performed that a few years ago many would have said were impractical or unachievable. Funding and personnel have grown substantially. The operations and analysis sections have seen increases in productivity and product. Morale has steadily improved.

Americans who want to work at CIA. Individual employees are gaining greater recognition for their work, and throughout this Agency, as well as in the Congress and our nation itself, there is a new recognition of the urgent importance of the mission of the CIA.

There are many quantitative measures of what you're achieving. You've increased the number of national intelligence estimates from 19 in 1980 to 55 in 1983, and in addition, completed 800 other special research projects. Though the specifics are classified, new stations have been opened abroad, and work with friendly intelligence and security services have been greatly expanded.

There has been a new emphasis on lean management staffs and, above all, establishing a consensus on the mission and the role of the agency. Underlying all this is a central insight: that, even more than material rewards, a chance to create, to build, and to put into action the shared values of an institution is the strongest inducement to human excellence.

Memoranda and suggestions have been asked for from all of you, suggestions and memos that have been read by the Director personally. Now, all this has meant not only a stimulating period of discussion and analysis leading to many specific reforms, but also the adoption of a new Agency credo, written by you, the personnel of the Central Intelligence Agency. I've had a chance to read the credo of CIA. It's everything such a credo should be -- practical, yet idealistic; careful, but inspiring; specific, yet general enough to explain not only what it means to be a member of the CIA but what it means to be an American serving the cause of freedom in a dangerous and difficult world.

On this point, I want to stress: An intelligence agency cannot operate effectively unless its necessary secrets are maintained even in this, the most open and free country on Earth. We cannot expect you or your informants to endanger life and work because of carelessness, sensationalism, or unnecessary exposure to risk. Hostile intelligence activities conducted in this country and directed at U.S. interests abroad threaten not only our legitimate secrets and our technological advantages but also our privacy and, ultimately, our freedom. To the danger of espionage is added active measures designed to subvert and deceive, to disinform the public opinion upon which our democracies are built.

Well, let me conclude by adding that the changes you have underway at CIA are a reflection of a larger renewal among the forces of freedom throughout the world. I think many of you realize that the days of defeatism and weakness are over for America and that in contrast to previous times the objectives of our foreign policy are being met.

Our economic recovery has strengthened the hand of the democracies, even as it has widened the economic and technological gap between ourselves and totalitarian nations. Our defense buildup has been a signal to the world that the American people remain ready to make the sacrifices necessary for the protection of human freedom.

Our alliances have been renewed and revitalized. Our support, both direct and indirect, for people whose countries are the victims of totalitarian aggression has blunted the Communist drive for power in the Third World.

The tide of the future is a freedom tide. American foreign policy has a new coherence and moral purpose. We have proposed the most extensive series of arms reduction proposals in history, and we have made it clear that we will negotiate without preconditions for as long as it takes.

We're now in a period of readjustment. Some of our adversaries who had grown used to disunity or weakness from the democracies are not enthusiastic about the success of our policies or the brightening trend in the fortunes of freedom. What is needed now is steadiness and calm and above all a quiet resolve to advance the cause of freedom as we continue to press our program for arms reductions and many other peace initiatives.

When historians look back at all of this, I'm sure they will conclude that no one has played a more important role in this exciting new era than all of you here at CIA. Your work, the work of your Director, the other top officials have been an inspiration to your fellow Americans and to people everywhere.

I wanted to come here today not only to dedicate this new building, which will assist greatly in better coordinating and consolidating CIA activities, but to pledge to you my continued support and bring to each and every one of you the heartfelt thanks of the American people.

Agriculture has always been one of our most important industries. Although our ancestors were bound to the land in order to survive, the remarkable advances of science and technology have overcome most limitations that dictated scarcity. American agriculture has emerged as a marvel of efficiency and productivity. Now, fewer than five percent of our people are able to supply an abundance of high-quality but low-cost food, freeing most others for the task of providing the incredible array of goods and services we enjoy.

Unfortunately, the accident rate for people engaged in agriculture is unacceptably high. Many thousands of farm and ranch residents and workers suffer disabling, crippling, or fatal injuries each year. This unhappy toll is further compounded by many job-related illnesses. The direct economic costs of these problems exceed $5 billion annually, and there is no way to measure the pain, despair and family disruption that also result.

Accidents and job-related illnesses can be averted by safe and proper methods, control of hazards, and use of protective equipment when appropriate. In addition, guidance in safety and health is readily available to all from the Extension Service, safety councils, volunteer safety leaders and the manufacturers of the products we use.

I urge every man and woman engaged in farming and ranching to make basic safety a priority in every activity and task -- on the job, in the home and on the highway. I also urge those who serve and supply farmers and ranchers to encourage and support personal and community safety and health efforts in every possible way.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fourth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

This legislation reaffirms the Nation's commitment to a long-range program of developing a private-sector synthetic fuels industry while recognizing that improvements in the energy outlook can permit us to achieve a major reduction in Federal spending through prudent realignments in the program.

Proponents of the current law argued that the Federal program would have little or no impact on the deficit and established an extremely rapid and ambitious schedule for developing a commercial synthetic fuels industry.

In the intervening years, the energy outlook has improved dramatically. The price of imported crude oil has declined more than 25 percent since I took office, and our oil imports are down 33 percent compared to 1980 levels. The Strategic Petroleum Reserve, at nearly 400 million barrels, provides more than 80 days protection against a total disruption of our imports and over 200 days if OPEC halted supplies -- in 1980, it provided less than 17 days protection. The energy conservation efforts of the American people have far exceeded expectations, further enhancing our energy situation.

As a consequence of these major changes, the presumptions that underlie the current synthetic fuels program have proven at variance with the realities of the market place. It is now apparent that developing a commercial synthetic fuels industry at the pace envisioned by the Energy Security Act of 1980 would require enormous direct budget outlays that would not be offset by any economic benefits.

Proceeding down the path set by current law would thus result in the inefficient use of billions of dollars. It would also grossly distort the market place for synthetic fuels, possibly creating an industry that would be permanently dependent on government subsidies, not the commercially-viable industry envisioned by Congress in 1980.

The legislation would rescind $9 billion of the $19 billion originally appropriated. It would also require that projects supported by use of the remaining funds be limited to those that produce fuels whose prices will not be significantly above projected market prices of competing fuels.

At the same time, the legislation leaves completely intact the administrative structure for the synthetic fuels program. By continuing to use the Synthetic Fuels Corporation, we can avoid unnecessary delay and disruption in the national effort of ensuring synthetic fuels commercialization.

Digestive diseases rank third in the total economic burden of illness in the United States. In terms of human discomfort and pain, mortality, and burden on the Nation's economy, they represent one of our most serious health problems. Digestive diseases account for a yearly expenditure of approximately $17 billion in direct health care costs, and a total economic burden of $50 billion.

Research into the causes, cures, prevention, and clinical treatment of digestive diseases and related nutrition problems is a national concern. The week of May 20, 1984, marks the first anniversary of the initiation of a national digestive diseases education program. Its goals are to encourage the digestive diseases community to educate the public and other health care practitioners to the seriousness of these diseases and the methods available to prevent, treat, and control them, and to inform the public that diseases of the digestive system are a major health priority.

Today a grateful nation mourns the death of an unknown serviceman of the Vietnam conflict. This young American understood that freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction. He may not have wanted to be a hero, but there was a need -- in the Iron Triangle, off Yankee Station, at Khe Sanh, over the Red River Valley.

We must not be blind to the light that he left behind. Our path must be worthy of his trust. And we must not betray his love of country. It's up to us to protect the proud heritage now in our hands, and to live in peace as bravely as he died in war.

We've seen some increases in interest rates in recent weeks, and, of course, we don't like that. But we're not about to panic or be buffaloed by the pessimists who ignore the great progress we've made during these last 3\1/2\ years.

I mentioned interest rates. Recently the prime rate climbed from 10\1/2\ percent to 12\1/2\ percent, and that means mortgage rates have also risen. These increases must be laid to fear that inflation is coming back. Well, we're determined to see that it doesn't.

Tax rates have also dropped by nearly 25 percent. If our tax program had not been passed, a median-income family would be paying over $900 a year more in taxes than it does today. And next year, your tax rates will be indexed. From then on, a cost-of-living raise won't bump you into a higher tax bracket. For years, government has used inflation as a silent partner to raise your taxes without having to pass a tax increase and take the heat for doing so. With indexing, you'll be protected against that kind of theft.

So, with inflation down, interest rates still down significantly, and taxes no longer rising, America is moving forward with impressive power. By virtually any yardstick, our economy is coming back. America is coming back. And for the first time in a long time, hope for the future is coming back.

Past recoveries from recession were snuffed out by a rekindling of inflation. Well, this time inflation is staying down, and we mean to keep it down. In the last 12 months, the Producer Price Index for finished goods -- one indicator of future inflation -- has risen less than 3 percent. If inflation stays down, interest rates will come down, too, and our economy will keep expanding.

A stronger economy and greater security are good news, but we still face great challenges. We must eliminate billions of dollars in wasteful government spending. We must make our tax system more simple and fair so we can bring your personal income tax rates down further and keep our economy growing. And we must keep our defenses strong, so the Soviets will decide it's time to return to the negotiating table and work with us to reduce armaments and assure a more peaceful world.

The President. Well, it is true, I have been there more than once in a previous occupation when I was a performer in the entertainment business, and then, subsequently, when I was Governor -- and when you and I met, when I was sent there by President Nixon on a mission for him. Actually, I would be going even if I were not a candidate, so it isn't a part of an election process. But I'm accepting an invitation that was first made by former Prime Minister Haughey and repeated by your present Prime Minister FitzGerald when he was here.

But there is another reason, a personal reason, why I'm going, also. I have known I would be going one day because up until I became President I had no knowledge of my father's family beyond him and his parents. He was orphaned at less than 6 years of age. So, he had no knowledge of his family roots. And I must say, the people of Ireland and the Government of Ireland have been very kind and generous, and I found when I arrived here in this job that they had gone to great lengths and have traced our family roots and found that Ballyporeen is the locale and so forth.

Americans constitute quite a sizable block in our country. There is a rich history of the millions of them that we have. I'm one of them. So, of course, I would like to have their approval, but I'm not making this trip for that purpose. I think that their votes will be based on their belief in whether I should be President for 4 more years or not.

This is a problem to be settled there between not only the Governments of England and Ireland but also of the people in the north and the people of the south. They, too, must be considered, and their wishes -- and I hope and pray we can find a solution that will bring peace.

Mr. Farrell. Mr. President, many Irish Americans still see what goes on in Northern Ireland as a freedom fight. They see the IRA not as terrorists, but as people to be supported. Can they be persuaded they're wrong on that?

The President. Well, I think that there is a fraction of the IRA that is revealed now, mainly what is called the Provisional IRA, that is not the IRA of the glorious days of the fight for freedom and that it has all the attributes of a terrorist organization. At the same time, I think that there is an element of the same on the other side of that.

I have a feeling myself that the majority of people, on both sides of the border out there would want, and do want, a peaceful solution, but that possibly, on both sides of the border, there is a problem about voicing that because of fear of the more radical elements. And that, if it's true -- that's a tragedy, and there must be a solution found.

Mr. Farrell. Mr. President, as you know, there are people in Ireland who are objecting already to your visit. In particular they feel that your stand on Central America has not supported justice sufficiently. How do you feel about the likelihood of those protests?

The President. I feel that they're misinformed. We know that Cuba and the Soviet Union have vast, worldwide disinformation machineries -- or machines -- in which they can give out misinformation to the media, to organizations and groups and so forth. I'm sure that many of those people, if there are people demonstrating on this issue -- I'm sure they're probably sincere and well-intentioned. But I don't think that they know the situation.

Now, we've had a case here in which, with the three elections that have taken place, bipartisan groups of our Congress and others have gone down there, in addition to the bipartisan commission I appointed under Dr. Kissinger, to go down to Central America. When they come back from viewing those elections -- many of these Congressmen have gone down openly admitting they're like those people that would want to demonstrate, they think we're on the wrong side -- they have come back completely converted by what they saw.

Some years ago, there was an overthrow of a military dictatorship in El Salvador. And the government that was set up then became kind of the same type of military thing. And then a man named Duarte, who was President after that first overthrow, was exiled, was -- well, first was imprisoned, was tortured, was exiled even though he'd been chosen as President. He has now returned, and the people overwhelmingly have elected him as their choice for President.

Now, how anyone could not believe that he is going to be determined to enforce civil rights, and if there is -- well, first of all, he's picking up something that has already been vastly improved under the existing government already there, which was elected by the people. We've had three elections in 26 months there, and in each one of them, a greater proportion of their people turned out for that election than turns out for an election in the United States.

The President. Not really. As a matter of fact, they had something like about a $20 fine if you didn't vote. But these teams of observers of ours went down; they couldn't find anyone that ever worried about that or that thought that it would ever be enforced -- whether they did or not.

But they did find an overwhelming enthusiasm on the part of the people. When a woman stands in the line for hours, waiting her turn to vote, and has been wounded by the guerrillas, whose slogan was, ``Vote today, and die tonight,'' and she refused to leave the line for medical treatment of her bullet wound until she had voted -- she wouldn't take the chance of missing the opportunity to vote.

Now, the guerrillas -- the government offered amnesty. The government offered for them to put down their guns and come in and participate -- submit candidates for office and all -- in the electoral process, and the guerrillas turned that down.

By the same token, in Nicaragua, the Sandinista government -- which is as totalitarian as anything in Cuba or the Soviet Union -- indeed, they are the puppets of Cuba and the Soviet Union -- that government, the so-called freedom fighters there -- or if they prefer to call them guerrillas -- they are former revolutionaries who were aligned with the Sandinistas in the revolution to overthrow the authoritarian government of Somoza. And once they were in, the Sandinistas, which is the, as I say, totalitarian element, Communist element, they got rid of their allies in the revolution and have broken every promise that the revolutionaries -- when it was still going on -- made to the Organization of American States as to free elections, human rights, freedom of the press, freedom of religion.

The present Government of Nicaragua -- right now, the Catholic bishops are protesting as far as they can, at the risk of great persecution -- they embarrassed one bishop by parading him through the streets of the capital naked. Now, the Archbishop of San Salvador has been quoted by this disinformation network here and there as being one who wants America to stop lending aid, military aid, to the Government of El Salvador. He has refuted that. He has denied that and said no. He knows that the others -- the guerrillas -- are getting outside support, and he knows from whence it comes. And he has said, no, he does not want us to leave.

So, the program we have is one in which three out of four dollars will go to help establish a democratic economy and society in El Salvador, and only one dollar is going in military aid. You can't have social reforms in a country while you're getting your head shot off by guerrillas.

Europe, your critics in Ireland -- don't see, necessarily, Nicaragua and El Salvador quite in the same way. There are those who've come back and who've said Nicaragua isn't as repressive as it looks. There are those who say American aid going in to the guerrillas there strengthens and toughens that government.

The President. How do they explain, then, the Miskito Indians, which, even under the Somoza authoritarian government, were allowed to have their own communities, their own culture and religion and so forth, and almost upon taking office, the Sandinista government marched its forces into those Miskito villages, burned their crops, burned their homes, their villages, and then confined as many as they could in concentration camps? But thousands of them fled across the borders. Now, we know an awful lot about some of those Miskitos, because some of our medical personnel in our military are helping taking care of them where they are in refugee camps in Honduras.

All I can suggest to some of these people who are saying this in Europe and who have evidently been propagandized is -- and I don't mean this to sound presumptuous -- but is there any one of them that has access to all the information that the President of the United States has? I'm not doing this because I've got a yen to involve ourselves or spend some money. But I do know that when the Sandinista -- well, the revolution won in Nicaragua, the previous administration immediately set out to help them -- financial aid to that government. And it was only a few days before my inauguration when that administration had irrefutable evidence that the Nicaraguan Government was supplying arms and materiel to the guerrillas in El Salvador, attempting to overthrow a duly elected government that was trying to be a democracy. And he put a hold on any further help.

Now, we came into office a few days later, and we still had to find out for ourselves. We thought if there is a possibility of negotiating some kind of a settlement -- and so, on that basis, we renewed the aid -- financial aid that was going to them and tried to deal with them. By April we had found out that, no, there was no honor, no honesty. They were totalitarian, but more than that, they openly declared that their revolution knows no boundaries, that they are only the beginning of what they intend to be further revolution throughout all of Latin America.

Nicaragua. That is the fifth such Bulgarian ship in the last 18 months. Just a week or two ago, there were Soviet ships in there unloading war materiel. Now, the Nicaraguan Government -- the Sandinista government is funneling this through to the guerrillas in El Salvador. Indeed, the headquarters for the guerrilla movement in El Salvador is only a few miles from the capital of Nicaragua, in Nicaragua where the strategy is planned and the direction of their revolution is taking place.

Government back to the original promise of the revolution, to modify its totalitarian stand, and you're going, at the same time -- and one of the reasons we were offering help is to interdict those arms and weapons that were going to the El Salvador guerrillas, but you know that a flood of that materiel is coming in through the ports and being unloaded, that you're going to try to think of a way to interdict that.

And those were homemade mines, as I say, that couldn't sink a ship. They were planted in those harbors where they were planted by the Nicaraguan rebels. And I think that there was much ado about nothing.

Mr. Farrell. Many people in Europe see you as a cold warrior. They see you as the man who started your Presidential years talking about the empire of evil. They see you as the President who, at this stage, is not involved in disarmament talks with the Soviet Union.

War II to enlist the Soviets into talks to talk about disarmament -- the reduction of arms and the control of weapons. It was this country that, as far back as 1946, when we were the only ones who had a nuclear weapon, we made a proposal that an international commission be appointed to take charge of all nuclear materiel, all weapons turned over to them. The Soviet Union hadn't even completed one yet, but they turned down that proposal.

I am the first one since 1946 who has gone to the bargaining table and proposed the total elimination of the intermediate-range weapons system in Europe, and they wouldn't listen. So, we said, ``All right. We still think that's the best idea -- to free Europe of this threat. But we will then talk to you about what figure would you suggest that we could reduce the numbers to, to at least reduce the size of the threat.'' And their reponse is to walk away from the table.

The President. Yes -- well, not all that bad. They're maybe more unhappy than they've been in the past. But I think one of the reasons for that is that in the past, the Soviet Union has seen this country unilaterally disarm, cancel weapons systems such as the B - 1 and other systems, close down our Minuteman missile assembly line. We don't even have the facility to make them anymore. And they've seen that while they were doing -- while we were doing that, with some idea that maybe they would see we meant no threat and, therefore, they would follow suit -- no, they continued with the biggest military buildup in the history of man.

Mr. Farrell. Many West Europeans are very unhappy, though, because they see the danger that if the confrontation happens, if you don't get to talks in some shape or form, it is Europe where that war will be fought.

They have lived almost 40 years now, since World War II, under an umbrella which has kept peace, and that umbrella is our nuclear capability in this country. I know that there are demonstrators, and I know that there are people that are influenced by the Soviet-sponsored World Peace Council, but I don't think our alliance in Europe has ever been stronger than it is today.

But, as I say, I think the Soviets -- sure, they're unhappy because they liked it the other way when under a kind of detente, they were having things their own way. Now they know that we're not going to make ourselves vulnerable, as was done before. But they also know that we're willing anytime they want to sit down, we are willing to start reducing these weapons. And my ultimate goal is -- I think common sense dictates it -- the world must rid itself of all nuclear weapons.

We've been doing business with them on some things of interest to them as well as us, and with some progress being made. It is only in this area -- they did come back to the mutual balanced force -- the conventional arms treaty, and we are discussing with them, as well as others, at the Stockholm disarmament talks. But it is on those two, the major nuclear weapons -- the START talks, as we call them, and the intermediate-range weapons -- where they are being intransigent.

The President.  --  -- President Carter, in those Olympics when it was their Olympics. Number two, frankly, I think they don't want to be embarrassed by having revered athletes in their country come to this country and decide to stay.

Mr. Farrell. Different part of the world very much in the news this week -- the Gulf. We're obviously teetering into a crisis there. Do you see, Mr. President, the possibility of a direct American involvement?

The President. Well, so far, it doesn't seem to be. The Gulf States have themselves said that this is their problem, and they want to deal with it. Some have asked for some military assistance in the sense of weaponry, and this is why we are sending some weapons, some Stinger weapons, to them and possibly augmenting our little squadron of tankers that are there. We have four there presently -- have had for quite some time. That could be expanded to six. But they have not asked us to intervene, and certainly, we have not offered to intervene.

The President. Well, if it comes to a complete shutdown of the sources of oil in the Middle East, this is a Western problem, and far more than for us. Actually, only about 3 percent of our oil comes from the Persian -- or by way of the Persian Gulf. Many of our allies are not in that advantageous a position. They are very dependent on that. And I have said previously that I don't see how the Western World could let that be closed down. But at the moment, the Gulf States who are directly involved and who are on the firing line there believe that the problem can be solved and without outside interference.

Mr. Farrell. What about the Middle East? You, after all, tried the Reagan plan in terms of resolving the West Bank problem. Do you see now a possibility of somehow coming to a reconciliation of Israel with its Arab neighbors?

The President. This is what we have to continue to try. We have never given up on that. It was set back by the inability to get a solution in Lebanon. It seemed impossible to go forward with that while, for example, Israel itself was engaged in combat in Lebanon. But, ultimately, the solution, as I have put it, is we must find more Egypts. We must -- and our job is to convince our Arab friends over there that we can be evenhanded and that we're not seeking to dictate a settlement of any kind, but that they must be prepared to sit down -- and the Israelis at the same time to sit down -- and negotiate out an end to a war situation in which there are countries that have still said they do not recognize Israel's right to exist.

Now, we have been supportive of Israel since 1948 and continue to be, but we also believe that, rather than our Arab friends and the Israelis continuing to exist in armed camps, it is time to do what the Government of Egypt did a few years ago and make peace.

Mr. Farrell. Mr. President, you're constantly being asked to do the impossible. You're being asked to intervene and not intervene. You're being asked, for instance, in Ireland to make an intervention in regard to the trial of a priest there in Manila. You're being asked to do something about Qadhafi. Can you do anything in these areas.

The President. Well, we can't do all of the things that people suggest. I think we've taken action with regard to Qadhafi. We removed many of our people, as you know, and recognized him for what he is. You mention the Irish priest in the Philippines. I do not know the details of that. I have only recently heard about that, but we've had a longstanding relationship, dating back to the -- when we were the protector of the Philippines, with that government. And if there is any way in which we could be of help in that, we'd be pleased to do it.

The President. I know that's a question that comes up every once in a while. I find it rather difficult to think that way or think about yourself in history. I guess, if they just said I did my best, I might be pleased with that.

Mr. Farrell. But your priorities -- after all, you're expecting to run into a second term. This is the time for you to do things. You said last week that the top priority is disarmament. Do you think you can achieve action in that over the next 4 years?

The President. I have to believe I can, because I don't think the world can go on this way. And we're going to try. Yes, if I had to say one thing that we would be aiming for -- that I would be aiming for as mine -- it is our country continuing along the path that was set so many years ago with its goal the ultimate in individual liberty and freedom consistent with an orderly society; with a government that is the servant of the people, not the master; and with peace throughout the world.

America, they look at the North-South debate, they look at the inequality of resources, they look at your richness and what you've got -- they wonder whether you can really appeal to the poor people of the world effectively?

America, God has placed an afflicted mankind.'' And we were the only nation that was left untouched by war, that still had our industrial power and all, had not been bombed and fought over and so forth. And we turned our resources to helping reestablish not only the wartorn countries on our side but our enemies as well. And we have lived to see those former enemies close allies with us today, and democracies, living up to all the principles that we have believed in for so long.

But, no, where there's a chance to bring peace -- our relationship with our Latin American neighbors -- I made a trip down there shortly after I got into office to tell them that my desire was that I think we'd been insensitive in the past. We haven't recognized that maybe we looked like the big colossus; and we were suggesting ideas with the best of intentions, but it was us telling them.

The President. Oh, now, you've touched on a superstitious point with me. I find it impossible to speculate or suggest that I am going to win. I think it jinxes me if I do that. So, I'm always going to behave as if I'm one vote behind. I'll run scared.

I didn't; I had them all written out here. [Laughter] Well, it is a pleasure to be with you here today. This is a training facility of which I think we can all be proud, and let me add, it's being used by some of the finest athletes in the world. And we're mighty proud of them, too, which means proud of you.

By the way, where's the riding ring -- [laughter] -- to get down to my present sport. But we had the U.S.C. women's basketball team at the White House not long ago, and so I saw a couple of familiar faces here when I was watching the practice over there.

I'm planning to be at the July 28th opening ceremony, so I'll see you there along with many of your friends from around the world. It's unfortunate that not all nations will be represented at the games. I hope you realize, however, that the success of the Olympics and your personal success in the games in no way depend on political machinations of powerbrokers in countries that are less than free. The games are moving forward, and they'll be successful.

Closer to home, the Olympic movement is alive and well in the United States. Part of the reason is because of the excellent leadership given to the United States Olympic Committee by your president, Bill Simon, by your executive director for over a decade, Colonel Don Miller.

One of the major goals of our administration has been promoting private-sector initiatives, getting people involved instead of waiting for the government to take responsibility. Well, this Olympic effort is probably the greatest private-sector initiative that's ever been undertaken.

Seventy thousand athletes have trained at this facility since 1977. The U.S. Olympic Committee budget is increased from less than $9 billion -- million dollars -- during Don Miller's first year to nearly $90 million for this Olympiad. I'm particularly impressed with the job opportunity program for athletes, permitting them to train while earning a living, and that sounds like a good job to me.

A host of corporations, sponsors, and individuals have contributed time, energy, and financial support to make sure the games and our team are the best ever. This spirit is especially important in our efforts, because ours is the only major national Olympic committee out of all 158 which receives no government financial support.

One aspect of the games of special note is the new competitive events for women. These games will do more for women than has ever been done before in the Olympics. There'll be 12 new women's Olympics events.

But even back then, our Olympic team was a great morale builder for the American people. And it's something which brings all your fellow citizens together. It gives us all the chance to wave the flag together. I'd end this by saying good luck, but I know it's not luck that you're depending on, although I've said it to some of you individually. It's your skill and all the training that you've done.

Lynette Woodard. Mr. President, this is a very exciting day for all of us. And we're very honored that you have graced us with your presence. On behalf of the 1984 Women's Olympic Basketball Team, we would like to extend to you a very warm welcome and present you with this gift.

Following his appearance at the center, the President went to the Broadmoor Hotel, where he attended several receptions for Colorado Reagan-Bush volunteers and Republican officials. He remained at the hotel overnight.

It's an honor and a real pleasure to come to Colorado Springs and to the Pike's Peak region. I just hope all Americans have the opportunity to visit Colorado and this breathtaking campus. Like me, they'll feel a deep pride in you, the men and women of our Air Force Academy.

The greatest privilege of my office has been to lead the people who defend our freedom and whose dedication, valor, and skill increase so much our chance to live in a world of peace. I believe that we've made great progress in our efforts to rebuild the morale and the readiness of our Armed Forces. Once again, young Americans wear their uniforms and serve their flag with pride, and our military forces are back on their feet and standing tall.

And now, the class of 1984 has its turn. After 4 years of hard work and dedication, you've earned the right to be saluted. It will now be your responsibility to guard the flame of peace and freedom and to keep that flame burning brightly.

Your jobs will never be easy. But I believe you're ready to meet the challenges before you and to turn them into opportunities for America. Your experience at this magnificient institution, guided by honesty, integrity, and an abiding loyalty to our nation will serve you well.

Dedicated instructors have increased your knowledge and understanding. You've been trained to deal in facts, not wishful thinking. And in doing many things together in classrooms, squadrons, and on the playing fields, you've learned the value of leadership and discipline and the need for both.

Personal honor, courage, and professional competence will guide your thoughts and actions. You understand the horrors of war, and you know that peace with freedom is the highest aspiration of our time. As a matter of fact, these past 4 years have prepared you to take your place in the best darn air force in the world.

By the calendar, 52 years separate my college class from yours. Yet by the changes mine has seen, it might as easily have been 520. The world which the class of '32 had grown to know would soon disappear. True, America was in the midst of a great worldwide depression which all of us desperately wanted to escape. Our immediate concern was work, but our class, like every college class, also thought about the future -- and what a future it has been.

The pace of change, once orderly and evolutionary, became frantic and revolutionary. A series of scientific and technological revolutions flashed past us, touching Americans everywhere and every day. A new future was discovered and then quickly rediscovered. Technological progress was a cataclysmic rush.

The armies of Napoleon had not moved across Europe any faster than Caesar's legions eighteen centuries earlier -- and neither army worried about air cover. But from my college days to yours, we went from open cockpits to lunar landings, from space fiction to space shuttles. Plotted on a graph, the lines representing technological progress would leap vertically off the page, and it wouldn't matter whether you plotted breakthroughs in agriculture or medicine, communications or engineering, genetics or military capability.

During the past few decades, the way we look and think about our world has changed in fundamental and startling ways. In 1932 ``splitting the atom'' was a contradiction in terms. We knew the word ``atom'' came from the Greek ``atomos,'' meaning indivisible and, by definition, you couldn't split anything that was indivisible. But Albert Einstein wouldn't arrive in the States until the following year, and the Manhattan Project had not yet begun. The nuclear age was more than a decade away.

So many of the things that we take for granted today didn't exist on my commencement day: transistors, computers, supersonic flight, fiber optics, organ transplants, microelectronic chips, and xerography. Yes, even the venerable Xerox machine is only 25 years old.

But the greatest of all resources is the human mind; all other resources are discovered only through creative human intelligence. God has given us the ability to make something from nothing. And in a vibrant, open political economy, the human mind is free to dream, create, and perfect. Technology, plus freedom, equals opportunity and progress.

Now, what about your generation? Where do you go from here? The quickening pace shouldn't generate the belief that the tide of events is beyond your control. No, you should be confident that with wisdom, responsibility, and care you can harness change to shape your future.

We've only seen the beginning of what a free and courageous people can do. The bold, not the naysayers, will point the way, because history has shown that progress often takes its greatest strides where brave people transform an idea which is scoffed at by skeptics into a tangible and important part of everyday life.

The space age is barely a quarter of a century old, but already we've pushed civilization forward with our advances in science and technology. Our work on the space shuttle gives us routine access to the landscape above us, dropping off payloads, performing experiments, and fixing satellites. And I believe we've only touched the edge of possibilities in space. It's time to quicken our pace and reach out to new opportunities.

This past January, in my State of the Union Address, I challenged our nation to develop a permanently manned space station and to do so within a decade. And now we're moving forward with a strategy that will chart the future course of the U.S. space program.

The strategy establishes priorities, provides specific direction for our future efforts, and assigns responsibilities to various government agencies. Above all, America's space strategy offers a balanced program that will best serve the down-to-earth needs of our own people and people everywhere.

Our goals are ambitious and yet achievable. They include a permanently manned presence in space for scientific, commercial, and industrial purposes; increased international cooperation in civil space activities; expanded private investment and involvement; cost-effective access to space with the shuttle; and strengthened security and capability to maintain the peace.

The benefits to be reaped from our work in space literally dazzle the imagination. Together, we can produce rare, life-saving medicines, saving thousands of lives and hundreds of millions of dollars. We can manufacture superchips that improve our competitive position in the world computer market. We can rapidly and efficiently repair defective satellites. We can build space observatories enabling scientists to see out to the edge of the universe. And we can produce special alloys and biological materials that benefit greatly from a zero-gravity environment.

Let me give you just one exciting glimpse that illustrates the great potential of how working in space can improve life on Earth. There is a medicine called -- and I'm not quite sure of my pronunciation -- it is either ``urokinase'' or ``urokenase'', but whichever name, it is used to treat victims of pulmonary embolism and heart attacks caused by blood clots. On Earth, this medicine is very difficult and expensive to produce. About 500,000 doses are needed annually at a cost of $500 million. Dr. Robert Jastrow, chairman of the first NASA Lunar-Exploration Committee, notes that tests in our shuttle have shown that production of urokinase in zero gravity could reduce that cost by a factor of ten or more. We could make this medicine available to thousands of people who cannot afford it at today's price.

Our willingness to accept the challenge of space will reflect whether America's men and women today have the same bold vision, the same courage and indomitable spirit that made us a great nation. Where would we be if the brave men and women who built the West let the unknowns and dangers overwhelm them? Where would we be if our aviation pioneers let the difficulties and uncertainties sway them?

The only limits we have are those of your own courage and imagination. And our freedom and well-being will be tied to new achievements and pushing back new frontiers. That's the challenge to the class of '84.

America's future safety, progress, and greatness depends on how well you hold fast to our most precious values -- values that embody the culmination of 5,000 years of Western civilization. Let your determination to make this world better and safer override all other considerations.

This Academy was not built just to produce air warriors; it was also built to produce leaders who understand the great stakes involved in the defense of this country, leaders who can be entrusted with the responsibility to protect peace and freedom. You are those leaders. And while you must know better than those before you how to fight a war, you must also know better than those before you how to deter a war, how to preserve peace.

As you look to the future, always remember the treasures of our past. Every generation stands on the shoulders of the generation that came before. Jealously guard the values and principles of our heritage; they didn't come easy.

Inspiration springs from great tradition. As military officers, guard the traditions of your service built here in the foothills of the Rockies and in the air over Ploesti, Mig Alley, the Red River Valley, and a thousand other places. The traditions you hold will serve you well.

In July 1944 a grateful nation bestowed the Medal of Honor on a soldier, a private, for extraordinary heroism on Hill 424 near Altavilla, Italy. The soldier could not accept the award that day. He was a prisoner of war, and his father accepted in his behalf.

Well, nearly 40 years have gone by, and it's time to do it right. A native son of Colorado and certainly a good friend of the Air Force Academy will forever be in the select company where the heroes of our country stand.

Colonel Wallisch. Please rise. Attention to orders: The President of the United States takes pleasure in awarding the Medal of Honor to William J. Crawford for service as set forth in the following citation.

For conspicuous gallantry and intrepidity at risk of life above and beyond the call of duty in action with the enemy near Altavilla, Italy, 13 September 1943. When Company I attacked an enemy-held position on Hill 424, the Third Platoon, in which Private Crawford was a squad scout, attacked as base platoon for the company. After reaching the crest of the hill, the platoon was pinned down by intense enemy machine gun and small-arms fire.

Crawford, without orders and on his own initiative, moved over the hill under the enemy fire to a point within a few yards of the gun emplacement and single-handedly destroyed the machine gun and killed three of the crew with a hand grenade, thus enabling his platoon to continue its advance.

Moving first to the left, with a hand grenade, he destroyed one gun emplacement and killed the crew. He then worked his way, under continuous fire, to the other, and with one grenade and the use of his rifle, killed one enemy and forced the remainder to flee. Seizing the enemy machine gun, he fired on the withdrawing Germans and facilitated his company's advance.

But as all athletes know, character is built on the playing fields through hard work, fair play, and gritty determination to rise to the highest challenge. The Duke of Wellington once remembered that the Battle of Waterloo was won on the playing field of Eaton.

The President. Secretary General Luns, distinguished guests, and ladies and gentlemen, it's an honor and a pleasure to welcome our NATO partners to the White House. This evening has been a special opportunity to celebrate the unprecedented success of our enduring friendship, our partnership -- an alliance dedicated to peace and freedom.

The establishment of the North Atlantic alliance was also an act of optimism, an affirmation of the enduring vitality of Western civilization. Thirty-five years of peace with freedom testify to the wisdom and the foresight of those nations, and of the four other nations who have since joined NATO.

We cannot be content with the accomplishments of the past. As we look ahead, there are compelling reasons to strengthen even further our solidarity and unity. Our commitment to collective security will continue to be an indispensable bulwark against aggression, terrorism, and tyranny.

Our unity will be the essential framework for building a constructive dialog with our adversaries and reducing the risks of war and the level of nuclear arms. And I know that it will be our societies, the democracies, that will offer a bright and hopeful future for our people and for people everywhere.

We can be confident. The events of the past year challenged us, and the Western democracies stood firm in the face of an intense Soviet campaign of intimidation, aimed at undermining NATO's commitment to defend Europe and preserve peace. Today we are stronger and more conscious of our unity. And that's of crucial importance, because when the Soviet Union becomes convinced that NATO cannot be shaken it may finally realize it has a clear and compelling interest to return to the negotiating table. We will be waiting, ready to meet them halfway.

Tonight is more than a celebration of an anniversary. It's also an opportunity to recognize the special contributions of our Secretary General. Joseph Luns is a distinguished diplomat and a man of many virtues.

First as the Dutch Foreign Minister, and then at NATO's helm, he's been at the center of the transatlantic bridge for nearly 30 years. His mission -- his vision, I should say -- his humor, and his patience have sustained us in good times and bad. As Secretary General, he's never lost sight of the goals and objectives of our alliance, and peace has been his profession.

You have been a trusted friend, an honest broker, a respected colleague, and, above all, an invaluable leader of the Atlantic alliance. Joseph, you've said that the state of our alliance is like Wagner's music -- better than it sounds. [Laughter] Well, I must tell you that thanks largely to your efforts I rather like the way the alliance sounds. And I hope that even in retirement you will still watch over our partnership and that you will not hesitate to share your counsel with us.

Ladies and gentlemen, in recognition of Joseph Luns uncommon dedication to the ideals of our alliance and in tribute to his outstanding service and enduring contributions to our freedom and security, it is my great privilege to bestow America's highest civilian award, the Medal of Freedom, on Secretary General Luns.

But before I invite him to receive the medal, I would ask that you raise your glasses and join me in a toast to Secretary General Joseph Luns and to the organization he has faithfully served and so ably guided.

The Secretary General. Mr. President, distinguished guests, I feel greatly flattered, deeply honored, immensely proud by having received from your hands, Mr. President, this very special award which I value highly and for which I am very, very grateful. Thank you very much, indeed.

May I say that I have now been nearly 13 years Secretary General of this great organization, and looking back on those 13 years, I must and I want to gratefully acknowledge the immense role the United States has played in this alliance. Far from being a hegemonic power, far from imposing your wishes and your will on your allies in an alliance where every decision must be taken by unanimity, you have always taken into account the views and the opinions of your European allies. And it is simply a truism to say that without the presence of more than 300,000 of your sons in Europe, Europe -- the world -- would be a far worse place than it is now, and I would not be standing here, nor would be the 16 Ministers of this alliance who have gathered here in Washington to have our yearly conclave, where, I must say, we had an excellent, excellent exchange of views.

Secretary of Defense, are among your guests, as well as so many distinguished people whom I have known, some of whom for a long time and some who have become personal friends of mine -- and I look at Tapley Bennett, who is now Under Secretary of the State Department, and so many others I could name -- makes, of course, this evening even more special than it is, Mr.

And, Mr. President, may I end by saying that we are all deeply grateful for your unflinching support for the alliance. You have shown it over and over again. And let me say, too, that I will always treasure this very special award, which I will, for the days which will still be with me, I hope, always see as one of the most important and the most precious awards which was ever bestowed on me.

For many Americans, coming to Ireland is like coming home. That is certainly true in my case. My great, great grandfather, Thomas Reagan, lived in the town of Doolis, Ballyporeen, in the county of Tipperary. His youngest son Michael, and Michael's son John, who was my grandfather, emigrated to the United States.

Nancy and I look forward to visiting Ballyporeen to see the church records of my ancestors and to meet family members and friends. We hope to make new friends while enjoying traditional Irish hospitality and savoring the beauty of this precious land.

In a way, my visit to your country is the story of Irish-American relations come full circle. My ancestors, like so many of their compatriots, left Ireland to seek a new beginning in a young and growing country. These Irish immigrants helped to build America with their bodies, their intellect and their love of beauty and culture -- and their sense of humor, I should add. They wrote one of the most remarkable success stories in American history. The United States owes much to these men and women for their many contributions to our society in the arts, literature, drama and countless other fields.

America in 1621, that peace, prosperity and freedom are the keys to the future, not only for ourselves, but also for our children. Ireland can be proud of its contribution to international peacekeeping and of its role in reducing international tensions.

Speaking for my country, I can say that Americans believe that the tide of history is a freedom tide, and that the values of freedom, democracy and independence that we have developed over the centuries will endure beyond the lives of all of us here today.

Last night at dinner and again this morning, we had the opportunity to discuss the major challenges facing the alliance, including the security and defense of the West, relations with the Soviet Union, and arms control.

We all recognize that there is no more important consideration than the development of a better working relationship with the Soviet Union -- one marked by greater cooperation and understanding and leading to stable, secure, and peaceful relations. This has been and will continue to be a primary goal of the United States and the NATO alliance.

For us, our NATO partnership is an anchor, a fixed point in a turbulent world. And it's our sincere hope that the Soviet Union will soon come to understand the profound desire for peace which inspires us. And I hope that the Soviet leadership will finally realize it is pointless to continue its efforts to divide the alliance. We will not be split. We will not be intimidated. The West will defend democracy and individual liberty. And the West will protect the peace.

At the same time, we remain ready to negotiate fairly and flexibly and without preconditions. It is our hope that the Soviet Union will soon return to the negotiating table. Our commitment to dialog and arms reduction is firm and unshaken. No other step in the near term would do so much for the cause of peace and stability as a return to constructive negotiations and agreements reducing the levels of nuclear arms.

I've said many times and will say again that when the Soviet Union returns to the negotiating table, we'll meet them halfway. I also hope that the Soviet leadership will respond positively to the range of proposals which we and our allies have advanced in other areas of arms control.

Our proposals serve the cause of peace: the draft treaty to abolish chemical weapons, presented by Vice President Bush in Geneva; the recent NATO proposal seeking to break the deadlock in the conventional force talks in Vienna; and the measures introduced by NATO in Stockholm in our effort to reduce the risk of surprise attack in Europe.

Tomorrow, I will leave for Europe. I'm looking forward to the trip and the opportunity to underscore the enduring importance of the political, cultural, and economic ties that bind the industrialized democracies.

Unparalleled progress in agricultural production has made the United States the world's food production model. Our ability to conquer disease and advance the health and productivity of our livestock has brought animal scientists and animal production specialists from around the world to our shores to learn the secret of America's agriculture.

In today's dynamic economy, it is difficult to remember that these high-quality, healthy animal products have not always been with us. Whenever we enjoy a meal of meat, eggs, or milk, administer a life-improving health supplement, or enjoy a fine leather or wool item, we reap the benefits of persistent hard work over the decades. Without the progress represented by the improved health and productivity of our animals, we, in the United States, would not enjoy these items as we do for a fraction of the cost often paid by the people in other nations.

On this centennial of progress in advancing the health of livestock and production of animals through research and cooperative endeavors, we salute all who have contributed to the progress we enjoy today. The sound, scientific, and humane principles which have guided those in the forefront of this century of progress continue today, not only for livestock and poultry on our farms and ranches, but also for the care and feeding of our pets and wildlife.

Theatres enrich the lives of all Americans. They have pioneered the way for many performers and have given them a start in artistic careers. Theatres enable their audiences to take part in the creative process; they challenge and stimulate us and show us our world in a new light. The strength and vitality of America's theatres are proof of our dedication and commitment to this vital art form.

In recognition of the many contributions theatres make to the quality of our lives, and in celebration of this art form which enriches us in so many ways, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 292, has designated the week of June 3 through June 9, 1984, as ``National Theatre Week,'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this week.

Over two hundred years ago, in June 1775, the first distinctive American flags to be used in battle were flown by the colonists at the Battle of Bunker Hill. One flag was an adaptation of the British Blue Ensign, while the other was a new design. Both flags bore a common device of the colonial era which symbolized the experience of Americans who had wrested their land from the forest: the pine tree.

The Constitution provides a framework for our continuous striving to make a better America. It provides the basic balance between each branch of government, limits the power of that government, and guarantees to each of us as citizens our most basic rights. The Constitution, however, is only the outline of our system of government. It is through each individual citizen living out the ideals of the Constitution that we reach for a full expression of those ideals.

Therefore, while we celebrate Citizenship Day and Constitution Week, let us rededicate ourselves to a full realization of the potential of the great country which the Founding Fathers struggled to create more than two hundred years ago.

Once each year, on September 17, all four pages of the original signed Constitution are placed on public exhibition in the Rotunda of the National Archives building in Washington, DC. I encourage all Americans to take the opportunity to view this document, which embodies our national commitment to freedom.

Now, Therefore, I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, call upon appropriate government officials to display the flag of the United States on all government buildings on Citizenship Day, September 17, 1984. I urge Federal, State and local officials, as well as leaders of civic, educational and religious organizations to conduct ceremonies and programs that day to commemorate the occasion.

On that day and in the ensuing weeks, the soldiers, sailors, and airmen of the assault forces, and the men and women who supported the landing, displayed great skill, unwavering tenacity, and courage. The Americans who landed at Omaha Beach -- where sharp bluffs, strong defenses, and the presence of a powerful German division produced enormous difficulties -- wrote an especially brave and noble chapter in the military history of the United States.

Opposed by bitter enemy resistance, the landing forces gained the beaches at great sacrifice, pushed inland, and expanded their beachheads. Feats of leadership and courage by individuals and small groups turned the tide. The great battles of 1944 that followed, from the hedgerows to the Ardennes, hold a place of highest honor in the tradition of the United States Armed Forces. The brave, often heroic deeds of our fellow Americans and others in the Allied Armed Forces set in motion the liberation of Europe and brought unity and pride to all free people.

Welded by the experiences of war, the old world and the new formed an enduring alliance which shared the rebuilding of Europe and forged a shield that has kept the peace in Europe for almost forty years. A common dedication to remain strong can continue that peace which these brave men and women fought so hard to secure.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 31st day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

I include as part of these documents my determination that further extension of the waiver authority will substantially promote the objectives of section 402. I also include my determination that continuation of the waivers applicable to the Hungarian People's Republic, the People's Republic of China and the Socialist Republic of Romania will substantially promote the objectives of section 402. The attached documents also include my reasons for extension of the waiver authority; and for my determination that continuation of the waivers currently in effect for the Hungarian People's Republic, the People's Republic of China and the Socialist Republic of Romania will substantially promote the objectives of section 402.

The general waiver authority conferred by section 402(c) of the Act is an important means for the strengthening of mutually beneficial relations between the United States and certain countries of Eastern Europe and the People's Republic of China. The waiver authority has permitted us to conclude and maintain in force bilateral trade agreements with Hungary, the People's Republic of China, and Romania. These agreements continue to be fundamental elements in our political and economic relations with those countries, including our important, productive exchanges on human rights and emigration matters. Moreover, continuation of the waiver authority might permit future expansion of our bilateral relations with other countries now subject to subsections 402 (a) and (b) of the Act, should circumstances permit. I believe that these considerations clearly warrant this renewal of the general waiver authority.

Hungary. -- Hungary continues to take a positive and constructive approach to emigration matters. The Hungarian record of the past year, during which all outstanding problem cases were resolved, was excellent. The number of Hungarian citizens who apply to leave Hungary remains small, and emigration permission is granted apparently without undue difficulty. There are no sanctions imposed on those who seek to emigrate, nor do emigration procedures appear excessive.

People's Republic of China. -- China continued its open emigrations policy throughout the past year. Chinese who wish to emigrate do so with little difficulty. In FY - 1983, nearly 10,000 immigrant visas were issued by our Foreign Service posts in China. This figure has increased every year since the normalization of relations with China in 1979. In addition, tens of thousands of Chinese have traveled freely abroad over the past few years to study, conduct business, or simply tour and visit family. The limiting factor on Chinese emigration remains less official constraint than the limited ability or willingness of this and other countries to receive large numbers of potential Chinese immigrants.

Between February and June, 1983, Romania required that all emigrants repay the state in convertible currency the cost of any education they had received beyond the compulsory ten years of schooling. However, in early June 1983 I received assurances from President Ceausescu that Romania would no longer require reimbursement of education costs as a precondition to emigration and would not create economic or procedural barriers to emigration. Since then, we are not aware of any emigrant who has had to pay for his education. Moreover, while there still are many problems in the emigration area, Romania's overall performance has significantly improved over the past year, particularly in the numbers of people receiving exit documentation and the shorter time taken to process their passport applications. On the basis of Romania's performance and the progress it has made in the area of emigration since last year, I believe that continuation of the waiver applicable to Romania will substantially promote the objectives of the Act.

The report presents information on the current and projected status of the domestic uranium mining and milling industry including uranium requirements and inventories, domestic production, import penetration, domestic and foreign ore reserves, exploration expenditures, employment, and capital investment. In addition to presenting projections of industry behavior under current policy, the report provides projections under alternative policy scenarios in the event that foreign import restrictions were enacted by Congress. The anticipated effect of spent nuclear fuel reprocessing on the demand for uranium is also addressed.

The National Science Foundation is a key part of the national effort to revitalize our capabilities in research, innovation, and production. Achievements such as those described here underlie much of this Nation's strength -- its economic growth, military security, and the general well-being of our people.

Mr. President, it seems so often that these economic summits tend to get caught up in the crisis of the moment, which, at this time is clearly the situation in the Gulf. I wonder if I could ask, first, what sort of commitment are you looking for from your allies and friends on the Gulf, and how far are you willing to go, if diplomacy fails, to keep the oil flowing?

The President. Well, I made a statement once that I didn't believe that the Western World could see that area closed to traffic and a shutoff of the oil supply. It is far more important to the countries that some of you represent than it is to us, because the bulk of our import now is coming from sources here in this hemisphere. But at the same time now, we're staying in close consultation with representatives of your governments, and at the same time, we are all staying in touch with the Gulf States.

Now, the Gulf States have taken a position, very firmly, that they want to deal with the problem themselves. They do not want it to enlarge -- as it might -- and expand into more of a war if everyone else got involved. They've made it plain, however, as is evident in the media right now, that there is some help they need in the line of materiel -- weapons. And, we have sent -- we've answered their request with some. But I think that we have to stay, as I say, in that consultation and watching, in the event that there should be a complete shutdown.

However, if you look at the last few days, it appears that, rather then getting worse, the situation has quieted somewhat. I don't believe there have been any attacks to speak of in the last several days. So, maybe it's going to turn out all right.

And now, even though Iraq, we must admit, is the one who started the war 4 years ago, Iraq now had made overtures to have a negotiated settlement and end the war. And Iran has refused to do this. So, Iran is in more or less the position of demanding unconditional victory. And if there was any way that any of the rest of us could, by appeal, bring an end to that fighting, I'm sure we would all do it, because it's a tremendous and horrible bloodletting that is going on. And Iran, as I say, is the one now who seems to resist any effort, short of a total victory, ending that war.

State actually said was, ``We have no better ally than France,'' meaning that the other allies are equally good. But there's no one that we would think of as a greater ally, and certainly no one longer as an ally than France. And, as I say, I think it was a language difficulty that made it come out ``best.'' And that would be rather unfair of us.

Soviet Union. Now, we offered a treaty to the Soviet Union to totally eliminate intermediate-range nuclear weapons in Europe. At that time, they had about 800 warheads targeted on Europe, not on the United States. And in 1979, NATO allies asked us to provide the weapons -- which we could, the Pershing II's and so forth, and cruise missiles, a combination -- as a deterrent to the SS - 20's of the Soviet Union, each with its three warheads. And my predecessor and the government at that time in this country agreed. So, I inherited this program that was underway with us building and testing the weapons to go there. And we came to deployment.

Well, the Soviet Union, when I said, ``Zero-zero. There'll be no deployment of these weapons if you will agree to eliminate yours.'' And they refused. So, we said, ``All right. If you won't go for zero-zero now, we'll hope that in the future you'll see the wisdom of it, but if not, we're willing to sit down and negotiate a reduction in numbers that would be fair to both sides.'' And they walked away from the table on the basis of our deployment.

At first, they did make an answer. They would reduce the number of their missiles, but we would have to have zero. In other words, they bought half my proposal of zero-zero. We'd be zero, and they'd have -- well, as it stands now, about 1,350 warheads targeted on Europe. They continued adding those warheads, those missiles, all the time we were talking at the negotiating table about reductions. They were continuing to increase.

Well, now they've -- the Economist Magazine has an article called, ``May Hibernation.'' And it suggests that the Soviet Union right now maybe doesn't have any answers, so the bear has just decided to hibernate, hunker down in the cave and not say anything.

But I happen to believe that, first of all, there is no great risk in this silence on their part. I think they're unhappy because we have refurbished our military after unilaterally disarming over the years, hoping that they would then follow suit, and they didn't. They continued the biggest buildup possible.

We're ready, and as a matter of fact, we are having negotiations with them, very quietly and on a number of subjects that are of interest to them. We have told them that we're ready to -- we're willing to talk on those particular matters, and those talks are going forward. And there's some productivity in them.

But I -- when I'm accused every once in a while of being guilty of harsh rhetoric -- the other day we had a very moving ceremony in the burial of our unknown soldier. I thought it was going a little far when the Soviet Union publicly referred to that as a ``militaristic orgy'' that we were engaged in. I don't know just how you could get that out of a ceremony for a young man whose name will forever be known only to God, but who gave his life in the service of his country. And we decided to bury him at Arlington Cemetery.

Now, we're dealing with them in Stockholm in those meetings. We're dealing with them and with our NATO allies in the Vienna talks on conventional forces. And they just stubbornly refuse to talk the nuclear weapons.

That shouldn't surprise us. Our effort to get them engaged in nuclear talks, weapon talks is, I think, the 20th since World War II ended. And the closest they ever came to a successful agreement -- well, there was the antiballistic missile treaty. But remember the significance of that.

Mr. Lugato. Mr. President, the uneasy alliance is something that we have been hearing for several years. It's a sort of complaint, if you want, of the European -- of American complaint of the European allies. Now there is a concern in Europe about the so-called shift between the Atlantic to the Pacific. What's your reaction, sir? How do you comment?

The President. Oh, well, that's very easy. Let me just say that last night in this same room we're in, we had a very enjoyable dinner with the 16 Foreign Ministers of the 16 alliance nations. I don't believe that relationship has ever been closer or better or stronger than it is right now. No concern about that.

At the same time, the United States, placed here as we are in the Western Hemisphere, we have always been a Pacific nation in that we're on the rim of the Pacific Basin. And we see no diminution in our closeness to the European alliance. But at the same time, we recognize that we have friends and allies on the other side of the Pacific, and we're just as concerned about keeping that relationship and enhancing it to keep peace and friendly bonds in that part of the world.

So, Japan is one of our close friends and allies and certainly is a close friend and ally of the alliance, Europe. And I think the trip that we made to the People's Republic was a very fruitful one. The ASEAN nations to the south, in Southeast Asia, who are concerned there about maintaining peace and having an alliance among themselves and getting -- obtaining a settlement to the Kampuchea problem. No, I think that we fought a war two-handed, in the East and the West, and certainly we could be peaceful neighbors and friends in the same way.

I'd like to ask you about a trade matter. I think you are surrounded by a very strong protectionism in the Congress, and we Japanese realize that and try the best effort to open the market. I'd like to have your assessment on Japanese effort to open the market. In connection with that, do you want Japan should continue self-imposed restriction of automobile import in this country after next year?

The President. I'm glad that you said what it was, because here in the treatment of our own press, they've -- without really deliberately misstating, they've given an impression to the people of this country that this was something we imposed on you, that we asked for the quota on automobile imports. And it's a good opportunity for me to reiterate what you said, that this was Japan's voluntary move when our automobile industry was as hard hit by the great recession as it was, and you were selling a product that we could not match pricewise. It was Japan that voluntarily agreed to limit the number of automobiles they would sell in this market. Now, the renewal of that, or if there is to be a renewal, isn't due for some months yet, and that is strictly up to Japan and what they decide to do.

But on the general trade matters, I have to say that Prime Minister Nakasone has just been a tower of strength in his belief in trade relations between our two countries -- improving them, making them more fair wherever there is an unfairness. And great progress has been made. Just previous to this last trip, as you know, I was in Japan and met with him, and since then, our other -- or our Cabinet ministers -- Secretary Regan and others have. And he and the Cabinet in Japan have worked with our people to bring about correction of some things that were unfair. And we've made greater progress, I believe, than has been made in the last quarter of a century as trading partners. And we're most appreciative of that fact.

Mr. Bell. Mr. President, that would seem to lead naturally into a question about the London summit, whither you're bound. We would expect the Americans to come under some pressure there on account of rising interest rates and budget deficits. Is there a message that you're carrying to London?

The President. Yes. I'd like to point out to them when I get there that if you go by deficits as a percentage of gross national product, we're not too out of line with our deficits with the deficits of our allies there in the summit. They, too, have deficits. Not all of them, but -- well, I think possibly all of them do, but not to the same extent.

The deficit -- and we're working hard -- the message I will bring is that we now have the House and the Senate in a conference committee working out their differences on what I had asked for earlier, a downpayment on the deficit of $150 billion or so over the next 3 years. I think we're going to have that, and it's just various details that have to be worked out that they will agree to.

As Governor of California, I had line-item veto. I could intercept and veto out of that good bill that amendment. Then the legislature, if it had the power, by a two-thirds majority, could override my veto. Well, in 8 years, I vetoed 943 times without ever being overridden, because once they have to vote for that bad bill all by itself, without it being hidden by this other legislation, they decide not to do that. Well, I want the same thing here.

But, also, once we get the downpayment, beginning next year we will begin implementing some two thousand, four hundred and -- I believe it's seventy-eight recommendations that were made to us by a citizens group. More than 2,000 of the business leaders of our country voluntarily came together and, at our invitation, went into every area of government and came back with these thousands of recommendations as to how modern business practices could be put to work to make government more efficient and more effective. And the savings are astronomical if this is done.

Now, some of those we've managed to put into operation by my Executive order. Most of them would undoubtedly result in changes that would require legislation from the Congress. But we're pursuing that. We have a study group right now combing those and framing legislation to bring those. So, we're going to go to work on the deficits.

But the other part of my message will be: I don't believe the deficits have anything to do with our high interest rates, because at the very time that we were bringing the interest rates that we inherited from the previous administration down from 21\1/2\ percent, and bringing them down to half that level, at the same time the deficit was going up. Now, how could that be and now there be a connection with the lower interest rates that we've already achieved, that somehow the deficit is responsible for those?

The responsibility for those is one and one only. The money market out there is not yet convinced that we have control of inflation. We've had about eight recessions since World War II, and every time they've seen government kind of turn to a quick fix and inflation go up some more. The world has been in the longest period of sustained worldwide inflation in the world's history.

Robinson. And he's been outspoken lately saying -- criticizing Canada's level of defense spending, saying Canada is not living up to its NATO responsibilities, and also saying that the departing Trudeau government has treated U.S. investors very badly. Are these Mr. Robinson's own views, or are they the views of your administration and you?

I know it is true that recently your country has done what a number of Members of our Congress would do to us if they would get away with it, and that is reduce deficit spending. If there's any opportunity to reduce spending, they'll reduce deficit spending rather than anything else.

The President. And we've had discussions, and in the summit -- and probably will some more -- about some of the differences in our approach to outside investment. But we'll deal with them at the summit.

Dr. Seger is a financial economist with extensive experience in business, banking, and government. She has served at both the State and Federal levels as the Commissioner of Financial Institutions for the State of Michigan and as a financial economist for the Federal Reserve Board in Washington, DC. And most recently, she has been a professor of finance at Central Michigan University.

Dr. Seger arrives at a time of optimism and challenge. We received more evidence this morning that our economic expansion continues steady and strong. The leading economic indicators rose again in April, the 18th increase in the last 20 months. At the same time, inflation remains low, contrary to many predictions.

We've begun a new era in America of strong growth and stable prices. And I'm convinced that it results from our program to take America in a new direction -- restore incentives to people, stimulate more competition in our economy, but restrain government's ability to spend, tax, and regulate. And I believe that we should press on with even greater determination.

Thinking back to being a kid in a small town in Michigan during World War II and having my parents tell me that I lived in the greatest country on Earth and that, while most people knew all about their rights as citizens, that we also had duties and responsibilities -- then, I never dreamed that I would one day have an opportunity to serve my country in this type of job.

We happened to be meeting with the Chairmen of the various Federal Reserve Banks today, so they were able to come over here and have a chance to meet Dr. Seger. Beyond that, we would be happy even if it wasn't that day. It's particularly opportune. And we are well aware of the breadth of her background, the kind of experience that she's had, that I'm sure is going to be a very fine addition to our system. And we're delighted.

Windsor. Dr. Seger has had 10 years experience in commercial banking, including serving as chief economist for Detroit Bank and Trust for over 7 years. Prior to this, she was financial economist in the capital market section at the Federal Reserve Board.

However, I'd like to ask you, in light of the growing hostility of debtor nations, first of all whether a coordinated long-term solution is now essential; and second, what the U.S. can do to guarantee confidence of its banking system?

The President. Well, first of all, let me answer that by saying that I believe the five-point system -- or program that we all agreed to at the summit meeting last year at Williamsburg has been working. And I'm sure there is unhappiness here and there with some. But I believe that since it is working, and it's working on a case-by-case basis, that we should continue that, and that the greatest thing we can contribute now to helping them in their problems is to do everything we can to ensure and increase, if possible, the economic recovery that is presently taking place.

Q. Mr. President, in the last few days you've said that the world feels a little bit more secure because of the strengthening in the American strategic and conventional posture. As paradoxical as it may seem in considering the reported widespread violations of SALT II by the Soviet Union, do you feel that the world can continue to feel a little bit more secure for an extended period of time in the absence of an agreement with the Soviet Union limiting nuclear arms?

The President. Well, I think the ultimate of what we want, of course, is for them to come back to the table and join us in not a limitation, as SALT was, that was simply legalizing an arms race in that the limitation was only a limit on how many more you could continue to build -- as a matter of fact, it's interesting to note that from the time of the signing by both parties to the SALT treaty, the Soviet Union added 3,950 more warheads.

When I say more secure, I believe that the United States, basically, in recent decades, went all out in various efforts at detente and in which we unilaterally disarmed with the idea that maybe if we did this and showed our good faith, they would reciprocate by reducing their own. Well, they didn't. They've engaged in the most massive military buildup the world has ever seen. And therefore, the reason I believe that there is more security today is the redressing that we've done of our own military strength, the strength of the alliance, and the unity that we have.

And the alliance resisted all that propaganda of the Soviets with regard to the intermediate-range placement, and their efforts to divide us failed. So I think -- there's an article that I could call to your attention in The Economist, called ``May Hibernation.'' It was an idea that hadn't occurred to me, but I think it makes a great deal of sense: that they are not deviously planning something or having a great plan going forward. The author of this article said that they don't have any answers right now, so they've just hunkered down and they're hibernating, waiting until they have an answer.

The President. Well, I don't see that particular issue as one lending itself to that. We are not out of touch with the Soviet Union. We have continued to negotiate with them on other matters -- other than the arms treaties -- that were of concern to them. And there's been some progress made on those. So, we've made it very plain that the door is open for negotiations.

On the gulf, I think the idea -- none of us want to see this spread into a major conflict. And I think the fact that the gulf nations themselves have not asked for help other than wanting more weaponry for their own defense here and there, and which we've provided, and I believe that that is the course to follow. If it ever goes beyond that, then I think that the major nations -- it would begin with us and our allies getting together, because basically our allies, including your own country, have a greater stake in -- if that energy supply was cut off.

The President. Oh, I'm quite sure we'll be discussing that. The summit meetings, I'm proud and happy to say, since Williamsburg, are kind of planned at a more informal basis. They used to be very programmed and with subjects in advance determined on and so forth. And we didn't think, when we had the Williamsburg summit, we didn't think that that really opened the door to what everyone would like to talk about. So it's more or less an informal get-together, and whatever subject is on anyone's mind, they can bring up, that they think is of interest to it. And I'm quite sure that we'll be discussing that.

Q. Well, if I can come back to the economic problem, Mr. President, the latest figures on the U.S. export performance -- they paint a rather grim picture. It is understood that the U.S. trade deficit -- trade imbalance will reach a staggering $126 billion this year, compounding, it seems, the deficit problem that already exists. How can interest rates really come down under such auspices? And what will you tell your partners at London, who are worried stiff already about interest rates and about the high dollar that it's created and the capital that comes out of their economies into banks in this country? What are you going to tell your partners about this?

The President. Well, the trade imbalance -- I don't think it has anything to do with the interest rates. The trade imbalance that you've mentioned there, as a matter of fact, is due to the value of the dollar in comparison to other currencies, and this is part of the worldwide recession that's been going on. But our imports are actually responsible for about a third of the recovery of our trading partners now. And there is another element that we don't consider in the balance of trade, but that is capital investment from outside the United States in our country. And yet, that is a kind of balance to this imbalance.

We'd like very much to be exporting more than we are, but we realize that our recovery started earlier and has been faster than it has in the other countries. And so the result is they have been less able to buy. And the very fact, as I say, that we're continuing to import is helping that recovery. And I think that this will move to change that.

Now, we get to the deficit, which is -- every country has one right now -- the spending over and above revenues in government functions. We have a program right now that is in conference committee before the House and Senate to work out the differences in their two versions of what I have called a downpayment. And that is a 3-year program to -- certain, some revenue increases -- but both domestic spending and some reductions in defense spending that will not set us back too much in our program. But this downpayment will amount to about $140 or $150 billion over the 3-year period in the reduction of our deficit.

But that's only part of it. We recognize that we have a long way to go in reducing the share of the gross national product that the Government is taking in taxes and is spending. And we had a commission from the private sector -- I asked a man named Peter Grace, a businessman, to form task forces and go into every agency and department of our government. I had done this in California when I was Governor, for the State, and it worked. And some 2,000 American leaders from the private sector spent several months doing this. And they have left us with 2,000 -- I think it's 478 specific recommendations as to how government can be made more efficient and more economical by simply implementing modern-day business practices.

For example, when they could find that in one area of our government, it was costing us $4 and something every time we wrote a paycheck for an employee, and out in the business world that process takes less than a dollar -- well, there's no reason why government shouldn't take less than a dollar in processing a paycheck -- well, this kind of thing. And we now have a task force that is working on those recommendations. Many of them will require legislation by the Congress; some of them only require Executive order by me. And we have already in our planning, right now, and in this downpayment, we have already included some of their recommendations and are going forward with them.

But what I stand on as evidence that it isn't the deficit that is causing the interest rates, the high interest rates, is the fact that we brought those high interest rates down from 21\1/2\ percent down to a little more than half that at the same time that our deficit was increasing vastly over what it had been. Now, how could that be? -- that interest rates were coming down while the deficit was going up, and now the deficit is responsible for interest rates not coming down any farther, or maybe, as they have, gone up a point or so recently?

We think that out there in the money market in our own country, after nearly half a century of deficit spending in this country and a growing inflation that has been worldwide for a longer period than ever in the world's history, that the money market is not yet convinced that we have control of inflation. And every move by the Federal Reserve System -- they always look to see, well, does this mean that suddenly inflation is going to start?

Senate and the House come together and this downpayment is made, and then, as we begin to put together the 1985 budget, which we will shortly be doing, and we begin to show in that budget the effect of the Grace commission reports and so forth, I think we will see a little more confidence out there in the business community, and I think we'll see interest rates come down a little further.

Q. My question: Our Prime Minister, Mr. Trudeau, set out on a personal disarmament quest last year, based on the assumption that the superpowers were deadlocked, that the world was becoming more dangerous, and that smaller powers might help to break that deadlock -- and got the support and endorsement of the Commonwealth.

The President. Oh. Listen -- well, no. We encouraged him and gave him our blessing to go forward with that. I think that it's awfully easy for us in our relations with the Soviet Union to be the kiss of death, sometimes, to these things. No. The Prime Minister came here -- I'm sorry, I misunderstood what you are asking.

I think the world pretty generally, with just a few exceptions, is ready for world peace. And this is our primary goal. But I don't believe that you can really -- that it is really on a sound basis unless it is accompanied by a reduction, particularly in the strategic nuclear weapons. This is the threat that we cannot -- the world cannot go on living under that threat. And one day, if there's any common sense left in the world, one day there will be no nuclear weapons.

Our country presented that at a time when we were the only ones who had them -- 1946. And we suggested an international commission to be given total control over all nuclear material. And the Soviets refused. Now, we knew they were trying to have such a weapon, and eventually did, but at that time they -- all they had to do was give in, and there wouldn't be any.

Q. Mr. President, during his visit to Washington, President Duarte of Salvador declared that he would never ask American troops to fight in his country. And last week you have stated yourself that you had never had any thought of sending American soldiers to Central America. And what would be your reaction if next fall, for example, the Government of Salvador was seriously threatened? I mean, with collapse, by guerrilla offensive?

You know, a great many of the Central American countries, their militaries over the years have been kind of garrison troops -- more concerned with internal problems than in fighting a war. And so they have been most open in their request of training.

And before we got here -- the previous, under the previous administration -- some of their training consisted of bringing El Salvadoran troops up here and training them at our own bases with our own men. Well, then, as the war heated up, they couldn't afford to have the men gone for that long a time. So we have 55 trainers working with their entire army.

Cuba and the Soviet Union -- not only with weapons, but with replacements, with personnel. And now the guerrillas are resorting to kidnapping. They're rounding up -- going into villages and rounding up even just youngsters off the streets and simply taking them, forcing them to be guerrillas. And as would happen -- the law of averages -- every once in a while some of those youngsters escape and get away, and so we know that this is the practice and what they're doing.

But, no, if this fall offensive comes, I believe we have confidence in the El Salvadoran Army. We think that the guerrillas could make things very unpleasant, and we think that they are building up the possibility of such a thing.

But now the election has taken place, the election of the President, and Duarte is very definitely dedicated to continuing to move toward democracy in El Salvador; certainly has the support of the people. And I am optimistic that we're on the right path. And our Congress has voted now to give us the appropriation we asked for further aid to El Salvador.

Q. Mr. President, I want to ask a specifically Irish question, as you're going to be -- the first country you're going to touch down in. And I'm familiar with what you said about Irish unity and the question -- your not becoming involved, as between Ireland and England. But are there any circumstances which might change that? If, for instance, Ireland were to join NATO or such a question were muted, would that make it more attractive, for instance, for America to support the idea of Irish unity?

The President. I really believe that that is an internal problem to be worked out, first of all because there are two governments involved, and the other government is already a member of NATO. I have been impressed with the Forum and some of its recommendations, and the -- as Prime Minister, your Prime Minister said, the recent finding of the Forum of recommendations certainly provided an agenda for serious thinking. If there's any way in which, without being an interferer in things going on there, but in which the people of Ireland felt that we could in any way be helpful with anything that we might do, we'd be very pleased to do it.

Q. I believe I'm in order in asking a supplementary. On the question of these unprecedented protests, which are unheard of in terms of an American President visiting Ireland, one of the factors in this is that there is a certain alienation between the Irish at home and the Irish here, because the quota of immigration has cut down the numbers of Irish with a day-to-day knowledge of America. Do you think that there is any likelihood that the Irish immigration quota might be increased?

Q. Mr. President, you said the other day at your press conference you didn't expect any real progress to take place on nuclear arms talks this year. Do you think if you're reelected in November and the Soviet Union sees they're going to have to deal with you for another 4 years that we could expect a fairly early return to the negotiating table, either on INF, or START, or both?

The President. Well, I know many people who are students of Soviet history and Soviet methods feel that there's a better chance of them deciding to join us in negotiations and things after the election is over. But they're not going to do anything in the meantime to help me get reelected.

I hereby prohibit all imports into the United States of goods and services of Nicaraguan origin; all exports from the United States of goods to or destined for Nicaragua, except those destined for the organized democratic resistance, and transactions relating thereto.

Government's aggressive activities in Central America. Nicaragua's continuing efforts to subvert its neighbors, its rapid and destabilizing military buildup, its close military and security ties to Cuba and the Soviet Union and its imposition of Communist totalitarian internal rule have been described fully in the past several weeks. The current visit by Nicaraguan President Ortega to Moscow underscores this disturbing trend. The recent rejection by Nicaragua of my peace initiative, viewed in the light of the constantly rising pressure that Nicaragua's military buildup places on the democratic nations of the region, makes clear the urgent threat that Nicaragua's activities represent to the security of the region and, therefore, to the security and foreign policy of the United States. The activities of Nicaragua, supported by the Soviet Union and its allies, are incompatible with normal commercial relations.

Powers Act and other authorities. The sanctions include a total embargo on trade with Nicaragua, notification of U.S. intent to terminate its Treaty of Friendship, Commerce, and Navigation with Nicaragua, and the suspension of service to the United States by Nicaraguan airlines and Nicarguan flag vessels. A report on these actions is being sent today to the Congress.

These events and the recent Nicaraguan rejection of the President's peace initiative, viewed in the light of the constantly rising pressure that Nicaragua's military buildup places on the democratic nations of the region, makes clear the urgent threat that Nicaragua's activities represent to the security of the region and, therefore, to the security and foreign policy of the United States. The activities of Nicaragua, supported by the Soviet Union and its allies, are incompatible with normal commerical relations.

During the month-long debate on U.S. policy toward Nicaragua, many Members of Congress, both supporters and opponents of the administration's proposals, called for the early application of economic sanctions. It should be understood, however, that the President does not consider the imposition of these sanctions to be a substitute for U.S. assistance to the unified democratic opposition.

The administration has repeatedly urged the Government of Nicaragua to respect its 1979 commitments to the OAS and more recently to the 1983 Contadora document of objectives, whose terms closely parallel our own basic objectives. Heretofore the Sandinistas have ignored or rejected all such appeals.

President's strong endorsement for internal dialog and reiterated his firm intention to pursue U.S. interests and national objectives in Central America. In this regard, it should be noted that the measures being instituted by the President are easily rescinded if Nicaragua acts to relieve our concerns.

Nicaragua and the unified democratic opposition, as called for by the resistance on March 1 and in the President's April 4 peace proposal, could make a major contribution to resolution of conflict in the region. The President continues to believe that direct pressure presents the only effective means of moderating Nicaraguan behavior and is using the means available to him toward that end. He urges all Members of the Congress to support future requests for assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. He has also made it clear that the embargo does not apply to those goods destined for the organized democratic resistance nor will it apply to donations of articles such as food, clothing, and medicine intended to be used to relieve human suffering.

Nicaragua and by those who abet it as unmistakable evidence that we take seriously the obligation to protect our security interests and those of our friends. The President calls again on the Government of Nicaragua to address seriously the concerns of its neighbors and its own democratic opposition and to honor its solemn commitments to noninterference, nonalignment, respect for democracy, and peace. Failure to do so will only diminish the prospects for a peaceful settlement in Central America.

President of the Commission of the European Community, meeting together in Bonn on the eve of the fortieth anniversary of the end of the Second World War, remember in grief all those who lost their lives in that time, whether by acts of war or as victims of inhumanity, repression and tyranny. We acknowledge the duty we owe to their memories, and to all those who follow after them, to uphold peace, freedom and justice in our countries and in the world.

We have learned the lessons of history. The end of the war marked a new beginning. As the sounds of battle ceased, we tackled the tasks of moral and spiritual renewal and physical reconstruction. Transcending the hostilities which had once divided us we initiated on the basis of common values a process for reconciliation and cooperation amongst us. Today, linked in a peaceful, secure and lasting friendship, we share in all our countries a commitment to freedom, democratic principles and human rights. We are proud that the Governments of our countries owe their legitimacy to the will of our people, expressed in free elections. We are proud that our people are free to say and write what they will, to practise the religions they profess, and to travel where they will. We are committed to assuring the maintenance of societies in which individual initiative and enterprise may flourish and the ideals of social justice, obligations and rights may be pursued.

In Europe, the Community, the embodiment of reconciliation and common purpose, is growing in membership, strength and prosperity. The nations of the dynamic Pacific region are drawing ever closer together. The partnership of North America, Europe and Japan is a guarantee of peace and stability in the world.

Other nations that shared with ours in the agonies of the Second World War are divided from us by fundamental differences of political systems. We deplore the division of Europe. In our commitment to the ideals of peace, freedom and democracy we seek by peaceful means to lower the barriers that have arisen within Europe. We believe that the CSCE process with its promise of enhancing human rights provides an opportunity to increase confidence, cooperation and security in Europe. Considering the climate of peace and friendship we have reached amongst ourselves 40 years after the end of the war, we look forward to a state of peace in Europe in which the German people will regain its unity through free self-determination and in Asia we earnestly hope that a political environment will be created which permits the parties to overcome the division of the Korean peninsula in freedom.

As recognized in the Charter of the United Nations all countries have a joint responsibility to maintain international peace and security and to this end refrain from the threat and the use of force. We for our part share a determination to preserve the peace while protecting our democratic freedoms. To that end, each of us will work to maintain and strengthen a stable military balance at the lowest possible levels of forces, neither seeking superiority for ourselves nor neglecting our defenses. We are prepared to pursue a high-level dialogue to deal with the profound differences dividing East and West. We strongly support endeavours to strengthen the peace and enhance deterrence through the negotiation of meaningful reductions in existing levels of nuclear arms, limitations on conventional arms, the banning of chemical weapons and lessening the risks of conflict. We welcome the opening of negotiations in Geneva. We appreciate the positive proposals of the United States of America. We urge the Soviet Union to act positively and constructively in order to achieve significant agreements there.

We shall continue to seek to work with the developing countries, so as to help them to fight hunger and disease, to build free and prosperous societies, and to take their part in the community of nations committed to peace and freedom. We respect genuine nonalignment as an important contribution to international security and peace.

So, as we look back to the terrible suffering of the Second World War and the common experience of 40 years of peace and freedom, we dedicate ourselves and our countries anew to the creation of a world in which all peoples enjoy the blessings of peace, of justice, and of freedom from oppression, want and fear; a world in which individuals are able to fulfill their responsibilities for themselves, to their families and to their communities; a world in which all nations, large and small, combine to work together for a better future for all mankind.

By pursuing these policies we will not only address our domestic problems, but at the same time contribute to an enduring growth of the world economy and a more balanced expansion of international trade.

Ministerial Council that a new GATT round should begin as soon as possible. Most of us think that this should be in 1986. We agree that it would be useful that a preparatory meeting of senior officials should take place in the GATT before the end of the summer to reach a broad consensus on subject matter and modalities for such negotiations. We also agree that active participation of a significant number of developed and developing countries in such negotiations is essential. We are looking to a balanced package for negotiation.

Greetings from Europe. I'm speaking to you from Bonn, West Germany. It's 6 o'clock in the evening here, and we've just completed the 11th annual economic summit among the world's 7 major industrial democracies, together with the European Commission.

As is fitting, we celebrate the remarkable achievements of the world's family of free nations during these last four decades: peace has flourished; our economies have prospered, and technological advances have revolutionized our lives.

France, Britain, and Canada were pitted against countries which today are among freedom's staunchest supporters -- the Federal Republic of Germany, Japan, and Italy. We celebrate our shared success, and we take heart that former enemies have been reconciled and are now partners and friends.

All of us are looking to the future to what could and should be the next 40 years of growth -- growth of our economies and our freedom, growth of human progress in our own countries and around the world.

On the economic front, I reviewed the progress America has enjoyed from reducing tax rates and increasing personal incentives. We all looked ahead to new and more vigorous efforts to reduce the heavy drag of government on our economies. I spoke of our own plans for a radical overhaul of our tax system, making it more simple and fair and bringing personal tax rates further down to strengthen the promise of growth well into the 1990's.

One great challenge all our countries face is government overspending leading to dangerous deficits, which, if left unchecked, will mortgage our future and impoverish our children. Few people realize that America's deficit, as a percentage of our total economy, is about the same as or less than most other summit countries. All of us must work harder to cut wasteful, unnecessary government spending.

On the trade front, it was clear that almost all of my summit partners want a 1986 target date to begin a new round of trade negotiations. These negotiations would be aimed at freer trade, more open markets, and greater competition worldwide. I'm heartened by the progress on this issue since last year's summit. Everyone now recognizes new negotiations are needed soon. We're pleased that plans for these negotiations, so important to world prosperity, have gained momentum.

In the area of security, we reaffirmed our determination to remain vigilant while working for progress in the Geneva arms control talks with the Soviets. The Soviet Union continues to be the major source of aggression in the world, building up its military forces far beyond any defensive needs and, through those forces and those of its satellites, promoting violence and repression across the globe, from Afghanistan to Cambodia to Nicaragua. So, we the democratic nations must continue to maintain our strength and keep the peace to enhance deterrence while striving, through negotiations, to achieve equitable and verifiable reductions in nuclear arsenals. The West will receive no gifts from the Soviets. Allied unity and resolve is the only message we can expect them to respect and respond to in a constructive way.

We also discussed our research on a nonnuclear defense, a defense not to harm people, but to prevent nuclear missiles from reaching our soil. I explained that this research will not produce results overnight and is no substitute for allied strategic modernization, but that over time, if our research proves out, we could lessen the threat of nuclear attack and begin to get rid of these dangerous weapons. Our host, Chancellor Kohl, welcomes SDI research, and other summit leaders said they'll examine how they might participate in this immensely hopeful undertaking.

One unexpected but encouraging development in the meetings here in Bonn was the real interest expressed by all the leaders in cracking down on international drug trafficking. Recognizing the terrible scourge of drugs and the danger they pose to our youth, we all agreed to intensify our efforts to tackle this problem. As a matter of fact, Nancy has just returned from Rome, where she had a private audience to discuss this great social problem with His Holiness Pope John Paul II, who has also spoken out against this terrible evil.

The Bonn summit made clear that 40 years after defeating fascism, freedom continues to shower us with infinite blessings. But as long as another system drives relentlessly to expand and control, we must be freedom's protector. If we are, if we remain as strong and true as we must be, these next 40 years will truly be the golden age of democracy.

President and Mrs. von Weizsacker, Chancellor and Mrs. Kohl, honored guests, Nancy and I want to thank you for your warm and gracious hospitality. Our visit to the Federal Republic of Germany has been a wonderful and enriching experience. Today was especially moving. We cannot fully understand the long road we've all traveled since 1945 unless we remember the beginnings. By standing before mass graves at a spot such as Bergen-Belsen, we could begin -- but only begin -- to feel the suffering of so many innocent people and to sense the horror which confronted our leaders 40 years ago. And by joining Chancellor Kohl in Bitburg, we could better understand the price paid by the German people for the crimes of the Third Reich.

President, embody the values which we're working to protect today. Your distinguished career in business and politics, your engagement in church affairs, are exemplary. Over the years, Americans have been especially moved by our ability to articulate the soul of the German nation.

The camaraderie of this evening, the good will that we've enjoyed, reflect the deep and abiding friendship between our two peoples, an affection that overcame the bitterness of war. The passage penned by Schiller in ``Wilhelm Tell'' says, ``What's old collapses, times change and new life blossoms in the ruins.'' Forty years ago, our friendship blossomed in the ruins. Today the bond between us is a powerful force for good, improving the material well-being of our peoples, helping keep us at peace, and protecting our freedom. In this year, studded with anniversaries, let us remember to celebrate the beginning of friendship as well as the end of war.

You, Mr. President, and Chancellor Kohl have been among the most thoughtful spokesmen for the spirit of the Federal Republic. Through you we've experienced the warmth and depth of German-American solidarity. By working together as friends and allies we have accomplished more than any visionary could have predicted.

Europe has enjoyed 40 years of peace. This did not just happen by chance. Peace has been the outcome of decisions made by individuals with the wisdom to see what was needed and the courage to do it. Chancellor Kohl, I understand and appreciate how difficult it was for you to stand firm and refuse to back away from the decision to modernize NATO's nuclear deterrent. By moving forward we balanced off the threat created by the massive Soviet buildup of the last decade and gave substance to our arms reduction talks in Geneva.

What we seek in Geneva is an agreement which will permit us to reduce significantly the size of nuclear arsenals. For too long we have lived in the shadow of nuclear destruction. The United States is now moving forward with a research program which could offer a way to diminish the threat of nuclear annihilation. I hope that the Federal Republic will join us in this effort to find ways to enhance deterrence based on protection instead of retaliation, on systems capable of destroying attacking missiles but incapable of threatening people.

It's especially fitting that on this the anniversary of the end of a worldwide conflagration that the leaders of the seven great industrial democracies met here in the Federal Republic to exchange ideas on economic issues and matters of state. As individuals elected by the people to represent their values as well as their interests, our good will and cooperation reflect the highest aspirations of the free people of this planet. The freedom our peoples have enjoyed in these last four decades has opened the door to a future in which our potential will be limited only by our imagination. The free people of the world, especially here in the Federal Republic and in the United States, stand together on the edge of this new era, a time of space stations, conquering diseases, and great leaps in the standard of living for all mankind.

Our 40 years of friendship are reason enough to rejoice, but let us look to the next 40 years, to the freedom and peace our children and their children will enjoy, to the boundless progress they will make, and to the friendship between Germany and the United States, which will serve them well just as it has served us.

Already, you have given us a gift of hope and beauty from the site of this sturdy old castle in the spirit of your youth and the spirit of Germany's future and, yes, from the warmth that we feel in German hearts. I may not say it well, but I can truly say, wir fuellen ganz hier zu hause [we feel completely at home here].

In welcoming us, you honor the 237 million Americans that I'm privileged to represent. I might add that, as you've been told, more Americans trace their roots to this land, these towns, and your families than to almost any other place or people in the world.

It's fitting that we meet where so much that is good and worthy of our two nations began. From here in the Rhineland-Palatinate, thousands left to cross a mighty ocean, to push back America's frontiers and to help us win a great struggle for independence. You have been told that, yes, one regiment came from Zweibrucken, led by Count Christian and Viscount Wilhelm von Frobach.

Schloss Hambach. They are walls of time that cradle the glorious past and that reach toward the promise of a future written for eternity across this wide open sky. Think back to that first Festival of Freedom that was held here in 1832. What noble vision it was that inspired and emboldened your first patriots -- not violence, not destruction of society, and not some far-flung utopian scheme. No, their vision and cry were revolutionary in the truest sense of that word. Those first patriots cried out for a free, democratic, and united Germany, and we do so again today. They cried out for solidarity with freedom fighters in Poland, and we do so again today. And they waved the colors of black, red, and gold to announce rebirth of human spirit and dignity, and those colors wave proudly here today.

The new Europe. One hundred fifty-three years have come and gone, bringing great change and progress. But the new Europe is yet to be complete. Why is this so? We know the answer. It is not that freedom has not worked for the European people, but that too many Europeans have been forbidden to work for freedom. It's not that democracy was tried and found wanting, but that some forbid democracy to be tried because they knew it would succeed.

You are living in the springtime of your lives. The world needs your idealism, your courage, and your good works. From one whose own life spans many years -- my critics in America would tell you too many years -- [laughter] -- permit me to offer you some observations about the future, about the creative future that can be ours if only we apply our wisdom and will to heed the lessons of history. Let me speak to you for a moment about your responsibilities and your opportunities.

In many ways, the challenges of 1832, when thousands of young Germans came here to protest repression, were similar to those you face today. By that year of 1832, Germany was changing rapidly. The Industrial Revolution was sweeping across Europe. But in dealing with these new problems, strong forces inside and outside Germany resisted democracy and national unity.

The great hopes that arose in 1832 and again in 1848 were set back. But despite the difficulties of democratic movements, we know for sure that totalitarianism, by whatever name, will never fulfill German aspirations within a united Europe.

The cause of German unity is bound up with the cause of democracy. As Chancellor Kohl said in his state of the nation address last February, ``Europe is divided because part of Europe is not free; Germany is divided because part of Germany is not free.'' And democracy will only be complete, Europe will only be united, when all Germans and all Europeans are finally free.

But even if national unity cannot be achieved immediately, you, the youth of Germany, you who are Germany's future, can show the power of democratic ideals by committing yourselves to the cause of freedom here in Europe and everywhere.

You know some may not like to hear it, but history is not on the side of those who manipulate the meaning of words like revolution, freedom, and peace. History is on the side of those struggling for a true revolution of peace with freedom all across the world.

Nothing could make our hearts more glad than to see the day when there will be no more walls, no more guns to keep loved ones apart. Nothing could bring greater happiness than to reach an agreement that will rid the Earth of nuclear weapons forever, and we will never stop praying, never stop working, never stop striving one moment to bring that day closer.

But my young friends, I must also plead for realism, for unless and until there's a changing by the other side, the United States must fulfill a commitment of its own -- to the survival of liberty. The first frontier of European liberty begins in Berlin, and I assure you that America will stand by you in Europe, and America will stand by you in Berlin.

Understanding the true nature of totalitarianism will be worth as much to us as any weapons system in preserving peace. Realism is the beginning of wisdom, and where there's wisdom and courage, there will be safety and security, and they will be yours.

Your future awaits you, so take up your responsibilities and embrace your opportunities with enthusiasm and pride in Germany's strength. Understand that there are no limits to how high each of you can climb. Unlike your cousins on the other side of the wall, your future is in your hands -- you're free to follow your dreams to the stars. And, you know, we have something so precious if we'll just remember: The eternal youngness of freedom makes it irresistible to people everywhere.

And we who live in this great cathedral of freedom need to remind ourselves that we can see our future shining, we can see new freedom spires rising, and yes, we can see the times of tyranny passing if we will just believe in our own greatest strengths -- our courage, our worthiness, our unlimited capacity for love.

Let us ask ourselves: What is at the heart of freedom? In the answer lies the deepest hope for the future of mankind and the reason there can be no walls around those who are determined to be free. Each of us, each of you, is made in the most enduring, powerful image of Western civilization. We're made in the image of God, the image of God, the Creator.

This is our power, and this our freedom. This is our future. And through this power -- not drugs, not materialism nor any other ``ism'' -- can we find brotherhood. And you can create the new Europe -- a Europe democratic, a Europe united east and west, a Europe at long last completely free.

Now, we hear it said by some that Europe may be glum about her future, that Europe dares no more. Well, forgive me, but I think this kind of talk is nonsense. And I hope you think it's nonsense, too. It is you, Germany, and you, Europe, that gave the values and vitality of Judeo-Christian civilization to America and to the world. It is Europe that has known more tragedy and triumph than any place in history. Each time you suffered, you sprang back like giants -- the giants, Adenauer and Schuman, Churchill and Monnet.

Today, only 40 years after the most devastating war known to man, Western Europe has risen in glory from its ruins. Today Europe stands like Schloss Hambach, a magnificent monument to the indomitable spirit of free people.

No country in the world has been more creative than Germany, and no other can better help create our future. We have already seen one miracle, your Wirtschaftswunder. The experts expected it would be decades before Germany's economy regained its prewar level. You did it in less than one. The experts said the Federal Republic could not absorb millions of refugees, establish a democracy on the ashes of nazism, and be reconciled with your neighbors. You did all three.

Germany's success showed that our future must not depend on experts or on government plans, but on the treasures of the human mind and spirit -- imagination, intellect, courage, and faith. We remembered Ludwig Erhard's secret, how he blazed Germany's path with freedom by creating opportunity and lowering tax rates, to reward every man and woman who dared to dream and to create the future -- your farmers, labor leaders, carpenters, and engineers -- every German hero who helped to put the pieces of a broken society back together.

I want to encourage you today to consider joining with your friends now or in the future to start up your own business, become part of a great new movement for progress -- the age of the entrepreneur. Small businesses will be the biggest job creators for the future.

Human faith and skill discovered oil where once there was only sand. Today we're discovering a new world of computers, microchips, and biotechnology. The new technologies can bring opportunities, create more jobs, produce medical breakthroughs, make our world cleaner and more humane, and provide better means of communication to bring the people of the world closer together. One top American computer firm was actually started by two college students in a garage behind their house.

Technology developed in the Federal Republic can make your air and water more pure, preserve the environment for your children. And because you're free, because you live in a democracy, you can help make all these things happen. You can make your voices heard so that technology works for us, not against us. My young friends, you can not only control your lives, you can help invent the future.

New technologies may someday enable us to develop far safer defenses -- a nonnuclear defense not to harm people, but to prevent missiles from reaching our soil; a nonnuclear defense not to militarize space, but to demilitarize the arsenals of Earth. For now we must rely on a system based on the threat of nuclear retaliation called mutual assured destruction. But someday, your children may be protected and war could be avoided by a system we would call mutual assured survival.

Working together in space -- as we've done with your fine astronaut, Ulf Merbold -- we can create the future together. We've learned enough from our shuttle flights to believe that we'll be able to manufacture in space rare crystals and medicines in far greater quantities, medicines to treat diseases that afflict millions of us. In the zerogravity of space, we could make medicines to treat victims of heart attack and manufacture factor 8, a rare and expensive medicine used to treat hemophiliacs. We could study the beta cell, which produces insulin and which could give us mankind's first permanent cure for diabetes. We know from one of our flights this is possible in space. In your lifetime, men and women will be living and working in space.

We're going to make the extraordinary commonplace -- this is freedom's way. And those secrets for our future belong not just to us in Europe and America, but to all people, in all places, in all time. Look at Singapore, Hong Kong, Taiwan -- tiny specks on the globe, densely populated, and with few natural resources. But today they are stunning success stories -- mighty little engines of growth and progress, pulling the world forward, thanks to their dynamic policies of incentives that reward innovation, risk-taking, and hard work.

Otto Hahn for Germany's future. Your future will be a way station further along that same journey in time begun by the great patriots at Hambach 153 years ago -- a journey that began in a dream of the human heart; a journey that will not be complete until the dream is real, until the times of tyranny have passed, until the fear of political torture is no more, until the pain of poverty has been lifted from every person in the world forever. This is freedom's vision, and it's good. And you must go out from here and help make it come true.

One of the greatest challenges to mankind always has been eradicating the presence of debilitating disease. Until just thirty years ago poliomyelitis occurred in the United States and throughout the world in epidemic proportions, striking tens of thousands and killing thousands in our own country each year.

Dr. Jonas E. Salk changed all that. This year we observe the 30th anniversary of the licensing and manufacturing of the vaccine discovered by this great American. Even before another successful vaccine was discovered, Dr. Salk's discovery had reduced polio and its effects by 97 percent.

Jonas E. Salk always had a passion for science. It was because of this that he finally chose medicine over law as his career goal. Even after his great discovery, he continued to undertake vital studies and medical research to benefit his fellowman. Under his vision and leadership, the Salk Institute for Biological Studies has been in the forefront of basic biological research, reaping further benefits for mankind and medical science.

In recognition of his tremendous contributions to society, particularly for his role in the epochal discovery of the first licensed vaccine for poliomyelitis, and in celebration of the thirtieth anniversary of its mass distribution, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 258, has designated May 6, 1985, as ``Dr. Jonas E. Salk Day'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

As President and Commander in Chief, I have been pleased to witness a new and abiding recognition of those brave Americans who answered their country's call and served in the defense of freedom in the Republic of South Vietnam. That recognition, figured in the Memorial the Federal government accepted last November as a permanent sign of our determination to keep faith with those who served in that conflict, is both the result and the cause of a new unity among our people. Ten years after American personnel left Vietnam, we honor and remember the deeds of a group of veterans who served as selflessly and fought as courageously as any in our history.

Together we have come through a decade of disillusionment and doubt and reached a new consensus born of conviction -- that, however long the wisdom and merits of U.S. policy in the Vietnam era may be debated, no one can withhold from those who wore our country's uniform in Southeast Asia the homage that is their due. Their cause was our cause, and it is the cause that animates all of our experience as a Nation. Americans have never believed that freedom was the sole prerogative of a few, a grant of governmental power, or a title of wealth or nobility. We have always believed that freedom was the birthright of all peoples, and our Vietnam-era veterans pledged their lives -- and almost 60,000 lost them -- in pursuit of that ideal, not for themselves, but for a suffering people half a world away.

On this day, we recall these sacrifices and say again to our Vietnam veterans: Your cause is our cause. We have not forgotten you. We will not forget you. To those who were killed in Vietnam we say: Your names are inscribed not only on the walls of black granite on the Mall in our Nation's Capital, but in the hearts of your fellow Americans. To those still listed as missing in action in Southeast Asia: We have raised the fullest possible accounting of your fate to one of highest national priority. To those who returned and resumed their daily lives in our Nation's cities, towns, and farms: We will continue to meet our commitment to compensation and health care programs for the more than 300,000 service-disabled Vietnam veterans and to programs to aid in Vietnam veterans' readjustment.

To all of our Vietnam-era veterans, we rededicate ourselves on this day to offer our continuing praise and thanks for your courage and patriotism. We pledge that our Nation will never forget the men and women who gave so much of themselves on behalf of the highest of human ideals.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventh day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Thank you, Mr. Boada, and thank you all. Your Majesty, ladies and gentlemen, it's a great honor to be with you today. I've been wanting to revisit Spain since I first became President, and I'm delighted that we were finally able to make it here this year. After all, it's already been almost five centuries since your first delegation visited our country.

Columbus. And it's no exaggeration to say that we stand at the outset of a new golden age -- a golden age of freedom that is sweeping across both the old world and the new. I'm convinced that historians will look back on Iberia's peaceful and joyful embrace of democracy as a decisive turning point. They will see it as the moment when freedom ended a long retreat and began a broad, new advance that has spread from Spain and Portugal to the Americas and has, in one short decade, brought over 225 million people into the family of free nations.

Freedom, we see, is contagious, and the force of your example has inspired a continent. When I first became President a little over 4 years ago, the map of our hemisphere was shadowed by dictatorships. But in country after country, the dictators have given way to the democratic aspirations of their people. Today, for the first time ever, the exceptions to the democratic tide in Spanish-speaking America can be counted on the fingers of one hand. They number four. Two, Paraguay and Chile, have entrenched military rule; the two others, Cuba and Nicaragua, are Communist tyrannies.

Sometimes the courage and character of one man can shape the course of history. Throughout the last decade, King Juan Carlos has set a moral example to this country and to the world, and in the storm of events, he has been like an anchor holding fast to the principles of democracy and freedom. Your Majesty, you are a true representative of the democratic aspirations of the Spanish people. All true democrats, all freedom-loving people everywhere salute you.

We salute, too, the remarkable achievement of the people of this land. Any visitor here can see that freedom is flourishing. For democracy to succeed, its roots must grow deep and wide. This means social cooperation, national unity, and a willingness to share power -- in short convivencia, a wonderful word to describe the culture of democracy.

Spain's proud achievements rank among the foremost contributions to Western civilization. But for too long this great nation was excluded from the community of Western democracies, and we were all diminished by your absence. Now Spain is an important partner in the free alliance of European democracies, the North Atlantic Treaty Organization that has protected our liberties and kept the peace for almost 40 years -- the longest period of peace Europe has known since the Roman Empire. And we need Spain.

Soon Spain will take its rightful place as a full member in the European Community, the largest free economic union in the world, larger even than that other economic union and free trade zone, the United States. Your accession into the European Economic Community will create opportunities for both our countries, and we have consistently backed and applaud Spanish and Portuguese membership in the EC.

Today we've come to understand that all the nations of the Earth are part of one global economy, our economic fates interwoven in a tapestry of a million connecting threads. We understand that we break those ties only at our peril, for if too many of them are severed, our prosperity will begin to unravel.

I am old enough to remember the dark days of the Great Depression when shortsighted national interest and beggar-thy-neighbor economic policies ended up turning us all into beggars and plunged the world into a totalitarian nightmare from which we did not escape until the end of a long and bloody World War.

With that lesson fresh in their minds, the leaders of democratic Europe, the United States, and other free nations met after World War II and agreed to demolish the trade barriers that had done so much evil. Their agreement, called the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, knocked tariff barriers down to their lowest level in modern history and contributed to an unrivaled period of world economic expansion that helped to rebuild the war-ravaged European Continent and gave the free nations a standard of living that would once have been thought unattainable.

Trade continues to fuel the global economy today. Over one-quarter of the world's output is traded internationally -- more than twice as much as in 1970. But these gains are increasingly threatened by demands for protectionism. Protectionism is the wrong word; we should call it by its real name -- destructionism. We will continue to resist these destructive pressures, but to succeed, all our governments must cooperate. The nations at the Bonn Economic Summit took an important step forward in calling for another round of trade negotiations. Soon we will realize that in a global economy all markets are common markets and that we will advance most quickly down the road of progress when we walk together.

Let's also keep in mind the enormous contribution made by the free movement of capital and respect for property rights. Spain has been attracting an increasing amount of foreign investment, reflecting a growing confidence in Spain's economic future and the stability of her institutions -- a confidence I fully share.

The fifties and sixties were boom years for the West, and Europe achieved an unprecedented level of prosperity. But come the seventies, the secret seemed to have been lost throughout the Western industrialized nations. Growth sputtered and almost died out. Inflation raged out of control. More and more people lost their jobs. Innovation and productivity lagged. Instead of building the future, we seemed to be slipping remorselessly back into the past.

As pessimism replaced progress, voices were raised saying that our decline was inevitable. Our world, they said, was rapidly running out of resources, and we must rely on government to distribute fairly our dwindling economic wealth. People began to lose faith in freedom, and it became fashionable to talk of a convergence between the free, democratic countries and the totalitarian dictatorships.

I know that Spain had its own share of these problems; moreover, you had to face them while confronting the demands of your historic transition to democracy. You have a starkly descriptive word for the human costs of economic malaise -- paro.

Every nation is different, and solutions must take those differences into account. But I believe strongly that there are certain basic principles which, applied wisely, can benefit all. From your introduction, Mr. Boada, I would guess that these principles enjoy widespread support among members of the APD. That is one of the reasons that I am particularly pleased to hear.

In the United States we rejected pessimism. We came to believe that government was more the problem than the solution, that the massive growth of government spending was weighing down the private sector, and that huge increases in taxes and regulations were stifling individual initiative and destroying opportunity for our people. In our country we've always held it as an article of faith that freedom works, and I came into office determined to give freedom a chance.

So, in the United States we began by cutting taxes, bringing the top rate down dramatically and lowering tax rates across the board by about nearly one quarter. By reducing unnecessary regulations, we limited the role of government and set enterprise free without endangering the essential protections that a compassionate society must provide.

Many economists schooled in the old policies of government control predicted disaster. Instead, as the recovery took hold, inflation and interest rates dropped, new businesses began incorporating at the astounding rate of over 600,000 a year, and employment took off -- up about 8 million new jobs. And in 1984 we enjoyed the strongest economic growth in three decades.

We've decided that freedom works so well in creating jobs and opportunity for the American people, that we want even more of it. When I return to the United States, I will be presenting an historic tax reform proposal to our legislature that will not only cut tax rates even further but make them less progressive. We believe that there's nothing progressive about tax rates that discourage people from climbing up the ladder of success.

Some point to our budget deficits as the source of our economic expansion. But if that were true, why did a decade of deficit spending in the seventies fail to revitalize our lagging economy? The fact is that many of the Western industrialized nations have larger deficits, as a percentage of their gross national product, than the United States, and yet their recoveries have been sluggish.

Deficits slow growth; they don't create it. And we're committed to a program that will cut government overspending and bring our budget into balance by the end of the decade. But at the same time, we found that the greatest barriers to risk-taking, investment, and a strong, growing economy are steep, progressive tax rates.

Our experience has shown us that government alone cannot stimulate economic progress, but it can set it free. The Western developed nations have led the world in creating a higher standard of living for their citizens through the growth of personal freedom, the same freedom that is the soul of human happiness and spiritual fulfillment.

Nevertheless, some governments try to control their economies. They've taken over many industries and subsidized others; they've subsidized exports and protected themselves against imports; they've sent their immigrants home in order to relieve unemployment, and they've passed strict job laws that restrict the movement of labor. But as controls multiplied, investment lagged, growth slowed, and employment declined.

In my own country we have had three major rounds of tax cuts -- in the twenties, the sixties, and the eighties -- setting off three of the most prosperous periods in our history. Each time critics said we were giving huge breaks to the wealthy at the expense of the poor; but each time after taxes were cut the wealthy ended up paying a larger share of total tax burden, as lower rates attracted more money into productive investment instead of into sterile areas of tax avoidance.

Tax cuts, a boon to the industrialized countries, are a necessity to the nations of the Third World, where tax rates often rise faster, higher, and steeper, blocking economic growth and locking them into underdevelopment. Throughout Africa and Latin America, we see that, where markets are relatively free and tax rates are lower, there is a faster rise in the people's standard of living. And in Asia economic freedom has really taken hold, fueling the meteoric rise of the Pacific Basin nations, boosting the ASEAN countries, and even giving Communist China a helpful push toward prosperity. Soon we may see an economic revolution in India, where Rajiv Gandhi is reducing regulations, lowering tariffs, and slashing taxes.

In our country a whole new generation of entrepreneurs has emerged. Men and women with new ideas and the tenacity to make them happen have sparked a renaissance of innovation, making new breakthroughs every day in such 21st century technologies as bioengineering, microchips, and fiber optics.

It's been individuals -- small businessmen and entrepreneurs -- who have fueled America's economic boom. It is estimated that 7 out of 10 of all of our new jobs have come from small, new, and growing firms. One of the largest, most successful personal computer firms in America was started by two college students in the garage behind their house.

That's one reason why we believe special tax breaks and subsidies for existing big businesses won't do the trick. Many nations have lower corporate taxes and much more generous investment credits and tax write-offs for business than we do in America. But the most fertile and rapidly growing sector of any economy is that part that exists right now only as a dream in someone's head or an inspiration in his or her heart. No one can ever predict where change will come from or foresee the industries of the future; no government would ever target those two young men working through the night, making dreams come true in their garage.

Christopher Columbus was one of the original entrepreneurs. Like many who would come after him, he didn't discover what he had set out to find, but his discovery quite literally changed the shape of the known world, turned it upside down, and began a whole new chapter in the history of man.

In the seventies some said we had reached, quote: ``the limits to growth.'' But we decided they were telling us the Earth was flat when it really is round. We decided to discover a new world not subject to such pessimistic constraints, a new world of hope and opportunity where our tomorrows are as limitless as the horizon.

A half-millennium after Columbus, wouldn't this be the best way to celebrate: for the people of the new and the old worlds to join with each other on a new voyage of exploration and discovery, and together stake our claim on the future.

The United States and Spain have long been friends and close allies. Our discussions today demonstrated a broad degree of agreement on the kind of world that our two democracies want to help bring about. Where there were differences, I think we both profited from the particular perspectives that we bring to the challenges we face.

Spain is making an important contribution to Western security through NATO and our bilateral agreement. We appreciate Spain's support for our efforts to negotiate deep reductions in offensive nuclear arsenals. And we agree on the pressing need to strengthen peace and security in Europe and throughout the world.

I expressed my congratulations to President Gonzalez for the successful conclusion of the negotiations on Spain's entry into the European Community. I know that Spain was worked hard for years to achieve this goal, and we have supported you throughout.

We noted that further efforts are needed to strengthen peace, democracy, and economic progress in Central and South America. And I know this is a region of special interest to Spain as it is to the United States.

Your Majesties, 1985 is a year laden with anniversaries of great historical significance. It was 500 years ago that Christopher Columbus and his son Diego came to Spain seeking support for a voyage of exploration. Much will be said about this as we prepare to celebrate 7 years from now, the quincentennial discovery of the Americas. Yet it's not so much the voyage but rather the decision to make the voyage that we should commemorate.

The skills of the captains and sailors, although vital to success, were less significant than the genius of Columbus and the vision of Queen Isabella. Though beseiged with serious challenges, the Spanish throne overcame the doubters and cynics and thus opened a golden age for Spain and a new chapter in human history.

It gives me great pleasure to be with you this evening to applaud another decision of courage and vision, the decision to chart for Spain a course to democracy. The Spanish Crown played a significant role in this historic turning point as well. Your dedication and ideals, Your Majesties, have earned the respect and gratitude of freedom-loving peoples everywhere.

Spanish people have nobly risen to this occasion. Your Majesty, we know that the President and the other leaders of Spain in and out of government have brought Spain peacefully and, yes, gracefully into the family of democratic nations. The American people admire you, and they admire your great achievements. Having been a republic for 200 years we Americans know full well that the road of freedom is not always easy, yet there is every reason to be optimistic. As Sancho proclaimed in Cervantes' ``Don Quixote,'' ``A stout heart breaks bad luck.'' After seeing your nation make dramatic and fundamental change, remaining ever true to the humane values at the core of representative government, no one can doubt that Spain indeed has a stout heart and that because of it your luck will be good.

Because of the efforts of your generation, Spain is no longer isolated on the Iberia Peninsula but is now a vital and growing influence among the free nations of the world. New doors of opportunity are opening, especially in the area of trade and international investment. During these last 40 years, the Western nations have enjoyed tremendous benefit from a relatively free and open trading system. That's why I'm pleased to see Spain becoming a full partner in the European Community, moving to further open the door of economic cooperation with other free countries.

America believes in free people, free markets, and free trade. Increasing the level of exchange between countries serves the interest of all. Trade and investment create a healthy interdependence between free peoples and expand opportunity and unleash new potential. The benefits of trade have been particularly clear as we've seen a vigorous American economy help serve as an engine for progress, pulling the economies of Europe into better times.

Of course, ultimately, whether a country prospers will depend on its domestic policies. Each nation must follow its own path, but I hope the progress that we've made in the United States might encourage others. Instead of trying to redistribute existing wealth, we've tried to produce more. Instead of imposing more controls and regulations, we've sought to free our peoples entrepreneurial spirit. Instead of channeling more of our resources into bureaucracy, we've sought to expand private investment.

Your Majesties, the United States has much for which to be grateful to Spain. Our Southwest was settled by pioneers from your country, and a rich Hispanic heritage is still part of our way of life in my adopted home State of California. Today, as Spain takes its place with the democratic nations, I predict the relationship between our peoples will grow and bear fruit as never before.

Your decision will be respected. I would say only that the people of the United States would be proud to have the people of Spain continue to stand beside us and the other members of the alliance in our collective, noble effort to preserve the peace and protect human liberty. We believe the peace can and will be preserved by the collective strength of the Western democracies. And if we're strong, we need not be afraid to negotiate with any potential adversary.

The United States is now engaged in arms talks in Geneva. We're seeking not just arms control but an actual reduction in the level of nuclear arsenals. I'm pleased to note that Spain is part of the Western efforts in Stockholm to negotiate a lessening of the tensions between East and West.

The United States is also moving forward on a research project that could use new technologies to diminish the threat of nuclear missiles and lead mankind into a happier and safer time. Our Strategic Defense Initiative is aimed at finding new means for deterring war. It's not based on the threat of nuclear retaliation, but on the contribution of a nonnuclear defense system that would be capable of destroying missiles and incapable of threatening people. By making missiles less of a threat, we hope to make them easier to give up and thus make arms reduction agreements more likely.

Ortega y Gasset once wrote, ``Nations are formed and are kept alive by the fact that they have a program for tomorrow.'' Well, the program for the future of the Western democracies is peace, progress, and freedom.

Today Spain is moving forward in a voyage of freedom and democracy, every bit as courageous as that of Columbus. Spain can be confident of the outcome because the future is on the side of the free. Things that are today beyond the imagination of dictators and tyrants will be conceived of and made reality by free men and women. This we can count on. It is when people can speak and pray, work for themselves, live without fear of repression that the most potent force on this planet is energized -- the genius and power of free people under God.

Your Majesties, today let us be grateful for that love of liberty deeply rooted in the soul of our people. Yes, its fire will light the way to a future more glorious than the golden age of yesteryear.

The 40th anniversary of the victory in Europe is an occasion for both our countries to remember the sacrifice of those men and women everywhere who gave the last full measure of devotion to the cause of fighting tyranny. Together with our other allies, our two countries played a full part in that long struggle. We demonstrated that despite our differences we can join together in successful common efforts.

I believe we should also see this solemn occasion as an opportunity to look forward to the future with vision and hope. I would like our countries to join in rededication to the task of overcoming the differences and resolving the problems between us, and in renewed progress toward the goals of making peace more stable and eliminating nuclear weapons from the face of the earth. By pursuing those goals, we will truly honor those whose memory we commemorate today.

It's a special pleasure to visit this green and beautiful country, and I am particularly delighted to have had an opportunity to review important international questions with my good friend, Mario Soares.

Prime Minister Machete, and other members of the Portuguese Government. There was a feeling of sadness as well as we reflected on the sudden death of former Vice Prime Minister Professor Mota Pinto. He was a man dedicated to the ideals of individual freedom and political democracy, and he was a champion of the Atlantic alliance.

I agree with the Prime Minister that the state of Portuguese-American relations is excellent. I am pleased by the degree of mutual respect and the spirit of cooperation which exists between our two nations and which characterized our talks today.

Portugal is a steadfast and valued ally, and I came to Lisbon knowing that I would consult not only with partners but with friends. Our meetings gave us a valuable opportunity to review our bilateral relations, both in the security field and in the economic area. We reviewed the significant steps recently taken toward expanding our economic cooperation and strengthening the ties between our economies. And as the Prime Minister noted, we addressed a number of international issues of mutual concern.

Our discussions were characterized by a close similarity of viewpoints. I profited greatly from hearing the views and insights of the Portuguese Government. Our talks ranged broadly both over East-West matters and Third World questions. I would note in particular the attention given to southern Africa, which reflects Portugal's special knowledge and expertise in this region, and our ongoing close consultations on the problems of the area.

For us, a long journey is ending now, but one fruitful in results and rich in memory. World leaders in summit conference, the youth of modern Germany, warm welcomes at the European Parliament and in Spain -- all these things we have seen and been grateful for. We have seen, too, memorials to the devastation of the past, to the memory of war, and to the cruelty of totalitarian rule. Yet we have also seen the prospering cities and nations of the modern Europe and experienced the warmth of her free people. Let there be no doubt that these things too are monuments, monuments to the future and to the human spirit -- its capacity for hope and change, its passion for peace and freedom.

American to make farewells as well as bring greetings. For as the history books of America's schoolchildren teach them, it was from these shores that the first maritime explorers departed, the scientists and adventurers whose skill and courage would lead someday to the discovery of a new world and a new nation.

And I hope, by the way, that you'll not think it impertinent of me to mention that anyone who's had the two careers I've had -- in Hollywood and in Sacramento, the capital of California -- owes the Portuguese people a special debt. It was, after all, your countryman of five centuries ago, Joao Rodrigues Cabrilho, who discovered a very long stretch along the North American coastline that came to be known as California. In fact, some in my country claim I've been around so long that my ranch in the Santa Ynez Mountains was originally sold to me by Cabrilho himself.

But I know it's customary for Presidents and statesmen to talk of your nation's great maritime discoveries, to speak of your past. And it's certainly no surprise that, gazing back across time, many look with wonder at a small nation in the 15th century that refused to go the way of other war-ravaged European nations -- that spurned conflict and turned its talents instead to exploration, to adventuring into new realms, to daring to dream, to believe in themselves and in the future. And this vision eventually doubled the size of the known world and is rightly thought of as a signal event in human history.

But we must do more than today celebrate the daring and renown of the Portuguese past. For the events of the last decade suggest that you're once again embarked on an adventure, a great adventure that all the world is watching closely. Once again you're charting a new course, not just for Portugal but for all others, especially those peoples of the Third World with whom your long-established ties permit you to speak with a special trust, wisdom, and candor.

In little more than a decade, your nation has moved rapidly through stages of development that illustrate the history of this century -- from far-flung empire and dictatorship to a confrontation with totalitarian ideology to a decisive turn to democratic self-rule. While it's always hard to distinguish between the ripples of daily events and the great tides of history, I will still venture a prediction.

Your adventure is important to our century, a century of so much promise and so much tragedy. I must state it that starkly. I have come from seeing places that remind us of the havoc and wrong that human hatred can cause. But here in the new Portugal and throughout Europe, we see our century's promise, a promise not just of material progress -- a time when mankind's age-old enemies of hunger and disease and poverty are things of the past -- but also the promise of progress in the human spirit as well. A progress toward the day when each man, woman, and child on Earth will live in freedom and have a right to a voice in their own destiny.

So, in these final miles of our journey across Europe, a journey into the future as well as well as the past, let me tell you what I think we've discovered. Whether one regards it as revealed truth or only as a great story, we learn in Genesis of a moment when humankind lived in harmony with itself and with God. Some have said the meaning of history is found in the unfolding story of our return to such a time, a journey painfully and frequently broken by heartbreak and suffering. Well, for now, I will leave such thoughts to the theologians and the historians. But this much I do know -- I've seen in these past days reminders of the tragedy and the grandeur of our time. I've heard the voice of the 20th century; it is humanity's voice, heard in every century, every time. And the words are unmistakable. They call out to us in anguish, but also in hope: Let the nations live in peace among themselves. Let all peoples abide in the fellowship that God intends.

But tragically, this great longing felt by every people in every time has not always been shared by their governments, especially those modern governments whose leaders and ideologies glorify the state and make a cult of personal power. At the end of the last World War, Europe and all the world hoped that we'd at last seen an end to conflict and armaments. It wasn't to be so. But at least we didn't repeat the mistake of an earlier time, the mistake that eventually led to world war, the mistake of believing it is enough only to wish for peace. Instead we accepted reality. We took seriously those who threatened to end the independence of our nations and our peoples, and we did what peoples who value their freedom must do -- we joined together in a great alliance. And we rearmed, but we did so only so that never again would we be forced under the weight of our betrayed illusions to resort to violence.

No one knows better than the people of Portugal, who have with Great Britain the oldest mutual defense treaty in European history, the value of such alliances and such readiness in preventing aggression and war. And so, we've labored together -- Old World and New World, Europe and America, Portuguese and American. And NATO has worked; we have kept the peace for 40 years. Let us keep the peace another 40 years and another after that.

Today Portugal's contribution to the Western alliance remains of critical importance. Your geographic location is strategically vital, your armed forces are modernizing to expand their role in NATO -- all of this further testimony that martial skill and a love of national independence are more than just parts of the Portuguese past.

Yet even your contributions to the alliance are superseded by the example of what you're doing now. Yes, democratic Portugal has faced political problems and social problems and economic problems, and, no, democracy, particularly in its earlier years, does not always go smoothly.

But this is true of any nation and especially any democracy. In my country, we've learned over and over again that democracy can only work when it is judged not in the short run but over the long term, when we keep in mind the principles upon which it is based and remember how right Winston Churchill was to remind us that democracy truly is the worst form of government, except for all the others.

The essential truth at the heart of Portuguese and American democracy is our belief that governments exist for the sake of the people and not the other way around. And this belief is based on an essential insight of our civilization -- the dignity of man, the value of the individual.

Well, it is this trust in the individual -- the right to speak, to assemble, to publish, and to vote, even to walk out -- that is the meaning of democracy. Our democratic governments are not built on the proposition that the people are always right; indeed, within the structure of our governments there are safeguards against the whims or passions of the majority. But democratic government is built on the proposition that there resides in the common people an uncommon wisdom, that over the long run the people and their right to political self-expression are the best protection against freedom's oldest and most powerful enemy -- the unchecked growth and abuse of the power of the state.

Now, this belief is not always easy to preserve, especially when the ship of state is buffeted by storms. There will always be those who lose faith and preach panic; you've sometimes heard their voices. But I believe that here in the nation of navigators there is a respect for the wisdom of holding fast to the course that has been charted. We know there will always be answers if we trust in the people, if we go to them, give them the facts, and rely on them to make the right decisions.

Portugal and her people are moving forward. You have handled during the past few years enormous problems, yet your democracy is strong and intact. You are embracing the free market; you are entering the Common Market; you are beginning to grow economically; you believe, as we do, that freedom works.

This democratic experience and economic development go hand in hand. History shows a strong, unbreakable link between political freedom and economic growth, between democracy and social progress. And in our own time -- a great revolution is underway in the world, a great longing for personal freedom and democratic self-rule that surfaces again and again, even in Communist countries. At the start of this century there were only a handful of democracies, but today more than 50 countries -- one-third of the world's population -- are living under democratic rule. One of the engines of this progress is the desire for economic development, the realization that it is free nations that prosper and free peoples who create better lives for themselves and their children.

This realization is growing throughout the world, and in some nations it's causing conflict and disorder. In a sense, then, Marx was right; economic progress is leading to clashes with old entrenched political orders. But Marx was wrong about where all this would occur, for it is the democratic world that is flexible, vibrant, and growing -- bringing its peoples higher and higher standards of living even as freedom grows and deepens. It is in the collectivist world that economies stagnate, that technology is lagging, and that the people are oppressed and unhappy with their lives.

So, everywhere we turn, there is an uprising of mind and will against the old cliches of collectivism. Throughout the world the old cries of ``power to the state'' are being replaced by cries of ``power to the people.'' Throughout the world we can see movement toward a time when totalitarian rule and the terrible suffering that it causes is only a sad and distant memory. That's why what you are doing in your country is so important. First at the British Parliament in 1982 and then again in Strasbourg yesterday, we've called for concerted action -- for a global campaign for freedom, an international strategy for democratic development.

I can think of no more fitting place to renew that call to the world than here in Portugal, and I can think of no people better equipped to advance the cause of democratic development and human freedom than the Portuguese. Let Portugal again lead the world, and let the Portuguese again cross small seas and great ones bearing news of science and discovery, the new science of democracy, the discovery of freedom -- that it works, that it prospers, and that it endures.

And I hasten to add that freedom can guarantee peace. Let us never forget that aggression and war are rarely the work of a nation's people, for it is the people who must bear the brunt and endure the worst of war. No, war and aggression in our century have almost always been the work of governments, one of the militarists and idealogues who may control them. And that is why war and aggression have a tiny constituency. Let democracy spread, let the people's voice be heard, and the warmongers will be made outcasts and pariahs. Let us not be afraid that in our crusade for freedom to proclaim to the world that the cause of democratic government is also the cause of peace.

This pursuit of peace has occupied much of our efforts on this journey and in our broader diplomatic efforts. Important negotiations are now underway in Geneva, negotiations that can lessen the chance of war by producing verifiable agreements and the first real reduction in nuclear weapons. So, too, the United States is moving forward with technological research that we hope someday will lessen the chance of war by reducing dependence on a strategy based on the threat of nuclear retaliation.

I know you share my hopes that our efforts to reach negotiated solutions will succeed. And I know, too, that you understand working toward this goal means remaining strong in our alliance and in our resolve to protect our nation's freedom and independence. Our agreement on this point is why we can be hopeful that a century that has seen so much tragedy can also be a century of hope. In the United States and here in Portugal, in Europe and throughout the world, we have rediscovered the preciousness of freedom, its importance to the cause of peace and to restoring to humanity the dignity to which it is entitled.

No one has done more to remind the world of the truth of human dignity, as well as the truth that peace and justice begins with each of us, than the special man who came to Portugal a few years ago after a terrible attempt on his life. He came here to Fatima, the site of your great religious shrine, to fulfill his special devotion to Mary, to plead for forgiveness and compassion among men, to pray for peace and the recognition of human dignity throughout the world.

And I dared to suggest to him the example of men like himself and in the prayers of simple people everywhere, simple people like the children of Fatima, there resides more power than in all the great armies and statesmen of the world.

This, too, is something the Portugese can teach the world. For your nation's greatness, like that of any nation, is found in your people. It can be seen in their daily lives, in their communities and towns, and especially in those simple churches that dot your countryside and speak of a faith that justifies all of humanity's claims to dignity, to freedom.

I would suggest to you that here is power, here is the final realization of life's meaning and history's purpose, and here is the foundation for a revolutionary idea -- the idea that human beings have a right to determine their own destiny.

I hope you'll forgive me if I leave you with one story about our early days as a democracy. At a critical moment in our history when disunity and discord prevailed on every side, a man celebrated as an inventor and scientist interrupted the proceedings of the Constitutional Convention, trying at the time to formulate the Constitution of the United States. It was Benjamin Franklin who rose to say to his fellow delegates that he had lived a long time and that he had learned above all that not the smallest bird falls from the heavens without the knowledge of God. It is said that he then knelt and asked the delegates to kneel with him and seek a guidance greater than their own. And from then on, every constitutional meeting opened with prayer.

A great democracy was born after those words, just as a great democracy was born in Portugal. It was born because the Portuguese are a people who love freedom and peace, who are willing to sacrifice for a better life for their children. But most of all it was born because the Portuguese are unafraid to acknowledge a higher law that operates in the affairs of mankind, that higher law dictates human freedom and dignity.

There is a word in your language I remember using in a speech during my first year in office, a very useful word evoking the remembrance of things past -- I hope I get it right -- saudades. Even in the short time Nancy and I have been with you in Portugal, we've developed a deeper appreciation for that word's meaning. We shall miss you; we shall miss Portugal. And we hope someday you will permit us to return, to visit with you again, and, as you say, muitas saudades.

Until then, on behalf of the American people, we extend our warmest wishes -- we look with hope toward your future and ours, a future we know will be one of democracy and freedom. One in which we also know the Portuguese people will write another great and inspiring chapter in history.

Overriding the loveliness we see the sculpture of your land as the soul and spirit of the Portuguese people. Mr. Prime Minister, we Americans take great pride in our frontier heritage and in our love of liberty. And when it comes to pushing back frontiers and to the commitment to human freedom, our two peoples are as one family.

Portugal's many experiences or achievements during the Age of Discovery are a great source of pride. Today you have equal reason to be proud of what you've overcome in order to ensure that future generations will continue to enjoy the fruits of democracy and freedom. It has taken enormous energy and commitment. With courage and tenacity you cast off the chains of a dictatorship, defeated those who would have subverted your cause, and have built a government based on the popular vote and a respect for human rights.

Minister, and to applaud what you and the people of Portugal have accomplished together. I also want to extend my thanks for Portugal's continuing contribution to the Western alliance. This is even more meaningful now that you have proudly joined the ranks of the democratic nations.

History is on the side of the free because freedom is right and because freedom works. Only in democratic countries is the individual free to create and dream without fear; to profit from the product of one's labor on investment or investment; to organize unions and cooperative efforts with like minded peoples; to peacefully try to change what is into something totally new and different.

Under freedom, innovation and ideas are unleashed that otherwise would be smothered by oppression and control. Free people are not afraid of change. In market economies, change becomes a means of creating new wealth by meeting the needs and wants of others and by doing it cheaper and better.

Mr. Prime Minister, we're aware of the economic challenges that you face. It wasn't that long ago when we in the United States found ourselves with similar economic difficulties. We decided to shun regulatory and redistribution schemes and, instead, put in place incentives for our people to work and produce and invest, freeing our economy to grow. Evey country must find its own way, but I would hope that our experience and the success that we've enjoyed might provide encouragement for others.

Our cooperation in educational endeavors, as we're doing in the Fulbright Program, will also reap many rewards in the future. Let us see to it that these positive steps are only the first of many. The recent establishment of the Luso-American Foundation bodes well for the relations between our governments and our peoples.

Today we are laying the foundation for the progress and freedom our children will enjoy. What we do today is for them tomorrow. They'll stand on our shoulders, and we must give them strong backs so they may see well into the future. And it will be people like you, Mr. Prime Minister, to whom future generations will be most grateful. You can be especially proud of your strong leadership in bringing democracy to Portugal.

Mrs. Eanes, as you've been told, to the White House on a state visit. And while in Washington, the Eanes's told us a great deal about the history of Portugal. Last month, Mrs. Eanes returned to the White House to attend a conference of First Ladies that Nancy had organized, and once again we heard about the glories of Portugal -- the magnificent climate, the alluring beauty of your coast, the splendor of your architecture, and most important the renowned friendliness and energetic talent of the Portuguese people. Well, that did it, and here we are.

Mr. President and Mrs. Eanes, it is an honor for us to join you. For your warmth, your kindness, and your hospitality we thank you from our hearts. We're delighted to be here in one of the oldest states in Europe, a country that traces her independence to 1140 and her present-day boundaries to 1249. As you noted in Washington, Mr. President, during her eight centuries of independence, Portugal has been a major participant in the long and complex effort that created the Europe that we know today.

Still more significant, Portugal contributed to our conception of the world itself. It was your country, smaller than many others and situated on the extreme western edge of the continent, that became a keystone by which Europe was joined with Africa, Asia, and America, integrating for the first time the four corners of the Earth.

In these years man's sense of the possible was expanded. The unknown world yielded to reason and daring. The known world was celebrated and adorned. It was a time of intellectual and cultural excitement, a time when the Portuguese were reaching for the new and the unexplored and when the greatness of the human spirit was given expression in greatness of deed and art.

Today, Mr. President, we who have studied and been so stirred by the feats of Portugal's past, see your nation setting off on am ambitious new voyage into the future. Your democracy is just a decade old. Already, it has been threatened, but you overcame those threats. You've suffered economic disruptions and slow growth, but you're facing these problems forthrightly, and I believe you will overcome them as well. In doing so you bring honor to democratic ideals; and you are, once again, expanding the limits of the possible. Portuguese democracy is no longer a risky experiment but a solidly established fact. The spirit of daring is thriving again.

Mr. President, your personal leadership in helping to shepherd the Portuguese renewal has been strong, constant, and decisive. You have defended democratic freedoms and civil liberties. You have become a symbol of your country's commitment to liberty, helping Portugal herself become an example for all the world, showing those who still thirst for freedom that totalitarianism can be rebuffed and representative government established in its place. And for all this, Mr. President, we heartily salute you.

Luso-American Foundation, which will prove an important instrument for cooperation in economic, technical, and other spheres. American banks have placed branches here in Lisbon, and recently a delegation of American business leaders visited Portugal to consider further investments in this country and joint undertakings with Portuguese enterprises. American business leaders know that Portugal now offers freedom and stability in economic life; these are precious seeds of opportunity that can blossom into great enterprises yielding greater abundance for tomorrow.

The friendship and trust between Portugal and the United States runs deep. We serve proudly together as members of the NATO alliance, defending the West. We consult widely on other foreign policy matters, and we in the United States value the perspective that your long involvement with Africa has given you on that continent.

I believe that the stars of our progress are bright. And as travel between our countries increases and Portugal takes up its membership in the European Community -- an important step for Portugal and all of Europe -- they will shine brighter still. We look forward to the work that Portugal and the United States will do together -- improving the lives of our people, defending the free world, and by our example extending comfort to the downtrodden and hope to the oppressed everywhere.

Mr. President, it is in our own time that Portugal is truly taking up the poet's challenge. Today the ancient glories are being renewed in freedom, and the bold path has a very special name -- democracia.

The journey to Europe has involved many highs and, yes, some anguishing moments. It took us to one of Europe's youngest capitals and two of its oldest and to a city which symbolizes the continuing quest for European unity. And at every stop I emphasized that our European friends can count on the United States to be their partner, to help them grow, to support their democratic aspirations, and to stand with them to protect the peace.

First, our visit to the Federal Republic has strengthened U.S.-German relations and the prospects for continuing peace in Europe. The German leadership characterized our visit as opening a new page in German history. I believe that our partnership and friendship have never been greater or stronger. At the Bonn Economic Summit we agreed to a common strategy to ensure continued economic prosperity and job creation. We also moved closer to our goal of launching a new multilateral trade round to eliminate barriers to free trade. All the summit countries have agreed to the need for a new round; all but one agreed that it should begin early next year.

We were pleased that our partners endorsed U.S. efforts in Geneva to achieve significant reductions in nuclear arms. We also reached agreement for intensified cooperation against international drug trafficking.

U.S.-Soviet relations based on strength, realism, peaceful competition, and negotiations. I conveyed to the Soviet Union once again America's heartfelt desire for peace. The constructive, commonsense initiatives we proposed to reduce tensions between us deserve a serious Soviet response.

In Spain and Portugal, we further enhanced our ties with two close friends and valued partners. It was heartening to see firsthand the strides these two courageous democracies have made, both politically and economically.

It's been a long, historic, and thoroughly worthwhile trip. Issues of major significance were dealt with openly, vigorously, and in depth. From our meetings came a strongly shared commitment to freedom, democracy, growth, and European unity.

Q. Mr. President, a week ago, you said it would be an irresponsible act if anyone agreed to zero growth on defense. Now you have accepted that, and you've also accepted a freeze on all COLA's, including Social Security. Can you explain about your campaign promise and why you've changed your mind?

The President. Well, let's take the defense matter first. The zero growth is for 1 year, the first year, and then the growth rate that we had asked for for the next 2 years is included in this but at the same time. And just a little while ago -- somewhere around 4 o'clock in the morning in Washington -- I had the assurance of the Senators that this is done with the proviso that if at any time the zero growth reveals in the coming year that it is going to in any way reduce our national security or harm it in any way, I will be back asking for a supplemental to overcome that.

The President. Social Security. Well, first of all, I never felt when I was answering the accusations that were made in a somewhat demagogic way in the campaign that I was going to cut the benefits, reduce them for the recipients. And I was denying that I had any such idea or would ever have any such idea. I didn't have in my mind that we were talking about any potential or possible increases. But it was interpreted that way, so, okay, I live with that. The thing that has been agreed to actually will amount to about the same benefits as the 2, 2, and 2, which I proposed.

Now, we have found that the 2, 2, and 2 that I had proposed -- that most people aren't aware of all of the terms of that. And this is particularly true of the Social Security recipients. Most of them were not aware or did not recall that if inflation drops below 3 percent, there is no COLA. And most of them were not aware that our 2, 2, and 2 was 2, plus any percentage of increase in inflation above 4 percent. And when this was pointed out to them in surveys, roughly around 70 percent of the people preferred that and said that they would take that.

So, the other thing that I did say was that unless I was faced with a mandate -- and I would suggest that I was faced with a mandate when 79 percent of the Senators, which means pretty much half and half Democrat and Republican, demanded that we have some curbing of the COLA's.

Q. Do you plan to go to the U.N. in the fall with the possibility of meeting Gorbachev? And why is it that you can preach reconciliation to the Germans, who committed so many horrors, and not say the same thing to the Soviet Union on this trip?

The President. Well, I thought that I had said some things. I told about the changes that we felt in this unifying of Europe should take place, but I also emphasized that it must take place peacefully, that I was not suggesting any hostile action.

I then extended an invitation that if he was going to be here, the door was open for a meeting between us. And that still goes. So, the ball is in his court, first, to decide whether he's coming here. And then, second, as to time and place for such a meeting, if he is willing.

Marxist dictatorships, saying those on the right can evolve into democracies, but Communist dictatorships never do. Yet here in Europe, you have talked about the changes you want to see in Eastern Europe, where Communist dictatorships are most deeply entrenched. How do you see those changes taking place and what is your role in those changes?

The President. Well, we've said that we would be most helpful to anyone who wants to make this modification. We have seen enough examples, in the Americas alone, of military dictatorships or just outright dictatorships and pressure from the people in the democratic process changing those to the point that today south of our border, roughly 90 percent of the people in what we call Latin America are now living in democracies or in countries that are moving toward democracy. And the only two totalitarian powers in our hemisphere are Nicaragua and Cuba. So, it is true that there is evidence that right-wing governments or dictatorships -- well, we're standing in one that has gone from dictatorship to democracy. The same was true in Spain, when we were there.

But it is true that what has been called the Brezhnev doctrine has been predominant, that once they get their grip in a country, it doesn't change. There are evidences that that isn't true. Well, as a matter of fact, that, too, happened here because -- in addition to dictatorial tradition -- there was a time when communism seemed to be moving in here. And again, the people of Portugal made that change.

The President. Well, first of all, you know, in the country of ours, everyone's got a right to express their opinion, and he was doing no more than that -- something that I know is very precious to all of you. But I would -- I'm trying to think of how I want to answer this question.

The President. All right, yes. We have tried on what seemed to be a verbal agreement between ourselves and the Soviet Union for some time that, even though we had not ratified that treaty, it had been signed by the negotiators, that we would both seek to abide by the terms. There's considerable evidence now that that has been rather one-sided. And if it has been, then there's no need for us to continue.

But whether we do or not, that's a decision to be made down the road. Actually, we have not come to a point in which we, in any way, in our own buildup are violating or going beyond the terms of that treaty. It is possible with regard to one system of weapons that we might come to such a point. And we'll make that decision then. And if we do, we'll do it openly, and we will do it with full knowledge of the Soviet Union.

Nicaraguan trade embargo, and we now hear that Costa Rica has opposed it. Why is it, sir, that some of your closest allies don't back you on this and don't seem to feel that Ortega and the Sandinistas are the threat that you think he is?

The President. I don't think there's any question, Chris [Chris Wallace, NBC News], that they don't agree with us about the threat -- they do. They know what Nicaragua is. On the other hand, we're running into a kind of a philosophical difference here, I think with regard to sanctions. We did a lot of soul searching about it ourselves. There are a number of people, certainly a number of governments, who just don't believe in that as a legitimate weapon.

On the other hand, when we were trying to get aid for the people of Nicaragua in their struggle for democracy and against totalitarianism, many of our own people in the Congress brought up the fact of how could we be doing this at the same time that we continued to maintain relations.

All we have ever sought is that they, as one faction -- when I say ``they,'' I mean the Sandinista government. That Sandinista government has never been legitimized by the people. It is one faction of a revolution that overthrew a dictator. And they stole that revolution away from the other factions which we now call the contras. And the leaders of the contras were leaders in that revolution also.

And in doing that, we have felt that what we are seeking and trying to pressure them to do is to come together again in discussion and negotiations to restore the promises they, themselves, had made as to what the goals of the revolution were. And in doing that -- and as I say, to refute their charges that we were somehow threatening them with aggression, and if you'll remember, there was a time when Mr. Ortega had us, every other week, landing the marines in Nicaragua, and we never had any intention to do such a thing. So, we maintained our embassy there, we continued our trade to show what we really wanted to do.

And then, in this recent vote in the Congress, we found many Congressmen justifying their position on the grounds that how could we still be doing business and yet wanting to aid this other faction of the revolution. And we have decided that pressure is needed to bring them to the realization that they should restore the original goals of their revolution.

Q. Mr. President, in recent days, Mr. Gorbachev has had some rather harsh things to say about the United States and about you. If there is a summit meeting, what would you have to talk about, and what do you think that such a meeting could reasonably produce in the current climate?

The President. Oh, I think there would be a lot to talk about, and I just happen to believe, that it's time we started talking to each other instead of about each other. And with regard to the harsh things that he's had to say about me, what's new about that. That, I think, has been consistent not only with me but with every other American President. It's just their way of doing things.

Q. Mr. President, a few days ago -- I'd like to go back to the defense budget -- a few days ago you told us it would be an irresponsible act to freeze it. This morning you seem to say it's okay to freeze it, but if you discover in the future that it is irresponsible, you'll go back to Congress.

Doesn't that suggest, sir, that you don't really have a firm view of what figure is needed? And doesn't it open you up in the House of Representatives to the House taking more out of the defense budget?

And, as I've said, we're talking about the year of 1986, and I have the agreement of the Senate that if this represents -- and I, in my own mind, feel that it does represent a cut in spending beyond which we should go -- that they recognize that I will be returning for a supplemental appropriation.

On the other hand, I have to point out to you that in this we have gotten more than 90 percent of what we have asked for in the budget. It will amount to some $56 billion this year -- almost $300 billion, which was our goal over the first 3 years. And there's no questioning the importance of sending a signal, not only to the world but to our own business and financial communities that we are determined to deal with a deficit problem that has been a Democratic heritage for the last 50 years of deficit spending, continued deficit spending. And once and for all, we're going to try to get hold of it. Yes, Lesley [Lesley Stahl, CBS News].

Q. Mr. President, as you probably well know, you've been called the Teflon President now for almost 5 years. You, in this Senate vote on the budget, asked for a 6-percent increase in defense and no cuts in Social Security. Why shouldn't this be interpreted as a cave-in on your part, and do you think that the Teflon has begun to peel?

The President. No, I have always believed from all my past experiences as a negotiator that you recognize that the other fellow is probably going to offer less than whatever you ask. And I've always kind of believed in leaving a cushion there for dealing. But this time things have changed.

This was a deal -- I don't like the word ``deal'' -- this was a working out -- [laughter] -- of a budget that was acceptable to the Senate, as well as to ourselves. And I think that the first one we presented was a very sound budget. But I recognize that, in the give and take that must take place in a system such as ours, to attain more than 90 percent of what we asked for means that, all right, we can do some giving along the line also.

Q. Mr. President, since you've shown a willingness to compromise on the budget on defense and some of the spending programs, would you also be willing to compromise on your tax reform program as a price of getting that, or 90 percent of it, to accept, perhaps, a temporary tax increase or a surcharge?

The President. No. You've now come down to what was part of our success in getting what we have. They all know that I absolutely will not accept a proposal for a tax increase. I think it is the worst kind of economic practice to do that. I think it would endanger our recovery, and they know that I will veto any proposal that comes to me for a tax increase. They also know that I have a signed letter, signed by 146 Representatives, which is enough to sustain a veto -- that, I have that in my pocket also.

So, I just have to tell you, I'm most gratified. I think I leave with sound friendships with the people of your government, personal friendships, as well as alliances between us or agreements between us. And I'm very pleased.

Let me just say one thing and then I have to go back here. Since there's been a lot of discussion about some members of my administration, and one in particular and this being Mike Deaver's last day -- I just want to say to you that I consider Mike's leaving in the nature of an amputation, and it is me that is suffering the amputation. He has been with us a number of years. I have never found fault with anything that he's doing, with his loyalty, with his friendship, and with the common sense that he has always used. And that extends to the arrangements for this trip and the part that he has played in the arranging of the trip. And while it was very difficult, I know that most of you are totally exhausted; some of us managed to survive a little better -- [laughter] -- if so, it's because we had Mike working in our behalf, particularly. And he's going to be greatly missed.

We return with warm memories of European friendship for America. The European people know the United States is working hard for freedom, democracy, and peace, and believe me they appreciate our efforts, as we do theirs.

I know you've heard that because there were a few demonstrations, some things might have been going wrong. But you know every time I noticed who was demonstrating, I felt reassured that we were saying and doing the right things.

Well, we feel good about what's been done, and after every summit leader agreed that steady economic growth means each government getting spending under control, how sweet it is to return with a 50 - 49 Senate victory for spending restraint and no tax increase.

And our thanks to Bob Dole and Pete Dominici, the Republican leadership of the Senate, their colleagues, and Senator Pete Wilson for the grit that he showed in coming back when we needed him the most.

During these discussions with our economic allies, concern was voiced that projected budget deficits threaten world economic growth. Well, this Senate budget resolution represents a savings of almost $300 billion over the next 3 years, and it reflects the Senate's willingness to bite the bullet to help sustain our economic expansion.

Our commitment to America's security is determined by the threat posed by our adversaries. If we conclude that our national security is jeopardized, I will not hesitate to request, and the Senate leaders have assured me that they will consider, supplemental funding for fiscal year '86.

House to do as good a job reducing the deficit by cutting spending and not raising taxes. And we urge the House to pass a responsible budget resolution as soon as possible. We're committed to reducing excessive government spending and urge bipartisan support in both Houses of the Congress to help us in that effort.

You know I've accepted your resignation orally but I suppose I have to put something down on paper -- after all, this is Washington. The only place I haven't accepted it is in my heart, and there I never will.

You will no longer bear a government title. You will not actually handle such things as schedule, trips, etc., but that's as far as we go. You will continue to be a part of our lives. We will have concern -- one for the other, and refuse surgery that would in any way remove you from a relationship that is part of our life-support system. In return, we will continue to be eternally grateful.

Correctional officers occupy a vital role in our Nation's criminal justice systems. They are called upon to ensure the custody, safety, and well-being of the over 680,000 inmates in prisons and jails. Without these officers performing demanding and often dangerous assignments, it would be impossible to carry out the primary law enforcement mission of protecting the law-abiding citizens of this country.

As the backbone of our correctional systems, they work hard to maintain the high professional standards necessary to ensure the safe and orderly running of our Nation's prisons and jails. The dedication exhibited by these officers in the daily performance of their duties deserves our greatest respect and appreciation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The American public pays approximately $4 billion per year in medical bills directly related to the treatment and diagnosis of asthma and allergic diseases, and another $2 billion per year in indirect social costs. Absenteeism in the schools and in the work place resulting from these diseases has an enormous effect on the Nation.

Although modern medical treatments of asthma and allergic disorders have reduced the danger of death considerably, thousands of individuals still die each year from asthma -- a disease that affects children more often than adults.

In order to improve the quality of life for those who suffer from asthma and allergic diseases, research scientists supported by the National Institutes of Health (NIH) are acquiring vital knowledge of these disorders. These scientists are optimistic that information gained through their research will provide means to develop new techniques for diagnosing, treating, and possibly preventing these debilitating diseases.

In addition, the NIH works closely with the Asthma and Allergy Foundation of America, as well as with other volunteer and professional health groups, to bring to the attention of health care professionals and the public current research results that can be translated into improved health care.

But sometimes the most memorable moment is something you notice by chance, that hits your heart and yields an unforgettable image. For me it was the sight of an elderly woman standing among the onlookers as we drove through the streets of Strasbourg, France, on the way to the European Parliament to help mark the 40th anniversary of V - E Day.

American convoys drove through the newly freed nation of France, and then I realized, maybe she was one of those young women. And as we drove by her, I thought perhaps she knows better than all of us what the anniversary of V - E Day is all about.

America chose to honor all mothers with a special holiday. After all, mothers have made a unique contribution to our country. They're the main communicators of the values by which our nation has flourished for more than 200 years -- the values of honesty, responsibility, decency, and personal effort. By imparting these and other values to our children, the mothers of America quite literally shape the future.

Mother's Day takes on a special significance this year for a number of reasons. One is the extraordinary phenomenon of the mothers of America joining together to press for much needed change in our society. There's Mothers Against Drunk Driving, the remarkable group started by a woman whose daughter was killed several years ago by a drunk driver. MADD, as it is called, has been responsible for helping bring tougher laws against drunk drivers in many States. The group has also heightened public awareness of the problem of drunk driving and made our children more aware of its hazards.

Recently in Washington there was a very important conference for the wives of 17 heads of state and government leaders on how they can strengthen families and help combat the epidemic of drug addiction among our children. That meeting was conceived and chaired by another Reagan named Nancy. I'm deeply proud of her involvement in this crusade, proud of her heartfelt commitment and the sacrifices she's made to help children in their struggle against drug addiction.

There's a group of mothers I'd like to mention, whose lives aren't remarked upon enough, but who should be given special mention today. That is the group of mothers who've made an extraordinary personal commitment by adopting children with special needs. These are mothers who have adopted older children, often foster children, and mothers who have taken in children who are unwell, either emotionally or physically, or who need special care of one sort or another.

America. Some devote their full time to raising families, others combine that responsibility with jobs in the marketplace. Some are breadwinners; others are not. But all deserve our respect and thanks. All of these mothers work hard; in fact, they must be the hardest working people in America. Happy Mother's Day to these and all other mothers.

The NATO countries have worked together at Stockholm to introduce a series of concrete confidence-building measures designed to make European military activities more predictable and more stable and to ensure that no weapons of any kind are ever used. These measures would require the mandatory notification and observation of all military activities above a certain level, together with appropriate verification measures, such as information exchange and on-site inspection. They are designed to reduce the risk of war by miscalculation and misunderstanding, guard against a surprise attack, and increase significantly the political cost to any state which would use the threat of force to intimidate another.

This ambitious program has the full support of all the nations of NATO as well as bipartisan political support here at home. The neutral and nonaligned countries of Europe also support the general principles outlined in the NATO proposal.

Conference reach prompt agreement on this package of measures proposed by the NATO countries. And I reiterated our pledge that the United States is prepared to discuss the Soviet proposal on nonuse of force in the context of Soviet agreement to concrete confidence-building measures. We hope the Soviet Union will give this serious consideration.

Soviet Union is prepared to join the rest of the Conference in negotiating meaningful confidence-building measures which go well beyond existing arrangements. In seeking this goal, Ambassador James E. Goodby, my representative to the Stockholm Conference, has my full confidence and support.

Commerce. Previously, he was with the State of Oregon as director of finance and administration and vice chancellor for administration, higher education; with the State of Wisconsin as director of environmental protection; and with the Council of State Governments as associate director in Washington, DC.

During National Nursing Home Week, I urge all Americans to remember the contributions our older citizens have made in building America. These men and women are an important link with traditional American values for our young people today. Continued contact between older and younger Americans helps to strengthen these values for our future.

I support the goals of the nursing home industry to provide the highest standards of medical and social services for the elderly, but institutional care is not enough. We must also encourage everyone to include the elderly in their lives. Wisdom, memory and life experience can help us all to better understand this complex and changing world.

Throughout the year let us visit our elderly relatives and friends in nursing homes to share our love and caring. We owe them our help, understanding and, above all, respect. In return, they will give us their experience and sense of continuity. Together we can enrich all of our lives.

Few of us take the time to consider how much we rely on these individuals who defend the principles of law and order that uphold our nation. Our police officers preserve our rights while protecting us from those who would abuse them.

Every year, tragically, some among the ranks of these brave men and women sacrifice their lives in the performance of their jobs. The giving of this most precious possession, life itself, is a dramatic demonstration of the intense dedication and selfless service of those who keep the peace and safeguard our lives and property each and every day. Let us resolve to do all in our power as citizens of these United States to support our law enforcement officers in their work and pray that no more of them are taken from their families and those they so ably serve. In this way, those who have laid down their lives for their fellowman will not have died in vain.

Without regard to any other part of this Order, except Part VI, the President, or the person acting as President under section 19 of title 3, United States Code, may, in the event of the death, disability, or absence of the Secretary of Defense, appoint any officer designated in Part I of this Order to succeed to the position of, and act as, Secretary of Defense; and that person may, in the event of the death, disability, or absence of the Secretary of a Military Department, appoint any officer designated in the part of this Order that relates to the order to succession in the Department concerned to succeed to the position of, and act as, the Secretary of that Department.

Succession to office pursuant to this Order shall be on a temporary or interim basis and shall not have the effect of vacating the statutory position held by the successor. An officer shall not succeed to any position under this order if the position that he occupies entitling him so to succeed is held by him in an acting capacity only.

We live in an age when rapidly changing science and technology are transforming our economy and our way of life. But this is nothing new for Americans, because we have always been inventors and explorers who looked to science as a way of achieving a better future.

Today the pace of scientific discovery has accelerated, and its effects are being felt worldwide. No nation or group of nations has a monopoly on the world's scientific talent, so no nation can take for granted that it will remain in the forefront of technological change just because it has been in the past. America must continually strive to undertake basic research in science as well as to develop new technological applications of scientific ideas.

In order to do this, it is particularly important that we provide our young people with good scientific education. Even those who do not pursue careers in science should understand the scientific method and appreciate the contributions science and technology make to our way of life.

Americans are coming together to meet the challenges that the rapid advance of scientific knowledge creates for us. As we have so many times before in our history, we see these challenges as opportunities. Our businesses, universities, and State and local governments are working in partnership with the Federal government to meet our needs through research and education. As these cooperative relationships develop, we can look forward with confidence to an era of scientific discovery and technological innovation unimagined only a few years ago.

In recognition of the importance of science, technology, and science education, and to draw public attention to the great works being accomplished in these fields, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 59, has designated the period from May 12 through May 18, 1985, as ``National Science Week'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

Telecommunication Union, which provides the framework for the orderly conduct of international telecommunications. It is in the public and commercial interest of the United States to continue to play an active role within this framework.

The International Telecommunication Convention entered into force on January 1, 1984, for governments that have deposited their instrument of ratification or accession, by diplomatic channel through the intermediary of the Government of Switzerland, with the Secretary General of the International Telecommunication Union.

Recalling that Dr. Sakharov's Nobel Peace Prize cited him as a ``spokesman for the conscience of mankind,'' I said that we who value freedom and human dignity must do all in our power to prevent him from being silenced.

As we honor Dr. Sakharov today and rededicate ourselves to the values of peace, freedom, and justice that he represents, we do so with solemn awareness that for more than 1 year, he and his brave wife, Yelena Bonner, have been cut off from all direct contact with family or friends in the West. A year ago this month, Dr. Sakharov embarked on a hunger strike to protest the refusal of Soviet authorities to permit his wife to travel abroad for urgently needed medical treatment.

Soviet authorities have turned a deaf ear to the outpouring of international outrage over the treatment of one of the Soviet Union's most distinguished citizens and of his courageous wife, who is a decorated veteran of World War II.

In recognizing the courage and ideals that Dr. Sakharov embodies, let us also remember the many thousands of his countrymen who likewise suffer the denial of basic human rights. Today the human rights situation in the Soviet Union remains bleak. Soviet authorities have succeeded in eliminating the main vehicle for human rights activism -- the Helsinki monitors movement.

Anatoly Shcharanskiy, Yuriy Orlov, and other monitors are now serving long terms of imprisonment or exile. Religious groups have become a major target of persecution, and Baptists, Catholics, Ukrainian Uniates, Pentecostalists, and other groups have been subjected to arrest and harassment. The crackdown on Hebrew teachers and Jewish cultural activists which began in July 1984 continues. Jewish emigration last year reached a 10-year low.

In exiling Dr. Sakharov to Gorky, the Soviet Government has attempted to silence and remove him from international attention, but their efforts will ultimately fail. Americans and others around the world who have drawn inspiration from his courage understand their obligation to carry his message to all and to redouble their efforts in pursuit of world peace and respect for human rights.

I am appreciative for the efforts undertaken by the Andrei Sakharov Institute, and I recognize the many concerned citizens around the world who have been inspired by Dr. Sakharov and who support his goals and ideals. We must act on his behalf, ensuring that his message of hope and freedom will never be silenced.

Today we renew our call to the new Soviet leadership to end the isolation of Dr. Sakharov and his wife and to permit Yelena Bonner to travel abroad for needed medical care. Let all who cherish Dr. Sakharov's noble values, both governments and individuals, continue to press the Soviets for information about the Sakharovs and for an end to Soviet persecution of two of its most distinguished citizens.

In order to ensure that Social Security coverage and taxation will be consistently and efficiently applied within the Executive branch in conformance with the Social Security Act and the Internal Revenue Code, I am hereby directing that the Internal Revenue Service and the Social Security Administration provide guidance to Executive departments and agencies concerning Social Security coverage and taxation for Federal personnel, including applicable regulations and published rulings and procedures. I ask the heads of Executive departments and agencies to follow such guidance in making their determinations under the aforementioned sections 205(p) and 3122.

President Reagan. Well, it's always a pleasure to welcome President Duarte, a close friend. He and his people are struggling against great adversity to consolidate their democratic institutions, and we're honored to be doing what we can to help.

They're striving to build a society that guarantees free exercise of religion and speech, that does not tolerate human rights abuses, that offers its people the benefits of a growing economy. And those who question our efforts in Central America should take note of the heartwarming progress that President Duarte has made.

The people of El Salvador had another free election in March; economic reforms are continuing; and Communist guerrillas are losing ground. And none of this would have been possible without the economic assistance and military training and equipment that we provided, and yet that assistance passed in the House by a very slim margin.

If there's to be peace and democracy in the region, if our neighbors are to be spared the tragedy that comes from every Communist dictatorship, we must have the courage to help all our friends in Central America.

In his efforts to bring peace to his land, President Duarte has initiated a church- mediated dialog with those fighting against his government. He has gone the extra mile to seek genuine reconciliation and to ensure his enemies the right to participate in the democratic process. He did not dictate who could represent the opposition. He met with both armed and unarmed opponents.

President Duarte has much to be proud of. The recent successful election and the indisputable improvement in the human rights climate in El Salvador are due in no small part to his efforts. I deeply appreciate his courageous support of my Nicaraguan peace initiative of last April and of our trade embargo against Nicaragua. And I assured him that we will continue our efforts to thwart Communist aggression and subversion in the region.

Peace will not be possible in Central America until Nicaragua ceases to support the subversion of its neighbors and itself achieves national reconciliation through democratic elections. The United States will continue working with President Duarte to build peace, prosperity, and freedom in his own land and to bring stability throughout Central America. It's been a great pleasure to exchange views with him today.

We have come far in El Salvador but have yet a long, difficult road to travel. The March election reaffirmed the commitment of my people to a peaceful, democratic solution of our problems. I fully share that commitment. But the need to curb foreign intervention is paramount in our purposes.

United States. I will reassure them all of my unwavering support to democratic, peaceful changes based on a strong and healthy economy, which we will work to build in close partnership with private enterprise.

Of the two Central American revolutions of 1979, ours has succeeded as Nicaragua's has been betrayed. We have fulfilled our commitment and kept our promises, while the Marxist Sandinista regime has not. Our press is free to say and publish what it wants. La Prensa in Nicaragua is censored every day down to a few lines.

He has been recognized for his efforts to improve the care and well-being of the mentally retarded and the developmentally disabled. His honors include the United States Congressional Achievement Award and the Community Service Award for his outstanding contribution to the State of California. As a tribute to Mr. Guglielmo's work, the Matthew J. Guglielmo Biology Research Fellowship was established at the City of Hope in 1974 and the Matthew J. Guglielmo Chair in Mental Retardation was established in perpetuity at California State University, Los Angeles, in 1981.

This may be called the President's Dinner, but it's really your dinner. For the second year in a row, you've made this the most successful fundraising event in the history of the Republican Party, as you've been told. And to all of you here tonight who've given so generously, you have my deepest gratitude. Your continued support is essential if we're going to keep America on the right track, growing stronger, braver, and freer every year.

A lot of you know Ed Rollins, and many of you will be working closely with him in the coming months. And I just want to take this opportunity to say what an outstanding job Ed has done over the years working to make our hopes and ideals a political reality.

But we're up against a tough challenge in this next election. Being right doesn't automatically or immediately translate into political might, without a lot of hard work. We are bucking an historical trend in midterm elections, but that's nothing new to us. For the last 4\1/2\ years, we've been bucking the historical trend, and we've been winning with spending and tax cuts, tax reform, strengthened defenses, and support for democracy around the world.

America. They said these things couldn't be done, but we're doing them. And that's the main reason, I believe, that in 1986 we're not only going to keep control of the Senate but build a winning coalition that will break the liberals' paralyzing grip on the House.

Have you ever stopped to think that this is really about the first time that you have ever seen the two parties, and today the only difference between them is the argument about what should be cut, but both agreed that government spending should be cut.

The Republican-controlled Senate has passed a budget that will shrink the deficit, prepare the way for tax reform, and help put our economy on a growth path through the end of the decade. The Senate Republicans have shown that they have the right stuff to make tough political choices by doing what everybody agrees has to be done -- cutting spending. By putting the needs of the country above any short-term political interest, our Senate Republicans have shown courage and leadership, and the country will thank them for it.

It awaits to be seen whether the Democrats in the House are up to this challenge. Will they shrink from this great moment and retreat into excuses and partisan politics? The Democrats have been talking about deficits for years. The coming budget vote in the House will be the measure of their sincerity. It'll signal to the country whether they'll cooperate in the business of running this country or if they're determined to reduce themselves to the role of spoilers, detractors, and negativists.

Some Democrats, in their effort to torpedo any constructive budget compromise, are proposing drastic cuts in defense that would seriously threaten our country's national security and tax increases that could strangle our economic prosperity. We had a referendum on that idea last November. The American people overwhelmingly rejected it. We've already compromised greatly on defense by agreeing to freeze spending at last year's levels with only an adjustment for inflation. Now, this was not an easy decision. There's no question about it, this will temporarily slow down our vitally needed defense buildup at a time when the Soviet Union is pouring unprecedented amounts of resources into their offensive military arsenals. But I've been assured that if I feel our national security is imperiled, I can come back to Congress for supplemental appropriations. Our leaders in the Senate have assured me of that. And if the Congress persists in making further reductions which could jeopardize our negotiating position in Geneva, I may take them up on that offer.

I'm determined that 1985 is going to go down in history as the year of tax reform and further rate reductions. This will be the year when that colossus of waste, unfairness, and inefficiency known as our tax code will finally be cleaned up.

We stand at the threshold of a new golden age of economic achievement and technological discovery. But a complicated and tangled tax code, along with unproductively high income tax rates, keep the door to progress partially closed. That's why we will be very soon announcing our tax reform plan to lower income tax rates, make our tax system fairer and simpler, and ensure that America is the sunrise industrial power of the 21st century.

Freedom works. Except for a few people on the far left-hand side of the aisle, the response was extremely enthusiastic, especially among young people. Of course every time I started talking about individual freedom and human dignity, the Communists stood up and walked out of the room. I suppose they were just rushing off to greet Daniel Ortega, who seemed to be following me in most of the countries where we were.

And I notice that many in our House of Representatives had second thoughts about their vote to block aid to the freedom fighters when Mr. Ortega immediately flew off to Moscow for what looked like a victory celebration. Mr. Ortega, of course, was looking for another installment on that almost $2 billion in military and economic assistance the Soviets and their friends have been pouring into Nicaragua to prop up the brutal Communist regime there.

I hope Congress will change its mind. I still think that we can together rise above partisanship and do what we know is right, and I think every American knows in his heart that supporting freedom and democracy is right. I'm convinced that last month's vote against the freedom fighters in Nicaragua will be remembered as only a short, shameful episode -- an exception to our great country's historic allegiance to the cause of freedom and human rights.

Yes, we have much left to do and with your help we are going to make it happen. We have begun no less than the renewal of the American dream, and we are not going to stop until that dream of hope, faith, and opportunity becomes a living reality for every American. That's the vision that guides us; that is the vision that the Republican Party is working toward. And to paraphrase John Paul Jones, we have only just begun to fight.

Well, greetings to your chairman, Michael Sotirhos, your executive director, Radi Slavoff, your honorary chairman, and to your convention chairman, Dr. Theodore Perros. The work of all of you has meant a very great deal to me personally and to our party and to our cause. And I'm delighted to have this opportunity to be with you, at least for a short time today.

A few years ago, most of us had a great aching in our hearts about America. As we picked up the morning papers, there was never any telling what new setbacks or international humiliation awaited us. And that's not even to mention what was happening here at home -- economic decline, endless increases in crime, and a deepening social discontent stemming from overly intrusive government, the loss of basic values, and stifled economic opportunity.

Well, together, you and I offered the American people a way out of all of this. And just as we always knew they would, they took us up on the offer. Now we've turned away from the days of defeatism and malaise; America's back where she belongs -- the champion of peace and freedom throughout the world.

I can think of few Americans who've made a more vital contribution to this effort than those of you who are in this room today. The story of America's economic, social, and spiritual recovery can be traced in great part to the resurgence of both Republican principles and the organizational strength of our party. And it hasn't been too many years that we've been able to talk about that.

But it's there now, and you've contributed mightily to that resurgence. You're here today because of your dedication to your party and your country and your desire to give as well as to receive -- to do something for America in return for all that she's done for you and your families. In that quest, let me assure you that you've succeeded. And so, I wanted to come by today just to thank and salute you.

As you know, I've just returned from Europe, where I had an opportunity to see as well as speak about the new energy and dynamism that is sparking the cause of democracy and personal freedom throughout the world. There just isn't any question in my mind that people everywhere seek now to fulfill one of the oldest and deepest aspirations of the human spirit -- the right to self-expression, to democratic self-rule, to representative government in every land.

You know, when I first began speaking a few years ago about expanding the frontiers of freedom throughout the world, some people asked whether, in preaching this forward strategy for freedom, I was calling for what was known in the 1950's as a rollback -- the end of totalitarian rule in other countries.

Well, you see, I always thought the question was misstated. The very word ``rollback'' suggests that somehow we who are promoting freedom are attempting to stop or roll back the inevitable and that history was actually on the side of those who prescribed totalitarian rule.

Well, it's true that in our century totalitarian ideologies, by holding out the false hope of utopia and promising an end to poverty and war, caught certain historical tides at their height and then flooded some of the lowlands of Western civilization and culture. But now everywhere we look today there is evidence this tide has spent itself and is receding, leaving behind only a totalitarian wasteland.

Look around the world at the growing insurgencies against repressive rule in totalitarian countries, the revolt of intellectuals against the stale cliches and bogus prophecies of Marxism-Leninism, the steady growth of the power and especially the number of nations that are turning to democracy. They all point to one powerful, undeniable truth: That bright, shining crest on the horizon is no mirage but the distant tip of a tidal wave called freedom, a tidal wave that will soon roll and crash its way across the desert that is 20th century totalitarianism.

So you see, it's the other way around. The events of this century are making possible the realization of the age-old aspirations of mankind for freedom. And those who would stand in its way are really the ones seeking to roll back history.

Now, don't mistake me, history has no inevitable outcome; it's still the work of free men and women; so, it's still up to you and me. So, if the cause of freedom is to continue to prosper, the United States must remain strong militarily and economically. We have to continue to strengthen institutions like Radio Free Europe and Radio Liberty. And we have to continue helping the resistance in Afghanistan and especially in Nicaragua.

And yes, we have to continue to state in public the crucial moral distinctions between democratic government and the totalitarian state. And much of this will depend on how the Republican Party fares in the next few years. And once again I think the prognosis -- but only with your help -- is an optimistic one. Our party has been unstinting in its support of democratic development and the struggle against totalitarianism. We've led the way in supporting the resistance movements in Nicaragua and Afghanistan. And we can be proud that in supporting a strong defense, Radio Liberty, Radio Free Europe, and in being realistic about Soviet intentions, our party, the Republican Party, has led the way.

Now, I mentioned defense there, and we're talking about how to cure some great misconceptions that are the result of a drumbeat of ceaseless propaganda that's been prevalent in the land with regard to national defense. Just give you one line about it. That $436 hammer -- we never bought that. We're the ones that found out that that's what they'd been asking for; then we didn't buy it.

You know, I've been encouraged by many of those in the Democratic Party who are wondering about a burden that some in their party would have them take on. Already many are asking if they really want to be remembered as the party that couldn't support vital weapons programs or the party that, at a critical turning point in the struggle between totalitarianism and freedom, did not aid those struggling to save freedom in their own countries -- countries like Nicaragua -- from totalitarian rule.

We need more Members of the House and Senate here in Washington who think as we do on these issues. Now, many of them maybe won't change that letter, but there are some who find that when it comes time to pull the voting lever they like the things that we're trying to do, rather than the objectionism and obstructionism that is coming from the leadership of their own party.

I want to encourage you to keep building the party. Believe me, bringing more ethnic Americans into our fold is the key to the positive realignment that we are beginning to see take shape. And if asked why they should become Republican, talk to them about some of the things that I've just said, and tell them about freedom. They might be interested in that. Believe me, in the coming years, freedom and foreign policy are going to be the issues that move the voter, even as they move the world.

These are exciting times -- the cause of freedom is on the move everywhere in the world -- times when all of us can be grateful for the special chance that we have to help light the way toward a future of peace and freedom.

Well, that light of high resolve is not dimmed in America; I have seen it so many times on so many thousands of faces all across this land; I can see it in your eyes. And just last week I was seeing it in the eyes of 10,000 young people, young Germans, in their teens. And I talked to them about freedom and that they should be proud of the 40 years now of democracy and freedom that their country has known since the days of Hitler. And when I finished speaking, I had a tennis ball in my throat because the band started playing our national anthem, and I saw 10,000 young German students singing our national anthem in English.

These golden hopes of mankind are here for us to protect and preserve. Let us resolve to pass that sacred heritage on to other generations of Americans and to make it someday, we hope and pray, the birthright of all the peoples of the world.

Older Americans are as diverse and fascinating as America itself. The memories they carry with them constitute a living treasury of knowledge about the history of our times. But older Americans are far more than just a repository of knowledge about the past. They are living active lives today and contributing greatly to enriching the lives of their families, friends, and communities.

The activities sponsored by senior centers are as various and interesting as the citizens who make use of them. Courses on art and literature, discussions of current events, and training sessions on how to use a computer are among the wide variety of events that occur in senior centers. The staffs of these centers are to be commended for their spirit of innovation and their dedication to enhancing the lives of older Americans. Once again, Americans are showing that anything is possible if we have the faith, the will, and the heart.

States. In terms of human discomfort and pain, mortality, and impact on the Nation's economy, they represent one of our most serious health problems. Digestive diseases are the leading cause of hospitalization and surgery in this country, and each day some 200,000 people miss work because of digestive problems. Twenty million Americans are treated for some type of chronic digestive disorder each year, and almost half of the United States population suffers an occasional digestive disorder, creating a yearly expenditure of approximately $17 billion in direct health care costs and a total economic burden of $50 billion.

An unexpectedly large volume of imports of these sugar-containing articles has caused the quotas for these articles to be closed or nearly closed for this fiscal year. This early closing of these quotas was unanticipated and is working or is expected to work severe hardship on importers and users of a number of articles containing relatively small amounts of sugar.

I believe it is appropriate not to cause such hardship in connection with these articles in the context of emergency action, but rather to permit their entry pending the investigation by the United States International Trade Commission.

Therefore, I have issued this day a proclamation modifying the description of the articles covered by the quotas established in Proclamation No. 5294 to permit the entry of articles as indicated above.

Not too long ago one of our Ambassadors visited an American armored cavalry regiment stationed on the NATO line in Germany. As he returned to his helicopter, he was followed by a young 19-year-old trooper. The trooper asked him if he could get a message to the President.

Today is Armed Forces Day, a day we set aside to remember and thank those Americans who wear our country's uniform and who serve our nation in so many places around the globe. Many are far from home, and things you and I take for granted -- family, friends, all the good things that go with life in our hometowns -- they've given all these things up for the sake of a challenge and to answer a call. The challenge is the task of defending freedom, and the call they've answered is summarized in three words: duty, honor, country.

So, on Armed Forces Day, let's remember the debt we owe those in uniform. News of this broadcast will be carried on the Armed Forces Network, and I know I speak for all Americans when I say to our soldiers, sailors, airmen, marines, and coast guardsmen: We thank you for the job you're doing and the sacrifices you're making for all of us at home. And we're grateful and proud of you for your devotion to country and to the cause of freedom.

Now, remembering to say thank you is very important, but we here at home have a greater responsibility. As you know, since my first day in office, restoring respect for America's military and rebuilding our nation's defenses has been one of my highest priorities. It remains so today.

I'm sure you've read about the discussions going on in the Congress on military spending. I'll reserve comment on them until the Congress has completed its current work, but I do want to say this much: One of the things that has most deeply disturbed Americans during the past decade, even though it isn't always talked about as much as other political issues, was the expansion of Soviet influence beyond their borders -- Angola, Ethiopia, Cambodia, Afghanistan, and Nicaragua are cases in point. This trend was of natural concern to the American people, especially right here on the continent.

The tendency of some leaders to shut their eyes to the real world, their lack of realism about our foreign adversaries and communism's unrelenting assault on human freedom requires that we face up to the need to restore effective deterrence and help our friends.

Americans don't want to take chances with our national security. It's just one of the strongest impulses in our body politic. Americans know an act of Congress can repeal vital military expenditures. They also know what an act of Congress can't repeal: the aggressive tendencies and intentions of our adversaries.

My first responsibility as President is the safety and security of the American people. So, if a suitable compromise can't be worked out, I won't hesitate to put our case before the American people and ask for your support. On this Armed Forces Day let's say thanks to all Americans in uniform, but let's make sure we give them the tools they need to do their job.

These past couple of months, as the trees have begun to leaf out and the flowers to blossom, spring has come to America -- an America that is in good economic health. For more than 2 years our economy has been growing steadily. And this morning at 8:30 a.m. the Commerce Department released some additional figures that indicate that very definitely.

Our basic industries have achieved new productivity while technological breakthroughs involving the computer and the microchip have produced entirely new fields of services and goods. And nearly 8 million jobs have been created and more than 200,000 last month alone.

As summer follows spring, inflation will remain low and our economy will continue to grow, creating still more jobs. Yet even in these good economic times, thousands of young Americans, as Bill has told you, have trouble finding summer jobs. Many live in parts of our inner cities where there are few employers. Some are black or Hispanic and suffer from higher rates of unemployment than other young Americans.

Ironically, the very young people who will find it hardest to get work will be the ones who need jobs the most. To them, a summer job means a chance to escape poverty and disadvantage, a chance to get the work experience that would enable them to climb the economic ladder.

I think many of us here remember summer jobs. I remember they taught me a great deal about the satisfactions of good, honest work. I was 14 when I got my first summer job. Before that summer was over, I was laying hardwood floor; I was shingling roof, painting, and using a pick and shovel to dig for foundation in house construction. I have to confess that pick and shovel work got a little heavy at times.

But I can't help thinking that those summer jobs might have been impossible for me to get if certain laws in place today had been in effect back then. And maybe in our effort to do good, maybe we haven't been as successful as we thought we were when we passed some of those laws.

Under the current minimum wage law, for example, many young people have been priced out of the labor market. To put these young Americans back in the market, we have proposed the youth employment opportunity wage -- legislation that would allow employers to hire young people at a lower minimum wage during the summer months. Our bill would increase summer employment opportunities, yet provide explicit safeguards to protect permanent employees and the young people themselves.

Americans. We firmly believe that the surest source of the real work, not make-work, is in the private sector. So, at the center of our efforts lies a partnership between the Government and the private sector.

As part of our Job Training Partnership Act this year, our summer youth employment program includes nearly $825 million in funding for State and local governments. And these governments have available some $100 million left over from the 825 million granted them last year for summer employment. So, these levels of government can use this over $900 million this summer to work with other nonprofit concerns as they provide work experience for more than 850,000 young people.

Private efforts in the summer jobs program can offer still more opportunities. Last summer, for example, television stations like WDAF in Kansas City aired summer job-a-thons. Newspapers like the Atlanta Journal/Constitution permitted youngsters to run a ``Jobs Wanted'' ads for free.

This summer, as in years past, the White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives will receive help in overseeing the summer jobs program from the National Alliance of Business. Bill Kolberg and the other executives at the NAB have my deepest thanks.

Sportscasters Association. Vin Scully, as representative of that association, you have my gratitude, and Vin, coming from somebody who used to do a little sports announcing himself, I'd like to say: You're one of the very best.

Finally, to the 170 representatives of corporations and private industry councils who have received summer jobs awards -- many present today -- our congratulations. You've already done much for young Americans, and I know that this summer, you'll do still more.

Together, we can provide summer jobs for hundreds of thousands of our young people. In so doing, we'll help to teach them the spirit of enterprise and to give them the most important kind of capital, not the kind that accumulates in banks, but that which, through actual work experience is stored up in the heart and mind.

Association. She is a member, past chapter president, and past State president of the Association for the Preservation of Tennessee Antiquities. She also serves as legislative chairman of the American Legion Auxiliary.

Maritime power has two principal components. One component, the Navy and the Coast Guard, guards America's free use of the seas while the other component, the Merchant Marine, supports trade with nations and, in an emergency, becomes a part of our military establishment -- integral with our military forces.

This role of our civilian mariners is not new. In World War II, virtually every serviceman who saw action against the enemy was transported overseas by ship. In Vietnam, more than 90 percent of the war material utilized in that conflict went by sea.

The enactment of the Shipping Act of 1984 was a major step toward regaining a prominent position on the world's trade routes for our country. It diminished or streamlined outdated regulations that governed the ocean liner industry, and it has helped rekindle the spirit of American maritime enterprise. American-flag liner companies are now in the forefront of developments that are providing shippers with more efficient, extensive, and innovative intermodal services.

Our Merchant Marine is being bolstered by the replacement of obsolete ships with new, efficient, and highly competitive vessels. With the cooperation of seafaring labor, these new fleet additions are being operated with small crews that increase their productivity and competitiveness.

Osteoporosis is a condition in which bone mass decreases, causing bones to be more susceptible to fracture. It may develop without warning. A fall, blow, or lifting action that would not strain the average person can easily cause one or more bones to break in a person with severe osteoporosis.

Some 15 to 20 million Americans are afflicted with osteoporosis. The risk of developing the disease increases with age and is higher in women than in men. It is estimated that 25 percent of postmenopausal women in the United States will develop osteoporosis. Among people who live to be age 90, 32 percent of women and 17 percent of men will suffer a hip fracture, mostly due to osteoporosis. More than 50,000 older women and many older men die each year in the United States as a result of such complications. It is estimated that national health costs related to osteoporosis are at least $3.8 billion annually.

As scientific knowledge about the disease continues to grow, there is reason for hope. New research findings and new approaches to prevention, diagnosis, and treatment are being developed. The Federal government and private voluntary organizations have created a strong and enduring partnership committed to research on osteoporosis. Working together, our objective must be to uncover the cause and cure for this major public health problem.

A century ago, physicians knew many of their patients from birth, knew all their ailments, and provided all their medical care. Today, with medical specialization and greater mobility among people, many skilled physicians may treat the average American during a lifetime. Using transcribed medical reports, each physician can easily and quickly review a patient's medical history even if the physician has never seen that patient before. Because of the work done by trained medical transcriptionists, patients can be assured that the history of their medical care is portrayed accurately and legibly. Medical transcriptionists have therefore become a vital link between the physician and the patient.

It is appropriate for our Nation to recognize the contributions of medical transcriptionists. We should encourage hospitals, allied health education programs, and community colleges to provide appropriate courses of instruction recognizing the high standards that must be met by medical transcriptionists and the vital function they perform.

Finland Concerning Peaceful Uses of Nuclear Energy and accompanying annexes and agreed minute; my written approval, authorization and determination concerning the agreement; and the memorandum of the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency with the Nuclear Proliferation Assessment Statement concerning the agreement. The joint memorandum submitted to me by the Secretaries of State and Energy, which includes a summary of the provisions of the agreement, and the views and recommendations of the Members of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission and the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency are also enclosed.

Non-Proliferation Act, which sets forth certain requirements for new agreements for peaceful nuclear cooperation with other countries. In my judgment, the proposed agreement for cooperation between the United States and Finland, together with its accompanying agreed minute, meets all statutory requirements.

Government of Finland to confirm and refine a framework for peaceful nuclear cooperation between our two countries in a manner which recognizes both the shared non-proliferation objectives and the friendly and harmonious relations between the United States and Finland. The agreement will in my view further the non-proliferation and foreign policy interests of the United States.

Under current law, this agreement may be brought into force upon the completion of 60 days of continuous session of the Congress. However, the pending Export Administration Act reauthorization bill would revise the procedures in sections 123 and 130 of the Atomic Energy Act for bringing the agreement into force. If these amendments are enacted in their current form before the completion of the 60-day period provided for in current law, this agreement will not be brought into force until an additional 30 days of continuous session has passed, in keeping with the intent of the proposed amendments. In that case, this submittal shall constitute a submittal for purposes of both section 123 d. of the Atomic Energy Act and section 123 b. as it is proposed to be amended. The Administration is prepared to begin consultation with the Senate Foreign Relations and House Foreign Affairs Committees on the proposed agreement immediately.

Representative to the Mutual and Balanced Force Reductions (MBFR) talks in Vienna, which reconvene this week. The U.S. delegation in Vienna together with those of our NATO allies are seeking to reach an equitable and verifiable agreement with the Warsaw Pact on the reduction to equal levels of conventional force manpower in central Europe. Such an agreement would enhance stability and security, reduce the risk of war, and promote mutual confidence in Europe.

Ambassador Blackwill's work in Vienna will go hand in hand with U.S. participation in other negotiations that seek to promote security and stability. In Geneva, the United States next week will return for a second round of negotiations with the Soviet Union on nuclear and space arms in an effort to enhance stability and eliminate entirely the risk of nuclear war. Also in Geneva, the United States has submitted to the 40-nation Disarmament Conference a draft treaty for the complete and verifiable prohibition of chemical weapons. And in Stockholm at the Conference on Confidence and Security Building Measures and Disarmament in Europe (CDE), the NATO alliance is actively seeking agreement on concrete measures to reduce the risks of surprise attack in Europe.

The President urged Ambassador Blackwill, together with his Western colleagues in Vienna, to probe for all possible areas of agreement in order to achieve concrete results, noting that if the Soviet Union and its partners show a similar degree of willingness to find mutually acceptable solutions to the difficult issues on the table, progress in MBFR will be possible.

What the American Congress and the American people should remember is that 24 hours after this request by President Ronald Reagan was rejected by the Congress, President Daniel Ortega was in Moscow saying hello to Chairman Gorbachev of the Soviet Communist Party.

I think that everybody recognizes that this vote in the Congress of the United States in which they rejected the request of President Reagan for humanitarian assistance for the contras was a victory for President Daniel Ortega and for the Communist Party, and I think that it's not my business, but the Congress of the United States decides -- the thing was lost by two votes and I can't interfere in domestic American politics. But, although I'm not an American, I think that you should feel proud in the United States that the United States has recovered its leadership position in the world under a great leader named Ronald Reagan.

And so, we in Central America are fighting for the establishment of democratic regimes that represent the will of the people freely expressed. We're fighting for liberty; we're fighting for justice. We strongly support the Contadora process; their meetings continue.

The five Central American countries that participate in that process -- the one that places the most obstacles in the path of a peaceful solution within a global framework for the entire region is precisely the regime in Nicaragua.

I've told journalists that have visited Honduras that they should try going to Cuba, Afghanistan, and Moscow and speak as freely as they do in the United States and in Honduras and see what would happen under these Communist governments. They'd wind up in jail or who knows what.

President Suazo. I'd like to remind you that the shield of Honduras says, ``A free, sovereign, and independent . . . .'' What I've said represents my beliefs. I believe that President Reagan has recovered the position of leadership that the United States had been losing. And all of us who believe in democracy have regained our faith and our trust in this leadership; our faith and trust have been reborn.

I think he's a man who makes vigorous decisions, and I think the American people should think about this and pray to the Lord God Almighty that He illuminate the President in the decisions that he makes.

And furthermore, President Reagan is not an executioner. He is not a dictator by any matter of means. And he's always been a strong believer in democracy, and he never has imposed any kind of restrictions on a free, sovereign and independent country like Honduras.

We've had very useful discussions during which both of us expressed our satisfaction with the positive relationship that our two countries enjoy. We're in full agreement that the growth of democracy and economic opportunity is essential to peace and security in Central America.

We reviewed the accomplishments of the U.S.-Honduran joint commission established last year to promote the closest possible cooperation between our two governments. The joint commission is an excellent example of how friends can work together in a framework of mutual respect and cooperation.

I expressed to President Suazo my personal appreciation for his government's strong support for our policies in Central America. Our two governments share serious concern over the threat to the entire region posed by the Communist Sandinista regime in Nicaragua and its Cuban and Soviet supporters. President Suazo and I renewed our commitment to face this challenge together and to counter aggression and subversion.

Honduras and the United States both back a comprehensive solution based on full, verifiable implementation of the Contadora document of objectives, including dialog to achieve national reconciliation through democratic elections.

President Suazo and I are today issuing a joint statement that sums up the state of relations between our two countries. In it, the American commitment to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Honduras is restated in clear and firm terms.

Finally, it was a great personal pleasure to meet again with President Suazo. Honduras is on the path to democracy -- a course which will in the long run ensure its people the fruits of freedom and prosperity.

This visit takes place a scant 6 months prior to general elections in Honduras. And for the first time in 50 years, a civilian will have the great privilege of handing over the reins of government to another civilian elected in free and honest elections.

Our emerging democracy has been subjected to the worst economic crisis of the century and exposed to the most severe international threats. These circumstances have made our task more difficult. Not everything I would have liked to have done has been possible. However, I will hand over to my legitimate successor a nation enjoying complete freedom, ready to face the challenges of the future with faith in its capacity for progress and with a deep-rooted conviction of justice.

Honduras, which has honored friendship and solidarity with other democracies, also needs it friends. It requires a clear expression of support in order to continue its development in peace, security, and with justice and liberty for all.

Honduras and the United States, a new relationship which is based on mutual respect and cooperation with interdependency. A new relationship takes into account our differences and our common interests, our needs, and our potential.

Thus, we have reaffirmed the general principles of a new relationship in economic as well as security matters. We have decided to continue to maintain on a permanent basis the high-level commissions which have been meeting to deal with these matters and to have systematic consultations between the Secretary of State and the Foreign Minister of Honduras.

Honduran people in order to stabilize and reactivate our economy. We have reached a mutually satisfactory agreement for the disbursement of aid programs for this year. And talks have been initiated to project economic and technical cooperation over the coming years. This dialog will allow us to give proper attention to the renewed efforts which will have to be made in order to speed up a process of economic, social, and administrative reform. The success of democracy in Honduras will depend on carrying out these efforts.

Even though social justice, the sustained development of our economy, and political participation should be the basis of our national security, President Reagan and I have evaluated the international dangers faced by Honduras, the Central American region, and the United States itself. Our countries will not fail to provide assistance to each other in order to face these threats.

America, we shall continue our efforts to reach a negotiated agreement within the Contadora peace initiative. We look forward to a full and verifiable regional peace and cooperation agreement based on the 21 objectives set forth by the five Central American states.

Mr. President, our talks have proven to be very helpful in promoting excellent links of friendship and cooperation between our peoples and governments, as well as for the peace and security of the Central American region. I shall return to Honduras having reaffirmed my admiration for the American people, my faith in the understanding of its legislators, and my confidence that the leadership, which you undoubtedly exert, will always be present to serve the ideals that make this nation great, ideals which were shared by the founding fathers of our respective nations when they were searching for independence, democracy, and liberty.

The two Presidents noted with satisfaction the warm, cooperative ties between the two nations, including the very close security relationship which contributes to peace and stability in the Central American region and strengthens the independence and sovereignty of their respective nations. Both Presidents expressed great satisfaction with the work of the Joint Commission on U.S.-Honduran relations that was formed in Washington in November 1984 to promote, on the basis of sovereign equality and mutual respect, sustained economic and social development and enhanced security.

Government of Honduras and the support of that program by the United States through economic assistance funds. They reaffirmed the agreements reached by the Joint Commission for the disbursement during 1985 of $147.5 million in Economic Support Funds. The two Presidents expressed approval of the objectives of the Honduran economic program to achieve sustained, non-inflationary economic growth through measures to control fiscal and balance of payments deficits.

They endorsed the mutual efforts to encourage expansion of the productive and exporting sectors of the Honduran economy. They agreed that their governments will cooperate closely and will seek increasing levels of bilateral and multilateral economic assistance to support economic stability, growth, and development to improve the living standard of the people of Honduras.

They further expressed satisfaction with the substantive progress made in the Joint Commission's review of the following areas of mutual interest: operating procedures related to the scheduling and planning of combined military exercises; counter-terrorism training; U.S. use of Honduran military facilities and airspace; and continued joint consultations and security threat analysis to facilitate Honduran planning of minimum force and force modernization requirements.

In the context of their review of the security relationship, the two Presidents reaffirmed their governments' intention to continue to work closely together to confront the serious threats to the peace and security of both countries through mutual assistance and the development of defensive capabilities. To this end, the Government of the United States will continue to cooperate, as necessary and appropriate, in the strengthening of Honduras' defenses and the modernization of its armed forces.

The Government of the United States further reiterated its firm and unwavering commitment to cooperate in the defense of the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Honduras in accordance with the reciprocal rights and obligations relating to individual and collective self defense and the use of armed force, as expressed in the Inter-American Treaty of Reciprocal Assistance, the Charter of the United Nations and the Charter of the Organization of American States.

In view of the very close and cooperative nature of the two countries' political and security relationships and the very serious security threats that exist in Central America, the Governments of the United States and Honduras reaffirm the rights and obligations in these three agreements, including Article 3 of the Inter-American Treaty of Reciprocal Assistance, Article 51 of the Charter of the United Nations and Article 21 of the Charter of the Organization of American States. In case of an armed attack against Honduras, the United States will take appropriate measures, consistent with the rights and obligations cited above, to consult with and support in a timely and effective manner the Government of Honduras in its efforts to defend its sovereignty and territorial integrity against communist aggression.

American people can be fulfilled only in a climate of peace and liberty. In this sense, they expressed their firm support for a verifiable and comprehensive implementation of the Contadora Document of Objectives including, in particular, dialogue to achieve national reconciliation in the democratic framework.

Four-and-a-half years ago when we picked up the mantle, I fully understood that if our southern neighbors were to live in peace and be spared the tragedy of Communist dictatorship, we must have a balanced policy on Latin America. Our strategy's been based on four mutually reinforcing elements. We've been seeking to help bolster the development of democratic institutions, to improve the living conditions of the people and restore economic growth, to provide security assistance and thwart Communist-supported subversion and aggression, to find realistic diplomatic solutions to conflict in the region.

State for Inter-American Affairs. Elliott has been an articulate spokesman for our country in the field of human rights. And I'm looking forward to working even more closely with you. Now, just make sure you get all the phone numbers of everybody in the room before they leave today.

With the energy and the creative talents of people like Bill Middendorf, Elliott Abrams, all of you here today, much has been accomplished in Central America. The people there, with the regrettable exception of Nicaragua, are enjoying the rising democratic tide.

Well, developing countries are discovering that the only things produced by communism are oppression and deprivation. The political freedom now emerging in Latin America gives us reason to be optimistic about the changes for economic progress. We're doing all we can to work with the new democracies in Central America, our neighbors in the Caribbean, and other countries in the hemisphere to strengthen their democratic institutions and to invigorate their domestic economies.

We're spending hundreds of millions of dollars in health initiatives, housing and infrastructure programs, food and agricultural assistance also, and employment projects and educational opportunities, including scholarships permitting young people in the region -- many of them from poor families -- to study here in the United States. Now, more can and will be done in each of these areas.

In the Caribbean our Caribbean Basin Initiative went into effect January 1, 1984. It's just beginning to take hold. Companies are starting to respond to new incentives that provide for manufacturers of most goods 12 years of duty-free commerce with the United States. This should encourage domestic and foreign investment. Already, some 250 to 300 new export-oriented investments in the region have created over 30,000 jobs.

Our administration has stressed the necessity of strong private sector involvement if economic progress is to be made in Latin America. The single most important reform any government can make is to lower its peoples' personal income tax. Government spending programs -- but what I should say, not just income tax -- I'm sorry, I've been just coming from a session having to do with our own income tax -- lowered personal tax rates in those countries. Government spending programs aimed at building the infrastructure will not do the job.

The efficiency, the ingenuity, and vitality of private enterprise and free people must be brought into play. I'd like to express my appreciation for the courage and foresight of those American companies who, during a time of economic uncertainty, invested in the future of Latin America.

I think we've turned the corner, and better times are ahead for our neighbors to the south. Our own economic growth has helped and continues to help stimulate growth in Latin America. And as their economies come around, their prosperity will add to ours.

I'd also like to thank Puerto Rico's Governor, Rafael Hernandez Colon, with us today, for the support that you've given to help us promote democracy and economic progress in the entire Caribbean region.

Now, last week I met with President Duarte of El Salvador, a country that is turning around a desperate economic situation and making great progress in its efforts to develop the institutions of democracy. I couldn't help but remember how close the House vote was last year on the crucial issue of military assistance to his government. A loss would likely have undermined everything that President Duarte was trying to accomplish.

Recently a top Salvadoran guerrilla leader surrendered. And according to press reports, this commandant confirmed, as have other defectors, what we've been trying to tell some of the doubting Members of Congress: Nicaragua supplies and supports the Communist insurgency in El Salvador. The former Salvadoran guerrilla leader reportedly confirmed they'd been getting 20,000 to 30,000 rounds of ammunition and 5,000 sticks of TNT from Nicaragua every month, and he asserts they get 70 percent of their arms from Nicaragua. One encouraging thing we can say is that this does reflect something of a decline in what has been normal over the recent years; so possibly we're having some success in intercepting those shipments.

With that, the Communists have been conducting military operations, kidnaping and murdering village mayors, and destroying El Salvador's economic infrastructure -- blowing up bridges, power lines, and more. This is aggression, pure and simple. Those who willfully ignore this aggression endanger freedom in Central America and, in the long run, the security of the United States.

Let there be no mistake, helping those who fight for freedom and supplying security assistance for our democratic friends in Central America are vital to the future of that region and to our national security as well.

I thank each of you for what you're doing to make the dream of the Americas come true from one end of the hemisphere to the other. I need your active help to inform your fellow citizens and the Congress of how vital it is for us to see our southern neighbors through this time of economic uncertainty and Communist subversion. Together we can work with the people of Latin America to build a freer, more prosperous future. And I know I can count on you.

Well, looking out over your faces in this inspiring and historic setting gives reason for confidence in our nation's future. These last 4 years have been spent preparing you to assume responsibility for the protection of our country and all that we stand for. You're part of a noble tradition.

America's independence and freedom, since we were but 13 Colonies huddled along the Atlantic coast, have relied on the bravery, the good sense, and leadership of her officer corps. We've leaned heavily on men of the sea, on our Navy and Marine Corps. Your careers will be no less significant to future generations of Americans than those of past naval heroes.

You will hear during your career, as I've heard during times in my life, that maintaining the military at peak readiness -- keeping our forces trained and supplied with the best weapons and equipment -- is too costly. Well, I say it is too costly for America not to be prepared. As Presidents since Washington have noted: The way to prevent war is to be prepared for it.

And as obvious as that is, it's not always appreciated. There's a story about John Paul Jones' chief gunners mate. It was during the gore and thunder of that most historic battle. He was loading and firing cannon and carrying the wounded to the medical officer, cutting away the tangled rigging.

Well, today as throughout our history, it is strength not weakness, resolve not vacillation, that will keep the peace. It's about time that those who place their faith in wishful thinking and good intentions get the word.

During the 1930's I saw America, disillusioned by the First World War, permit our military power to decline. The lack of will on the part of the Western democracies encouraged the totalitarians of that day. Churchill called what followed the most avoidable of all wars, and it turned out to be the most costly of all wars, both in terms of resources and in terms of human suffering.

Americans were spared much of the direct ravages of the Second World War due to geography, the grace of God, and the incredible skill and unmatched courage of our Armed Forces in the desperate months after Pearl Harbor. Fighting a delaying action, often against overwhelming odds, they bought the time needed to build our forces. Coral Sea, Midway, Guadalcanal are names that have gone down in the annals of truly historic battles. I couldn't help but see those names up there on the stadium. Many good men gave their lives in the 1940's for America's unwillingness to prepare in the 1930's. Let me promise you: As long as I'm President that will not happen again.

Since the end of the Second World War, American military might has been an immensely positive force in the world. We used our economic resources to help rebuild the devastated homelands of our allies and of our former enemies as well. Those people, wherever they are in this world, who've enjoyed the rights to speak and to pray and to direct the course of their government through democratic elections owe their freedom to one degree or another to the protection of the United States military. It doesn't take much imagination to know how different things would be had the Soviet Union, not the United States, militarily and economically dominated the world after 1945.

States and the Soviet Union are morally equivalent. This reasoning does a great disservice to our forefathers and all the brave individuals throughout our history who have fought and died to keep this country free. The United States is a democratic nation of free people. We are a far more moral and decent land than any totalitarian state, and we should be proud of it.

And how did the Soviets seize this historic opportunity for better relations? They raced forward with the largest peacetime military expansion in history. They built almost three times as many ships as we did in the 1970's, turning what had once been a navy aimed at coastal defense into an offensively designed, blue-water navy -- a formidable threat to peace and stability throughout the world. The Soviet's Pacific fleet alone now has more than 500 vessels, including two aircraft carriers and more than 130 submarines.

America's weakened defenses, and I'm proud to say that much progress has been made. I know you're ready for the Navy, and I can tell you the Navy is now much more ready for you. And thanks to Secretary of the Navy John Lehman's aggressive leadership, we now have 532 battleforce ships in commission. In 1984 alone, the Navy took delivery of 25 ships. We currently have 102 battleforce ships under construction or conversion in 21 shipyards. By the end of the decade, we'll realize our goal of a 600-ship Navy, which will include 15 deployable aircraft carriers.

And we've taken the steps necessary to make certain that our ships are in fighting trim and able to accomplish their mission. We've moved forward to ferret out waste and inefficiency. And by the way, that's why you hear those stories about outrageously expensive hammers or bolts and things of that kind. We're finding the waste and cutting it out. Those press stories are actually success stories, because by and large they represent our efforts to make the best use of our defense dollar.

To make sure our military is ready, we've purchased spare parts, ammunition, better and more efficient equipment, and top-of-the-line weapons systems. Most important, we've got the best darn bunch of officers and crews this Navy or any navy has ever had.

By the end of the 1970's many of our military personnel were demoralized. The purchasing power of their pay had eroded, as had public recognition of their service. Enlisting quality personnel was increasingly difficult, and the reenlistment rates plummeted. We had ships that couldn't leave port for lack of a full crew.

Today that situation has been dramatically reversed. We've not only been meeting our recruitment goals but we're bringing in individuals fully capable of handling the sophisticated equipment and high-tech weapons systems of the modern Navy. Reenlistment rates are up in all of the services.

And testing among our sailors and marines suggests that drug use, once a major problem, has dropped more than anyone would have predicted possible. And I've heard of your excellent record in this area, and I commend you for it.

And having gotten them there and then strapped in, they took them up and gave them the works, the whole load. Well, this group of somewhat upset officers -- [laughter] -- returned to the naval base. And then they thought they should return the favor, so they invited the flyboys to come over and learn something about the submarine service.

And they took them out in the submarine, and they were below, and they dived. And then all of a sudden, bells began ringing, and sirens sounding, and fellows were running back and forth, and there were red lights flashing. And it seemed that there was a dial there that said that they were not coming out of their dive. They were going on down. And worriedly they pointed out to these flyers what this meant -- that if it passed that red point on the dial, that was below the ability of the submarine to withstand the pressure.

And the great democratic nations of the world are tied by shared values and a reliance on the sealanes. Our treaty commitments mean little without access to the Atlantic, the Pacific, the Caribbean, the Mediterranean, the Indian Ocean, the Persian Gulf -- all the great bodies of water.

The challenge is great. Our Navy is meeting a heavier responsibility than we had in the sixties and meeting it with fewer ships. And that means the officers and crew of every vessel must work harder, carry a heavier load, and endure longer, more strenuous cruises. The Ticonderoga, our first Aegis-equipped, guided-missile cruiser, spent over 80 percent of her time underway during a 6\1/2\ month maiden cruise in 1984. That same year the aircraft carrier Ranger and her battle group set a record for sustained continuous operations for conventional-powered carrier battle groups -- 121 days, steaming more than 50,000 miles.

Men and women on these and other ships are under great stress, handling advanced weapons systems and sophisticated equipment. And that's all the more reason to salute them after setting a new record for aircraft safety last year. Many who served could easily have better paying civilian jobs. Sailors on the carriers are away from their families 70 percent of the time; yet 60 percent of these fine young people reenlist.

In today's Navy, as with the other services, the Reserves are playing an increasingly important role. Who are they? Citizens concerned about the future of this country and determined to do their part. They share their time, energy, and talent to keep America strong, safe, and free.

Sometimes it's hard to find the words to express my heartfelt gratitude for those who serve on active duty and in the Reserves. But it isn't difficult to find the words to explain why they do what they do. It only takes one word -- patriotism. And as Commander in Chief, I am overwhelmed at times by their dedication and courage.

Or they are on the ground, in the dirt, testing and training weapons that may someday kill others but today may deal them that same irony. The smallest margin of error separates a live man from a dead man. And in war, of course, they are the first and usually the only ones to pay. The President and the Congress may suffer bad news stories. The military man suffers the deaths of his friends, early and often.'' End quote.

I want each of you to know that this President understands and appreciates the job that you will be doing. Your lives are precious. You are putting yourselves in harm's way for America's sake, and I will do everything in my power to make certain the country gives you the tools and equipment you need to do your job and to come home safely.

There's a new appreciation for our men and women in military service. One manifestation of this is the effort now going forth to build a Navy memorial in the Nation's Capital, a living tribute to you and all those in the United States Navy, officers and enlisted, who have gone before you.

Whether we remain at peace, whether we remain free, will depend on you -- on your character, your decisions, your leadership. Our ships are in a state of forward deployment, adding both to our deterrence and to our flexibility in dealing with any potential crisis. The theory of deterrence means more than preventing nuclear war. That certainly is an aspect of deterrence, an important one in which the Navy, with her fleet of Poseidon and Trident submarines, is a leading player.

But the spectrum of conflict ranges from terrorism and guerrilla warfare through conventional and nuclear confrontation. The Navy is an intricate part of a wide-ranging strategy of deterrence across this spectrum. We hope to dissuade hostile action at any level by persuading potential aggressors that whatever their target they'll lose more than they will gain. The Navy and Marine Corps' power and forward deployment puts them on the front lines of deterrence. The leadership and judgment of naval officers, serving in the far reaches of the globe, are critical to our success as a nation.

So, let me leave you with these thoughts. Your countrymen have faith in you and expect you to make decisions. The issues will not be black and white, otherwise there would be no decision to make. Do not be afraid to admit and consider your doubts, but don't be paralyzed by them. Be brave. Make your judgment and then move forward with confidence, knowing that although there's never 100-percent certainty, you have honestly chosen what you believe to be, as you have been told by the Admiral, the right course. Do this, and the American people will always back you up.

Federal advisory committees have been referred to variously as the fourth arm of government or as a public-private partnership. Known by many names and descriptions, these committees play an important role in determining public policy and contribute to our Nation's security, economic vitality, scientific achievements, and quality of life.

In fiscal year 1984, over 25,000 private citizens representing nearly every occupation and geographical area exemplified our great American tradition of civic service by participating as members of Federal advisory committees. These individuals devoted countless thousands of hours of talent and expertise to developing and offering recommendations affecting almost every Federal program.

Because most advisory committees have low operating costs and the great majority of committee members serve on a noncompensated basis, the Federal government receives tremendous benefit for a modest investment. However, committee productivity is not uniform as some committees have outlived their usefulness while others receive insufficient support and attention from their sponsoring agencies. In the interest of good management I have directed all executive departments and agencies to undertake a thorough review of their committees to eliminate those that are unnecessary and to strengthen management and oversight of those that remain. A task force of senior agency personnel from several agencies chaired by the General Services Administration has been commissioned to carry out this initiative during fiscal year 1985.

It should be noted that the 1985 Annual Report of the Medicare Board of Trustees indicates that projected annual revenues from payroll taxes are expected to be sufficient to pay annual enrollee benefits for Medicare Part A through the first part of the next decade, and reserves in the Hospital Insurance Trust Fund are likely to be sufficient to cover annual shortfalls for an additional five years. Data from the 1985 Trustees Report should be used to update statements made on page 21 of the Annual Report of the Federal Council on the Aging.

From my days on the dinner circuit and in Hollywood, I can remember when associations holding a dinner and wanted someone prominent in public life to attend their annual dinner they would notify the individual that he or she had recently won the society's highest award, an award that they could collect if they showed up. And if they didn't, they would pick somebody else to give the honor to.

Well, a couple of months ago an invitation for lunch at the White House was sent to some of the individuals gathered in this room today, an invitation that also notified them they were recipients of this country's highest civilian honor. But I want to assure you that as flattered as Nancy and I are to have you here, this was not some conspiracy on our part to get this distinguished and talented group over to the house for lunch. Because, you see, the invitation really did not come from us at all. It comes from an entire nation, from all of America.

For your achievements in diplomacy, entertainment, government, politics, learning, culture, and science, the American people honor you today. Each of you has achieved that hardest of all things to achieve in his life -- something that will last and endure and take on life of its own.

America's highest civilian honor. And 50 years from now, a century from now, historians will know your names and your achievements. You've left humanity a legacy, and on behalf of the American people, Nancy and I want to congratulate you.

You know, one of our medal winners today once made a film with Frank Capra about a man who took his own life for granted and was saddened by how little impact he seemed to have had on the world. But then a benevolent angel gave him the opportunity to see how different his hometown would have been had he not lived. And the man was astonished to discover how much good he had done without knowing it -- how many people he had touched and how many lives he had made richer and happier.

Well, more than you will ever know, this world would have been much poorer and a dimmer place without each of you. In a million countless ways you've inspired and uplifted your fellow men and women, and we want you never to forget that. And we are grateful to you for it, also.

But I'm about to present the medals, but I want each of you to know that it comes with the heartfelt thanks, the admiration and pride of the some 238 million Americans who couldn't be here for lunch, but are, believe me, here in spirit.

For decades, Captain Jacques-Yves Cousteau has been a celebrated undersea explorer. His journeys aboard the Calypso have become known to millions through his books and films. His manned, undersea colonies yielded wealths of research and data and made important technical advances. His aqualung has made underwater diving available to all. Captain Cousteau perhaps has done more than any other individual to reveal the mysteries of the oceans that cover more than two-thirds of the surface of our planet. It is, therefore, likely that he will be remembered not only as a pioneer in his time but as a dominant figure in world history.

Scholar, philosopher, and thinker -- Sidney Hook stands as one of the most eminent intellectual forces of our time. His commitment to rational thought and civil discourse has made him an eloquent spokesman for fair play in public life. His devotion to freedom made him one of the first to warn the intellectual world of its moral obligations and personal stake in the struggle between freedom and totalitarianism. A man of truth, a man of action, Sidney Hook's life and work make him one of America's greatest scholars, patriots, and lovers of liberty.

Jeane Kirkpatrick held high the flag of our country with courage and wisdom. She is an endlessly articulate spokeswoman for the moral and practical benefits of freedom and a tireless defender of the decency of the West. Jeane Kirkpatrick is a patriot, and there is no honor more appropriate for her than one entitled, ``The Presidential Medal of Freedom.'' It's bestowed this day by a nation that knows Jeane Kirkpatrick's work has only just begun.

During his distinguished public service at NASA, Dr. George M. Low helped lead this nation's space program to its greatest achievements, directing the first manned landing on the moon and planning the shuttle program. As President of Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute, he continued to make his mark on the future, improving academic excellence and launching a program to spur technological innovation. Our nation will be reaping the benefits of his wisdom and vision for years to come.

Reporter and anchorman, family man and a patriot, Frank Reynolds' life exemplified the highest standards of his profession. His commitment to the truth, his unfailing sense of fairness, his long experience as both witness and participant in the great events of our time earned him the respect of his colleagues and the trust and admiration of the American people. We honor his memory for his aggressive but fair-minded reporting and devotion to profession, to family, and to country.

As one of America's most distinguished soldiers and patriots, Albert C. Wedemeyer has earned the gratitude of his country and the admiration of his countrymen. In the face of crisis and controversy, his integrity and his opposition to totalitarianism remained unshakeable. For his resolute defense of liberty and his abiding sense of personal honor, Albert C. Wedemeyer has earned the thanks and the deep affection of all who struggle for the cause of human freedom.

American success story. Since this country was founded, when over 90 percent of its labor force was on the farm, it has excelled at growing food and other agricultural products. This success was achieved long before we became a leader in industry, technology, science, and commerce.

Cyrus McCormack designed and built the first horse-drawn reaper. The United States now supplies food to millions of people around the world, and our productive capabilities grow still greater every year.

But the farmer's life is still difficult and dangerous. While the new technology that makes such bounty possible has brought advances in safety, it also carries its own risks, and requires knowledge and care in its use. Incidents of accidental death, injury, and job-related illnesses are still tragically numerous on the farms, in the homes, and on the roads of rural America. But with increased education about the need for farm safety, and with ongoing improvements in product design, there is hope that we can make real progress in protecting America's farmers and their families from accidents and injuries.

I urge all those Americans engaged in agriculture or its related services, and especially those training inexperienced or young workers, to establish and follow safety procedures and instill dedication and commitment to safety and health care in all those who can be influenced by their example.

Europe, marked by an uproar over your decision to visit a German military cemetery and by failure to obtain French agreement for a 1986 round of trade liberalization negotiations. How do you personally assess your European trip?

The President. Well, I think the headlines sometimes obscure the most significant events in public life and that history has a way of clarifying genuine achievement. Personally, I am very heartened by the results of my trip. I am confident that they do add up to real achievements and represent a success for the Western partnership as a whole. That is why I reported ``mission accomplished'' to the American people and Congress. For example, the visit definitely strengthened U.S.-German relations and the prospects for continuing peace in Europe -- twin accomplishments which have major importance for every country in Europe, not least of all Italy.

At the Bonn Economic Summit we agreed to a common strategy aimed at continued economic growth and job creation -- again, an accomplishment which vitally affects every country in Europe. And while it is true that one country out of the seven summit participants did not join the rest of us in agreeing on a date to begin multilateral trade talks, we did move much closer to our goal of launching those talks. I was also heartened by the across-the-board support for our arms control efforts positions in Geneva.

In my speech to the European Parliament, we set forth a framework for improved U.S.-Soviet relations, spelling out a number of constructive, commonsense, confidence-building measures aimed at lowering tensions. Here, too, we were dealing with the crucial issue of war and peace as well as the shape of Europe during the rest of this century and on into the next. And in that context I should mention my stops in Spain and Portugal, Europe's newest democracies. There, we saw heartening proof that freedom works.

Finally, let me add how much I appreciate the very special flavor which your country provided to my trip. In the first place it was pleasant, as always, to have the company of your Prime Minister, representing his democratic coalition government, during the economic summit in Bonn. Mr.

Craxi's vigor, poise, and intelligence tangibly contributed to the value of our discussions and the positive statements we produced. And, of course, I was very personally pleased by Nancy's program in Rome and the marvelous hospitality she found there. I hope it's not too presumptuous for a proud husband to note that Nancy's work on drug abuse interested all of my colleagues and was a constructive accompaniment to our summit agreement for intensified cooperation against international drug trafficking.

Q. Mr. President, from your discussions in Bonn with your European partners and allies did you get a sense that they are ready to cooperate with the United States in the research program for the Strategic Defense Initiative, even if the Soviets and other critics of the program will protest that SDI runs counter to the ABM treaty?

The President.  There is no question that all of our key allies -- and that of course includes Italy -- are extremely interested in our Stategic Defense Initiative. During the Bonn Economic Summit, I was delighted to see that all of our partners support our SDI research program as prudent and necessary. Whether they choose to participate in our research effort is, of course, for them to decide. We know there are a number of questions, but I wish to emphasize that we would welcome participation by our allies.

As for Soviet protests that such research runs counter to the ABM treaty, I can only say that such protests are factually wrong and proceed from cynical efforts to distort the meaining of the ABM treaty. The truth is, we are and will remain in full compliance with our ABM treaty obligations.

It is also important to know that the Soviets themselves obviously understand the value of defensive systems. The Soviets are spending as much on defense as offense, and of course they have the only operational ABM and antisatellite systems deployed by anyone in the world. Given their actions, it's only reasonable that we proceed with our research program.

The President. I believe that it is far too early in this extraordinarily complex set of negotiations -- which address strategic nuclear weapons, intermediate-range nuclear weapons, and space weapons -- to speak of deadlock. In any event, we firmly oppose the idea that progress in any one area of the negotiations should or must be held hostage to progress in any other area. Rigid insistence on such a self-defeating formula would violate both common sense and mankind's genuine interest in achieving the widest possible agreement on arms reductions. I believe that it is very much in the Soviets' own interests to avoid placing purely artificial impediments in the way of achievement, and I am hopeful that they will join with us in working for a safer, more stable, and more peaceful international community.

Q. The first phase of the Geneva talks was relatively unproductive, by admission of your own administration. In part, this has been attributed to the Soviet desire to see if they could get anything from the U.S. without bargaining. Are you hopeful that some real bargaining may now begin in Geneva? And in which one of the three baskets of negotiations?

The President. My ardent desire is that through patient and serious and realistic negotiations we can make significant progress in all three of the baskets, as you call them. Obviously, I do not underestimate the difficulties of our task. After all, these negotiations affect our vital security interests. But because they do entail issues that are literally matters of life and death, it is imperative that we stick with them and not let ourselves be discouraged by either the slow pace of progress or by the tactics which the Soviets themselves might from time to time adopt in the hope that these will weaken Western cohesion and resolve.

Q. In your judgement, which are the areas that potentially are more suited to an improvement of relations with the Soviet Union and in which you could achieve some progress in a summit meeting with Mr. Gorbachev?

The President. Well, I am not really sure it would be helpful for me to speculate at this point on what areas of improved relations might come out of an eventual meeting with Mr. Gorbachev. I might note that while I have publicly expressed my interest in such a meeting and my willingness to meet with Mr. Gorbachev, he himself has not yet officially indicated when -- or for that matter where -- he thinks a meeting should take place. In general, however, I would emphasize to you a view I have often voiced in the past: It is always much better to be talking to a person than about him. And if and when Mr. Gorbachev and I get together -- which I hope will be soon -- you can be sure, for the American part, that it will be in the spirit of good will, seriousness, and a determination to explore whatever avenue may be open toward better understanding, reduced tensions, and peace. I must underline, however, that meetings do not in and of themselves guarantee progress -- it is the overall relationship between our countries that counts, and this relationship is not enhanced when expectations about any one meeting are too high.

Q. Are you concerned that a strong push by the Europeans for a summit conference, and possibly in the direction of a new detente, may create a situation in which the tactics of the summit may be more important than the substance of the discussions? What are your bottom-line conditions in requesting a well-prepared summit?

Economic Summit further convinced me that European leaders attach far more importance to the substance of East-West relations than to what you call tactics. Their stakes in a genuinely improved East-West climate are as strong -- perhaps even stronger than our own, and they do not want such a critical relationship built on illusion, ambiguity, or misunderstanding. Despite what the Soviets themselves may be hoping or saying for propaganda purposes, the Western track record is impressive when it comes to sizing up our adversary and taking joint action in response.

Allied firmness on commitment to the two-track NATO decision on intermediate-range missiles is eloquent proof of that. So, yes, we will be well prepared on our side for a summit meeting, and the bottom line for us means, as I earlier indicated, a meeting based on a spirit of good will, seriousness, and a sincere effort to address and, if possible, improve the core concerns of our relationship.

The President. I am delighted to have you here for this signing of H.R. 1869. It repeals a requirement for a very extensive regulation -- an unnecessary one, I think, on people who use business vehicles for private purposes also. And I am glad to have you here, and it is just a part of what I hope will be a larger tax reform later, so we can all be together for another signing. But more about that next week.

Virginia, a career member of the Senior Foreign Service, Class of Minister-Counselor, in his capacity as deputy to the head of the United States delegation to the arms reduction negotiations in Geneva.

The President today accorded the personal rank of Ambassador to Henry F. Cooper, of Virginia, in his capacity as Deputy United States Negotiator for Defense and Arms, arms reduction negotiations in Geneva.

In recent years, as our administration has fought to halt the growth of government and expand the freedom in the marketplace, your association has given valuable support. I owe each of you a deep debt of gratitude. And I'd like to take this opportunity to give particular thanks to your chairman, Stan Pace, your president, Sandy Trowbridge, and your vice chairman, Bob Dee.

And so it is with our nation. We've been blessed with a vast and beautiful land and with an energetic and enterprising people. Yet it's up to us to keep our nation prosperous, strong, and free. We must examine our problems, decide upon the solutions, and then forcefully and without hesitation take action.

Napoleon Duarte about Central America, an area where the principle of forthright action unmistakably applies. My remarks today will focus on the budget and tax reform, but permit me to say a few words first about this region I've just mentioned.

Our policy in Central America is straightforward. We intend, first, to offer support to the free nations of the region, to those that have already achieved democracy, and to those that are working toward it in good faith. Democracy in the region has achieved a firm foothold. Costa Rica has long been a healthy democracy. Honduras is making strides, and now, under the leadership of President Duarte and in the face of attacks by Communist guerrillas, El Salvador, too, is making progress. Just last week the New York Times carried a front page story on El Salvador that reported human rights violations at a 5-year low, new successes in countering the Communist guerrillas, and a rising international confidence in El Salvador itself.

We are also determined to prevent the Communist regime in Nicaragua from exporting revolution. Since taking power in 1979 that regime has established regular censorship of the press, harassed the church, driven the Jewish community out of the country, and practiced virtual genocide against the Miskito Indians. They have expanded their military forces from 5,000 troops to regular forces of more than 60,000; from a handful of tanks and aircraft to more than 350 armored vehicles and tanks and an air force of 30 helicopters and 45 fixed-wing aircraft.

America just 700 miles from our territory. Already more than 250,000 Nicaraguans have fled, many flooding into Costa Rica and Honduras. If the Sandinistas, the Communists, are allowed to export their violence, the flood will grow and our Southern States could become virtual refugee camps for hundreds of thousands -- even millions -- of the dispossessed.

As for government revenues, despite a widespread impression to the contrary, they're actually on the rise. In 1984 Federal receipts increased 11 percent, a healthy gain of 7 percent, even after accounting for inflation. This fiscal year that remarkable pace is being sustained.

I had to believe it was working when they stopped calling it Reaganomics. [Laughter] Sadly, however, the historic achievements of recent years have been cast in shadow by a menace that could wipe them out -- the Federal deficit.

It's important to be clear about the source of the problem. This deficit has not arisen as a result of the tax cuts. On the contrary, as I've said, government revenues are actually on the rise even though we've reduced the rates. Instead the deficit problem is a problem of spending, spending without discipline or direction, spending that in recent decades has burgeoned absolutely out of control.

To begin to bring deficit spending under control, we've worked with the Senate to put together a package of spending cuts that would trim $56 billion from the budget next year and some $300 billion over 3 years. While, like all budget resolutions, it has its imperfections, the Senate resolution is historic, a major effort to control government spending. It will prepare the way for tax reform and help put our economy on a growth path through the end of the decade.

Yesterday the House passed its own budget resolution. It is, frankly, unacceptable -- unacceptable to me and to the American people. House sponsors claim that their plan will save some $56 billion -- in fact, billions of those savings would come from what could only be charitably described as phantom cuts. Even worse, the House plan fails adequately to address the fundamental problem of unbridled domestic spending. Instead it goes easy on the fat in domestic programs and turns instead to our Armed Forces, freezing the budget for our national defense at last year's level -- in real terms, a deep cut.

Yet such a further cut in defense spending would undermine our negotiating position in Geneva and put the defense of our nation at risk. My friends, the Senate has shown the way. We can cut the deficit while protecting our security. I want to thank you from the bottom of my heart for all the help that you provided during the Senate budget process. Now, we must work together to make certain that those Senate efforts are reflected in the final budget resolution. Can I count on you? [Applause] Thank you.

Next Tuesday I will address the Nation about a dramatic proposal to reform our system of taxation, the first comprehensive plan to modernize the system since the income tax code was enacted some 70 years ago. It is a proposal that will affect Americans of all ages and occupations and touch every aspect of the economic life of our country. Details of the proposal will have to wait until the address on Tuesday, but I would like to discuss with you the principles upon which our plan is based and the outlines of the plan itself.

We propose to replace a tax system that is almost universally regarded as needlessly complicated and unfair and replace it with a simpler, fairer, more streamlined model. Today almost half of all taxpaying Americans seek professional advice on filling out their forms, and there are probably a lot more every year who end up wishing they did. Tax reform will mean that you will not have to have an advanced degree in accounting to get your taxes right. Most people will be able to fill out their tax forms without paying for help and in a fraction of the time that they take now.

Today you can see advertisements for tax shelters and tax avoidance schemes with little or no economic justification, from credits for investments in windmills to deductions for so-called educational cruises on oceanliners. Well, the American people know that such waste doesn't come free. And that for everyone who finds a shelter, someone else is left out in the cold; that for everyone who avoids paying his fair share, someone else has to make up the shortfall by paying a heavier tax burden.

Just as important as the unfairness of all this is the tremendous waste of time, energy, resources that the present system entails. Instead of inventing a better mousetrap, our entrepreneurs and businessmen have to spend their time avoiding the tax trap. Steeply rising income tax rates punish success, discourage hard work and initiative, and cut into savings. And meanwhile, tax loopholes and shelters divert investment away from the productive economy and into areas that are often economically stagnant.

Tax considerations become paramount in business decisions, and the rationale and efficient allocation of resources by the market is distorted out of all recognition. Our economy becomes enmeshed in a bureaucracy instead of energized by opportunity. And economic growth slows, and with it, the creation of new jobs and businesses.

Well, we have a better idea. Let's remove government obstacles to growth, lower rates, close loopholes, and put this country on an ascending spiral of business formation, job creation, and technological innovation.

We've seen what the first tax cuts achieved in revitalizing our economy and setting it firmly on a path of healthy noninflationary growth. Tax reform is the necessary next step, truly returning us to the free market principles that made the United States the land of opportunity and the greatest economic power in the world.

As in the past, on so many of our initiatives, we'll be looking for your help. And I know that on this vital issue I can depend on your support. And, in advance, from the bottom of my heart, I thank you.

Two centuries ago, America was born in a rebellion against unfair taxation. Today another revolution is quietly growing, a peaceful revolution to restore this country to its original promise, to strike a blow for fairness, to break the last economic shackles from the land of the free and the home of the brave and propel America into a future of almost limitless possibilities.

It was April 13th then, and I'm sure many of you were approaching those final moments before your tax forms were due with a rising sense of frustration, even anger. Nobody's ever going to enjoy paying taxes; it just isn't human nature. But I also know that the American people wouldn't find the whole process so aggravating if they didn't feel our tax system was shot through with unfairness, inequality, and waste.

The American people are always willing, even eager, to do their duty. But you quite naturally resent it when you see others shirking theirs. It rankles to know that your tax rates are so high because others who can afford high-priced lawyers and tax consultants are able to manipulate the system to avoid paying their fair share. And it simply adds insult to injury when, on top of a large tax bill to the IRS, you have to pay a professional to tell you how much you owe.

The United States tax code is so mammoth, so incredibly complex that even experts can't agree on what it says. We've seen the damage an unfair tax system can do to our economy, our pocketbooks, our faith in American justice, and to our confidence in government institutions.

Well, that's all going to change. Next Tuesday we'll announce an historic change in the tax laws to remove the dark cloud of unfairness from our tax system. We're going to overhaul the whole rickety, jerry-rigged tax code and come out with a newer, sleeker model that will not only be fairer and simpler but will significantly reduce taxes for the majority of all Americans.

Starting today we're declaring the 1040 tax form an endangered species. Our plan is to make the paying of your taxes so easy that many Americans won't even have to fill out a form. We're going to do away with the inequities and the economically unjustifiable tax breaks, things like deductions for windmills and so-called educational cruises on luxury oceanliners.

By closing such loopholes, we'll be able to lower taxes and begin to flatten the present steeply rising system of tax brackets so that you can keep more of each additional dollar you earn. We want to knock down the barriers on the road to success so that all Americans can go as far as their hard work, skill, imagination, and creativity will take them. Closing wasteful business loopholes will also allow us to lower tax rates on America's businesses and entrepreneurs.

By lowering rates, we can unleash an entrepreneurial explosion of business formation, job growth, and technological innovation that will rival even our most optimistic dreams. Our plan will also recognize the central role of the American family in preserving and protecting our nation's values.

Since 1948 the personal exemption, which allows breadwinners to deduct a certain amount from their taxable income for every man, woman, and child who is dependent on them, has dwindled to a mere fraction of its original value. The result -- a tax increase of immense proportions that struck directly at the pocketbook of America's families. In effect, it's been families that have borne the burden of the explosive growth in government and domestic spending these last four decades.

Well, it's time families got a little help, and that's what we propose to do. By greatly expanding the personal exemption, raising the standard deduction, lowering rates, and retaining the home mortgage interest deduction on principal residences, we're going to make it a lot easier for struggling lower-income households and for the working-poor families to climb up the ladder of success.

This must be a priority of a profamily, pro-opportunity society. The timid, the cynical, and the special interests will combine to say that what we want -- fairness, hope, and opportunity -- is impossible. Well, they'll be wrong; they've been wrong so many times in these last 4\1/2\ years.

On Tuesday night I will be announcing the details of this historic tax package on nationwide TV. I hope you'll tune in and listen to what I have to say. This could be the single most important step we'll take in this decade to fulfill the American dream of hope and opportunity for us and for future generations.

Cemetery -- and I just wonder if because of the special character of this day, Memorial Day, if we couldn't perhaps bow our heads for a few seconds in silent prayer for those who have given their lives that we might live in liberty. [A silent prayer was observed.] Amen.

Well, indeed it is an honor for me to be here today to receive a magnificent gift that I received on a second and very much warmer Inauguration Day. I understand that in preparing for this event more than 2,500 young people worked with sponsors in the private sector who donated food, transportation, and lodging. And each of you who helped to make this private sector initiative possible has my heartfelt thanks.

You know, today we're enjoying a standard of living that, when I was your age, could not even have been imagined. Buoyed by medical breakthroughs and rising standards of living, the life expectancy of Americans has been increasing steadily for 50 years. I've already surpassed my own life expectancy at my birth by 20 years. Now, there are a lot of people that find that a source of annoyance, but I appreciate it very much.

Today we take for granted so many inventions that inspired wonder not long ago -- the polio vaccines of Dr. Jonas Salk and Dr. Albert Sabin; television, first in black and white and now in vivid color; drought-resistant seeds and cold-resistant grains; computers in the workplace and the home; spacecraft that can orbit the Earth for days and then land gently on a desert runway.

Despite the predictions so many made during the Great Depression when I was a young man, life in America today is not worse -- it's far better. And let us ask, then, what made it so? Was it government directing our daily lives?

During these past five decades the Government has indeed provided vital services and helped improve life for many people. No one doubts the necessity of a strong national defense or the role our military has played in keeping us free. Likewise no one doubts the importance of the government safety net for those in genuine need.

Yet our national experience shows that when government grows beyond these two limited duties, when government lays claim to more and more of our resources and begins, through massive regulation and high taxation, to impinge on our individual freedoms, then our economy grows not more prosperous but less so.

Throughout the 1970's, for example, government's growth was unbridled, yet our economy stagnated. By 1980 the gross national product registered zero growth. If it was not the Government that spurred our economic growth was it perhaps our natural resources? Our vast land has always been blessed by a mighty multitude of resources -- broad plains, powerful rivers, and rich deposits of minerals. Yet in a sense, the primary reality of a resource exists not in the earth but in the minds of the men and women who give it usefulness and value.

Consider oil. A century ago oil was nothing but a thick, foul, and useless liquid. It was the invention of the internal combustion engine that gave oil its function. Or think of sand, sand that used to be nothing but the stuff that deserts are made of. The development of the silicon microchip has given sand a vital function. And today we use it to make chips that give home computers their intelligence, monitor functions on aircraft, and guide our satellites through the dark reaches of space. No, it's not been so much our resources or our government that have given us our enduring vibrancy and growth but the initiative and enterprise of individual Americans.

Air travel, for example, has become commonplace because test pilots like Lindbergh had daring, and engineers like Boeing and Douglas had the wits and determination. The Government might have wished it could simply decree a polio vaccine, but it took years of unremitting effort and dedication by Doctors Salk and Sabin to make the vaccines a reality.

In this setting, one story of a private initiative is particularly appropriate. Back in Missouri in the early 1900's there lived a farmboy who discovered that he had a knack for drawing barnyard animals. As an adult, he began to put his animals into cartoons, and he became convinced that he could entertain people by telling stories about a little creature with a high voice, red trousers, and yellow shoes and white gloves.

Professionals in the field made fun of the idea, and to produce his first cartoons the young man had to sell or pawn virtually everything he owned. But today, 57 years later, this man and his creation have become permanently fixed in the history of our popular culture. His name was Walt Disney; his little creature was Mickey Mouse.

The determination that each of these heroes of progress demonstrated came from within. Yet in each case it was crucial to the success of their efforts that they were operating in a climate of economic liberty -- in a free market where they could make use of pooled resources, experiment with new techniques and products, and submit their plans and hypotheses to the test of practical experience.

This aspect of freedom, economic freedom, is one of the distinctive characteristics of life in our nation, as interwoven into the American legacy as freedom of speech and press. It has enabled our people to make our nation into a marvel of economic progress, and, as with all the freedoms that we enjoy, it's our duty to cherish and protect it.

Just as the American people rebelled against oppressive taxation some two centuries ago, the reform that I will announce tomorrow will represent a dramatic effort to make our tax code more simple, efficient, and fair and place more resources into the hands of your families and, ultimately, you yourselves. It'll expand our economic freedom and clear the way for even greater economic vitality than that which we enjoy today.

Nor will the benefits be economic alone. With more resources at their disposal, the American people will be able to provide greater support to the institutions that they themselves value -- our schools, universities, the arts, our churches and synagogues. As our economy grows they, too, will flourish.

John Marshall said, ``The power to tax involves the power to destroy.'' If so, then the power to cut taxes must surely be the power to create -- the power to force government to stand back and let the people themselves give expression to the spirit of enterprise -- building and imagining; giving to you, our sons and daughters, a nation of ever-greater prosperity and freedom.

My friends, thank you again for the gift of this magnificent inaugural parade. May you enjoy all the blessings of a free and bountiful nation, and on this, the eve of the second American revolution, may you always remember the enduring truth that our tax plan seeks to embody and that Americans have cherished through the ages -- God made man for liberty.

Participating in the parade were the bands scheduled to perform in the 1985 Inaugural Parade, which was cancelled due to extremely cold weather. Following his remarks, the President traveled to Miami.

You have more than your share of people committed to the cause. There's Jorge Mas and his team from the Cuban-American Foundation. And then there's Carlos Perez, the Cuban firecracker, and his Concerned Citizens for Democracy. And I know I speak for Senator Hawkins when I say thanks for all that you've done.

We Republicans have been blessed with grassroots supporters who are committed to the ideals of individual freedom, family values, free enterprise, and a strong America. While the other party has tried to build a coalition by segmenting America into warring factions over the past years -- pitting white against black, women against men, young against old -- we've taken a more positive path. The Republican Party has sought to unite our citizens by building on those fundamental beliefs that made America the great land that she is.

As Andy Ireland keeps emphasizing, the door to our party is wide open, the welcome mat is out, and our agenda is opportunity and freedom for all. We don't promise quota systems and giveaway programs. We promise to do what's right for America and for all Americans.

Now, throughout the country hundreds of Republican women hold elected office, and last year there was a net gain of 95 Republican women elected to State and Federal legislative bodies -- the biggest jump in the history of either party.

Senator Hawkins has been an articulate champion of our cause. She's been a leading figure, for example, in the fight against drug trafficking -- a menace to every family in America. She has been working within the legislative process to support those countries that are battling the drug traffickers and penalize those that are not. She's made it her business to expose the Cuban-Nicaraguan drug connection. High-level officials of these governments have been personally implicated and, in some cases, indicted.

We're moving forward on a broad front to attack the use of illegal drugs. Working with private and charitable organizations, with schools, family groups, and others, we're encouraging people, especially young people, not to get involved with drugs and to help those already on drugs to get off. I happen to be very personally, very proud that Nancy has taken the personal interest that she has in this positive initiative to win the drug war. When I come home from the office and open the door and say, ``I'm home,'' if there's no answer, well, I know where she is and what she's doing.

But another part of our strategy is a strong law enforcement/interdiction campaign aimed at stopping the drug flow before it reaches the customers. It's a complicated and frustrating job, but our commitment sends a message to every youngster in this country: Drug use is a threat, an ugly, life-destroying vice. And it's wrong. And I'm pleased that the message seems to be getting through. Young people in America are turning away from drugs.

Let me be partisan and add something here -- one thing more and more young people are turning to is the Republican Party. Nothing gave me greater joy than the multitude of young faces evident everywhere we stopped during the 1984 campaign.

What we do -- our efforts to make America a better country -- is for them. Illegal drugs are only part of the crime epidemic. For far too long our legal system has resembled a jigsaw puzzle of complicated roadblocks through which our law enforcers have been forced to maneuver in order to do their job. In 1984, with a Republican majority in the Senate, we passed a comprehensive crime control act -- a major step toward reestablishment of the balance to the criminal justice system. It's about time our criminal justice system gets back to serving the cause of justice and not the interests of criminals.

Paula Hawkins is a Senator of accomplishment. She has authored 32 bills and amendments which have passed the Senate and have gone on to become law. Now, that's an amazing record for any Senator, much less a freshman. We can expect even more from her during her second term, and she's earned a second term.

Of course, all this effort means little if our country is not secure. During these last 4 years, we've been moving forward to rebuild America's military strength, which was neglected during the 1970's. I can't tell you how vital Republican control of the Senate has been in this effort. The opposition often acts like a weaker America is a safer America.

Well, like it or not, that's the kind of bizarre logic that will carry the day if the other party regains control of the Senate. But with a Republican majority, we can count on common sense and courage to rule the day. Republicans know it is strength, not weakness, that will ensure the peace.

We are fully aware of the threat communism poses to human freedom. And don't let anyone tell you we're morally equivalent with the Soviet Union. I have heard that term used in places. This is a democratic country of free people, a democratic country where all people enjoy the right to speak, to worship God as they choose, and live without fear. We are morally superior, not equivalent, to any totalitarian regime, and we should be darn proud of it.

In Central America today our ideals are being put to the test. The freedom of our friends and neighbors to the south is at stake, as is the security of the United States. And I'm happy to say that Paula Hawkins is one elected official who didn't have to wait until Daniel Ortega went to Moscow yet again before she realized that he's a Communist.

Many of those opposing our efforts have steadfastly refused to acknowledge that the rulers of the regime in Managua are, by their own admission, hardcore Communists and consider themselves part of the international Communist movement. Many of our own elected officials act as if they don't believe the Sandinista regime is playing a significant role in the Communist insurgency in El Salvador. Incidentally, I think some of our people get confused -- they're not that familiar with Central America -- when we talk Sandinista government and contras or the freedom fighters. I'm going to quit using both terms and start calling them what they are -- it's the freedom fighters against the Communists.

Now, this role that they're playing in the insurgency in El Salvador -- this despite the fact that top defectors from the El Salvadoran guerrillas have been telling us they receive guidance, training, funds, and vast amounts of arms and ammunition from their Communist friends in Nicaragua.

Closing our eyes and making a wish, which seems to be about the only course of action our opponents will support, won't make this threat go away. We need to assist those governments targeted by the Communists, and it's imperative that we support those brave individuals who are putting their lives on the line to bring democracy to Nicaragua.

Communist regime from focusing its full strength on subversion and aggression. The freedom fighters are the best hope for democracy in that troubled country. Those who would have us abandon them and the people of Nicaragua are cutting off our chances to avoid a major crisis in Central America.

I firmly believe the tide of history is moving away from communism and into the warm sunlight of human freedom. To win this struggle, to preserve our way of life, to maintain the peace, we must be strong and true to our ideals. And together we can meet the challenge. Future generations, not only in the United States but throughout the hemisphere, will be grateful for what we do today.

Now, I know a moment ago when I mentioned our defense buildup -- I know the wave of propaganda, the drumbeat that is going on through this country with regard to our defense spending program. And one of the things that's the hardest and most frustrating to bear is the fact that our very success has been adding to the feeling that something is wrong with what we are doing. That is, every time we find one of those $400 hammers or something like that, it is added to the thought that, well, something is wrong and wasteful in the Defense Department.

Now, you know, I know that the defense budget is large, you count this in the number of dollars and so forth, and where we're trying to balance the budget, erase the deficit. But I would just like to give you some comparative figures from the past. In the fifties, defense spending averaged 46 percent or better of the total budget. In the sixties, it averaged almost 40 percent, 39\1/2\ percent.

It averages now only 29 percent of our budget. So, when we set out to cut spending, we think that it makes a lot of sense to cut where the bulk of the spending is, which is in domestic spending for a lot of things that government shouldn't have been doing in the first place.

And again, I come back down to this fact: None of what we're doing could have been done if we didn't control one House of the Senate [Congress]. You know that for about 42 out of 46 years our opponents held both Houses of the Congress. And finally, 4 years ago, we got control of this one House. It is absolutely essential if we are to succeed in what we have started to do. And to just give you one idea of how much has been accomplished, Republicans -- for most of those 40-odd years I'm talking about -- Republicans continually had to fight in the Congress a rearguard action against further government spending and increased government spending.

We'll keep on until pretty soon more and more of them will find out that there is a wide open door to our party, and they can come on over and straighten up and fly right. [Laughter] But in the meantime, please send Paula back. We need her very much.

Hotel. Prior to his remarks, the President attended a reception in the Florida Ballroom at the hotel for major donors to Senator Hawkins' campaign. Following his remarks, the President returned to Washington, DC.

The greatest strength of our economic system is the opportunity it affords to every American to prosper according to his or her own talents and efforts. No other nation in history has so boldly set individual opportunity as its leading goal or come so close to achieving it.

Americans who are members of minority groups. In the past, these minority entrepreneurs were subject to laws and regulations that prevented them from competing freely in the marketplace. But those laws contradicted the spirit of freedom that animates our democracy, and today they are only an historical memory, a reminder of the need to be forever vigilant in defense of individual freedom.

Minority enterprises today form a significant proportion of all the Nation's businesses, and their number is continuing to grow. The talents, insights, and hard work of minority Americans are adding to our Nation's technological prowess, providing us with new solutions for important problems and creating jobs in many industries, some of which did not even exist only a few years ago. This is the genius of economic freedom, and we should do everything in our power to preserve this freedom and expand it so that opportunity for all will continue to be the defining characteristic of our society.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

We face an historic challenge: to change our present tax system into a model of fairness, simplicity, efficiency, and compassion, to remove the obstacles to growth and unlock the door to a future of unparalleled innovation and achievement.

For too long our tax code has been a source of ridicule and resentment, violating our Nation's most fundamental principles of justice and fair play. While most Americans labor under excessively high tax rates that discourage work and cut drastically into savings, many are able to exploit the tangled mass of loopholes that has grown up around our tax code to avoid paying their fair share -- sometimes to avoid paying any taxes at all.

The American people want change and for very good reason. Our present tax code is not only unfair, it slows economic growth and job creation, and hinders technological advancement by interfering with free markets and diverting productive investment into tax shelters and tax avoidance schemes. In 1981, we made the first necessary, historic step by cutting tax rates and opening the way to vibrant economic growth and expanding opportunity for all Americans. Now is the time to build on our success, to redesign the basic structure of our tax system in order to discourage non-productive economic activity, to encourage greater compliance and to liberate incentives still further.

Accordingly, I hereby submit my proposal to overhaul our tax code based on the principles of simplicity and fairness, opening the way to a generation of growth. This is a tax proposal we can be proud of, a proposal that will help fulfill America's commitment to fairness, hope, and opportunity for all its citizens.

The President. I have just concluded a very useful meeting and lunch with King Hussein. We all recognize that the positive atmosphere which has developed in the Middle East recently can be credited in great measure to His Majesty King Hussein. Steps he's taken over the last year gave new momentum to the search for peace.

Our discussions today have provided further evidence of Jordan's commitment to a peaceful resolution of the Middle East conflicts, which should prompt a sense of gratitude from men of good will everywhere.

The United States has long played a central role in the Middle East peace process. We're proud of what we've helped accomplish, and we look forward to continuing to make meaningful contributions. But we hope that His Majesty's courageous steps forward can lead to direct negotiations between the parties, based on United Nations Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338, by the end of this year. And we'll do our part to help bring this about.

Our goal remains a just, lasting, and comprehensive peace which will satisfy the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people and provide for the security of all states in the region, including Israel.

We recognize Jordan's economic and security needs. And in the spirit of working together, I have told the King that we will be able to count on the United States for assistance in addressing problems which Jordan may face in those areas.

Regarding the prospects of peace in our area, I have told the President that a just, comprehensive, and durable peace in the Middle East should secure the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people, including their right of self-determination within the context of a Jordanian-Palestinian confederation.

I have also assured the President that on the basis of the Jordan-PLO accord of 11th February and as a result of my recent talks with the PLO and in view of our genuine desire for peace, we are willing to negotiate, within the context of an international conference, a peaceful settlement on the basis of the pertinent United Nations resolutions, including Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338.

United States, under the courageous and dedicated leadership of President Reagan, will find a way to seize this opportunity and respond positively to our peace efforts. The active and balanced role of the United States is an essential element for the success of the peace process.

Q. If you can hear me, sir, can you explain, please, why Jordan needs an international conference in order to negotiate with Israel? Couldn't it do it directly? Could you elaborate a little on what your thinking is?

We need the international umbrella to offer us the opportunity to negotiate. And when I speak of negotiations, I obviously mean negotiations amongst the party to the conflict -- in other words, negotiations between the Arab side, in this case a Jordanian-Palestinian delegation, with Israel on the other side.

Q. What are the problems that remain, the definitions of Palestinian representation in the delegation? Have you agreed on the Palestinian representation in the delegation, especially Jordan said PLO should be represented?

The King. This is, I believe, a last chance for peace. We are approaching it, as I've explained, determined to do all we could for the establishment of a just and durable peace in our area. And obviously, when we speak of negotiations, we speak of them within the context of an international conference, but negotiations amongst the parties to the conflict.

Q. Mr. President, the King has said that this opportunity will only be with us for a short time. In view of the situation in Lebanon, is there not something that the United States can do immediately to speed this process?

Q. Mr. President, the King has said that the opportunity for peace may be a very short one. In view of the situation in Lebanon, is there not something the United States can do to speed the process -- and do something immediately?

The last chance -- I think that the conditions have never been more right than they are now to pursue this peace. And who knows whether those conditions will ever come as close together again as they have now. So, that's why I think the term ``last chance.'' And I think we ought to keep that in mind that perhaps it is the last chance.

I don't know if you happened to be watching TV last night, but the networks were kind enough to give me a few minutes to speak about a subject that's very close to my heart and close to your wallets. I'm talking about our historical -- or historic proposal to completely overhaul that old jalopy of our tax system, replace it with a fairer, simpler, sleeker, more compassionate model -- an all-American tax plan providing new freedom, fairness, and hope for all.

Our proposal is not a tax increase, and it will not increase the deficit. It will mean lower taxes for a majority of Americans, with expanded opportunities to save and invest. We want to do away with the trials and tribulations of filling out your tax forms for as many people as possible.

What does America's tax plan mean for the average family? Well, I enjoy talking statistics, so let's talk a few. Of those who file and pay taxes, 7 in 10 will pay at a maximum rate of 15 percent, and fully 97 percent of all taxpayers will pay no more than 25 cents on the very last dollar they earn.

Our plan will also mean an historic correction of a problem we've let go on too long -- the increasing tax burden on low- and fixed-income Americans that's been knocking the bottom rungs off the ladder of opportunity. A compassionate, profamily opportunity society should give a break as well to those Americans struggling to get by and move up. And that's exactly what we intend to do.

By hiking the earned income tax credit, indexing it for inflation, and practically doubling the personal exemption, we can make sure that the working families do not suffer under the burden of Federal taxation. Giving a leg up to those struggling to move up is what America is all about. And that's a top priority of our tax proposal.

We're also going to make some other chances to help families -- or changes, I should say, not chances. Right now our tax system discriminates against homemakers, making IRA's fully available only to spouses who work outside the home. We're going to change that. Believe me, the work of the homemaker deserves to be treated with as much dignity and worth as that of any other worker. Well, it's a pretty hare-brained social policy that punishes spouses who decide to stay home and take care of the children. So, now every husband and wife will each have full access to an IRA tax-deductible savings account up to $4,000 a couple every year.

I think you can begin to see that making ends meet is going to be a lot easier for a lot of people under our plan, especially those of low and modest incomes who find it difficult to cope under the existing unfair code.

We're making many changes. But while we're throwing out the bad in the old tax law, we're being sure to keep the good, with special attention to those provisions that protect our families. The home mortgage interest deduction will be kept in full for principal residences, and no less than $5,000 will still be deductible for other interest expenses, which could include a second residence.

Now, you may have noticed that I haven't mentioned some tax deductions which are currently on the books -- tax loopholes for things like windmills and so-called educational cruises on oceanliners. But we're eliminating or drastically curtailing these sort of tax dodges, which are really no more than windfalls to a privileged few, loopholes that everyone else ends up paying for through higher tax rates.

Also, in the interest of fairness, we're removing the reduction -- or the deduction for State and local taxes, which has until now been one of the major pressures pushing up the tax rates of the American people. I don't believe that we can justify a system that forces taxpayers in low-tax States to subsidize the big-spending policies of a few high-tax States. That really is taxation without representation. And contrary to what some have been saying, lower rates, doubling the personal exemption, and raising the standard deduction will more than make up for the loss of State and local tax deductions for most taxpayers.

On the corporate side, we're streamlining the present ad hoc system of deductions in order to set the stage for an entrepreneurial renaissance of business formation, job creation, and technological advancement. By lowering the overall tax rates that affect corporations but making sure that every profitable corporation pays some tax, we will be untangling our economy from a bureaucratic tax code that has been distorting our free markets and slowing economic growth.

Together with a lower top rate on personal and corporate income, these changes will immediately open up new horizons to America's entrepreneurs, unlocking the full potential of American industry, and creating jobs and opportunity for all Americans, including those in our hard-pressed cities.

Even those in this town who are still reluctant are being lifted up and carried forward by the momentum of public support for a fundamental change in our tax laws. And once called impossible, tax fairness and simplification are now all but inevitable.

I'm going to paraphrase a statement by Admiral Farragut -- cleaned up just a little: Blast the torpedos! Full speed ahead! [Laughter] For too long we've lived with a tax system that is a blot, a stain on the shining mantle of our democratic government. We've quietly tolerated a tax code which we know is an outrage, one riddled through with special privileges and inequities that violates our most fundamental American values of justice and fair play.

As I said last night -- and I bet a lot of you here today would agree with me -- in its very spirit and substance our tax system could only be described as un-American. Well, there are two things we can do about it. We can either declare April 15th a day of national mourning -- [laughter] -- or we can change the system. And I don't think Americans can recognize an injustice without trying to change it.

Now, that's how this great country got started. Our forefathers rebelled against the injustice of oppressive taxation. In place of King George's despotism, they created a government of, by, and for the people -- a new democratic nation in which all men were created equal.

Today we're undertaking another great adventure in freedom -- a second American revolution, a peaceful revolution of hope and opportunity. And one of its first orders of business is to toss our present moldy tax code overboard and get a new one.

But for the sake of our traditions and for the sake of our present well-being and future happiness, we must take this next vital step toward freedom. It'll be good for our economy; it'll be good for individuals; it will be fairer and more just. But most of all, it will help strengthen America's most important institution -- the family. As I said last night, this is the single, strongest, profamily initiative in postwar history.

The family is the moral core of our society, the repository of our values, and the preserver of our traditions. The family's like a tree with its roots in the experience of past generations and its branches reaching boldly out into the future. Our families are the safe haven where we're taught charity, generosity, and love and from which spring our most cherished concepts of human dignity and the worth of each individual life. It's there that we learn to nourish the young and care for the elderly.

In our contemporary society, we find so many of our fundamental values have come under attack, but I believe the moral vision of family life is still carried in America's heart. And we know that the underlying truth of that vision is what keeps us good and strong and makes our nation the land of the free and the home of the brave.

You know, every once in a while I've heard people say we don't have any heroes anymore. They haven't looked around their own neighborhood. You see them getting up, sending the kids off to school, going to work every morning, supporting their church and their charity and all the good things in this society. You bet they're heroes. It's through their sweat, toil, and tears that the foundations of our society are built, and America's tax plan will simply give them a little help.

I'd just like to tell you one line that a Senator spoke back around 1913 when they were debating the income tax amendment. And on the floor of the House this gentleman said, ``We don't need this tax for government's needs. We must have it for government's wants.'' Well, they've had long enough for their wants. We're going to get them back to their needs.

Americans participate in the arts in some form almost every day, and their lives are made richer by this activity. Art also brings us into contact with the rich aesthetic tradition of our civilization, while the art of other cultures can be one of the best introductions available for those who want to learn more about them.

The importance of art makes it essential that all Americans be able to make use of this unique resource. The National Committee, Arts with the Handicapped, is an educational affiliate of the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts. During the past eleven years, it has served as the coordinating agency for arts programs for disabled children, youth, and adults. The Very Special Arts Program that it sponsors provides ongoing arts programs for many Americans with disabilities.

The Very Special Arts Program makes it possible for disabled Americans to participate in the arts and enrich their lives in the same way as all other Americans. Through it, they can gain the opportunity for self-expression within the context of our rich cultural tradition. This program deserves the support and assistance of all Americans.

In recognition of the importance of arts education in the lives of everyone, including those with disabilities, and in celebration of Very Special Arts Programs throughout the country, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 103, has designated the month of May 1985 as ``Very Special Arts U.S.A. Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

Thank you, ladies and gentlemen, Governor Robb, Senator Trible, Mayor Walker, and distinguished members here of the Williamsburg Foundation, the officials of that organization, and you ladies and gentlemen.

Republic. Boston is called the Cradle of Liberty, Philadelphia is where the Liberty Bell first rang, but Williamsburg, too, has an honored place in our history and our hearts. Because, as you have been told, here a practical plan for American self-government and a declaration which became the basis for the Bill of Rights of our Constitution were written, endorsed, and sent out to the world by the Virginia Legislature.

Here the arguments against unjust taxation rang out like a firebell in the night, and the chief arguer, Patrick Henry, gave our movement for independence the one thing it needed to become a revolution -- he gave it passion.

And so, I'm happy and honored to speak in Williamsburg today. For I, too, mean to speak of liberty and a practical plan to increase its measure in our country. I wish to speak also of the philosophical underpinnings of that plan, for whatever happens to it, I mean for it to be understood.

Two nights ago I unveiled our proposal to revolutionize the Federal tax code. I spoke of the system as it is now, and as we wish it to be. But just for a moment today I want to note how our modern tax system evolved from a modest attempt to raise modest revenues to the behemoth to which we are currently beholden.

The Federal income tax only began in 1913. At that time some strange things happened. When it was being debated in the Congress one man spoke prophetically -- or I should say, very honestly when he said, ``We don't need this tax for government's needs. We need it for government's wants.'' And he was pretty prophetic, but there was another man that was almost laughed out of public life and public office, a Senator who said, ``If we pass this amendment, we may very well see the day when the government could think it could take as much as 10 percent of a person's earnings.'' [Laughter] They thought that was a pretty ridiculous statement.

Well, this income tax was instituted because the Federal Government needed more money to operate because there was a widespread feeling that the rich ought to contribute to the system that made their riches possible. It was a system aimed almost exclusively at the wealthy, a class tax, as opposed to a mass tax.

But during and after the war a great change came -- tax rates were increased, exemptions were reduced, and inflation brought more people into the tax structure. Withholding was introduced for the first time, and suddenly just about every working American was paying the Federal income tax. And the tax suddenly was the largest single component of government revenues.

Seventy-two years after its inception, what is our Federal tax system? It's a system that yields great amounts of revenue, yes, but even greater amounts of discontent, disorder, and disobedience. It's a system in which the top personal tax rate rose to 94 percent. And it only came down from those heights when a young man named John Kennedy decided some time back that while it's all right for the Federal Government to be your partner, it's not quite fair that he be your boss.

It's a system from which no full-time wage earner is exempt. Now, almost everyone, no matter what their circumstances or their special needs, must pay. In fact, so many pay so much that someone has figured out that it takes the average taxpayer until almost May every year before he starts working for himself. Up till then, he's working for the government.

It's a system that allows an exemption of barely over $1,000 a year for each child born into a family, an exemption so utterly out of touch with the realities of everyday life that it serves as a metaphor for exactly how ridiculous the entire structure is.

Government, with decent citizens called before the Internal Revenue Service to answer for their income and expenditures and show their papers and their proof in a drama that is as common as it is demeaning. Wasn't there a line a couple of hundred years ago about being safe in your books and your records?

It's a system that is antigrowth and antiproductive for it discourages the very virtues that make a man and woman valued contributors to society. You know this if you've ever worked overtime to pay for your child's braces. The money you earn is taxed at so high a rate as to render your extra efforts almost totally without point or profit.

Thirty and forty years ago you didn't hear people brag at social get-togethers about how they got their tax bill down by exploiting this loophole and engineering that credit. But now you do. And it's not considered bad behavior. After all, goes this thinking, what's immoral about cheating a system that is itself a cheat? That isn't a sin, it's a duty.

What to do? Well, we took our first step toward a second American revolution in 1981 when we lowered tax rates for every individual in this country. This increased our economic freedom and sparked one of the greatest economic expansions in our nation's history.

But now is the time to take the second step, the historic step for America's tax plan. Now is the time to turn our tax system around once and for all and make it more just, more equitable, more comprehensible. Now is the time to create a tax system that will encourage and not penalize the creation of wealth and jobs. Now is the time, in short, to get the Federal Government off our backs and out of our way.

We propose to lower the top corporate income tax rate from the current 46 percent to 33 percent, and we've proposed a new minimum tax to deal with those corporations and individuals that have managed not to pay any tax at all.

Now, you might see the present tax structure as a hornet's nest. Our plan is an attempt to burn away the webs and the nest and let the Sun shine in to start new, start clean, and start over. Is this long overdue reform revolutionary? I believe it is, but we conservatives don't launch revolutions lightly. There must be a clear and compelling need, and the reform that's proposed must bear within it the promise to better the lives of all of our citizens, and the reform must be achievable.

Well, our tax reform plan of 1985 satisfies those requirements. Beyond that, it will go a long way towards satisfying America's hunger for justice, thirst for opportunity, and search for freedom. By lowering the highest tax rates on individuals and businesses, we encourage the growth of our economy. Lower tax rates, of course, increase the after tax wages for additional work. And so, people will be able to profit once again from working overtime or at a second job. Lower tax rates will also increase the aftertax return on savings and investment. And so, people will tend to save and invest more. This will provide the money the economy needs to build additional factories or buy more machinery.

These are not just economic facts. What I am speaking about is a profound public good. For when a society has high levels of economic growth, most everyone benefits, especially the poor. More jobs are created, there's more money to spend on medical care and education, the standard of living increases, and all of this enhances the quality of life.

By simplifying the rate structure itself and by eliminating the devices by which the powerful evade their responsibilities, we ensure that people in the same circumstances will pay the same levels of tax. We'll ensure that those now earning lower incomes will not find themselves paying a greater percentage of their income in taxes than those earning higher incomes. We'll ensure that from the hard streets of the cities to the soft green hills of the suburbs the people of America will pay their fair share and no more.

So, I believe the virtues of our proposal are clear. You'll know that your neighbor is paying roughly what you are, that no one will be able to rig the system to his benefit. You'll know that the tax rates themselves won't creep up and mug you just as you start to succeed in the world.

When you read our tax code you realize that somehow we got lost along the way. Somewhere along the line, we stopped understanding that people worked not for the government, but for themselves; that they get up every morning and go out into the world to earn their bread, not to support a government, but to support their families. We, the citizens of the United States, have got to get public law back in line with private imperatives.

I want a tax system that keeps as much of that money in your wallet as possible. The primary reason is moral. It's your money, after all. But the secondary reason is practical. You'll do more for the economy with it, and you'll do more to benefit your fellow citizen with it than the government will.

Now, how are you going to hurt me this time? [Laughter] Well, this is not an unreasonable question. So many times the American people have been promised better and been delivered worse. But I tell you from the bottom of my being, this is a plan that's going to help our country by helping every individual in it.

Our tax proposal will not increase the deficit; it is revenue neutral. It is not a tax increase; in fact, it's designed to be the first step toward lower tax rates in the future. When you simplify a thing, make its lines clear and clean, you make it much less vulnerable to quiet mischief and selfish tinkering. So, if some Congress of the future gets it in its head to increase taxes -- to raise the lowest personal tax rate from 15 percent to something higher -- the public will immediately see what is happening and understand what is happening. And they will rise up and resist, and they will be heard.

Our forefathers fought a revolution for two reasons: to give liberty to a naturally independent people and to secure, in the words of a Burgess who met here, ``. . . Prosperity in the Community and Security to Individuals.'' The idea of freedom impelled them; it intoxicated them. And it's freedom that impels us still.

History's not a static thing. History moves; it never stops. And the American Revolution continues as we continue to push back the barriers to freedom. We, like the patriots of yesterday, are struggling to increase the measure of liberty enjoyed by out fellow citizens. We're struggling, like them, for self-government -- self-government for the family, self-government for the individual and the small business and the corporation.

And so, we offer this tax proposal of 1985 in the name of growth and fairness. We offer it to ensure generations of economic power for the citizens of this free and vital nation. We're doing it in the name of our children, and we're doing it in the memory of those towering souls who walked these streets and met in this capitol and together wrested justice from the heart of oppression. We offer this plan in memory of the patriots who took a handful of demoralized little colonies and invented a nation. We're doing it to continue their work.

The President. Well, listen, this is really a welcome, and I want to thank you very much. If you didn't recognize him, that gentleman coming down the steps with me was your Senator Kasten from Wisconsin. And this is quite a welcome.

And, you know, she's been working very hard on the drug programs to make sure that more young people in our country don't become victims of drugs. And I'm very proud of her for doing that. So, I'll have to say hello for her.

Every once in a while I see on my schedule that I am having a working breakfast with the congressional leadership. As long as I am working, I'll wear those. [Laughter] It might impress them enough that we will get things done.

I thank you all. It's good to be in Oshkosh, B'gosh! A lot of your schoolchildren were out at the airport when we came in, and I told them that when I was their age and their size I was wearing them, and at that time, though, they had it on and as a kind of a trademark in stripes where it said ``Oshkosh, B'gosh'' on the overalls.

But it's an honor to be here with your outstanding Senator Bob Kasten and your superb Members of the Congress, Tom Petri and Toby Roth. Each of them is serving the people of Wisconsin and our nation with high distinction. And Bob Kasten has long been a leader for the kind of reform that I would like to talk to you about now.

The night before last, television networks were kind enough to give me a few minutes to talk about our system of taxation. I announced our plan to put more resources into the hands of the American people by making our tax code more simple, fair, and efficient and the most sweeping change in our tax laws it would be in more than 70 years. I knew we were on the right track when the high-priced tax attorneys started shedding tears after I spoke.

Thank you. I'm delighted to be with you and to join in the fun. And, my friends, if you will permit me, I would like to begin by conducting a little poll using an impartial and scientifically selected sample -- you. Would you mind answering some questions? For example, do the people of Oshkosh want our tax system to be complicated and unfair?

You know, I've been asking people informally about tax reform everywhere I go. And the answers are just the same everyplace I know of except for one city -- Washington, DC. Sometimes folks back there are a little slow to catch on. I may need some help getting it through to them that the American people consider it high time for a change in our tax laws. Can I count on you to give me a hand?

The President. All right. Our tax proposal is a true first. It's a plan for fairness, incentives, rewards, and simplicity in taxation. It won't raise taxes or increase the deficit. In fact, we call it America's tax plan because it will lower taxes and expand opportunities. Do you remember about 6 weeks or so ago, the last tax day, April 15th, how you felt, how you prepared to sign that complicated document that turned over a big chunk of your income to bureaucrats you'd never even met? Remember what your kitchen or dining room table looked like with the forms and the receipts and the tax tables spread out across it?

Well, under our tax proposal most of you, if you choose, will never have to go through anything like that again. Form 1040 will be shortened and more than half of all Americans won't have to fill out a tax form at all. It will be just that easy.

Let me tell you how it will work. And don't worry, I can keep it short and simple because it is short and simple. To begin with, we intend to replace the present steeply rising system of 14 different tax brackets with a flatter, three-step design that will allow you to keep more of each additional dollar that you earn. Currently, tax rates range all the way up to 50 percent, 14 brackets. Under our proposal there will be only three tax rates -- 15, 25, and 35 percent, period.

Suppose your family wants to save some extra money and invest it in an IRA. Right now our tax system limits -- you know what those are, those revenue accounts where you can put money in a savings account and you don't have to pay tax on it for having done that -- right now, our system limits IRA's to $2,250 per household. Again, my friends, that makes no sense. Homemakers should have the same rights to IRA's as wage earners. In economic terms, homemakers produce goods and services that are invaluable. And by nurturing our children, caring for us when we get sick, and looking after the elderly, they -- perhaps more than any others -- give our country its strength and heart.

And here's where we get the next part of our tax plan, also designed to help the family. Under our proposal, every husband and wife will have the same access to IRA accounts -- up to $4,000 a year for each couple.

Now, you can begin to see how much easier that'll make it for families here in Oshkosh and around the country to make ends meet. Consider a Wisconsin family of four struggling at the poverty line with an income of $12,000. By raising the level at which people begin to pay taxes and by doubling the personal exemption, our plan would ensure that the family would pay no Federal income tax at all -- none.

Now, I want you to know that I've got a little holdout. There's a little group over there -- I'm going to raise their taxes. But seriously, all the way up and down the income scale, the overwhelming majority of American families will find themselves with more resources to devote to their children, to pay for their home, and, perhaps here in Oshkosh, to buy a boat, and to put away for retirement. That sounds pretty good to me. Does it sound good to you, too?

Wisconsin is famous cheese country, so you know what I'm talking about -- big holes no matter how you slice it. Well, under our proposal, tax breaks for things like windmills and so-called educational ocean cruises will all be eliminated or drastically reduced.

We want to do away with a tax code that reflects years of lobbying efforts by powerful special interests. Instead, we want a tax code for Main Street America -- one that will help people like the worker at Oshkosh Truck Corporation and his family, the youngster who's just graduated from Oshkosh West High and is -- [applause] -- and maybe is starting work here in town as a clerk at Kline's -- [laughter] -- the teller at the First Wisconsin National Bank and her children.

But as we throw out the bad in the old tax system, we'll be sure to keep the good. The home mortgage interest deduction reflects our nation's historic commitment to the value of homeownership. For principal homes it's a deduction that we intend to keep. Likewise we will retain preferential treatment for Social Security and veterans' disability payments and keep in place the current itemized deductions for charitable contributions.

On the business side, our tax plan will be just as sweeping, one that will clear the way for surging business formation, job creation, and the technological innovation that fosters so much of our economic growth. The tax plan for business includes a reduction in the maximum corporate tax rate, down from 46 to just 33 percent. The institution of a minimum tax to make certain that all corporations pay a fair share and a reduction in the maximum tax on capital gains.

Well, back in 1978 Bill Steiger engineered a cut in the maximum capital gains tax from 49 to 28 percent. Almost instantly the amount of venture capital available in our country rose sharply, making it possible to expand existing companies and to form new ones, creating new jobs in the process. The very next year scores of new companies were formed in California's Silicon Valley alone. And in the years since, we've seen capital raised for new ventures increase by over a hundredfold.

Building on Bill Steiger's achievement, in 1981 we cut the top capital gains tax down to 20 percent. And now we want to cut it again down to 17\1/2\ percent. This new cut will foster still more growth and job creation, a renaissance of American entrepreneurship.

America was born in the midst of a great revolution sparked by oppressive taxation. There was something about the American character -- open, hard-working, and honest -- that rebelled at the very thought of taxes that were not only heavy but unfair.

Today the proud American character remains unchanged. But slowly and subtly, surrendering first to this political pressure and then to that, our system of taxation has turned into something completely foreign to our nature -- something complicated, unfair, and in a fundamental sense, un-American. Well, my friends, the time has come for a second American revolution.

From Oshkosh to Miami to Santa Fe, we, the people, must unite. Those who have been elected to positions of public trust must show true leadership and political courage. For the sake of our traditions of liberty, for the sake of our strength and prosperity as a nation, but most of all for the sake of our families, we must take this next step toward freedom. Let us resolve here today, during this dawn of the second American revolution, that this great task shall be accomplished.

You know, back in 1913 -- I just say this in closing -- back in 1913 when they were discussing having an income tax and having an amendment to the Constitution to make it possible, there was one Senator who rose on the floor of the Senate, and he said something at the time that was very prophetic. He said, ``We must have this tax not for government's needs, but for government's wants.'' Well, I think for the last 70 years government has been wanting too much, and let's get it back to where we pay for what it needs and no more.

The President. Governor Thornburgh, ladies and gentlemen here on the dais, and all of you: I thank you very much. It's great to be here at the Valley Corporate Center, the workplace of the future. Here in the Route 202 corridor, America is truly on a high-tech highway, rolling full speed ahead, and there ain't no stopping us now.

Goldberg tax system and turn it into a model of efficiency and fairness that works for the new age of silicon chips, CAD/CAM, bioengineering, robotics, and all the other marvels of this new technological era.

We call it America's tax plan because it will mean tax relief for American families, individuals, and businesses. It'll mean less redtape and lower rates for the majority of Americans. It will not be a tax increase; it will not expand the deficit. It will increase incentives to work, save, and invest.

Our tax cuts in 1981 lifted our economy out of -- you've heard the word back then -- ``malaise'' and into an almost 2\1/2\ years of growth. If those tax cuts could take a sick economy suffering from runaway inflation, skyrocketing interest rates, declining investments, sinking morale, and slumping initiative and turn it into the strongest, most dynamic and innovative economy in the world, think what America's tax plan can do today. We can build success on top of success. We can ignite the second stage of our booster rockets and blast this economy to new heights of achievement. We can do it, and we will do it.

For too long our tax code has been a damper on the economy. Steeply rising tax rates punish success, while tangled and needlessly complicated rules of compliance can boobytrap any new enterprise that can't afford high-priced lawyers and tax consultants to protect itself from the tax man.

April 15th wasn't so long ago. And I'm sure many still remember that mounting feeling of frustration and resentment as you worked late into the night trying to make sense of the maze of bureaucratic rules and regulations. Nearly half of all Americans threw up their hands in dismay and went to get professional help on their taxes this year. Well, paying someone to figure out how much you owe the Government in taxes just adds insult to injury. Don't you think America's had enough?

Well, we're going to break apart the shackles and liberate America from tax bondage. We're going to dramatically simplify the whole process of paying taxes. Eventually, as many as half of you won't have to worry about the 1040 Form. In fact, you won't have to fill out a tax form at all.

We're going to replace the present obstacle course of some 14 different brackets with a flatter, simpler, three-step design that will allow you to keep more of each additional dollar you earn. The present tax structure locks Americans into a future of ever-climbing tax rates. Even though our tax system is indexed for inflation, as real incomes increase the tax bite grows larger and larger.

America's tax plan is a dynamic model for the future that gives Americans the freedom to get ahead, move up, and succeed. This means that if you work overtime or get a raise, if you're promoted to a better job, if you're able to save some money and invest it, then fewer of those dollars will go into Uncle Sam's pockets and more will end up in your wallets, where they belong.

We think that the Federal Government should get out of the business of punishing people for hard work and success with high tax rates. Instead, we want to encourage all Americans to follow their dreams, to go as far as their courage, initiative, and creativity will take them. We think that's what America is all about, and that's why we're saying: America, go for it.

Well, this proposal will be a first for the American family -- as I said on Tuesday, the single strongest profamily initiative in postwar history. Raising a family in this modern age isn't always easy, and the Federal Government hasn't been helping much. Since 1948 the personal exemption has been declining in value to the point where it's now only a fraction of its original worth, due to inflation. But we're going to turn that around by virtually doubling the personal exemption to a full $2,000. That's $2,000 for every taxpayer and dependent in the family. Together with our hike in the standard deduction of up to $4,000 for joint returns, our tax proposal would mean that a Pennsylvania family of four wouldn't pay a penny in Federal income taxes on the first $12,000 of income earned. And with the lower marginal rates of our new design, they'd pay only 15 cents on each dollar of taxable income from there on up to $29,000.

In helping America's families, we know that we have right on our side. Our proposal also would provide equal access to IRA's for homeowners -- or homemakers -- I'm sorry -- homemakers. And that's as much as $4,000 of tax-deductible IRA savings funds per couple each year. And we're keeping those deductions in the present code on which our families depend, such as home mortgage interest deductions on principal residences and at least $5,000 in other interest payments which could include a second residence. Deductions for charitable giving, medical bills and casualty losses, the current preferential treatment of Social Security and the exclusion of veterans' disability benefits will be maintained.

This is one tax proposal that America can be proud of. It promotes all our nation's most basic values. It's profamily and profairness, pro-opportunity, and most of all profuture. I bet a lot of people here can remember the bad old days of the seventies when punitively high tax rates on capital gains were squeezing the life out of our venture capital markets and putting the lid on innovation. Since then, two dramatic cuts in the capital gains tax have produced a renaissance of entrepreneurship and catapulted America to the cutting edge of high-tech.

Venture capital -- that's the capital that funds the new, adventurous, high-risk industries like many of these here in the Great Valley Corporate Center. It is thriving. From a disastrous low of $39 million in the depths of 1977, the total of venture capital in this country -- it exploded to $4.2 billion last year.

By streamlining our tax code, we'll speed our progress. Our present tax code diverts too many of our precious resources into wasteful loopholes and tax dodges like jojoba bean shelters, windmills, racehorse writeoffs, and Cayman Island trusts. These shelters are not only economically unjustifiable, they're unfair to the vast majority of unsheltered taxpayers who have to make up the difference with higher tax rates. It's about time that we pulled our investment money out of foreign tax havens and put it back into fueling America's economic growth.

Not only will we lower the capital gains tax and give venture capital another shot in the arm, we'll also cut the corporate tax, continue graduated tax rates for small corporations, and bring the top personal income tax rate down to its lowest level in more than five decades. In addition, we're preserving incentives for research and experimentation that are so important to investment in techological innovation. As I said last Tuesday night, it's our ambition to make these next decades of American history the age of the entrepreneur.

Right now the army of lobbyists and special interests are dug in around the Capitol Building, firing every weapon in their arsenal in an attempt to shoot down our proposal for tax fairness and tax simplification. They're allied with the Washington sophisticates and so-called experts who tell us that tax simplification will never pass, that it challenges too many of those interests and takes away the special privileges of a powerful few who like the present tax code just fine. But I think the sophisticates and the lobbyists and the experts have forgotten one thing -- they've forgotten about you.

They've forgotten about the rest of America that exists beyond the shores of the Potomac. So, I think it's about time that we reminded them. Let's make them hear what America thinks. And remember, Washington is a few miles off, so you're going to have to speak up if you want Pennsylvania to be heard.

Hope and optimism are what drive the American people, and if they set their minds on something, you can bet it'll happen. We're a can-do nation, with little patience for the voices of resignation and the status quo. Two centuries ago, not far from where we stand today, General Washington and his army of patriots endured terrible suffering in the snows of Valley Forge because they knew that their winter of hardship would be followed sooner or later by a springtime of liberty.

It's time to take another step in that long march of freedom, to make our future big and adventurous and worthy of our past. Now is the time to inaugurate the second American revolution of hope and opportunity, to declare our independence once again, and to commit ourselves to the ideals that have always kept us strong and free and true. We can do it.

Note: The President spoke at 12:11 p.m. to an outdoor gathering of center employees and their families. Following his remarks, the President had lunch with a group of chief executive officers of area companies. He then traveled to Camp David, MD.

Under the Pelly Amendment, when the Secretary of Commerce determines that a foreign country is conducting a fishing operation that diminishes the effectiveness of an international fishery conservation program, he will certify this determination to the President. After receiving a certification, the President may direct the Secretary of the Treasury to embargo the offending country's fishery products to the limits of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade. Within 60 days following the certification, the President is required to notify the Congress of any action taken under the certification.

Southern Hemisphere minke whales are taken by the Soviet Union, Japan, and Brazil. The quota for these minke whales is divided into six areas. Brazil harvests whales from a land-based operation in Area Two, and Japan and the Soviet Union then divide the quota for the remaining five areas.

The Soviet Union, Japan, and Brazil have objected to the IWC Southern Hemisphere minke whale quota and, consequently, are not bound by the quota under international law. Even though the objections release the governments from any treaty obligation to observe the IWC limit, the taking of more minke whales than established by quota is inconsistent with this international conservation standard and, in the absence of any indication of compliance with IWC standards, diminishes the effectiveness of the Commission and its conservation program.

The trade sanctions authorized by the Pelly Amendment against Soviet fish products will not aid other Administration efforts to change the Soviet whaling policy. Under the Packwood-Magnuson Amendment, we cut in half Soviet-directed fishing allocations in our exclusive economic zone.

We have also encouraged the Japanese to refrain from importing Soviet whale products taken contrary to the IWC conservation program, and Cabinet-level officials have met with Soviet officials to resolve the problem. These actions are designed to encourage the Soviet Union to observe the IWC program. A Pelly Amendment embargo, however, will have a negligible effect on the Soviet Union, as most of the products imported into the United States, such as king crab, are highly marketable elsewhere.

In addition, United States fishing interests could be seriously harmed by such a sanction. An embargo imposed in 1985 could cost the United States 90,000 metric tons of expected joint-venture catch and over $12 million. An embargo could result in the permanent dissolution of the U.S.-U.S.S.R. joint-venture company, which provides markets for underutilized species and fish that might solely be harvested by foreign vessels. Unemployment of U.S. fishermen and other related workers could also result from the loss of this joint-venture company.

In light of this assessment of the effect of an embargo on Soviet fishery products, I have not taken any action against the U.S.S.R. under the Pelly Amendment. If the Soviet Union makes no progress towards complying with the IWC program, I intend to reassess my position and take necessary action. I will send you a supplemental report at that time.

The freedom of thought and action we Americans enjoy today seems as natural as the air we breathe. But there is a danger we may take this freedom for granted. We must never forget it was bought for us at a great price. The brave and resourceful Americans whose sacrifices gained our Independence and preserved it for more than 200 years against formidable foes have set an example of unflinching loyalty to the ideal of liberty and justice for all.

Soviet authorities are continuing to maintain a close hold on information on the nuclear accident and its consequences. We know that a major accident resulted in explosion and major damage to unit four of the Chernobyl nuclear facility. A fire occurred, and we have indications of a continuing fire at that facility. We cannot confirm press reports of a second nuclear reactor meltdown. Some diplomatic and consulor establishments are advising their citizens to leave the area of Kiev. We have no firm official information on casualties, on evacuation of population.

On Tuesday afternoon, Washington time, Minister Counselor Isakov of the Soviet Union conveyed a message to the United States Government regarding the Chernobyl nuclear accident. The Minister Counselor characterized the message as being from General Secretary Gorbachev to the President. This is in addition to the meeting which Secretary Ridgway had with Mr. Sokolov earlier in the day in which he presented our offer. This message was not characterized by the Soviets as a direct response to our earlier request for information, nor have we received a response to our offer of assistance. We have reiterated to the Soviets that our offer of assistance still stands. We also repeated hope for a more detailed information on the scale and nature of the accident.

The Soviets have confirmed to us that an accident occurred on April 25th -- you will note that is Friday -- in one of the power block rooms at Chernobyl, an atomic power station near Kiev. They say that a leak of radioactive material has required the partial evacuation of the populations in regions immediately adjacent to the accident. They indicate that the radiation situation has been stabilized; and, finally, they note that the dissemination of radioactive contamination in the western, northern, and southern sections has been detected. The message further states that these levels of contamination are somewhat above permissible norms but are not in the extent which would require special measures to protect the population.

The latest available information from the President's interagency special task force on the Soviet reactor incident indicates very little change from yesterday. We do not have any different assessments of casualties from the Soviet Union. You have seen their public announcements. The movement of the radioactive substance in the atmosphere is still unsettled. Releases immediately following the incident moved toward the northwest, toward the Scandinavian countries, then shifted to the south, and the latest day or so have moved to the east. There have been reportings of radioactive fallout in a number of European countries, most specifically and recently the Austrians. The coverage of the cloud is quite large. Estimates from the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration lead us to think that it is covering a good part of eastern and northern Europe, possibly the northwestern part of the Soviet Union, and may well be extending into the Arctic Basin. As far as the background levels found in Sweden, we have only limited information at this point. But it would appear that the background level has been exceeded by only about 1 millirem over the last several days, and they're continuing to take measurements. To put it in context, the average background level due to all sources on a continuing basis, natural and otherwise, is about 90 to 100 millirem per year, and they have received 1 millirem over the last several days.

We still do not know if the plume might reach the United States. But based on data that we do have at this time, we do not expect any significant health effects if, indeed, it does reach the United States.

In the meantime, we're waiting and assessing the situation. The EPA's National Environmental Radiation Monitoring System is in its usual monitoring mode and, in the case of any detection of increased levels, will speed up the rate at which we take measurements of all types: air, ground, and water.

We're continuing to ask for more information from the Soviets so that we can learn exactly what happened. It is still impossible to learn if there was actually a meltdown at the fourth Chernobyl reactor, but there are indications of it. There was obviously a fire of graphite material surrounding the fuel rods, and there's been a release of various radioactive elements. So far as we know, the fire is still burning. There has been some speculation in public circles regarding a similar incident or fire at the third Chernobyl reactor, but we have no evidence to confirm that. We know from Landsat satellite photos that there is a second heat source; but that can indicate several things, such as buildings or other things burning in the area, but not necessarily the problem with another reactor.

Yesterday we said there were two graphite reactors in the United States. One is the N reactor at Hanford, Washington; the other is a private, electrical-power generating, commercial reactor at Fort St. Vrain, Colorado. It is a graphite-based, gas-cooled, and like all commercial U.S. reactors, has a containment system around the reactor. The Hanford N is a graphite-moderated, liquid-cooled. That is the only similarity with the Chernobyl reactors. At Hanford, if there were a loss of coolant, we would have a separate cooling system to keep it from overheating. That reactor has been operating for 23 years. It produces power and plutonium for weapons programs. It does not have a containment dome but does have a filtered confinement system. The confinement system would filter out 99.9 percent of all particulate emissions. The reactor is also in a heavily reinforced concrete building, whereas the Soviet reactor was in a less secure industrial building.

Yesterday we were asked about the Department of Energy reactors that do not have containment facilities. There are four such reactors at Savannah River, South Carolina, which is south of Aiken. They are all production facilities, heavy water moderated and cooled. Like the Hanford facility, they are confined with filtration systems. Heavy water facilities use an isotope of the standard H2O molecule that results from the presence of deuterium oxide, an isotope of hydrogen with an extra neutron in the nucleus. It tends to moderate the actual fission process created by the U - 235 fuel activation. That moderating loop is closed and separate from the cooling loop. It is also worth pointing out that, unlike conventional, commercial light water reactors, these heavy water reactors operate at only 5 pounds per square inch over normal atmospheric pressure and at temperatures only slightly above 212 degrees Fahrenheit. Commercial reactors operate at very high temperatures and normally in excess of 2,000 pounds per square inch.

Mr. Vice President [Salvador Laurel of the Philippines], ASEAN Foreign Ministers, ladies and gentlemen, I appreciate this opportunity to discuss with you the wide range of issues that are of mutual concern to our peoples. Since coming to the Presidency, I have stressed enterprise, not redistribution, as the best means of improving the economic well-being of any country. I've emphasized the importance of free people cooperating together to meet the serious challenges that are loose in the world today. Our talks, then, have particular relevance. Since its founding in 1967, ASEAN has been a shining example of enterprise and cooperation.

It was my honor earlier to have met and conferred with President Soeharto. Our discussions were friendly and carried out with the mutual respect one would expect between the leaders of two great nations. I am confident that our discussions will be in the same spirit -- I mean our discussions here. And I'm looking forward to hearing your views.

Today there is an ever-increasing recognition that our futures are linked in so many ways. Two ASEAN members, Thailand and the Philippines, are treaty allies. All of you are friends with whom we work closely. The United States sees ASEAN's unity and decisiveness as an example to other free people. The ASEAN collective voice of responsible international behavior has been amplified throughout the world, and I am here to listen to you. Support for and cooperation with ASEAN is a linchpin of American Pacific policy.

Nowhere has your leadership been more inspiring than in molding the world's response to the Vietnamese invasion and occupation of Cambodia. After the collapse of South Vietnam, ASEAN took a strong stand against Vietnamese expansionism. When Vietnam invaded Cambodia in 1978, you recognized the threat and acted quickly. The strength of your commitment and the direction you've provided on this vital issue have been much admired by the United States. In 1981 ASEAN organized the International Conference on Kampuchea. We continue to support the basic principles for the settlement of the Cambodian situation agreed upon at that conference: the complete withdrawal of Vietnamese forces under international supervision; the restoration of Cambodian independence, sovereignty, and territorial integrity; a Cambodian government chosen in free elections under international auspices.

ASEAN's efforts are consistent with American desires to bring peaceful resolution to the tragic cycle of events that has plagued the Cambodian people. We continue to believe a negotiated settlement with ASEAN is in Vietnam's interest and in the best interest of everyone in the region. We are prepared to participate constructively in a regional settlement and call upon Vietnam to answer your reasonable proposals for negotiations. The contrast between the economic conditions prevailing in Vietnam and ASEAN is striking. Their continued occupation of Cambodia is simply widening this gap each day. Cambodia is, of course, something we will discuss further this afternoon along with other issues of regional and global importance.

In approaching our discussions, let me just say the United States considers itself a Pacific rim country, with a heavy stake in the outcome of events in this region. The Philippines, for example, is a country with which the United States has deep and abiding ties. We hope that recent events there will increase the chances of unity through democracy and enable the Philippine people, to a greater degree, to join in the economic advances so apparent throughout the region. Before I left Washington, we announced a Philippine aid package to help our Filipino friends during this difficult period. This region's economic stature continues to grow. Collectively, ASEAN is now the United States fifth largest trading partner. Our trade with you, as with all of east Asia and the Pacific, is growing faster than with any other region of the world. When this organization was founded back in 1967, our annual trade was running at less than $2 billion. In 1985 U.S.-ASEAN trade reached $23.5 billion.

As you are all aware, there is growing pressure in many industrial countries to restrict trade. Well, I'm certain you agree that any substantial cut in the commerce between nations would be an unmitigated disaster. It's only right that we are meeting prior to the 12th economic summit in Tokyo. One of the messages I am bringing to the economic summit concerns the necessity of keeping open the avenues of world trade. This is something that the United States and ASEAN should work closely together to achieve. It is fundamental to the well-being of both our peoples. As part of my preparation for the economic summit, I'm also looking forward to hearing today your thoughts on issues that the summit conferees should keep in mind as concerns of the countries of ASEAN. We are pleased, as a Pacific rim partner, to take your ideas to the meetings in Tokyo.

Our progress has been based on freeing -- not restricting -- man's commerce, energy, and creativity. A strong commitment to the principles of freedom and independence, and a fundamental trust in free enterprise and open markets, have propelled ASEAN countries far beyond what others would have thought possible. The decisionmakers of your countries have proven their wisdom and good sense. But I have a favor to ask. I think the leaders of the developing world could use your advice. You know, give a man a fish and he won't be hungry today, but teach him how to fish and he'll never be hungry again. You can do a great service by telling others, especially those trying to improve their lot, how to follow the path of personal incentives to economic progress.

I would like to mention the humanitarian issue of great personal concern to me, my administration, and the American people. It is about our men still missing in action from the Vietnam war. Vietnam's recent, apparent attempt to link this last vestige of the war to other issues is a great disappointment to us. We were pleased with the evident progress over the past year. It indicated Hanoi had agreed with us that resolution of this issue was in their national interest. We appreciate all that you have done to help us on this, and we hope that Vietnam will soon resume these important talks.

In closing, I would like to say the United States is proud to be a partner with ASEAN in the quest for peace, freedom, and greater prosperity. I am looking forward to our meeting this afternoon and to the continuing close relationship between our governments and people. Thank you all, and God bless you.

Well, Mr. President, the American people are honored that, as citizens of the world, we count as our close and trusted friends the people of Indonesia. Americans see Indonesia as an impressive success story. In just over 40 years, this vast and beautiful nation has made enormous strides. We Americans appreciate that the path to national union is not easy for a country that spans over 3,000 miles and is scattered across more than 13,600 islands. The challenges you face in developing your country, with its wide expanse and rich diversity, are not unlike the obstacles and hazards Americans faced in settling and developing our own country.

Despite regional diversity, Indonesia, under your leadership, Mr. President, is a united country, a country that is assuming an increasingly significant role in the region and in the world. Your commitment to Indonesian resilience, drawing on your own resources and your own traditions and institutions, serves to enrich your people materially and spiritually. In the United States our governing institutions celebrate the wisdom of a balance of power that works to shape our laws and traditions. Indonesia's governing philosophy of consultation and consensus is different from our own, yet its ultimate goal is blending diversity into national unity. Even though our methods of government differ, the friendly and open nature of the discussions we've had here and when you were in Washington reflect the positive and constructive day-to-day, year-to-year conduct of relations between our two countries.

I want to congratulate you, Mr. President, on Indonesia's achievement in reaching self-sufficiency in rice production. This is an enormous accomplishment of which you can be justifiably proud. Having moved so far, so fast in providing ample food resources is another indication of your government's effective management. The attainment of rice self-sufficiency is just one indication that Indonesia's economic development program has been wide-reaching and impressive. This program of growth and advancement has been directed toward bringing the benefits of development to all levels of society. Mr. President, not too long ago you said, ``It is impossible to reach equity in development, impossible to wipe out poverty, if there is no economic growth.'' Well, we applaud that emphasis. We have a saying in the United States that rather than talk about how to divide a small pie, let's work and build and bake a bigger pie so everyone can have a bigger slice. Mr. President, we have been happy to cooperate with you in a number of social and economic fields, including food production, off-farm employment, private sector development, and health care. We look forward to continuing our work together. In this regard, we have found the growing cooperation between our two nations in the field of science and technology to be particularly beneficial.

Indonesia is also to be congratulated, Mr. President, for its humanitarian policy of granting first asylum to almost 100,000 refugees from Indochina. The international community and the American people applaud Indonesia for its generous response to the plight of these unfortunate people who are seeking freedom and refuge. Many of these refugees have also resettled on our shores and have enriched the fabric of American life. The plight of these friends in distress is very important to Americans. I want to express to you, Mr. President, my personal appreciation for the sacrifice and consideration your government has shown in this humanitarian endeavor.

I am struck by how our discussions have reflected a mutuality of interests and a harmony of views. And I am confident the spirit that has prevailed here will enable us to forge even stronger relations in the years ahead. And I would ask you all to join me then in toasting the people of Indonesia; their distinguished leader, President Soeharto; and the friendship between the Indonesian and American people.

Q. What are the primary American objectives at the Tokyo summit? How do you think this summit will be different from the previous summits? What would be the greatest accomplishment the summit could achieve?

The President. United States objectives for the Tokyo summit are to promote policies that will assure further convergence of economic performance and a strong and stable global economy. We will stress the importance of actively pursuing the strategies laid out at Williamsburg, London, and Bonn for dealing with the interrelated problems of growth, debt, trade, and finance. We will emphasize the importance of working together to assure implementation of the Program for Sustained Growth, proposed by Secretary [of the Treasury] Baker in Seoul, through the adoption of growth-oriented economic reforms in debtor nations, policy and procedural reforms within the international financial institutions to permit increased disbursements in support of growth-oriented economic reform, and adequate net new lending by commercial banks. In addition, we will emphasize the importance of completing the preparation of a new round of multilateral trade negotiations and ensuring the successful launching of such negotiations.

We also hope that this convocation of democratic leaders will be an opportunity to further collective action on combating terrorism. The scourge of terrorism has profoundly affected the peoples of our country. We must look for ways to deter states such as Libya from supporting, directing, and sponsoring terrorism while we concurrently look for ways to ameliorate the root causes of such activity.

Q. We understand you have a close personal relationship with Prime Minister Nakasone, who has said he wants to make this summit a ``summit that sends a bright message to the future.'' What role should Japan play at the summit? Do you believe this summit marks the beginning of a more assertive Japan, inclined toward increased leadership in world affairs?

The President. In the five summits I have attended before, each nation has sought to play a constructive role in bringing the major industrial democracies closer together while conveying its own perspectives on global economic and political issues. I expect this will be Prime Minister Nakasone's approach to the Tokyo summit, and it will be mine. Japan has been an important participant in the economic summits and hosted the summit once before in 1979, so it is fair to say that Japan has had a very prominent leadership role in world affairs for quite some time now. In recent years Japan has quite rightly taken on more responsibilities in global affairs, as appropriate for an economic superpower. It should continue its efforts in this direction. Prime Minister Nakasone has made it clear that Japan is prepared to continue to assume more of the burden of its own defense, to import more and provide a larger and more open market to her trading partners, and also to continue to increase development assistance to important needy friends in the developing world.

Q. Some fundamental disagreements between the United States and its Western European allies have surfaced recently over the Libyan crisis. When unity is essential for negotiations with the Soviets and for economic coordination among Western nations, how do you plan to solidify Western unity at the summit?

The President. One of the great strengths of the yearly economic summit is the opportunity it provides for leaders of the free world to meet together and discuss candidly the major issues we face as democracies. It is this very process of continued consultation and dialog that allows us to stand unified behind the basic principles and values we share. And while we may differ on tactics, the countries represented share both a revulsion to terrorism and a common commitment to a dialog with the Soviets based on strength and realism.

On economic issues, a broad consensus has emerged on the shared responsibility to continue to implement sound and compatible domestic policies which promote convergence of strong noninflationary economic growth as a prerequisite for sustainable world economic expansion. As a group, the summit economies are entering the fourth year of real expansion; and inflation fell below 4 percent in 1985. Improved economic fundamentals in many summit countries have been reflected in the appreciation of nondollar currencies, facilitating the adjustment of large external imbalances. Moreover, new cooperative efforts are being made to address the debt situation, and preparatory work is underway for a GATT ministerial with the goal of launching a new trade round.

The President. The United States would welcome the widest possible Japanese participation in the SDI research program. There are a number of areas where we believe Japan's advanced technological capabilities and expertise could provide valuable contributions to the SDI research effort. We also believe that participation would be beneficial to Japan by contributing to advances in technology and knowledge which might otherwise not take place. As you know, a group of Japanese Government and industry officials recently visited SDI research facilities in the United States. We hope they will reach similar conclusions. While we do not see participation by any of our allies as essential to the success of the SDI research effort, the widest possible allied participation will help to ensure success. As to the timing of a Japanese decision on SDI, as well as the decision itself, that of course is a matter for the Government of Japan to consider. We have set no time limits for such a decision.

Q. The Japanese Prime Minister told reporters after his meeting with you that he hopes the trade imbalance between the United States and Japan will improve. Do you expect progress on this front? Specifically, how do you expect this to be achieved, both on a macroeconomic scale and bilaterally between the United States and Japan? Regarding Japan's recent blue ribbon report which recommends far-reaching structural changes for the Japanese economy, what recommendations of the report do you regard as most promising?

The President. I share Prime Minister Nakasone's hope that the trade imbalance between the U.S. and Japan will improve. It is essential that this balance improve. I am convinced that with strong efforts and perseverance on both sides we will overcome our trade problem. We should keep in mind, however, that the imbalance results from complex factors that will take time to correct. There are no quick and easy fixes.

The Prime Minister told me Japan is adopting as a priority national goal the steady reduction of its trade surpluses. He said he is determined to bring about a fundamental shift in Japan's economy: a shift from reliance on exports for growth to a more balanced economy leading to a significant increase in imports, particularly manufactured goods. This was the central message of the Maekawa report, and Prime Minister Nakasone indicated that a Cabinet committee would be empowered to ensure followup. Implementation of these actions, coupled with increased Japanese economic growth and Japan's continuing efforts to open its markets, should help to alleviate our bilateral trade tensions. Also, the shift in exchange rates should help.

Q. In the wake of the U.S. attacks on Libya, relations between the United States and the Soviet Union have deteriorated further. Are you confident there will be another summit between you and Mr. Gorbachev this year? You have stated clearly you will not compromise on SDI and that underground nuclear testing is necessary to maintain U.S. deterrence. Besides on-site inspection, on what areas, if any, are you prepared to compromise with the Soviets?

The President. General Secretary Gorbachev and I agreed at Geneva to hold a summit in the U.S. this year and in the Soviet Union next year. For our part, this agreement stands. Unfortunately, the Soviets have been reluctant to go ahead. They still haven't answered us about dates for a summit. They have now suspended our agreed foreign ministers' meeting. We see no reason for delay. There are a lot of issues between our countries that need work, and holding back on talks doesn't contribute to progress. Our action in Libya was antiterrorist, not anti-Libyan, anti-Arab, or directed against the Soviet Union.

We have advanced good positions in arms control, including nuclear testing, strategic offensive and defensive weapons, and intermediate-range forces. These are not take-it-or-leave-it positions. We want to work to reach mutually beneficial agreements. We also want to continue useful discussions on regional issues, human rights, and bilateral issues such as cultural contacts and trade. The Soviets have not answered all of our proposals, but have advanced some ideas of their own. We'd like to accelerate the process by getting on with scheduling the high-level meetings we have agreed to.

Q. What did the United States gain and what did it lose when it bombed Libya? Will the United States take similar action against other nations if you have conclusive evidence of their involvement in terrorist acts?

The President. There can be no question about direct Libyan involvement in a number of recent, heinous terrorist acts which injured and killed Americans, such as the bombing of a disco in West Berlin. These indiscriminate attacks and those planned by Libya must be dealt with firmly to prevent even more indiscriminate attacks on innocent people. It is my duty to take action to protect the lives of Americans. Military operations on April 14 were specifically aimed at installations of direct relevance to Libyan terrorism in an effort to preempt further acts of this kind. Our action underscored to Qadhafi that his actions will not go unpunished and cost-free. This was a principal goal, and it was achieved.

We did what we had to do. We tried peaceful options such as economic and diplomatic sanctions before resorting to force, but Qadhafi did not grasp the seriousness of our determination to bring a stop to terrorism. I took no pleasure in ordering the attack on military targets in Libya. U.S. servicemen performed with valor. Sadly, two gave their lives in this service, a loss which we feel deeply. Terrorism is a worldwide problem. If we are to defeat it, sacrifices by all affected nations are necessary. I hope that this action will have been enough to convince Qadhafi to change his policies. If not, I will not hesitate to act again.

Q. Since you visited the People's Republic of China in the spring of 1984, countries surrounding China have keenly watched U.S.-China relations, especially in the field of military and technological cooperation. The U.S. Government has recently decided to provide China with advanced electronic equipment for its air force, and talks are underway to provide China with additional military hardware and technology. How far can such U.S.-China cooperation go without seriously alarming Taiwan and the Soviet Union?

The President. Since the normalization of diplomatic relations between the United States and the People's Republic of China on January 1, 1979, the development of an appropriate military relationship has been seen as one element of the overall political and economic relationship. Great strides have been made in both the political and economic areas of the relationship. Not surprisingly, the military dimension of U.S.-P.R.C. relations has also progressed. An objective of U.S. policy is to build an enduring relationship with the P.R.C., including a military one, which will support China's national development and maintain China as a force for peace and stability in the Asia-Pacific region and the world. We believe a more secure, modernizing, and friendly China, with an independent foreign policy and economic system more compatible with the West, can make a significant contribution to peace and stability.

Q. Also, last year China refused a U.S. port call from the 7th Fleet because some ships in the fleet are nuclear-capable. How will the United States respond to the Chinese request for a guarantee that ships entering its ports not carry nuclear weapons?

The President. We view a U.S. ship visit to China as one symbol of progress in developing an enduring, long-term military relationship. A U.S. naval port call to China in the future is still under active consideration. I remain hopeful that we will reach an agreement with the Chinese that will allow a visit to take place.

Q. Are you satisfied with the new Aquino government in the Philippines? Do you believe it has firmly established its control? Related to this, the Philippine ``revolution'' seems to be influencing the opposition in the Republic of Korea, which has stepped up its demonstrations for constitutional reform. How do you assess this situation? Are you satisfied with the Korean Government's handling of the opposition?

The President. The new government of the Philippines enjoys the overwhelming support of the Filipino people. The United States is ready to cooperate with and be helpful to the new government in any appropriate way. President Aquino has declared a timetable for the early return to full democracy. The timetable includes a plan for a new constitution to be submitted to the Filipino people for ratification this year and legislative and local government elections thereafter.

The Philippines and the Republic of Korea are two very different countries. In Korea President Chun has promised to step down at the end of his term, less than 2 years from now. The economy is doing well. And the military is doing a very professional job of encountering a serious external threat. This sort of environment makes incremental progress possible. We have encouraged further democratization in Korea and will continue to do so. We have welcomed the Korean Government's eased policy toward the opposition since President Chun's February 24 meeting with opposition and party leaders.

The President believes it is essential that a budget resolution be passed by the U.S. Congress. If we are to maintain a strong economic recovery and sustained growth it will require a clear signal that the deficit targets required by Gramm-Rudman-Hollings be met. The Senate has developed a budget package that falls short of the President's requested levels for providing a strong defense. It calls for additional revenues above the levels he believes appropriate. And the domestic spending reductions envisioned in the resolution are more modest than what the President feels is appropriate. In addition, while the proposal covers a 3-year timeframe, he believes a 1-year focus is more appropriate.

Nonetheless, the Senate has struggled to meet its obligations under Gramm-Rudman-Hollings and send a positive signal to working men and women of the country and the rest of the world that we are staying on a path to a balanced budget. While the President has serious reservations about individual aspects of the Senate budget resolution, he believes it is important that the Senate passes a budget for 1987 and recognizes their effort. The consequences of failure to act under Gramm-Rudman-Hollings are too great. Therefore, given the Senate's action, he looks forward to working with the Congress to ensure more acceptable levels are reached for defense, taxes, and spending reductions.

The President has received the report of the Vice President in written format as a result of the meeting. The President and Vice President both expressed serious concern with the lack of information that the Soviet Government is providing to the public and to the world and to its own citizens. Environmental accidents whose fallout ignores national boundaries are concerns for all. We will continue to press for full and accurate information.

While it's true that the Soviets are reporting that they have smothered the fire at the [number] four Chernobyl reactor, we cannot confirm that. We have every reason to think that the fire has diminished, but there is evidence that the reactor or associated equipment with the reactor continues to smolder. We do know that the second hotspot, as reported from the Landsat photos, was not a reactor.

Weather patterns are shifting from day to day, but airborne radioactivity now covers much of Europe and a large part of the Soviet Union. In the last 48 hours there has been movement of radioactivity to the south, and there's apparently elevated levels detected as far south as Italy. Air containing radioactivity by aircraft was measured at 5,000 feet about 400 miles west of northern Norway and is believed to have turned south and southeastward. It is beginning, perhaps, to return over Europe. While there's been speculation about the movement of the plume eastward across the Soviet Union, we cannot at this moment confirm any movement across the Soviet Union. There has been no detection of any elevated levels of radiation above the normal background either in the United States or Canada. Environmental Protection Agency's (EPA) radiation monitoring network is now sampling all media on a daily basis, but there is no reason to expect any risk to human health in the United States.

With the limited data on hand, the Department of State and Health and Human Services have issued an advisory against travel to Kiev and adjacent areas. Due to reports from the Polish Government of increased levels of radiation in certain lake districts, we're recommending that women of childbearing age and children should not travel to Poland until after this situation is clarified. Milk and other dairy products in Eastern Europe also should be avoided. Other actions taken by the task force include: radiation-monitoring teams have now been sent from the United States and are in place in several European countries; EPA medical teams have been sent to our Embassy personnel in Warsaw and Moscow. An EPA technician and State Department medical expert will leave today for Warsaw, Krakow, Moscow, and Leningrad to help determine the radiological status of our missions there. An expert in bone marrow transplants, Dr. Peter Gale, has gone to the Soviet Union to offer his expertise and assistance.

We're pleased to take note of the fact that Prime Minister Nakasone's ruling Liberal Democratic Party has agreed to his proposals for specific action assignments to restructure the Japanese economy. These actions embrace several of the key recommendations of the Maekawa report as well as other important measures. The action assignments are part of the medium- and long-term steps necessary to change the structure of Japan's economy to rely on increasing domestic demand for its economic growth and on the trade side to increase Japanese imports, especially of manufactured goods.

Prime Minister Nakasone has described this effort as an historic change for Japan, and the President has welcomed it. The Government has made action assignments for specific targeted areas for implementation such as tax reform, financial liberalization, encouragement of investment, and transformation of the industrial structure. The Government also announced its intention to stimulate housing construction, cut working hours, and rationalize coal mining and agriculture.

The President. It's great to be meeting with all of you and wonderful to see how Asians and Americans share the spirit of enterprise. You stand as testimony to the positive, economy-building power that is unleashed by free enterprise.

Well, what you men and women of commerce have accomplished has been due to much more than luck. Behind the great progress we've witnessed since the close of the Second World War has been your hard work, diligence, and competitive spirit. But, of course, even the best need a level playing field on which to compete; and that's why the subject of free and fair trade will be a priority at this economic summit. America's summit partners have set the ball rolling on a new round of multilateral trade negotiations, and we're going to do everything we can to make those negotiations a success. While we work to open markets abroad, we'll continue to resist protectionist pressures at home in the United States. Many of you, as representatives of America's business community abroad, know how vulnerable we all are to a retaliatory protectionist backlash.

As I said to the Chamber of Commerce in Washington, the winds of freedom blow both east and west, and carried on those breezes are the world's hopes for a prosperous, growing future. Ultimately, of course, expanding trade depends on an expanding world economy. And that's why we must always -- or also begin to focus our attention on the current -- or urgent issue of economic stagnation in much of the developing world. We'll not be able to prosper indefinitely while much of the world lags behind, caught in a web of poverty and underdevelopment.

In America the inflation of the 1970's gave us bracket creep. In much of the developing world, though, it was more like a stampede. Rapidly rising marginal tax rates, often on very low incomes, destroyed incentives to work, save, and invest in stifled growth. Making matters worse, one often finds that on top of these explicit taxes were piled more onerous implicit taxes such as price controls, regulations, currency controls, protectionism, and inflation. A new study commissioned by the Agency for International Development found a direct relationship between high tax rates that kick in at low thresholds and low to negative economic growth. On the other hand, they found that low tax, high threshold countries -- many of them right here in the Pacific Basin -- are among the fastest growing in the world. And rapid growth brings rising real wages and improved living standards. Because high tax rates force economic activity underground or drive it abroad or discourage it all together, they often bring in little revenue. That's why reducing tax rates and increasing thresholds not only stimulates growth, it often increases government revenues, too.

In the postwar period the world has undergone a kind of experiment in which two basic development models have been tested. One is based on central planning and high taxes; the other, on free enterprise and low taxes. The results of the experiment are in: Freedom works. We've seen the proof here in Asia, in the Pacific Basin countries, with their sometimes double-digit growth records, and in the low tax ASEAN nations, which recorded heroic economic growth throughout the 1970's despite the twin shocks of oil price hikes and inflation. The lesson has been learned well here. Singapore and Japan are considering further tax cuts to keep the growth momentum going. With their dramatic success, these free market countries have much to offer those still struggling with the problems of underdevelopment. It's my hope that the Pacific Basin and ASEAN countries will come to take a leadership role in world development, that they'll share with other nations the wealth of their knowledge and the rich resources of their experience.

The free market nations of Asia have already performed one economic miracle. Now it's time for a second: helping to unlock the vast potential for economic growth that still lies dormant in much of the world. Meanwhile, we're going to keep working to level out that playing field and keep the markets open. There are encouraging signs. Currencies are adjusting, some barriers are being lifted, and Japan is considering steps to increase domestic demand and bring more balance to its export-oriented economy. Open markets, free trade, a fair chance for everyone to compete -- that's our agenda for this summit and our goal for the years ahead.

Well, now, that's enough of a monolog from me. And it just occurred to me that maybe for 2 or 3 minutes more you might put up -- I know none of us have too much extra time, but you might want to put up with me for a couple of more minutes and make it a dialog. And maybe if somebody has a question, fire away.

Mr. Snowden. I do now, yes. [Laughter] Mr. President, those of us who work in this part of the world can attest that many good things have happened in the marketplaces here as a result of lots of factors in response to your inspirational leadership on really promoting free trade.

Mr. Snowden. At the same time American companies find that big domestic market so attractive, somehow it's unattractive or difficult overseas. Does the administration have any plan that would help bolster the courage and give incentives to more American companies to come into this part of the world to help work on this trade?

The President. Yes, as a matter of fact, that's of great interest to me and to our administration. We all know the record of the United States as well as other countries, including our host country here, Japan, in aid to lesser developed and underdeveloped countries. But what we've had a feeling is that maybe we've devoted too much of our effort to outright handouts rather than to see if we cannot help with investment and for them to develop their own economies and become totally self-sufficient. And we are trying and looking for ways to see if working with them if we cannot produce those incentives and then see capital invested. I remember a man once told me that no country had ever become great that had not imported people and money. That certainly was the history of the United States. [Laughter] And so, we'd like to pass it on, and we are going to try to do that.

The President's task force on the Soviet nuclear accident is continuing to monitor the situation and to report on the effects of the accident to the President on a regular basis. No increases of radioactivity above normal background levels have been reported by the radiation monitoring networks in the United States or Canada. The airmass containing the radioactivity continues in its present location over much of Europe and a large part of the Soviet Union. The airmass containing radioactivity is not expected to enter any part of the United States for several days and is not expected to pose any threat to human health or environment of the country.

The cause of the accident leading to the explosion at the Chernobyl site is still unknown. The Soviets have claimed that they've used helicopters to drop sand, lead shot, and boron on the fire in unit four in order to reduce the activity level. Apparent damage to the building and detective radioactivity levels in nearby countries suggest that massive core damage must have occurred. We are unable to confirm the Soviet claim that the fire in unit four has been extinguished. There is still no evidence that unit three was involved in the accident.

The Soviets have reported that they evacuated the three towns closest to the Chernobyl reactors. This and other reports of evacuation up to 30 kilometers from the site are consistent with an accident of this magnitude. The Nuclear Regulatory Commission has notified its licensed facilities in the United States to provide monitoring data to the task force to augment EPA's nationwide radiation monitoring system, which is gathering data on an accelerated basis. The United States Government is also making efforts to gather data from several countries surrounding the Soviet Union that could prove essential to evaluating the accident in the absence of information from the Soviet Government.

In addition, we have sent a team of U.S. technicians to Moscow. They arrived in Moscow to begin evaluating health and environment at our missions in the Soviet Union. First results from our monitoring in Warsaw indicates that background radiation levels of roughly twice the normal background levels. This is not to be judged particularly serious. For example, normal levels in Denver are about three times background due primarily to rock and soil makeup.

There is a report on the wires that a Cabinet-level meeting is taking place -- Japanese Government in Tokyo regarding increased radiation levels over central Japan from rainfall. We do not have any specific information. We've been in touch with the Japanese Government to confirm these reports and have not yet received any information that we can go on. We do not have any specific monitoring information either.

Daylight time, 7:18 a.m. Tokyo time this morning, at Cape Canaveral, Florida, a Delta rocket carrying a geostationary operational environmental satellite -- GOES, which is a meteorological satellite -- was launched. NASA [National Aeronautics and Space Administration] has indicated that the satellite was destroyed because of a premature main liquid fuel engine shutdown. The shutdown began at approximately 71 seconds into the flight and concluded at 76 seconds. The loss of the main engine resulted in the loss of control of the Delta vehicle, and the range-destruct signal was given at approximately 91 seconds into the flight. This was done because the system was still under thrust by the solid-rocket booster. At this point of destruction, the vehicle was about 8.5 miles in altitude. Delta rocket liftoff results when six one-piece solid motor strap-on rockets are fired along with the main liquid fuel engine. The solid rockets are manufactured by Morton Thiokol and the main rocket by Rocketdyne, Incorporated. The vehicle itself was produced by McDonnell Douglas.

At 63 seconds into the flight, three separate solid rockets were to fire, and data indicates that they did fire and that they were burning properly. The ignition comes at 8 seconds after the initial six solids burned out. All of this sequencing appears to have been normal; however, the main engine should have burned until approximately 120 seconds into the flight. As I said, the shutdown was experienced at 71 seconds into the flight, and the destruct was given at 91 seconds into the flight.

The President was informed shortly after the explosion by Chief of Staff Don Regan by telephone. He was awake and reading morning news reports and national security information at the time. The President directed members of his Tokyo party to get in immediate touch with NASA officials in Washington and at Cape Canaveral. The President said he would like to have all information provided to him on a regular basis throughout the day. The Delta rocket has been the mainstay of the U.S. space program for 26 years. There have been 177 prior launches at a 94-percent success rate. The last prior failure of a Delta rocket came on September 13, 1977, when one of the solid strap-ons failed.

Greetings from Tokyo. I'm here for the 12th annual meeting of 7 major industrialized democracies. I flew here last night after a meeting in Indonesia with some of America's close friends and energetic trading partners. During my stay there, I conferred with President Soeharto of Indonesia on a number of issues of common interest to our countries. President Soeharto has led his country during a period of impressive economic growth. Over the last 15 years the annual increase in Indonesia's gross national product has averaged 6.8 percent. The Indonesian people have reaped the rewards of a higher standard of living.

While in Indonesia I also met with the foreign ministers of six countries which make up the Association of South East Asian Nations, or ASEAN. Indonesia, Malaysia, Singapore, the Philippines, Thailand, and Brunei have joined together in one of the most successful and admirable regional groupings in the developing world. Our relations with these ASEAN countries exemplify the mutual benefits that can be derived from close and open relations among free and enterprising peoples. Over the last two decades ASEAN countries committed to free trade and open markets have had some of the highest growth rates in the world. Commerce between us has created a host of jobs on both sides of the Pacific. The sound management of their economic affairs enable the ASEAN countries to weather much of the turbulence experienced in other parts of the world.

On the eve of the economic summit here in Tokyo, there was much to talk over with our ASEAN friends. One of the issues of concern to us all, and a subject I expect to discuss in detail at the economic summit, is the growing pressure for protectionism to shut world markets. Unfettered commerce has been a mighty force for growth and prosperity since the close of the Second World War. Our open trading system has kept America efficient and on the cutting edge of technology. While free trade means change and progress, protectionism invariably leads to stagnation and decline. Well, Americans aren't going to be left behind by anyone. But like our friends in ASEAN, we want to make certain that free trade is not a one-way proposition, that markets are open in all countries, and that other governments do not unfairly subsidize their exports. I assured our ASEAN friends that the United States will continue to fight trade-killing protectionism and aggressively pursue open markets and trade that is free and fair. There is no reason to doubt America's ability to compete, no reason to lack confidence in our working men and women and our corporate leaders. When everyone plays with the same rules, our people have what it takes: the ingenuity, the hard work, and the integrity to compete with anyone, anytime, anywhere.

Economic challenges remain. At the summit we will discuss interrelated problems of growth, debt, trade, and finance. The fundamental strength of the economies of our summit partners will be a major focus of our discussions. At the same time, however, we will address the situation of debtor countries. Growth-oriented structural reforms in developing countries and the opening of their economies to international trade and investment is the path to progress. It's up to the industrialized democracies to lead the way.

The summit will also serve as a forum for discussion of critical noneconomic issues: the environment and terrorism, for example. Poet John Donne once wrote that ``No man is an island.'' Well, when it comes to terrorism, no country is a fortress. The death of innocent people at the hands of terrorists, then, is everybody's business, a threat to the liberty and well-being of all free people. Here in Tokyo I'll be talking with the leaders of the other industrialized democracies about what must be done in response to terrorism, especially state-sponsored terrorism. We must and will stand as one against the enemies of civilization.

Seldom has the interdependence of modern industrial States been more evident than this past week. All Americans, indeed the entire world, sympathize with those affected by the tragedy at Chernobyl. We stand ready, as do many nations, to assist in any way we can. But the contrast between the leaders of free nations meeting at the summit to deal openly with common concerns and the Soviet Government, with its secrecy and stubborn refusal to inform the international community of the common danger from this disaster, is stark and clear. The Soviets' handling of this incident manifests a disregard for the legitimate concerns of people everywhere. A nuclear accident that results in contaminating a number of countries with radioactive material is not simply an internal matter. The Soviets owe the world an explanation. A full accounting of what happened at Chernobyl and what is happening now is the least the world community has a right to expect.

This week Congress will turn to consideration of a missile sale to Saudi Arabia. On April 8 President Reagan notified the Congress of his intent to sell these air and sea defense missiles to the Saudis. These weapons are not new to Saudi Arabia; all have been sold previously and are already in the Saudi inventory.

The missile numbers have been calculated by the U.S. Air Force as necessary to meet realistic threat projections in the period when they will be delivered. They present no threat to Israel and in no way undercut the absolute determination of the United States to preserve Israel's qualitative military edge in the region. These missiles are subject to stringent security safeguards. The Saudis have an outstanding record in this regard and have never allowed any U.S. weapon to fall into unauthorized hands. Moreover, if the United States fails to help the Saudis in this important area, they are certain to get the weapons they need from other sources who are unlikely to share America's concern for Israel's security.

The United States and Saudi Arabia have many similar interests beyond the Gulf, and our actions are often mutually supportive. They have helped in U.S. efforts to support moderate governments in Egypt, Jordan, and Sudan, and have worked quietly in the search for peace in Lebanon, in the Arab-Israeli conflict, and in the Iran-Iraq war. We are engaged in a critical struggle against Libyan-supported state terrorism. Saudi Arabia has consistently worked behind the scenes to discourage terrorism from any source.

Saudi Arabia is a firm friend of the United States. Our own interests require us to help Saudi Arabia meet its legitimate security needs in the face of growing regional threats. Therefore, the President strongly urges the Congress to support this important sale.

The President. Good morning. I have a few words first here before taking questions. It's no exaggeration to describe the Tokyo summit as the most successful of the six that I have attended. The atmosphere was cordial, the talks were candid and constructive, and a strong measure of allied unity on the fundamental issues of our agenda was achieved. All we sought to accomplish at the summit was achieved.

This triumph at Tokyo was due in no small measure to the leadership of Prime Minister Nakasone. The Summit Seven agreed upon the menace posed by the scourge of international terror and upon new political and diplomatic measures to deal with it. We agreed that the Libya of Colonel Qadhafi represents a unique threat to free peoples, a rogue regime that advances its goals through the murder and maiming of innocent civilians.

We arrived at this summit as a rising tide of prosperity in the industrial democracies was demonstrating to the world the wisdom of the free market policies that we've pursued. And together we committed ourselves in Tokyo to strengthen those policies when we return home. For developing countries as well, as a robust and free Asia demonstrates, the principles of the free market are more important to progress than any level of economic aid.

On the emerging issue of agricultural overproduction, it was agreed that the primary cause of the worldwide surpluses of food and fiber is domestic government policies that must be addressed. One danger to the common prosperity we all recognize is the specter of protectionism -- that vain search for security behind tariff walls and inside closed markets. History has proved again and again the fallacy of that reasoning and the folly of protectionism. In Tokyo we have obtained a green light for the commencement of a new round of trade negotiations beginning in September. The way to resolve trade problems is to seek open, not closed, markets; to seek multilateral negotiation, not unilateral legislation.

We made progress in strengthening economic policy coordination with our summit partners. This will help reduce trade imbalances by tackling their underlying causes and promote greater exchange rate stability. We also believe this will result in greater stability in the yen-dollar relationship, something both the United States and Japan desire. We also won an endorsement for the U.S. initiative for a joint debt strategy for developing nations.

And, finally, as events of the past week starkly demonstrate, we need more openness on nuclear accidents. A breakdown at a nuclear powerplant that sends radioactive material across national frontiers is not simply an internal problem.

But let me now thank our Japanese hosts, and in particular Prime Minister Nakasone. They put up with the inconvenience that thousands of summiteering politicians, bureaucrats, and press must have caused them with unfailing courtesy and graciousness; and we are in their debt.

Q. Mr. President, you came to Tokyo saying that you didn't want a grandiose statement on terrorism, you wanted action. Now you have your statement, but your fellow summit leaders say that nothing really has changed. What actions do you expect, if any?

The President. Well, I find it difficult to believe that the people that I've been meeting with, the heads of state, would have indicated anything otherwise; because what we have agreed upon is that terrorism is a threat to all of us. It is an attack upon the world. The determination of terrorists who murder and maim innocent people in pursuit of some political goal, and that the way to deal with it is not individually or unilaterally but to deal with it together. And this was the sense of the agreement that we arrived at, that we are going to act together with regard to opposing terrorism, to isolate those States that provide support for terrorism, to isolate them and make them pariahs on the world scene, and even, if possible, to isolate them from their own people.

The President. We discussed at great length specific actions and all. But the statement was one to simply say that we together will decide upon what is appropriate, depending on the acts, what is the most effective thing to do in the instance of further terror incidents. And we didn't think that it was, perhaps, useful to put all of that into a public statement, telling the terrorists exactly what it was we intended to do.

Q. Mr. President, there are reports that you are preparing a missile attack -- another round -- against Libya with conventional warheads. Do you think that the summit statement on terrorism gives you a license to bomb any country that you suspect is harboring terrorists?

The President. Well, Helen, I have to tell you, I read that little item myself this morning. No one was more surprised to hear that I was planning that than I was -- [laughter] -- because I'm not planning that. As I said, we'll work together on these things. But we do feel -- and this was part of the gist of the conversation that we all had and the agreements that we came to -- and that is that we can take whatever action is necessary to curb, to stop, and to punish, if they are successful in a terrorist attempt, those who practice terrorism and the States who back and support it.

The President. Again, you touch upon something where military action is deemed necessary. I'm not going to discuss that, because I think it would be counterproductive to do so. But we weren't out, in the sense of getting one man -- that we were dropping those tons of bombs hoping to blow him up. I don't think any of us would have shed tears if that had happened. But we were out to damage and destroy those facilities that were making it possible for that particular State under his guidance to back and support terrorism.

Q. Sir, a moment ago you talked about people who commit terrorist acts in pursuit of a political goal. Do you really think you're going to stop that kind of action until you deal with the root causes of terrorism? Your Secretary of State seems to suggest, or at least indicate, that it's just a question of people who are thugs. Where is the emphasis on trying to revive the Middle East peace process? Where is the emphasis on trying to settle the Palestinian problem? Has there been any?

The President. All of those things are still goals of ours, and we're still doing everything we can to arrive at solutions. But, Sam, I think that's the same thing as the cliche line that is going around that, well, one man's terrorist is another man's freedom fighter. No such thing. The people that are customarily called freedom fighters are fighting against organized military forces. Even if it is a civil war, it is a war. Terrorists, as I said before, are people who deliberately choose as a target to murder and maim innocent people who have no influence upon the things that they think of as their political goals. And, therefore, those people must be treated as to what they are, and that is they are base criminals.

Q. Mr. President, the Soviets have now admitted that they miscalculated the accident at Chernobyl in the first few days. Their officials complain that your focus has not been on sympathy for that great tragedy that their country has suffered, but that you're more focused on bashing their system and their country and taking advantage of this tragedy. What's your response?

The President. Well, my response is that our first response when word came to us -- and not as information directly from them, but that there had been such a thing happen there -- was an offer of any kind and every kind of aid that might be helpful to them. And certainly an expression of sympathy went with that for those who might have suffered in the accident. Since then, the effort -- for a limited period at least -- to cover up and confuse the issue, we think, was the wrong way to go. We're not bashing at all. We're simply citing the need for any one of us, if that happens, to let the neighbors know that they may be threatened as the outcome of this. But I am pleased to say that in the last few days there has been a change, and the Soviet Union has been more forthcoming about this with regard to getting information and so forth.

The President. Well, I don't think that I could put a time on that, but I think that we did things at this summit that are dealing with that kind of problem and are going to do our utmost to see that markets are opened and trade restrictions are removed. That was one of the prominent subjects here and one in which will be treated with the forthcoming GATT rounds.

Q. Mr. President, you and Mrs. Thatcher worked so hard to get Libya mentioned in the summit declaration. Syrian President Assad has said that there should be more terrorist acts against Israel. Why did you not work to get Syria mentioned as a terrorist-sponsoring state?

The President. Well, right now the one state on which we all have irrefutable evidence of their support of terrorist acts -- indeed, we had intelligence information that knows in advance of 35 planned operations backed by them. So, we tagged them. What we have made plain is that if we have the same kind of irrefutable evidence with regard to other countries, they will be subject to the same treatment.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to go back to the terrorism statement signed at the summit. The leaders did agree to some specific actions. Most of them are things that they are already doing, but they explicitly decided not to endorse either economic sanctions or military action. Are you saying that there were some secret agreements and that they have approved economic sanctions or military action?

Q. But, sir, if I might, were there any commitments made? The French and the Japanese are already saying they don't view this summit statement as binding. They'll decide to do whatever they want to do.

Q. Mr. President, there are those in the administration who say that a decision has been made to take two Poseidon submarines out of service to observe the limits of the SALT treaty, the unratified treaty, when that deadline comes around. Can you tell us if you have made the decision, or if it's imminent, and if, when you do make it, and if you do do that, if you're going to say that you're going the extra mile once again?

The President. No decision has been made. And with regard to the two submarines you mentioned, I might tell you that no decision was made there either. But a decision has to be made that has nothing to do with the SALT treaty restraints. The thing is a practical question of whether it is better, economically and for our strength, to try to refurbish two aging submarines or whether to put them out of action simply because they are no longer, and their lifespan is so short. And we haven't made the decision on either one of those things yet.

Q. Mr. President, when you were in Indonesia, what did you tell President Soeharto about the human rights situation there? And as a followup, what would you like the Secretary of State to carry in the way of a human rights message to South Korea when he goes there today?

The President. Well, I have to say with regard to my conversations with Soeharto -- and I've always believed this with regard to human rights things and anyone we're talking with -- I've found that it's far more productive if quiet diplomacy is practiced and if you simply discuss those things in private. So, I won't refer to that. I will call attention to the fact, though, that with all of the criticisms that are being made, and particularly since the issue of whether some reporters could or could not land, the progress that has been made by Indonesia, the fact that they have become totally self-sufficient in providing food for their 165 million people, a number of things of this kind, the economic growth. He has much to be proud of and the record that has been established by his government.

Q. Well, as a followup, sir. If you won't tell us what you discussed, can you say whether you brought the subject up? And again on South Korea, with the Secretary going there today, will those be discussed?

Q. You say the allies have signed a statement pledging joint action on terrorism. Does that mean that precludes unilateral American military action in the event of a terrorist attack? And a followup to an earlier question: What exactly is the state of the solution to the Middle East problem, the Palestinian problem?

The President. Let me just say that with regard to the first question, no, there wasn't anything in there in which we said that we would try to preclude some nation from acting. We simply said that it shouldn't be dependent on a single nation to try and find an answer, that all of us were united, that this was an attack against all of us.

The President. Well, look, we continue to try and have tried to be helpful in bringing about peace negotiations in the Middle East. And we have stated from the first and still state that the solution to the Palestinian problem must be a part of any peace settlement. We haven't retreated from that.

Q. Mr. President, while you've been here, you've been losing ground in the Senate. The Senate voted against arm sales to the Saudis, and the Senate tax committee has approved a plan that abolishes capital gains and does quite a few other things that you said you're not for. What are you going to do about it?

The President. On the tax reform? Well, there are a few things in there I've got some questions about, but haven't had time to really study in depth with all that's been going on here. I have to tell you that, overall, I think the Senate Finance Committee's tax plan basically meets the four requirements that I had always set down for a tax reform. And I find that, overall, it is far superior to the Congress version -- or the House version. And I think that, very likely, I can find myself supporting the Senate committee's version. I hope it comes out to the floor. As a matter of fact, there's a possibility it may have, and they may be voting on it right now.

The President. Well, again, I would be violating a confidence. All of them were talking about their problems, their relationship with Libya; and many of them were making suggestions as to what they thought they were going to do. But I don't think that I should be quoting them or making that public, because those were in private conversations.

Q. Mr. President, as you know, your government has information suggesting that the perpetrator of the Berlin disco bombing got the explosives from the Syrians. Do you intend the agreement that you all signed here this week as a warning to the Syrian Government as well as to the Libyan Government?

The President. We think that this agreement that we signed, yes, is one that is saying to those other countries which there's reason to suspect have if not openly supported, certainly not discouraged terrorism coming from their countries. We intend this to make them think also and realize that they're covered by this agreement, that they will have to face all of us united if we get evidence that they are doing this.

Q. If I could follow up, sir. Do the various enforcement measures contained in the statement apply to suspected terrorists of other countries, other than Libya? For instance, if Washington or London were to expel, say, three Syrian diplomats for alleged terrorist activity, would Paris be required to deny them diplomatic status as well?

The President. Well, here again is a decision that would then be made by all of us. And as a matter of fact, without waiting for incidents in a particular locale -- whether to start at least reducing their personnel or sending them home entirely, that is a decision that we will all make. And that is one of the things that needs to be done.

Q. Mr. President, you and Mrs. Thatcher managed in 1984 to get through a statement on terrorism that, at the time, you considered quite forceful. And yet the incidents of terrorism increased, and you didn't get cooperation on the April 15th raid. Is there any reason to think that this time it would be different, that the allies would be willing to do what they seemed to be unwilling to do the last time after passing a declaration like this?

The President. I think there is reason to believe that because we have all seen the evidence and we've all seen the fact that the victims of the terrorist attacks and the place where the attacks take place are such that almost any incident involves more than one country to begin with, that they -- as I said last year, together with sharing intelligence with other countries, we were able to abort 126 planned terrorist acts.

Now we, as I say, have evidence ourselves of 35 planned attacks, but they're in a number of countries. And in many instances, however, the targets would be specifically Americans, but in other countries. The incident in France -- and I had to congratulate President Mitterrand on it -- they discovered this incident that was to take place very shortly. And this was when they expelled the members. It was for this reason. Through the Libyan organization that they -- they don't use the word ``embassy,'' but it amounts to that in Paris -- weapons had been provided to terrorists who were then going to set up -- and outside the American Embassy where people line up to go in and get visas to come to America. Those aren't Americans. They don't need visas if they're Americans. So those innocent people of whatever nationality, probably predominantly French, were going to be mowed down with small-arms fire and hand grenades. And that was aborted, and they sent the diplomats home and are sending additional ones home. But, again, it reveals that we all have come to an awareness that we're all targets.

The President. Well, that's one of the wonderful things that came out of this summit. There may and will, I'm quite sure, be differences here and there between countries on a method or what to do. But I don't see a divorce in the offing. I think the marriage is happier than I've ever seen it. As a matter of fact, people who have been more familiar -- or familiar with more summits than I have -- said the same thing that I have said. Of all the six I've attended, I never have attended one in which the sense of unity and the cordiality between us in -- whatever differences, they were more of how to accomplish something than whether to accomplish something. And we are all going home pretty much inspired by that.

The President. Well, thank you all. Nancy and I appreciate you coming out here to welcome us home. Before I bring you up-to-date on the economic summit, I'd like to turn a minute to my good will ambassador. Nancy used the opportunity of this Pacific trip to take her fight against drug abuse to Thailand and Malaysia. And I'm very proud of the award that was presented to Nancy by the people in Thailand in recognition of her dedication. She's really special to me, too. I understand that she has a presentation. I understand that Nancy has a presentation of her own to make, so here's my special ambassador of good will.

Mrs. Reagan. Thank you. All the young people that you see over there are from the Martin Luther King School. And before we left for Tokyo, they gave to me some letters to be delivered to their sister school in Tokyo and a mural, which I did. And they were very, very happy to receive them, and they sent back a lot of letters to you and this mural which I wanted you to see and everybody else to see. And they hope that this will be the beginning of a long friendship and relationship between the two schools and you and them and a lasting friendship. So, I was very happy to do it, and they were very happy to receive your letters and your mural. Thank you.

The President. Well, prior to leaving, I talked about the winds of freedom, about the resurgence of democracy throughout the world and the solidarity among free people. We returned from Asia more confident than ever that the future is on the side of the free. Today the leading powers of the free world are united in purpose and steadfast in their resolve. In Tokyo we looked each other in the eye, discussed the challenges we face, and reached understandings that will serve the cause of our mutual security, freedom, and prosperity. The seven major democracies represented in Tokyo set out a unified course on a number of vital issues.

Terrorism, as expected, was high on the agenda. Our unarmed citizens have been murdered, victimized by cowardly attacks that if permitted to continue, threaten not only the flow of trade and travel but the very fabric of our free societies. I am more than pleased by the commitments made in Tokyo by our summit partners in this regard. Our nations, acting together, have enormous diplomatic, economic, and military power. We agreed the time has come to move beyond words and rhetoric. Terrorists and those who support them, especially governments, have been put on notice. It's going to be tougher from now on. The decent people of the world -- as is clear from our statement in Tokyo -- are not just standing together in this war against terrorism. We're committed to winning the war and wiping this scourge from the face of the Earth.

The late Ludwig von Mises, a free -- or a preeminent, I should say, free market economist, once said: ``People must fight for something that they want to achieve, not simply reject an evil.'' Well, our meetings in Tokyo reflected both struggle and triumph. We sought and reached a consensus as to the best path to our sustaining noninflationary economic growth. High taxes, redistribution, and central planning are not the way to a better life. For the last 5 years ours has been a program of low tax rates, high growth, and free enterprise; and it's worked.

There are those in less than free societies who would like to think that self-interest makes it impossible for democratic peoples to cooperate. The triumph in Tokyo refutes that cynicism. Summit members, in an extraordinary display of unity, agreed to a number of significant economic initiatives. We, for example, agreed to improve the international monetary system through greater interaction between our governments. We reached an understanding that trade imbalance questions and exchange rate stability, very tangible issues, would not be dealt with as isolated occurrences, but as manifestations of fundamental economic goals and policies. We established a new framework for strengthening effective coordination of international economic policy.

Subsidized agricultural production, a primary cause of the world's surpluses of food and fiber and a politically sensitive area, was seen as an emerging issue of great importance, and we discussed it with candor. We spent more time on this than any other economic issue. In the end we agreed to further analysis and discussion. It was a modest step, but perhaps the historic step toward the day when our farmers can sell their products at a competitive price anywhere in the world.

A high degree of unity was evident in a number of crucial economic questions. The U.S. program to deal with the large foreign debt in the developing world by encouraging high private sector growth received strong support, and the need for a new round of trade talks with an early launch following the September ministerial received a strong endorsement.

World trade -- keeping it free and fair -- is a major challenge not only of the Western democracies but also the developing world. Prior to the Tokyo summit I met with representatives of the six member nations of ASEAN, the Association of South East Asian Nations. They agreed with me on the necessity of keeping markets open and getting world trade flowing. The ASEAN countries are supportive of a new round of trade talks and of a program of growth-oriented policies to solve the debt problem in the Third World. My meetings with the representatives of ASEAN gave me a chance to bring their concerns to Tokyo. It also permitted me the opportunity to confirm our ties with the industrious people of the Pacific rim. The United States is a Pacific rim country and will most certainly continue to play an important role in events in the Pacific.

That the economic summit was held in Tokyo was fortuitous. There in Japan, East truly does meet West. A land of beauty, culture, energy, and enterprise. Today the interests of free people are no longer East or West, North or South, but instead are global and universal. Free people everywhere of every culture share a bond of the spirit and of the soul. We all have an interest in peace, the rights of man, and in the well-being of everyone who lives on this planet. We reconfirmed that in Tokyo.

Tomorrow marks the opening of round five of the nuclear and space talks in Geneva (NST). Our overriding priority in these negotiations is the achievement of deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions in the nuclear arsenals of the United States and U.S.S.R. and the strengthening of strategic stability. Through agreements on such reductions, we seek to achieve a safer world and to work toward our ultimate goal of eliminating all nuclear weapons.

The session that begins tomorrow is an important one. In Geneva last November, General Secretary Gorbachev and I agreed to accelerate the negotiations on nuclear and space arms, particularly where we had already identified areas of common ground. This includes the principle of 50-percent reductions in nuclear arms, appropriately applied, as well as the objective of an interim agreement limiting intermediate-range missile systems (INF). Unfortunately, little progress was made during the most recent round of the negotiations, largely due to the failure of the Soviet Union to act on the commitments it undertook in the November 21 joint statement.

In January Mr. Gorbachev advanced publicly a ``plan'' calling for the elimination of all nuclear weapons by the end of the century. While we are pleased that the Soviet Union has embraced in principle our ultimate goal of eliminating all nuclear weapons, we believe this must be accomplished through a progression of practical measures. Our immediate focus should remain the prompt accomplishment of the necessary first steps in this process: 50-percent reductions in strategic nuclear arms and an interim INF agreement, as agreed last November in Geneva. Toward this end, the United States has put forward fair and balanced proposals in all three areas of the NST negotiations. Our new strategic arms (START) proposals adopt the concept of 50-percent reductions in the nuclear arsenals of the United States and U.S.S.R. and seek to enhance stability by reducing the capability to conduct a first strike. These new proposals are designed as well to take into account concerns expressed by the Soviet Union and to build on areas of common ground in our respective positions.

In the defense and space forum we want to initiate a dialog with the Soviets on the vital relationship between strategic offense and defense. Furthermore, as a demonstration of our peaceful intentions, we are proposing an exchange of information on our respective strategic defense research programs and reciprocal visits by U.S. and Soviet experts to laboratories which are engaged in such research. Unfortunately, neither in their January announcement nor in their statements at Geneva have the Soviets provided a constructive response to our proposals in either the START or defense and space area. We hope they will do so this round.

On the other hand, Mr. Gorbachev's announcement did seem to show a potential for progress in the INF area. Taking this into account, I therefore made another new U.S. offer: a concrete, phased plan for the global elimination of this entire category of U.S. and Soviet missiles by the end of this decade. This new proposal, developed in close consultation with our allies in Europe and Asia, builds upon areas of common ground, as called for in the summit joint statement. Our previous INF proposals also remain on the table. In INF we also are proposing very concrete verification measures. After resisting for years U.S. proposals for verification, the Soviet Union recently has professed in its public statements that it now shares our interest in effective verification. We are seeking to put these Soviet pronouncements to the test at the negotiating table. In light of the unfortunate events of the past week, moreover, the need for effective verification measures has become clearer than ever.

In sum, our key objectives in the Geneva negotiations are: deep cuts; no first strike advantage; continuing defensive research, because defense is safer than offense; and no cheating. We are making a sincere and determined effort to see the promise of the November summit fulfilled, and the instructions I gave to Ambassadors Kampelman, Glitman, and Lehman on their return to Geneva provide them with the flexibility they need to explore all promising approaches for agreement. It is high time now for the Soviet Union to get down to business by addressing seriously with us in Geneva the practical implementation of the mutual commitments which Mr. Gorbachev and I made at the summit. If the Soviets truly join us in this vital effort, real progress in nuclear arms reductions is clearly within our reach.

I want to emphasize in closing that the way to make progress is at the bargaining table in Geneva, in the confidential atmosphere provided by these negotiations. I therefore call on the Soviet Union to study these practical, yet far-reaching, U.S. proposals carefully and to respond in an equally concrete and constructive manner at the negotiating table. Only this will establish the kind of dialog that can lead to progress.

Today the House joined the Senate in voting to disapprove the proposed sale of defensive missiles to Saudi Arabia. By this action, the Congress has endangered our longstanding security ties to Saudi Arabia, called into question the validity of U.S. commitments to its friends, and undermined U.S. interests and policy throughout the Middle East, in particular our ability to act as a balanced arbiter in the search for a peaceful resolution to the Arab-Israeli conflict. The President will not allow this to happen.

It must be clearly understood that this sale of defensive arms is not proposed as a favor to the Saudis, but because it is in America's interest to help our friends defend themselves against the forces of radicalism and terror. Therefore, it is the President's intention to veto this resolution and to work actively with Members of both Houses of Congress to sustain that veto.

Today some 36 million Americans suffer from some form of handicap. Eighty percent of Americans will experience some disability in their lifetime. That makes it necessary for all of us to understand and appreciate both the barriers they must surmount and the contributions that they can make to our society.

Many disabled people face financial, cultural, and physical barriers because of a lack of public understanding of their needs. We must become more aware of the barriers that prevent or inhibit so many of our fellow Americans from participating fully in the life of our society, and how much more they could contribute if those obstacles were removed.

This can begin with recognizing the outstanding achievements of many disabled citizens. These heroes, often unsung, have done much to enrich their lives and ours. Let us all resolve to act positively toward those who must cope with the challenge of physical handicaps. We all have much to gain if they are able to live up to their full potential.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Paul Matthews Cleveland, of Florida, a career member of the Senior Foreign Service, Class of Minister-Counselor, as Ambassador to Western Samoa. He succeeds H. Monroe Browne. Ambassador Cleveland was appointed Ambassador to New Zealand last December and will serve concurrently and without additional compensation as Ambassador to Western Samoa.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Patricia Gates Lynch, of the District of Columbia, as Ambassador to the Democratic Republic of Madagascar and the Federal and Islamic Republic of the Comoros. She succeeds Robert Brendon Keating.

The President today announced his intention to accord the personal rank of Ambassador to Michael Novak, of the District of Columbia, as Chairman of the United States delegation to the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe experts' meeting on human contacts in Bern, Switzerland.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Clarence Thomas to be a member of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission for the term expiring July 1, 1991. This is a reappointment. Upon confirmation he will be designated Chairman.

May 8 marks the seventy-fifth anniversary of naval aviation in the United States. On that day in 1911, Captain Washington Irving Chambers prepared the requisition for the first aircraft for the United States Navy, thereby initiating a long and glorious tradition. Since that date, naval aviation has played an essential role in our national defense, both in peace and war. Naval aviation also has played a vital role in the development of space exploration and aviation technology.

Naval aviators performed superbly in World Wars I and II, the Korean and Vietnam conflicts, and other operations in support of our national security. Today, naval aviators are deployed in all parts of the world aboard our aircraft carriers, other ships, and shore-based naval aviation squadrons. The courage and professionalism of these dedicated men and women were again demonstrated vividly during the anti-terrorist strikes conducted in Libya a few weeks ago. All Americans owe a great debt of gratitude to the people who fly and maintain naval aircraft.

It is appropriate, therefore, that on the day marking the seventy-fifth anniversary of the founding of naval aviation, the people of the United States, along with our friends and allies throughout the world, should celebrate the remarkable achievements and proud heritage of naval aviation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Throughout our history, the Nation's waters have provided a bounty of fish for recreation and food. Every year more than 60 million Americans participate in sport fishing, one of the most wholesome and healthful of outdoor pursuits.

Recreational fishing provides enjoyment and relaxation for citizens of all ages. It brings them into close touch with the beauty, wonders, and abundance of our inland and coastal waters. Sport fishing promotes respect for nature and encourages sound conservation.

In this great land we are particularly blessed. Not only does sport fishing represent an important commitment to conservation and recreation, it sustains a billion-dollar industry. Through the special taxes, licenses, and fees that sport fishermen pay, tens of millions of dollars are made available each year to fund fishery restoration projects throughout the 50 States and the Territories.

Fishing, of course, is also a major industry that provides employment for more than 300,000 Americans each year and lands some six billion pounds of seafood worth about two and a half billion dollars in direct sales.

In recognition of the valuable financial contributions sport fishing makes to fish conservation programs in every State, and in light of the time-honored recreation it means for so many of our citizens, it is fitting that we observe a National Fishing Week. It is proper that we encourage our Nation's sport fishermen to take pride in their sport and in what it does to preserve and enhance America's fishery resources.

Just about a year ago I went on national television to speak of a great national endeavor for our future, an effort by all of us to give the words freedom, fairness, and hope new meaning and power for every man and woman in America. I spoke to you about what we must do to transform a tax system, rotting from unfairness and complexity, a source of unending resentment and enmity, into one that is clear, simple, and fair for all, a system that could no longer run roughshod over Main Street America, but would ensure your families and firms incentives and rewards for hard work and risk-taking in an American future of strong economic growth.

Death and taxes may be inevitable, but unjust taxes are not. And so we proposed, as our number-one domestic priority, a radical reform to simplify the tax system and lower your tax rates, clear out the clutter of special provisions, free ourselves from the grip of special interests, and create a binding commitment to the only special interest that counts: you, the people who pay America's bills. All of us -- our White House team, Jim Baker's at Treasury, and everyone else in the administration -- have fought hard to get tax reform passed into law.

But from day one the Washington establishment has been firing its big guns trying to shoot tax reform down. According to these experts, we never had a chance. If you listen to conventional wisdom here, to the wisdom of Washington's most influential lobbyist and insiders, tax reform was never more than a pipedream. Less than 1 month ago we were told that tax reform is dead. Well, just in case you missed one of the headlines last week, it read: ``Sudden twists in tax bill's course leave lobbyists stunned, bewildered.'' What happened? The people won, that's what happened. Well, they may not have won quite yet; but thanks to heroic work of Senator Bob Packwood, members of his finance committee, our administration, and you, the political entrepreneurs have just won a magnificent first victory over the stagnating forces of the status quo.

America today stands poised to lift off into a new age of opportunity powered by one of the most exciting economic changes of my lifetime. Passed by an overwhelming 20 to 0 bipartisan vote, this proposal is really radical in scope. It dramatically simplifies the entire tax rate structure and reduces personal income tax rates to their lowest levels in over half a century. There will be only two simple rates: 15 and 27 percent. Over 80 percent of all Americans will pay a tax rate of 15 percent or less. In addition, the Finance Committee proposal will raise the personal and dependents' exemption to $2,000 for all middle- and low-income Americans. It will remove 6 million working poor from the tax rolls all together. That's right, I said 6 million.

It will sweep into the trash bins of our past literally scores of unfair, unwise, unproductive tax shelters. It will make business decisions depend on economic merits rather than on tax considerations. And it will make America more competitive in world markets. Finally, the proposal will make an enormous contribution toward tax fairness by providing for a minimum tax of 20 percent on certain items of tax preference. In this way, we can be sure that all individuals and corporations finally pay their fair share. Of course, this bill is not perfect. But several months ago I wrote several Members of the House specifying the conditions that must be met for my support. This bill meets those conditions. As far as I'm concerned, it's a giant step forward.

The President. I very much wanted to be here today because this ceremony marks the dawn of a new beginning for NASA, the United States, and the free world. For over 25 years the men and women, secretaries and scientists, technicians, and astronauts of NASA have paved the way to the stars. They have charted new courses for us in a strange and forbidding and, yes, sometimes even an unforgiving environment. Some of them have even given the supreme sacrifice.

Over 25 years ago the people of this great nation made a commitment to go where no man has gone before and to do what no man has ever done before. We invited the finest minds in the Nation and world to join with us in a new but risky adventure: to explore the planets and the stars. We invited men and women from all walks of life to join a great team and a great nation to follow an uncertain path.

Everyone knew this was a great nation, and great nations pursue great efforts. This was no exception. There have been sacrifices in this program and lives lost, but there've also been great triumphs. In the 1600's another explorer with unlimited vision and an insatiable search for knowledge recognized the sacrifices of others. Sir Isaac Newton said, ``If I have seen further, it is by standing upon the shoulders of giants.'' Well, the giants of the world's finest space program, we're proud to say, are Americans.

The men and women of NASA and the Department of Defense are setting high standards that are going to be tough to follow. Jim, you're coming on board at a time when NASA and the country need you. We need a steady hand on the tiller. These past few months have been a stormy period for NASA and the space program of the United States. Dr. Bill Graham, who's been serving as the Acting Administrator, has seen us through some high seas and gale force winds, and he has done a fine job. The space shuttle and our missile launch programs are the foundations of our nation's journey to the stars and beyond. It's time to rededicate ourselves to this destiny, and in our view, you, Jim, are the one to make that happen. So, congratulations, and God bless you.

Mr. Fletcher. Thank you, Mr. President, the Vice President, and all of the others here. As you know, I was reluctant to accept this assignment when you first called. After receiving the warm welcome from NASA last week, I've completely flipped over, and I'm anxious to get to work. I must say that we've got a little bit of business ahead of us, but it won't be long before we are flying again. And with the help of some of the people that you see in front of you -- NASA hands and many others -- we'll do that. And of course the Members of Congress, members of the committee -- we expect some of their support, too, and I think with their help we'll be back on track again, Mr. President.

The President. Well, thank you all for being here. Nancy and I want to welcome you all to the White House for this happy occasion. On days like this and at lunches like this, I find myself looking up and thinking what a wonderful job I have. We're here today to present the Medal of Freedom to seven Americans. This medal is the highest civilian honor our nation can bestow. And I've always thought it highly significant that we call it not the Medal of Talent or the Medal of Valor or the Medal of Courage or Genius but the Medal of Freedom. I think that says a lot about our values and what we honor and what we love.

Freedom is important to all of us. As someone who spent many years making speeches, I have quoted many definitions of freedom -- some very moving and eloquent. But I've always liked George Orwell's blunt and unadorned statement. He said, ``Freedom is the right to say no.'' There's something kind of happily rebellious about that definition, and I thought of it this morning because I decided this year's recipients of the Medal of Freedom are distinguished by this. You're a group of happy rebels. In your careers and in the way you have lived your lives, you've all said no -- a most emphatic no -- to mediocrity, to averageness, to timidity. You've said no to the rules of the game and the regulations of the day. You've said no to the conventional wisdom, no to the merely adequate, no to the limits and limitations on yourselves and others.

You're all originals. You've all made America better -- a better place -- and you've made it seem a better place in the eyes of the people of the world. And this today is just our way of saying thanks. And without further ado, I'm going to read the citations for the medals now and award them to the recipients.

Following a brilliant career in publishing and pioneering the use of television for educational purposes, Walter Hubert Annenberg was in 1969 appointed Ambassador to the Court of St. James, where he served with extraordinary diligence, bringing the governments and people of the United States and United Kingdom closer together. Since returning to private life, Walter Annenberg has devoted himself to the development of higher education and has provided support to countless institutions. Today our nation repays his lifetime of achievement with its gratitude.

A soldier of the gridiron, Colonel Earl ``Red'' Blaik led the West Point team he coached into the pages of the history books. He rallied the Black Knights from a record of devastating defeats and carried them on to some of their greatest victories, winning the esteem of his cadet players and the admiration of his vanquished rivals. One of America's great coaches, he brought a winning spirit to his team, honor to his branch of service, and pride to his nation.

Soldier and statesman, Barry Morris Goldwater has stood at the center of American history. Respected by both ally and adversary, Barry Goldwater's celebrated candor and patriotism have made him an American legend. Hailed as a prophet before his time, selfless in the service of his nation, Barry Goldwater has earned the unbounded affection and admiration of his countrymen and the enduring gratitude of all future generations of Americans.

Many are admired, but few are beloved, and fewer still are both. But Helen Hayes is and has been for almost all the years of this century both. Peerless actress, peerless star, she has excelled on stage, screen, and television, playing everything from virtuous young ingenues to Victorian queens. Helen Hayes is that rare thing -- a true original. She is also, demonstrably, a great actress, a great patriot, and a great soul.

For over half a century, as a journalist, author, and teacher, Vermont Royster illuminated the political and economic life of our times. His common sense exploded the pretentions of ``expert opinion,'' and his compelling eloquence warned of the evils of society loosed from its moorings in faith. The voice of the American people can be heard in his prose -- honest, open, proud, and free.

When, as a boy, Albert Bruce Sabin came to the United States from Russia, no one could have known that he would number among the most prominent immigrants of our century. From an early age Sabin devoted his life to medicine, and by the 1950's his research had resulted in a breakthrough. In the years since the Sabin vaccine has helped to make dramatic advances against the scourge of poliomyelitis.

There's nothing to add to achievements such as these, and no praise that can add any more luster to these great names. May I say to you simply, to all of you, thank you just for being, for doing what you've done and what you do. And thank you all, and God bless you.

I wish to commend the many parties who worked together, most particularly Senator Mark Andrews, whose tenacious dedication led efforts, along with others, to settle the complex issues surrounding authorization and funding for a revised Garrison Diversion Unit. Despite the long and contentious history of the Garrison Diversion Unit, the citizens who have worked on both sides of the project have demonstrated that people of good will can reach consensus on the critical water development and environmental issues that face the Nation. Because both supporters and opponents were willing to drop past differences and work together, H.R. 1116 offers benefits to all of the parties who were involved in the negotiations.

We have consistently supported the fine work of the Garrison Diversion Unit Commission. In developing its recommendations, the Commission responded to the contemporary water needs of North Dakota. While this bill is generally based on the recommendations of the Commission, I regret that H.R. 1116 does not include amendments requested by the administration to ensure greater cost recovery for the project. However, the total cost of the revised project represented by this compromise is substantially less than anticipated under the original authorizations or under the Commission's recommendations, and major portions of the controversial project are deauthorized by this legislation. Of equal importance, H.R. 1116 responds to a unique problem that has been the subject of controversy for over 40 years, and therefore I view this compromise as an acceptable solution of this longstanding issue. It should not be perceived as altering, in any way, the administration's policy on cost recovery for water projects. Without these considerations, I could not have approved H.R. 1116.

Finally, section 9 of H.R. 1116 raises a constitutional concern that requires comment. That section provides for the establishment of a ``Wetlands Trust'' under the laws of North Dakota, but partially funded by an annual contribution of Federal funds. The trust is to be administered by a board of directors whose members would be appointed by the Governor of North Dakota and certain environmental organizations. The purposes of the trust, as stated in the bill and to be restated in its corporate charter, are to ``preserve, enhance, restore, and manage wetland and associated wildlife habitat in the State of North Dakota.'' The corporate charter will authorize the trust to finance programs in support of those purposes.

I have been advised by the Department of Justice that because the trust officials are not Federal officers, the trust's allocation of Federal funds may raise a constitutional question under the appointments clause, article II, section 2, clause 2, unless the bill is given a careful narrowing construction. For this reason, I am signing H.R. 1116 based on the understanding that the language directing the Secretary of the Interior to make an annual Federal contribution to the trust means that the Secretary shall establish a grant agreement with the trust. The agreement should contain such terms as are consistent with constitutional and legal requirements and as are necessary to carry out the purposes of the trust, as defined in its corporate charter.

The administration is deeply concerned over the increase in attacks on merchant shipping in international waters in the lower Persian Gulf. Within the last 8 days, two Saudi tankers have been struck by Iranian aircraft in what appears to be an intensification of strikes on neutral ships operating peacefully in the Gulf.

We are concerned that the recent action of Congress in rejecting an arms sale may have created the misperception that the U.S. commitment to freedom of navigation in the Gulf and Saudi self-defense has diminished. Any such view would be gravely mistaken. We strongly support Saudi Arabian self-defense. To avoid miscalculation, we reemphasize the importance we attach to the principle of freedom of navigation and the free flow of oil, as well as our determination to maintain open access through the Straits of Hormuz. Our commitment to this principle and its application to the Gulf remains unchanged.

The United States continues to seek the earliest possible end to the Iran-Iraq war. At the same time, we will support the individual and collective self-defense efforts of our friends in the region and will continue to consider expansion of the Iran-Iraq war to the Arab Gulf States to be a major threat to our interests.

The President today has announced his intention to appoint the following individuals to be members of the National Council on Vocational Education for terms expiring January 17, 1989. These are reappointments.

There is no greater, more beautiful, and instantly recognizable symbol of our Nation and its ideals, traditions, and values than the flag of the United States. The thirteen stripes of red and white remind us of the courage and steadfastness of those who pledged their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honor to found this great experiment in republican government. The white stars on a field of blue stand for the 13 original colonies that formed the nucleus of the new Nation and the 37 states that have become part of our Nation since then. Those many stars recall the saga of our growth as we spanned a continent. The colors of our flag signify the qualities of the human spirit we Americans cherish: red for courage and readiness to sacrifice; white for pure intentions and high ideals; and blue for vigilance and justice. In recent years, citizen awareness, interest, and appreciation of the flag and its relationship to our American heritage have increased. More American families and businesses are buying and displaying the flag.

Nineteen eighty-six marks the 200th anniversary of the first call for a Federal constitutional convention and the year of rededication of the Statue of Liberty, another mighty symbol of what America means. Let it also be the year we as a people commemorate our flag as the proud banner that the winds of freedom lovingly caress, for which generations of patriots have fought and died -- the sign and symbol of a people ruled by a constitution that protects all and enshrines our hopes and our history.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Over two hundred years ago, in June 1775, the first distinctive American flags were flown over the colonial defenses during the Battle of Bunker Hill. One flag was an adaptation of the British Blue Ensign, while the other displayed the pine tree, a symbol of the experience of Americans who had wrested their land from the wilderness.

After more than two centuries, with the addition of thirty-seven stars, each representing one of our 50 States, the flag chosen by the Continental Congress on that June day in Philadelphia still waves over our Nation. This flag symbolizes our shared commitment to freedom and federalism and carries a message of hope to the afflicted, of opportunity to the oppressed, and of peace to all humanity.

I also urge the American people to celebrate those days from Flag Day through Independence Day, set aside by Congress as a time to honor America (89 Stat. 211), by having public gatherings and activities at which they can honor their country in an appropriate manner, especially by ceremonies in which all renew their dedication by publicly reciting the Pledge of Allegiance to the Flag of the United States of America and to the Republic for which it stands, one Nation, under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all.

The President has signed the Acts of the Nineteenth Congress of the Universal Postal Union, negotiated at Hamburg in 1984, and expressed to the Postal Service Board of Governors and to the Postmaster General his concern that the Acts might be used in ways that would stifle private competition in the international mail arena.

Administration policy is to encourage free enterprise in ways that will ensure better products and services at lower costs to our citizens. In line with this policy, the President has asked the Postal Service Governors and the Postmaster General to permit and promote marketplace competition in international mail and to influence other nations to do likewise.

Osteoporosis, a degenerative bone disease, affects 15 to 20 million Americans, mostly women, and takes a terrible human toll of pain, impaired mobility, and disruption of daily activities. Its victims lose their independence, and their families share in the heartache.

Often called a silent disease, osteoporosis may begin and then progress without any warning signs. Bone mass decreases, causing bones to be more susceptible to fracture. Each year more than 1.3 million Americans over 45 years of age suffer bone fractures as a result of this malady. Fractures of the spine, hips, and wrist are the most common, although any of the bones may be affected.

As the number of elderly persons increases, so will the magnitude of the problem. However, we now know that osteoporosis may not be an inevitable part of aging. New research findings and new approaches to prevention, diagnosis, and treatment are being developed to eliminate osteoporosis as a cause of human suffering. Working together, the Federal government and private voluntary organizations have developed a strong and enduring partnership in osteoporosis research. I am confident we will uncover the cause and cure of this major public health problem and promote measures to prevent or delay its occurrence.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The President. Thank you all, and welcome to the White House, and thank you for coming. I want to congratulate all of you from John A. Holmes High School in Edenton, North Carolina, on your great achievements this year and on your upcoming graduation. And a special greeting to Rob Boyce, the principal of this fine school.

As you know, my remarks are being broadcast live over radio and television to high school students throughout the country. While I was in Tokyo at the economic summit, I found myself thinking about all of you, and I decided that when I got back it'd be good to report to you -- share some thoughts that I've been having about the future.

In general, conditions in our country are about as bright as this very bright afternoon. I was worrying when I put that line in there that it might start to rain, and I'd have to say something else. [Laughter] We've been working to take an economy that was in bad shape and get it moving and growing again; take our national defense and make it first-rate again after a long period of decline; and to restore reason, respect, and reality to our foreign policy. And I think it's fair to say that we've made a good deal of progress.

Only 5 years ago our economy suffered from high inflation, high interest rates, mushrooming government spending, and steadily increasing unemployment. A lot of people couldn't find jobs, and people on fixed incomes were finding it harder to buy the basics, such as food and shelter. Well, we got inflation down, interest rates down, and our economy created over 1\1/2\ million new jobs just last year alone. The poor are now increasingly able to dig themselves out of poverty, and that's been good economic news.

The good news in defense is that our Armed Forces, which were suffering from neglect and low funding, have now made a comeback. Morale is up in the services, and the quality of our men and women in uniform has never been better -- and I mean never. As a matter of fact, we have the highest percentage of high school graduates in uniform today than we've ever had in the history of our nation, even back when we had the compulsory draft. In addition, our nation has encouraged a more realistic sense of defense needs.

In foreign affairs we've kept our friends close and the lines of communication with our adversaries open. We've tried to give the world the sense that the United States has a coherent and logical foreign policy that reflects our respect for freedom and our opposition to tyranny.

The point is that all we've done has had, and will continue to have, a direct impact on your lives. And the fact is, it's your future, not ours. And all that we've done, we've done with an eye toward how it would impact you. We want to make your future better, because tomorrow belongs to you. And since you're the leaders of tomorrow, I wanted to talk to all of you as a friend about the things you'll have to do to ensure a prosperous nation and a peaceful world. And I'm sure that peace and prosperity must be at the top of your agenda for the future.

You have some special responsibilities ahead of you -- very important responsibilities. America is back, yes, but we still face major challenges in the world. And it's your generation that will have to accept the primary responsibility for tackling these challenges. It's important that you're fit for the future and that you be all that you can be. So, go for it! In the area of education you have a responsibility to try to learn and care about scientific and intellectual inquiry. The world is an increasingly competitive place. And if we're to compete, we'll have to do it with brainpower -- your brainpower. So, keep learning and hit those books.

We have to remain economically competitive, and that means being aware of two things: first, what makes economies tick, and second, what works in other societies. We've been trying very hard in Washington to make America even more economically fit by really overhauling our entire tax structure. When we came into office, the top personal tax rate that the Federal Government could put on your income was 70 percent. Now, you can understand, I think, that if you were getting up in those brackets -- there were 14 different tax brackets, depending on the amount of money in each bracket you earned. And when you could look and say, ``If I earn another dollar, I only get to keep 30 cents out of it,'' you can imagine the lack of incentive there. Well, we lowered it to 50 percent, and the economy really took off. Now we're trying to lower it yet again so that families can keep more of their money and so the national economy will be lean and trim and fit for the future.

And it's your generation that will defend freedom from its adversaries. The biggest contribution you can make to that quest is to become a good citizen. Good citizenship is vitally important if democracies are to continue. Good citizenship means trying to understand the issues and great questions of your day. It also means voting. To vote is to take part in this grand experiment called democracy in America. It's your right and your responsibility to take part. Good citizenship also might mean considering going into teaching as a profession. There's a teacher shortage, as you may know. You could help ease the situation and give to others the advantages you've been given if you become a teacher yourself. And it's also important that you stay in school. That diploma counts. And I just want to personally congratulate those who have overcome some disadvantage and who stuck it out and will graduate this year.

And part of being a good citizen, part of being fit for the future so that you can meet America's agenda for the future, is seeing to it that you live your life with a clear mind and a steady intellect. And that means saying no to drugs. Nancy has traveled across the country talking to young people like you. And many of them have talked to her about the allure of drugs, about the drug culture, and the kind of peer pressure that you come under to experiment and try out drugs. But when you come right down to it, drugs are just a dead-end street. They have nothing to offer you. I think you also ought to remember we only get one set of machinery. If you wear this set out, you can't take it and trade it in someplace for a used one or a new one. So, what you do now and early in your life decides how able you're going to be to enjoy yourself when you get to be my age.

And I want to tell you, I'm enjoying myself. I've talked to young people from China to Europe to the islands in the Caribbean. And let me tell you, they're incredibly bright and talented, and they're going to create quite a future for themselves. And you can't keep up or catch up if you allow your mind to be clouded by drugs.

Well, that's more or less what I wanted to say to you today. I'll be talking to many young people over the next few months, and I'll be expanding on certain points and amplifying certain themes. But for today, before your questions, I just want to let you know that I have been thinking about you very much. You are a special generation, and you're facing special challenges. And the biggest is to be ready for a future that will prove to be demanding and exciting. Soon, we'll enter the 21st century, a time that'll have more than its share of great wonders. The next 10 or 15 years may well be the most exciting and challenging in the history of man. There's the continuing revolution in technology, the possibility of curing diseases that have stalked us from the caveman era. There's the marvelous conquest of space, a rich frontier whose riches we've barely glimpsed. And there's the struggle between the democracies and those countries which are not democratic.

All of these possibilities bring with them questions. And it's your generation that will have to answer them. That makes you all very important, indeed. You have much before you. And all I can say is that you've begun brilliantly. Continue to pursue excellence. Be proud of your country and its heritage, and be proud of yourselves, as we are proud of all of you.

Now, that's all I had to say in terms of prepared remarks. What I really want to do is take your questions. And I understand that Rob Miller will be asking the first question. So, Rob, step up to the microphone, and we'll begin.

The President. Oh, there are so many things, and many things that you don't enjoy, also. I think the greatest is that every once in a while something comes to your attention -- maybe it's something you read in the paper about some unfortunate person, or you get a letter that someone managed to get through about some problem that, evidently, there isn't any regular program to solve, and you find that you can solve it. And I know of one case of a baby that had to have a transplant, and we were able to arrange that. And then, just a short time ago, I had the pleasure of seeing that little girl who had been a baby at the time of the transplant, and she came here with her parents to the White House. But it's things like that where you find that being in this position enables you to reach out and touch and get something of that kind done. And you go home feeling 10 feet tall and very happy.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Stacie Self, and I will be studying mechanical engineering at North Carolina State University. Many of us are planning to continue our education and go on to be doctors, lawyers, engineers. However, very few, if any of us, are planning to become teachers. Does this concern you? If so, what measures are being taken to encourage more people into entering this profession?

The President. Well, we have been doing some things. As you know, I appointed a commission to come up with a report on excellence in education, and they brought many suggestions. And since the Federal Government does not control education -- it's controlled at the State and local level -- we, then, sent our missionaries out to tell the States and to provide this report to them. Some of them had to do with this very problem of teachers. And the result is that many States now are putting in merit pay for teachers -- that, in addition to a set of classified salary scales for teachers, that teachers who rise above the norm and do exceptionally well can be rewarded as they would be in any other business or industry with an increase in pay. We also have made quite a considerable sum available to stimulate the teaching of instructors in math and science and so forth. So, we are working toward that end. I can't recall when we've faced a shortage of teachers as is facing us in the near future. And they are all important. So, we're going to continue doing everything we can to encourage going into that profession.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Saundra Roundtree, and I'll be attending North Carolina Central University this fall to have a major in computer science. Most of us are getting ready to start paying Social Security. Do you think we will be able to receive it when we retire?

The President. Social Security? Yes. When we came here I was very disturbed, and I got myself in a lot of trouble, because in an election year some people sort of distorted what I was trying to say. But Social Security was in trouble. As a matter of fact, we knew when we came here that, as far as we could see, Social Security by July of 1983 was going to be bankrupt in the way it was going. And when the election year of '82 was over and it was no longer a political issue, then we put together a bipartisan commission made up of representatives of the Congress, the Government, and the private sector. They did a study and came back with a recommendation for a complete reform. And as far as we can see now, Social Security is on a sound financial basis as far as we can see into the next century. So, yes, it will be there.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Martha Felton, and in the spring I plan to attend Johann College to study journalism. My question is: First of all, we've seen, all of us, the specials and news reports concerning the financial status of the American farmer. And I was wondering, could you explain to us what you think the future holds for the family farmer?

The President. Yes, for one thing, we have to get farming back into the marketplace, instead of under the Government regulations and subsidies and programs that we've had for the last 50-odd years. This isn't a purely American problem. At the Tokyo summit, the representatives of the seven countries around the table -- all of us recognized that governments were, in a sense, subsidizing the overproduction of food in the world. We've been so used, over the centuries, to calling it a hungry world; but today virtually every country that once was an importer of foodstuffs is now an exporter.

So, one of the things we decided, after lengthy discussion, was to put together an international team of experts and see how we could meet this particular problem. But I can't help but call attention to the fact that in our country a large part of farming was never in the government farm programs. And that part of farming has not had the troubles that we see now among our farmers. And so, we have to recognize that government has to bear a responsibility for part of what has happened. And we're trying to find a way out, but with compassion for those people who must not just be allowed to wither on the vine. But our main problem is that we have induced overproduction; we're producing more than there's a market for. And we've got to find an answer to that, and yet an answer that does not suddenly hurt some individuals.

The President. I'm delighted to answer that one. There are a number of things that I've thought we did rather well and was proud of. But right now, the fact that both the Senate and the House have passed tax reform legislation for the income tax -- meaning that when we can get those two together -- one of their programs they passed, I don't like at all. The other one's pretty good. But both of them can be improved. This, I think, would be the greatest achievement. We have had an income tax system that was passed in 1913 and has grown to be such a monster that virtually -- well, the main part of the people in our country have to hire professional help to find out how much they owe the Government. And the tax is such that if you make a mistake, the Government then comes back and penalizes you and charges you a fine for having made a mistake. At the same time, the Government has warned you not to seek advice from their own employees, because their own employees don't understand the law. And, therefore, you'd be penalized for their mistake.

Well, today this tax that the Senate -- or bill that the Senate has passed has only two brackets: 15 percent and then 27 percent. Meaning that there would always be an incentive, even if you're in the 27-percent bracket, because you're going to get to keep 73 cents out of every dollar you earn no matter how many dollars those are. And it's been simplified to the place that you won't need a public accountant to tell you how much you owe. You can figure out your tax yourself. It's fair. There will be about 6 million people at the bottom of the scale who'll be dropped from having to pay any income tax at all. And about 80 percent of the people will be in that 15-percent bracket.

So, I think the fact that we have finally gotten the Congress of the United States to deal with this problem of tax reform is the greatest achievement. And I'm going to be riding herd all the way to see that we finally get it through.

Q. Mr. President, my name is David Rosenblatt, and I'm currently trying to gain admission into the United States Naval Academy. My hope is to graduate from the Academy and become a career officer, United States Marine Corps. Mr. President, what do you recommend to my generation -- what steps do you recommend that we take to avert the possibility of a future nuclear war?

The President. I think the path that we have -- trying to be on -- and if we can persuade our Soviet counterparts to go with us, is the path. And that is to start a program of mutual reduction of nuclear weapons leading to, as soon as possible, the total elimination of such weapons. As you know, we have the most stupid policy today. We inherited this from years back. It's called mutual assured destruction. And because the Soviet Union had built up such a massive force, then we built up a deterrent force. What do we mean by deterrent? Well, we know we're not going to shoot the first one. But if they attack, then we must have enough so that our retaliatory blow will deliver unacceptable damage to them. And that's supposed to keep them from shooting the first missile at us.

Well, doesn't it make a lot more sense, instead of living under that threat that some madman might push that button, let's get rid of those weapons? But then, over and above that -- what we're trying to do -- let's get rid of the mistrust between the East bloc and the West bloc so that there's no need for any war. Someone has wisely said that nations don't distrust each other because they're armed. Nations arm themselves because they distrust each other. So, if we can eliminate that -- and that's what we're trying with these summit meetings and so forth. But may I wish you well in the career you've chosen and tell you that of all the things I'm proud of in this job, I'm more proud of the young men and women in uniform than I can say. I'm bursting with pride. They're doing such a great job.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Laura Bond. I will be attending North Carolina A&T State University to major in industrial engineering. As high school seniors, many of us will soon be seeking employment. What do you feel is the employment status for us next year?

The President. Employment in the United States? I have to say the prospects are good, because while we still show, say, a 7-percent unemployment rate, that is based on considering everyone, male and female, in the United States between the ages of 16 and 65 as the potential work force. Today we have the highest percentage of that sum total work force employed ever in our history: 110 million people working. And in the last 40 months we have created 10 million new jobs. And we're going on still at that same rate, as I said a million and a half just in the last year.

The President. Well, I want to encourage you. Let me just say that about this. First of all, you want it not just for the job; you want to be sure that there are things that you believe deeply in and that you would like to try and see are done for the betterment of our nation and the people. And then, I would suggest that first of all you get involved in helping in politics -- your local or county headquarters. When election year comes along, volunteer to help to go door to door, to do all the things that need to be done in an election. And in that way, you learn where it is that you think would be the best way for you to start.

Now, there are two ways of going into government. There is that, running for office and then seeking the next opportunity to go up. The other is not the elective process, but to look at the career possibilities in government, of becoming a government employee. And many times that also then leads to elective office. But the opportunities are there. But as I say, you must want, inside of you, to do things for the public good, not just say, ``Oh, that looks like a nice job. I'll try that.'' So, I think you'll do it the right way. And, as I say, your postgraduate course can be volunteering and helping. And thus you get acquainted, and you understand how the process works, and you get acquainted with the people that would help you get elected to an office. And it also helps if pretty soon, instead of you having to volunteer, somebody comes to you and says you ought to run for -- and then you grudgingly give in.

Mr. Shcharanskiy thanked the President for his unflagging support for human rights in the Soviet Union and his role in securing his release from a Soviet prison camp. He gave the President his assessment of the situation of Soviet Jewry, particularly the plight of 400,000 Soviet Jews who have expressed a desire to emigrate from the Soviet Union. He urged the President to continue his efforts on their behalf.

The President expressed his admiration for Mr. Shcharanskiy's courage and fortitude and reaffirmed his determination to do everything possible to help those who have been denied the right to emigrate, practice their religion, or maintain their Jewish identity. The American people and the world will not forget them.

I hope I haven't kept you waiting, but somebody had to run the store. [Laughter] Well, it's a pleasure to be with you again. During the last election, I promised to support an overhaul of the tax system from top to bottom. And every time I talked about it there were cheers from the audience and a gigantic ho-hum from the pundits. And, as usual, the people have been way out ahead of Washington insiders on this issue. The special interests in the Nation's Capital seem to have taken the taxpayers for granted once too often.

But it was less than a month ago that we were told that tax reform was dead. And the one thing about Washington, there are plenty of people around to tell you why something can't be done. And if I was cynical enough to believe that real change is impossible, I wouldn't have run for this job. Democracy's a cumbersome process. Like Winston Churchill said, ``Democracy is the worst form of government except all those other forms that have been tried from time to time.'' I think the bold and innovative tax program that was passed through the Senate Finance Committee by Bob Packwood and his bipartisan coalition is a major victory for the democratic process. It's the kind of straightforward, hard-hitting proposal that's enough to restore one's faith -- a faith some of us never lost -- that this truly is a system of the people, by the people, and for the people. It's a good proposal, and pardon me for resurrecting an old phrase, but we should go for it.

It was about a year ago when I called on Congress for a second American revolution. I spoke about the need to transform an unfair and overly complex system, a source of resentment and confusion, into a fair and simple tax code. One that would serve the general interest instead of the special interests, and one that would encourage business to grow and produce. I said then, and I still say, business leaders -- small and large -- should be permitted to quit spending their time concentrating on the tax angles and get back to thinking about supply and demand.

Our original proposal, to say the least, got a little bogged down as it went through Congress. We fought hard -- and that means all of us on the White House team -- Jim Baker's team over at Treasury, everyone else in the administration -- but the Washington establishment was fighting just as hard, trying to sink tax reform. Interest groups drilled one little hole after another in the hull of the tax reform boat, and when they got done, they proclaimed it wouldn't float. Well, that's not what I call good government. And what has happened in these last few weeks is evidence that there are still a lot of people in this town who are committed to good government and to following the will of the people. The proposal that passed the Senate Finance Committee meets the criteria I set down for tax reform. Starting right now, getting it passed and signing it into law is a top priority. It simplifies the mind-boggling tax rate structure, making it more understandable and fair. And it reduces the personal income tax rates to their lowest levels in over half a century.

And talking to some people about tax reform, I made a point the other day, just shortly after April 15th, that mine was all made out for me, and they sent it to me and even with it all filled out I couldn't understand it. There will be only two rates under the new plan: 15 and 27 percent. The overwhelming majority of people -- over 80 percent -- will pay a tax rate of 15 percent or less and most will enjoy a reduction in their tax obligation.

By lowering the rates, we'll encourage resources to flow from tax shelters to productive economy-building investment. By lowering the rates, we'll encourage the entrepreneurial spirit of the work ethic by letting people keep more of what they earn. This is the way to build a stronger and more powerful economy -- one that produces more for everybody, including a broader tax base for the Government. You know, I've often wondered how much the Government really got from some of those tremendously high marginal rates. Because when I was back in Hollywood, where the pay scale is a little above the average, I know I would reach a point and then someone would send a script -- and gee, it would look like a good part and something I'd like to do. But I'd already reached the 90-percent bracket. [Laughter] And there wasn't any way I was going to spend a couple of months working for 10 cents on the dollar. [Laughter] So, they didn't get much for their -- in that particular rate.

My Council of Economic Advisers tells me that the Senate Finance bill, with its added incentives and efficiencies, could increase our country's growth rate nearly 10 percent over the next decade. That could mean as many as 4 million additional new jobs over that period. That could mean as much as $600 to $900 of more real income per household each year. Business men and women don't have to be told what more money in the pockets of consumers will do. Lower rates aren't the only pluses, however, to the Finance Committee proposal. The personal and dependents exemption will be raised $2,000 for all middle- and low-income Americans. It'll remove 6 million working poor from the income tax rolls altogether.

And finally, in the area of fairness, it provides for a minimum tax of 20 percent on certain items of tax preference. And I have an uneasy feeling that maybe the gentlemen sitting behind me have already told you all these things. But too often in the past, tax provisions aimed at encouraging business expansion were used as escape vehicles to get away from paying any taxes at all. Those of you who've been working long hours, in part, to make up for the taxes your competitors aren't paying, will be pleased to know: The day of the free ride is over. Overall, this bill is a giant step forward. And I hope I can count on each of you to do your utmost to see to it that no holes are drilled through the bottom of this tax reform boat before we get a chance to launch her.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Cynthia Shepard Perry to be Ambassador Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary of the United States of America to the Republic of Sierra Leone. She would succeed Arthur Winston Lewis.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Eugene F. Murphy to be a member of the President's National Security Telecommunications Advisory Committee. He would succeed William C. Hittinger.

Mr. Himmelfarb is presently contributing editor of Commentary magazine in New York City. Previously he was director, information and research services for the American Jewish Committee. He has served as a visiting professor at the Jewish Theological Seminary and the Reconstructionist Rabbinical College and as a visiting lecturer at Yale College.

We are comforted by Mr. Gorbachev's assurances that ``the worst is behind us'' in dealing with the Chernobyl reactor tragedy. Our immediate concern, from the time we learned of the accident, was primarily for the well-being of the people in the area. This is why we offered our assistance. Our offer stands. We have noted Mr. Gorbachev's suggestions regarding further international efforts to enhance the safety of nuclear powerplants. We believe that they deserve the most serious consideration. We strongly support additional international efforts to ensure nuclear plant safety and prompt reporting on accidents.

We are distressed, however, that Mr. Gorbachev used the occasion of his otherwise reassuring presentation to make unfounded charges against the United States and other Western governments. On this score he has obviously been misinformed. There has been no effort by this government or its partners at the Tokyo Economic Summit to make political capital out of the Chernobyl tragedy. The United States Government at no point encouraged inaccurate reporting on the accident. If some reports carried in the mass media were in fact inaccurate, this was an inevitable result of the extreme secrecy with which the Soviet authorities dealt with the accident in the days immediately following it. Citizens of foreign countries and their governments had a legitimate interest in knowing the facts, since their own health could be affected. In the absence of detailed, official information, the media reported what they could learn on their own. Any attempt to attribute legitimate foreign interest in a major catastrophe to devious political motives is as deplorable as it is without basis.

Unfounded accusations against others must not be used in an attempt to exonerate national officials from their obligation to inform the public promptly of accidents which may affect their health. Mr. Gorbachev also seems to be misinformed regarding the position of the United States and its allies on nuclear arms reduction. As the leaders who met at the Tokyo Economic Summit stated, ``each of us supports balanced, substantial, and verifiable reductions in the level of arms,'' and in regard to the U.S.-Soviet agreement to accelerate work at Geneva, ``we appreciate the United States negotiating efforts and call on the Soviet Union also to negotiate positively.'' The United States is eager to speed up negotiations to achieve a 50-percent reduction of strategic nuclear weapons as soon as possible. The United States has made concrete proposals and is waiting for a constructive Soviet reply.

Regarding a meeting between the President and General Secretary Gorbachev, the President has invited Mr. Gorbachev to visit the United States in late June to discuss the entire range of issues between the two countries. Mr. Gorbachev has not yet responded to this invitation. Nevertheless, it is clear that a meeting between the two leaders is possible this year if Mr. Gorbachev desires.

So far as the question of nuclear testing is concerned, the United States has proposed that U.S. and Soviet experts meet to initiate a dialog. We have as yet no Soviet response to this suggestion. It is difficult to understand the rationale for a meeting of our leaders confined to the nuclear testing issue, when the Soviet Union has up to now been unwilling to authorize a discussion at the expert level.

A 12-percent real decline in defense spending is hardly the ``leveling-off'' depicted by some. The committee recommendations, if approved, would cripple the combat readiness of our conventional forces and take unacceptable risks with our national security at a time when the immense Soviet military buildup continues uninterrupted. This radical, antidefense budget would tear down much of what we have built, together, these past 5 years and return us to that era of the 1970's, when the national defense was neglected and our country paid worldwide and dearly for that neglect. Has the Congress so soon forgotten the consequences of shortchanging national defense? The President cannot believe the American people, given the facts, would approve of what the House Budget Committee would have us do. Its recommendations, taken together, represent nothing less than a breach of faith with our common duty to protect this nation.

While the impact of a $35 billion reduction in FY 87 would be severe, this administration would seek to protect, to the extent possible, those programs and capabilities most vital to our national defense. These include the strategic modernization program, which also includes the Strategic Defense Initiative and improvements in command-and-control; our military personnel and the current force structure; and sensitive classified programs. Even so, there is no possibility that the large improvements in military personnel and readiness that have been achieved to date could be sustained in the face of a $35 billion reduction recommended by the House Budget Committee. It would be very difficult to support the increases in the size of U.S. Forces already approved by the Congress; and program terminations and cancellation of proposed new starts would be unavoidable.

We would have to cut an entire division from the Army, an aircraft carrier battle group, and tactical fighter wings from both the Air Force and the Navy. Termination of critical mobility programs, such as the C - 17 airlifter, would further postpone the capability we need to deploy forces rapidly over long distances. Other critical programs would be terminated as well. These would include programs like a new field artillery support vehicle, the Army helicopter improvement program, a new 120mm mortar and ammunition, the AV - 8B and A6E/F attack aircraft, the F - 15, the JSTARS new surveillance aircraft, the TR - 1 reconnaissance aircraft, and a number of other needed programs.

Munitions cutbacks would reduce our ability to sustain forces in combat. We would see direct impact on programs like the GBU - 15 bomb; Maverick, Harm, Tomahawk, Sparrow, and Patriot missiles; lightweight, multipurpose ammunition, and ammunition-mobilization facilities. Reductions in spare parts, support equipment, and communications equipment would lead to lower operational readiness. Depot maintenance capability would be reduced. Ship repair backlogs would increase. Operations accounts already severely cut in 1986 would not increase sufficiently to support forces and equipment or satisfy essential readiness and training needs. In short, the impact on our defense capability would be pervasive and severe across the board.

In the final analysis, it is Congress that will determine specific funding levels for individual defense programs. While the priorities the President has outlined are clear, it is impossible to predict the results of authorization and appropriation action. If such cuts are sustained, however, an action clearly damaging to our national security, the President will make every effort to see them carried out in the manner he has outlined.

The accomplishments of the past 5 years are now in jeopardy because of the defense reductions being considered in Congress. Congress approved and set in motion our program for rebuilding America's military strength. It would be wasteful and irresponsible to cut short this program by denying the funding necessary to carry it out. We did not spend the last 5 years making our military more competitive and America secure again only to undo it all in our second term. We must not return to the shortsighted and discredited policies of the past, which destroyed the confidence of our military personnel, undermined our military capabilities, and jeopardized America's security. The threat has not changed; this only increases the risk.

The decisions we make about our defense budget today determine the strength with which we can underwrite our security for years to come. The threat we anticipate, unfortunately, continues to grow. The House Budget Committee's proposed level for defense spending would increase the risk to each one of us by reversing the progress we have made and causing the gap between our national security requirements and our military capabilities to widen once again.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifteenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

American Jews have made immeasurable contributions to our country's economic, political, social, and cultural development. The remarkable and varied achievements of American Jews have greatly enriched the lives of all Americans, from medicine and mathematics to movies and the musical theater.

It is appropriate at this time of year that we remind ourselves of the tragedy and glory of Jewish history. The Jewish people have recently celebrated Passover, the holiday that commemorates their deliverance by God from the bondage of Egypt to freedom in the Holy Land. Last week marked the observance of Yom Hashoa, the Day of Remembrance, and this week, Israeli Independence Day is celebrated. These events remind us that Israel was reborn out of ashes of the Holocaust. These commemorations sustain our hope that someday the persecuted Jews of the Soviet Union will be delivered from bondage.

Our Nation was founded on beliefs in basic human freedoms. Among these cherished freedoms is free movement of people and ideas. In exercising that freedom, Americans have developed the greatest transportation system the world has ever known. We can travel where and when we want, either by air, water, or land. We can move goods by airplane, railroad, ship, barge, and truck. This ability to travel and to ship goods is as important to our Nation's strength today as it was vital for the pioneers who settled this great Republic.

The first Federal highway built with national funds, the Cumberland Road, was begun in 1811. A century later, when the Lincoln Highway opened to traffic in 1913, we had our first paved coast-to-coast road. Between now and 1990, we will complete funding for our greatest highway project yet, the Interstate Highway System. Great progress has already been made, and when it is finished, the Nation will be linked together with 42,500 miles of unbroken, limited-access roadway. This is the equivalent of circling the world almost twice without hitting a traffic light -- an achievement that benefits not only business and pleasure travel, but greatly strengthens our national defense as well.

In a few months, we will be celebrating the 100th birthday of our great symbol of freedom, the Statue of Liberty. This magnificent lady watched as millions of people streamed across the Atlantic to our shores in pursuit of a dream -- a land of opportunity, a country where people were free to go as far as their abilities could take them. Many of these immigrants became involved in designing and building our highways, bridges, railways, and airports. Their sons and daughters are working on new challenges, high-speed railways, hypersonic flight, and new technologies to make all travel safer. What the future will bring we can only guess, but improvement in the swiftness, safety, dependability, and economy of transportation will be an integral part of even greater prosperity and human fulfillment.

As part of the arrangements for the accession of Portugal and Spain to the EEC, the EEC: (1) has imposed restrictions on the importation into Portugal of oilseeds and oilseed products and on the consumption of vegetable oils (other than olive oil) in Portugal; (2) has required that a specified portion of Portuguese imports of grains be reserved for suppliers from other member countries of the EEC; and (3) has withdrawn Spanish tariff concessions and imposed variable levies on imports of corn and sorghum. These EEC actions apply from March 1, 1986. The average annual value of U.S. exports affected by the EEC actions exceeded a billion dollars in the 1981 - 1983 period.

In discussions with the EEC, we have sought the removal of the restrictions in Portugal, which we consider to be inconsistent with the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT). We are also seeking, in accordance with our rights under GATT, appropriate compensation from the EEC for the tariff and variable levy actions in Spain.

On March 31, 1986, I announced that I would impose restrictions on imports of EEC products of comparable effect to the EEC's restrictions in Portugal unless and until we were able to resolve these matters. Efforts to obtain a satisfactory resolution have not yet been successful. I also announced that, in response to the EEC's tariff and levy actions in Spain, I would withdraw U.S. tariff commitments in GATT on certain products, but would maintain the current level of tariffs in order to allow until July 1 for expedited negotiation of agreed compensation from the EEC. I will proclaim increased duties as appropriate if such agreement is not possible. To the degree those negotiations are successful, I will restore concessions.

I am taking these actions to enforce U.S. trade rights on important export interests. I would strongly prefer a solution that would restore and encourage trade for all parties, and we will continue negotiating efforts toward this goal.

The President today proclaimed quotas on agriculture imports from the European Community in response to the EC's quotas on U.S. agricultural exports to Portugal. We have been assured by the EC that their quotas will have no immediate impact on our trade. As long as that remains the case, our quotas will be similarly nonrestrictive. However, should the EC's quantitative restrictions begin to restrict U.S. exports, the U.S. quotas will be adjusted to have a comparable effect or the President may substitute tariff increases for the quotas.

This action follows the President's announcement on March 31 that the U.S. would respond in kind to the EC's import restrictions on grains and oilseeds imposed in Portugal following that country's accession to the EC. The U.S. quotas will be effective May 19 on EC white wine with a value of more than $4 per gallon, chocolate, candy, apple or pear juice, and beer. The President indicated his willingness to suspend these measures and refer the matter to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) if the EC will agree to do the same.

The President has also decided to suspend certain tariff concessions, effective in 30 days. The action will not increase tariffs, however, and the decision on any duty increases will be deferred until July to allow time for negotiation of compensation for EC tariff action affecting U.S. exports of feed grains to Spain.

This is a dispute the U.S. sought to avoid. But we cannot overlook the EC's unilateral actions which clearly violate GATT rules and affect some of our most sensitive exports. Our response is fair and measured. We hope the EC will respond in a way that will help us settle this disagreement without further damaging our trading relationship.

Today in Vienna representatives of NATO and the Warsaw Pact resume their efforts to reach a verifiable agreement that would reduce and limit conventional forces in central Europe. These negotiations, known as the mutual and balanced force reduction (MBFR) talks, have the important goal of creating a more stable balance of forces at an equal and significantly lower level in central Europe, the area of greatest concentration of armed forces in the world. The MBFR talks are at an important stage of their 13-year history. Last December 5 the President joined other allied leaders in making a new, far-reaching proposal aimed at finding out if the Soviet Union is seriously interested in moving towards an accord in these long-running negotiations.

The Warsaw Pact had asked for a time-limited, first-stage agreement calling for initial reductions by U.S. and Soviet ground forces, followed by a freeze on all forces of the two alliances remaining in the area. In its December proposal, the West agreed to this framework. The East also insisted that progress could be made only if the West dropped its demand that the sides agree on the number of forces each currently has in the area before reductions begin. We agreed to this also, despite the fact that this demand had been a crucial part of the NATO position for over a decade. We hoped the East would reciprocate our concessions and agree to Western verification proposals, a central remaining prerequisite to forging a viable agreement. Unfortunately, the East was not forthcoming during the round of negotiations that ended in March. Despite General Secretary Gorbachev's public declarations endorsing realistic verification measures for conventional force reductions, the Soviets did not respond positively in Vienna. Indeed, in response to NATO's concessions, the Soviets and their Warsaw Pact allies actually moved backward by rejecting the Western proposals and recycling old, shopworn verification ideas the East had made 2 or 3 years previously.

The Soviet leadership has now had additional time to give full and careful consideration to the details of NATO's December 5, 1985, proposal. In East Berlin on April 18, General Secretary Gorbachev again asserted that his government is committed to achieving reductions in conventional forces and pledged that these reductions will be assured through dependable verification, including on-site inspections. The President has instructed the U.S. negotiator, Ambassador Robert D. Blackwill, working with his NATO colleagues, to put these Soviet public claims on verification to the practical test at the negotiating table in Vienna.

I am very pleased today to sign S.J. Res. 289, a joint resolution that recognizes the important role the settlers of New Sweden played in forming our nation. Those settlers were Swedish and Finnish people who by their bravery and tenacity gave us a treasured legacy: They helped form our country, and they helped establish the pioneer spirit and hardy virtues that are the foundation for our national character. The anniversary of their landing is an occasion to celebrate our origins and to remember that our friendship with Sweden and Finland has an intimate and historic beginning.

I am pleased to submit the attached report on the desirability of establishing an International Space Year in 1992. The year 1992 will be very special indeed. It will mark not only the 500th anniversary of Christopher Columbus' historic voyage of discovery, but also it will be the 35th anniversary of the International Geophysical Year, which ushered in the space age.

A major objective of an International Space Year should be to maximize, through international cooperation, the achievements and benefits of the current and prospective space programs of the participating world community. Such efforts should emphasize the involvement of both the developed countries and the developing countries in ways that demonstrate the benefits to everyone from discoveries in space science and the practical utilization of space.

I am directing NASA to continue to lead an interagency effort to develop the idea of an International Space Year so that the United States will be fully prepared to move this concept forward internationally. I would also expect the National Academy of Sciences to play a key role in focussing discussion within the United States' scientific community regarding the scientific content of an International Space Year.

But to be serious for just a moment, your work has an appeal and a power all its own. The TV reporter is on for a few minutes, and then he's off. Your work lasts. The print journalists may be able to analyze and explain a story at length. Your work presents a story in a second, vividly, unforgettably. It was a photographer, Mathew Brady, who gave us the images of Lincoln that fix the face of that great President in the mind of every schoolchild. It was news photographers who gave us pictures of the epic battles in World War II: The marines struggling to raise the flag on Iwo Jima; landing barges crashing ashore on the Normandy beaches. And it's news photographers, the photographers here in this room, who have shared with the country both the high drama and the simple humanity of this office, of the Presidency, snapping, for example, J.F.K concentrating at his desk while John-John played on the floor. Your work is not passing like so much of the news, but a living part of our historical record.

These disputes, in the judgment of the National Mediation Board, threaten substantially to interrupt interstate commerce to a degree such as to deprive a section of the country of essential transportation services.

Section 1. Establishment of Board. There is hereby established, effective May 16, 1986, a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate these disputes. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier. The board shall perform its functions subject to the availability of funds.

Sec. 3. Maintaining Conditions. As provided by Section 10 of the Act, from the date of the creation of the board and for 30 days after the board has made its report to the President, no change, except by agreement of the parties, shall be made by the carriers or the employees in the conditions out of which these disputes arose.

A strike called by the BMWE against the Maine Central/Portland Terminal subsequently spread to the other Guilford railroads. A further escalation of the dispute occurred in April when the BMWE initiated a class action suit against the Association of American Railroads contending that certain railroads had provided Guilford assistance under a mutual aid arrangement. Picketing was initiated by the BMWE on April 10, 1986, against selected railroads outside the Guilford system.

However, as a result of considerable litigation following this escalation in the job action, several Federal courts issued orders restraining the BMWE and other unions from picketing. Important issues under the Federal labor laws have been presented in these cases, the speedy and final resolution of which is of great importance to labor-management relations in this industry and to the efficient movement of rail traffic in interstate commerce. The recent conflicting decisions of the Federal courts, permitting in some cases picketing of carriers not involved in the basic dispute, however, made Presidential emergency action necessary in the interim.

Three Federal court jurisdictions have permitted picketing by the BMWE of railroads outside the Guilford system. The Central Vermont Railway was denied a preliminary injunction by the United States District Court and the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia. The Richmond, Fredericksburg, and Potomac Railroad was denied a preliminary injunction on appeal before the United States Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit; and most importantly, Conrail was denied injunctive relief on May 15, 1986, when the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit dissolved an injunction granted on suit by Conrail.

Conrail operates 13,400 miles of lines in 15 Northeast States as well as the District of Columbia and Canada. In 1985 Conrail was involved in transporting 15 percent of all traffic loaded by the Nation's railroads. In the Northeast alone, Conrail accounts for over 30 percent of all freight loaded by rail. It also provides connecting service with almost all major railroads operating in the South and West. More than half of Conrail's traffic is carried in connection with other railroads, as part of joint-line movements. Over 1 million carloads each year move onto Conrail lines from another railroad, and close to half a million carloads are forwarded by Conrail to another railroad. The effects of a strike against Conrail would therefore extend to most other large carriers throughout the country, even if they were not directly involved in the strike itself.

Theodore White was truly an American institution. More than just another reporter on the campaign trail, Teddy was a familiar part of the American political fabric, observing and explaining the very essence of our democracy. In books which have become works of historical importance, Teddy White taught us much of ourselves and our country. Somehow, a Presidential campaign was not really over until Teddy's book was written.

He was a true professional, tough and insightful, but always fair. He respected and understood the Presidency and took us behind the scenes with a special wisdom and sensitivity. Nancy and I will miss Teddy White and extend our deepest sympathy to his family.

Section 1. Establishment of Board. There is established, effective May 16, 1986, a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate this dispute. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier. The board shall perform its functions subject to the availability of funds.

Sec. 3. Maintaining Conditions. As provided by Section 9A(c) of the Act, from the date of the creation of the board and for 120 days thereafter, no change, except by agreement of the parties, shall be made by the carrier or the employees in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

The President, by Executive order, created the Emergency Board pursuant to an appropriate request as mandated by the Railway Labor Act. The emergency board procedures of the Railway Labor Act applicable to commuter railroads provide that the Board will report its findings and recommendations for settlement to the President within 30 days. The parties must then consider the recommendations of the Emergency Board and endeavor to resolve their differences without engaging in self-help during a subsequent 90-day period.

Now, I know you here with me and most members of the armed services listening at the moment aren't in your dress uniforms, and maybe -- and I'm sure it only happens every now and then -- your shoeshines aren't quite as bright as the ones I'm looking at here. But I know the sense of military professionalism, love of country, and commitment to freedom is just as strong. It's because of that patriotism and professionalism that you've left your homes and communities to become part of an extraordinary military tradition. Unlike so many other traditions, America's military history has been largely one not just of great battlefield victories but victories in the name of something beyond conquest or self-interest.

Here in America we've been fortunate to be the keeper and custodian of a dream -- a dream that began this nation, a dream that millions of people hope to share in someday. And every member of America's Armed Forces has a special part in keeping that dream alive. The dream, of course, is freedom, and truly those of you in uniform today are freedom's honor guard.

The new patriotism that's alive in our nation today is reflected in these young people joining our military services. They're better educated, better trained, and as highly motivated as any time in our history. These young Americans look to a future they know will be free as long as America remains strong and her people resolute. But this revitalization of our military was a long time coming, the result of a lengthy legislative battle here in Washington.

You see, the House of Representatives recently passed a military budget that is wholly inadequate, a throwback to the seventies, a budget that is a breach of faith with our Armed Forces and our allies and would send exactly the wrong signal to the Soviets and their satellites. So, today I not only want to ask every American to join me in saluting our young Americans in uniform, I want to reiterate that the best way to ensure their lives are never placed in jeopardy is to send a message to Washington and to the world, a message that says the American people are committed to national defense and that we stand behind those who wear our country's uniform.

We owe a great debt to those on freedom's first line of defense -- men like Captain Lorence and Captain Ribas-Dominicci, Air Force pilots who recently lost their lives in the raid on Libyan terrorists. We honor them today and all the members of freedom's honor guard. And we say thank you to you, our Armed Forces, and pledge our support for adequate military expenditures, a strong defense, and the dream of world freedom and peace.

Digestive diseases are a major cause of hospitalization and surgery in this country. Each day some 200,000 people miss work because of them. Twenty million Americans are treated for some type of chronic digestive disorder each year, and almost half of our population suffers an occasional digestive disorder, creating a yearly expenditure of approximately $17 billion in direct health care costs, and a total estimated economic burden of $50 billion.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

On the occasion of South African military strikes into Zambia, Zimbabwe, and Botswana, the United States stands with the governments and peoples of those countries in expressing our sense of outrage at these events and our condolences to the families of the victims. We vigorously condemn these attacks by South Africa. Our diplomacy in South Africa has been aimed at stopping cross-border violence. Such efforts have had results. We would note that senior officials of South Africa and its neighbors have held regular and productive consultations on issues of security and respect for international borders.

We believe these military actions to be particularly inexplicable in the light of ongoing efforts among those neighbors to maintain good working relations and communication on security problems. The ongoing process had clearly not exhausted all possibilities for peaceful remedy of the issues. We find the South African raids are all the more difficult to fathom, given current efforts of the Commonwealth's Eminent Persons Group, which is currently in the region, engaged in highly sensitive discussions to promote dialog between blacks and whites in South Africa.

The United States has made clear for many years its strong opposition to, and condemnation of, violent means by any party as a method for resolving South Africa's problems. And we stand by the principle that political avenues should be given every opportunity.

But it's important for us Americans to reflect upon the extent to which our nation is involved in international trade. One in six of our manufacturing jobs and one in four of our farm acres produce merchandise for overseas markets. Roughly speaking, every billion dollars worth of American manufactured goods exported means more than 25,000 American jobs. And overall, today nearly 5.5 million American jobs are connected to exports.

And yet despite its importance, international trade faces serious challenges. Large and sometimes massive trade imbalances among the major trading nations have given rise to strong protectionist feeling both here at home and abroad. Yet ever since the disaster of the 1930 Smoot-Hawley tariffs, we've known that protectionism doesn't work. No, the way to promote worldwide prosperity is not to erect barriers, but to bring them down; not to decrease international trade, but to expand it. And we're working to do just that. Our approach has been threefold.

First, we're doing all we can to provide an economic environment that's conducive to exports around the globe: international economic stability, innovation, and growth. And in this regard, we're having historic success. Here at home our own economy has grown for 41 months, creating more than 9\3/4\ million American jobs. Inflation in our nation is running at the lowest level in two decades, and the prime rate of interest has dropped by 60 percent since we took office.

Abroad, we've been working to achieve closer economic policy coordination between nations, foster improved global growth, and promote greater exchange rate stability. Indeed, closer economic coordination between us and our trading partners was agreed upon at the Tokyo summit. We're pleased to see that other nations -- in part spurred by our own growth, in part following our example of low taxes and limited government -- have a good outlook for more economic growth of their own. The Plaza agreement that was reached last September has contributed to substantial exchange rate changes, improving our own competitive position. And the debt problem in lesser developed countries is being addressed, providing expanded markets for American trade. All this adds up to a sound basis for a wider and freer world trade.

Second, we're working to remove foreign trade barriers that may be blocking the sale of otherwise competitive American products. As I said in my trade address on September 23d of last year: ``All must work to guarantee open markets -- free trade is, by definition, fair trade.'' Since September we've initiated investigations into unfair trade practices by other countries, making ours the first administration to initiate such investigations on its own. Today we've cases underway concerning Korean barriers to foreign insurance companies, Brazilian restrictions on computer imports, Korean violations of intellectual property rights, and Japanese restrictions on imported tobacco products, as we've started our first investigation into Taiwan's foreign export performance requirements.

In that same September speech I just referred to, I announced the formation of a strike force to identify unfair foreign trade practices and recommend strategies for combating them. The strike force has been hard at work. We've initiated an antidumping case against Japan for its practices involving exports of semiconductors. We've begun consultations with European governments on airbus sales. And we've proposed legislation to strengthen and expand the protection of intellectual property rights and adopted a formal policy in the enforcement of such rights.

Third, we're working to negotiate new trade agreements that will expand world trade for the benefit of all nations. At the recent Tokyo summit, we and our allies once again affirmed our support for a new round of multilateral trade negotiations, targeting the September GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] ministerial meeting for decisive progress. At the summit we also agreed that this new round of talks should have a comprehensive agenda, including new topics of particular interest to the United States, such as services, intellectual property, and investment. And still pursuing the goal of expanding trade, we've also begun to explore the advantages of negotiating a comprehensive free trade agreement with Canada, our largest trading partner.

In trade relations with Japan, progress is, again, being made. When Prime Minister Nakasone and I met in April and again at the Tokyo summit, we agreed on the need to expand our trade through better market access. Indeed, I'm gratified at Japanese efforts to restructure their economy to expand domestic demand. Based on previous work, the Japanese are now committed to lowering Japan's barriers to imports of telecommunications equipment, medical equipment, forest products, pharmaceuticals, and electronics. Like many of our trading partners, the Japanese are tough negotiators. I think many of you here know that firsthand. But we're determined to do all we can to lower trade barriers in Japan and throughout the world.

These actions are all constructive steps aimed at expanding trade. And that's why I'm dismayed at protectionist legislation that is under consideration in the House of Representatives. It isn't a fair trade bill; it's a ``less trade'' bill. It will not open markets to U.S. products; it will close them. It will mandate that the United States violate many of the most basic rules of international trade. And it would expose our most productive farms and industries to retaliation by other nations.

The creation of a strike force, the enforcement of our trade laws, vigorous trade talks with Japan and other nations -- it is only right that we in government should make those efforts. But in truth, our nation would be nowhere without you -- you who've shown such initiative in opening new international markets. You're proof that American business has never been afraid to compete, that our business community is as innovative, efficient, and competitive as any on Earth. My friends, for setting such high standards, I thank you.

And now it's my privilege to sign the proclamation and then to ask Secretary Baldrige and Ambassador Yeutter to help me present the "E" and "E Star" awards for excellence in exporting. So, I'll take pen in hand.

Each year, World Trade Week provides an opportunity to celebrate the importance of international trade to our present prosperity and our future prospects. Indeed, it benefits us and all the nations with whom we do business.

American business initiative and ingenuity have never stopped at our borders. Since the birth of our Nation, we have been a dynamic force in international trade. That trade has helped us build the most productive economy in the history of mankind.

Today, America's prosperity depends as never before on our ability to compete in international markets. Our exports make a major contribution to domestic growth and employment. The United States is today the world's leading exporter. We export nearly 16 percent more goods to the world than our nearest competitor, yet we export far less of our total production than many other trading nations. We need to increase our exports to further strengthen our economy.

American companies need the same free and fair access to foreign markets that the United States offers to its trading partners. My Administration has stepped up its efforts to counter unfair trade practices and to open foreign markets that have raised barriers to American products. We will continue to do so.

Today, we are preparing for a new round of multilateral trade negotiations. Through those negotiations we will continue to press for open markets for the products of our manufacturing firms. We will also press for greater market access for the products of America's farms and the products of our fast-growing service industries.

Export expansion also requires a sound, stable dollar and reliable exchange rates around the world. We have already achieved a great deal through our efforts to coordinate economic and monetary policies with our major trading partners. Upward revaluations of foreign currencies against the dollar are making American products more competitive around the world. We are continuing our policy discussions with America's major trading partners to enhance America's trading opportunities.

Government can only set the stage for increased trading. It is the job of American private enterprise to make trade grow. Over the past year, government actions have vastly improved the climate for trade. Aggressive exporters in our business community are calling today's trading climate an opportunity for a ``renaissance in American competitiveness.'' Translating that golden opportunity into a reality depends upon all of America's businesses.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this nineteenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

I have signed into law H.R. 739, which effects miscellaneous changes in the laws administered by or affecting the United States Coast Guard and Maritime Administration. In approving H.R. 739, I have been assured by the Department of State that section 10 of the act is consistent with existing treaty obligations and consistent with existing United States cabotage statutes.

Since 1984 Mr. Stendahl has been serving on the Cultural Property Advisory Committee. He is director of the Stendahl Art Galleries in Los Angeles, where he has staged solely or contributed to the staging of more than 100 exhibitions in the United States and Europe. He has also written several publications on primitive and ancient arts and has been instrumental in forming collections for many museums in the United States.

The President. I appreciate all of you joining us here today to kick off ``Just Say No Week.'' And before I begin, I want to give a long-distance hello to Senator Paula Hawkins. Senator Hawkins has been a loyal warrior in the battle against drug abuse. So, long distance, Senator, thank you for all you've done, and best wishes for a speedy recovery.

When our team got to Washington nearly 5\1/2\ years ago, we pledged to put America's house in order. Well, that required more than economic reform and bolstering our national defense. Our country was threatened by an epidemic of drug abuse that's been growing in intensity since the 1960's. By 1980 illegal drugs were every bit as much a threat to the United States as enemy planes and missiles. The plague was fueled by an attitude of permissiveness, both public and private. America was losing its future by default.

Early in our administration I issued a challenge: Americans in and out of government, I said, should do all we can to defeat the drug menace threatening our country. And I'm pleased that many of you who were there when I issued that challenge are with us today. I'm also grateful for all the hard work and long hours that you've committed to this truly noble endeavor.

The first thing we did was take down the surrender flag and raise the battle flag. Together we beefed up our enforcement arm, and today more arrests are being made and more narcotics are being seized than ever before. Today there's also more communication and effective coordination between the levels of government and departments and agencies than many believed was possible. We are, indeed, trying to do everything government can do to combat drug traffickers.

But just as important -- I happen to think more important -- we've enlisted the American people in this battle. Parents, service clubs, youth organizations, responded to our call. We found prominent citizens, captains of industry, singers, actors, and athletes -- individuals who young people look up to -- were more than willing to do their part. Why? Well, because they love people, and they love this country. What we've got to do now is make certain that we continue to give our young people -- like the ones with us here today -- the support and backing they need to ``Just Say No'' to drugs.

There's someone else here who shares these sentiments. She was a favorite of mine even before she got involved in this issue. [Laughter] However, I will have to confess that she's made me such a proud husband in these last few years. Nancy was, and still is, the motivational force behind the ``Just Say No'' movement. It all started in an elementary school in Oakland, California, during the summer of 1984. She was talking to a class about drug abuse, and out of her discussion with the youngsters came the idea of ``Just Say No'' clubs. And from that very day the idea snowballed. Clubs came into being first in California, then they started up in towns and cities all across the country and overseas. On Thursday of this week, Nancy will participate in the ``International Just Say No Walk'' with hundreds of thousands of young people around the globe.

Because of these grassroots efforts, all of us, inside government and out, are seeing a change of attitude about drug abuse. Public awareness has increased dramatically in the past several years, and our children are more aware of the dangers of drugs now than ever before. By educating our children about the dangers of drugs, we're going to dry up the drug market and kick the dope peddlers right out of this country. Every time Nancy and I meet this country's wonderful young people, we feel more confident that we are going to win this battle.

To our country's young people, I say: We're so proud of each of you who has rejected drugs and also those of you who have overcome drug problems. Your courage and commitment have not gone unnoticed. You have a special place in our hearts.

The First Lady. At the beginning of this year, someone asked me if I wanted to make a New Year's wish, and I said yes -- and it was that I'd like to see every young person in the world join the ``Just Say No'' to drugs club. Well, just the fact that Congress has proclaimed ``Just Say No Week,'' and in light of all the activities taking place, it seems that my wish is well on its way to coming true. I'm so proud of all the young people, the parents, the citizens in cities and towns across the Nation, the Government, and everyone else who's helping to create what I believe is the final solution to this problem -- and that's a way to teach every one of our children to ``Just Say No'' to drugs. The future of the world lies in their hands, and we must all come together in their name to end drug and alcohol abuse once and for all.

People all across America are becoming increasingly aware of the terrible dangers of drug abuse. Permissive attitudes about drug use have been replaced by deepening concern and -- what is more important -- action. People of all ages and from all walks of life are rallying against this terrible scourge. Many young people are taking a leading role in the effort to help other young people from ``getting hooked,'' and in assisting addicts to break the chains of their addiction.

Although young people are exposed to far too many opportunities to experiment with drugs, an ever-increasing number are saying no to drugs and to alcohol. They are joining together to learn how, and to make it stick. They are forming ``JUST SAY NO'' clubs to help them resist temptation and to encourage their peers to stay drug-free. On May 22, many thousands of children and teenagers will Walk Against Drugs to encourage others to join them in saying ``No'' to drugs.

We, as adults, owe a debt of gratitude to our children for setting such a fine example; for leading the way to a better future for future generations. I congratulate our young people for their courage and zeal in this crusade. I challenge the adults of the world to encourage and support them, and to follow their lead in saying ``No'' to drugs. I am confident that, working together, we will conquer drug abuse.

This bipartisan spirit, I think, will be a tremendous boost in creating a binding commitment to the only special interest that counts -- and that's the American people, the ones who pay the bills in this country. And in particular, I want to thank you for eliminating needless brackets and lowering the rates to 15 and 27 percent, raising the personal and dependents exemption to $2,000 for middle- and low-income Americans, and providing a minimum tax so that individuals and corporations will pay their fair share.

Beryl and his group at the Council of Economic Advisers tell me that the added incentives and efficiencies could increase America's growth rate nearly 10 percent over the next decade. And that means people will be able to keep more of what they earn and thereby encouraging the entrepreneurial spirit, building a stronger and more productive economy. And that kind of growth would also, it is estimated, provide an additional 4 million new jobs over that same period.

You and your chairman, Bob Packwood, who couldn't be with us today, are to be commended for a yeoman effort to breathe new life into something that had been declared dead on more than one occasion since the effort had begun. And now we need to make sure the lifeline stays intact as this historic measure is considered by the full Senate when you get back from Memorial Day weekend. Not only will the American people benefit by your straightforward, hard-hitting proposal to return simplicity and fairness to the tax code, but the bipartisan coalition you've forged is a major victory for the democratic process that makes this nation great. And I think the American people join me in thanking you for your statesmanship in this.

I have decided to seek voluntary restraint agreements (VRA's) on machine tool imports. In March 1983 the National Machine Tool Builders Association submitted a petition to the Secretary of Commerce recommending import quotas based on the view that imports of machine tools threaten the national security. Pursuant to statute, Secretary Baldrige submitted a report to me in February 1984. In March 1984 I decided that this report should incorporate new mobilization, defense, and economic planning factors then being developed by an interagency group. I then directed the Secretary of Commerce to update the machine tools investigation. In March 1986 Secretary Baldrige submitted his report to reflect this guidance. The National Security Council subsequently discussed the report, and on this basis, I have directed that import levels be reviewed during the next 6 months.

Integrate more fully U.S. machine tool manufacturers into the defense procurement process. In particular, companies will receive more timely information on U.S. defense programs and future DOD manufacturing requirements so that they may be able to participate at an earlier stage in the procurement process.

Modernize machine tool capabilities that support our national defense. DOD programs that improve manufacturing productivity as well as those that advance technology will be applied to the machine tool industry.

Provide up to $5 million per year over the next 3 years in Federal Government matching funds to support a private sector technology center to help the machine tool industry make advances in manufacturing and design.

The Secretary of Commerce will monitor the U.S. machine tool industry's performance on an annual basis, with emphasis on the steps it has taken to improve its production capabilities and competitive position.

May 21, 1986, is the 65th birthday of Andrei Sakharov. At this time, let us recall and acclaim the courage and dedication of this giant of the twentieth century. Let us rededicate ourselves to the values of peace and justice and human dignity he has come to symbolize for all who love freedom throughout the world.

Since we last honored this brave man, we are pleased that Dr. Sakharov's wife, Yelena Bonner, has been allowed to travel here to see her family and to obtain needed medical care. We welcome the fact that several separated husbands and wives were at last given permission to join their spouses in the United States. We welcome the release of Anatoly Shcharansky.

Unfortunately, these positive developments only serve to underscore the overall grim human rights situation that continues to prevail in the Soviet Union. For his efforts on behalf of human rights and world peace, Dr. Sakharov himself remains isolated in Gorky, deprived of contact with friends and family, and barred from carrying out scientific research. The Soviet authorities have succeeded in eliminating the main vehicle for human rights activism, the Helsinki Monitors. Yury Orlov and many other monitors are now serving long terms of imprisonment or exile. Religious groups continue to be major targets of persecution: Orthodox believers, Baptists, Roman Catholics, Ukrainian rite Catholics, Uniates, Pentecostalists, and other groups have been subjected to arrest and harassment. The crackdown on Hebrew teachers and cultural activists continues. Emigration remains at low levels. Many more families remain separated. The basic freedoms of speech, assembly, and press are systematically denied, yet, as Sakharov has recognized, these are the essential means by which people can ensure that their own governments act peacefully and in the people's interests.

I believe we can best honor Dr. Sakharov on his 65th birthday by taking his message to heart and by continuing our own vigorous efforts in pursuit of a just peace, including respect for human rights. We must act on his behalf to ensure that his message of hope, freedom, justice, and the inviolability of the human conscience will not be silenced.

From the very beginning, America has been a seafaring Nation. In fact, the discovery of our continent was the result of one of the most daring seafaring adventures in human history. Even before the founding of the Republic, our people looked to the sea -- for peaceful trade and to ensure prosperity.

American maritime leadership was also reflected in ship design. The fabled ``Yankee Clippers'' of the early 19th century represented the first major innovation in wind-powered craft since the 15th century. They dashed across the seas at unprecedented speeds, making them the ultimate in merchant sail. And when steam-powered vessels began to eclipse sailing ships in the latter part of the 19th century, it was largely the result of pioneering work by two Americans, John Fitch and Robert Fulton.

Since America fronted on the world's two largest oceans, it was fitting that an American naval officer, Alfred Thayer Mahan, should have been the author of the first major historical study of the influence of sea power in geopolitics. Theodore Roosevelt, who as a young man was the first to review Mahan's book, later, as President, took the lead in providing the United States with its first world-class navy. From this rich heritage, America emerged as the greatest trading Nation on earth.

All of us today owe a debt of gratitude to the civilian merchant mariners who have braved the perils of the sea and the assaults of enemies who threatened our way of life. Through the centuries, untold numbers sacrificed their lives to preserve American freedom. In World War II alone, nearly 6,000 U.S. merchant seamen aboard 733 American ships were lost in enemy attacks. But our sea-lane lifelines remained open.

It is appropriate that we pause to pay tribute to those civilian sailors, past and present, in our commercial fleet and to all other Americans who support them and guard the lifelines of the sea that sustain us all.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The President. Thank you very much, and welcome. And I think, for those who will probably be seeing and hearing this by electronic means, I should make it plain to them that you and I are seeing each other for the first time. There has been no rehearsing or anything of this kind. And I'm going to take your questions, and I don't know what those questions are going to be.

But I'm not going to talk anymore, I'm going to get down to this -- other than to thank our host here for this program, the foundation that has made this possible, Close Up Foundation, and for C-SPAN making it available for so many other people to see and hear. But now let's get down to the questions.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Mr. President, your administration seems to favor a view towards education which is one of self-motivation and not governmental support. I agree that to achieve, one must have this self-motivation -- important to maintaining our economic growth and -- [inaudible] -- independent of our generation being able -- is dependent upon our generation being able to go on to higher education. Your scholarship dollars are not available, and costs of college education continue to grow. What can we do?

The President. Well, I think there's some misunderstanding. The question basically is getting at the great importance of education and at the college level and so forth and then the cost of going to college. There's been some misunderstanding about what we are or are not doing in that regard. First of all, we know that for education up through secondary, through high school, is basically the responsibility of the States and local communities, although there is some Federal aid in that, too. But then when we get to college, I have to tell you that, for example, next year more loans will be available for college students than ever in our history. It'll be around $9 billion -- is available for loans. There are other programs also, and the Federal Government is spending at a higher level in that kind of support than ever before. So, it isn't true that with all of our need to find economies that we have shut down education.

But while I've got you here, can I make a plug for something else? It is true that there are scholarships, and there well should be. And States have scholarships. I know my own State of California, when I was Governor, we increased the amount there to 11 times what it had been -- the State scholarship program. These are earned, as you know, by your qualifications and ability in school and all. But there's something else. There's nothing wrong, also, with working at jobs at the same time that you're going to school. Now, I say this because I worked my way through college, and there weren't Federal programs at that time. There were loan programs from private funds and endowments that you could apply. And finally, by my senior year, I got around to getting one of those loans. But lately, because of these other things that are available, you'd be surprised how many colleges have jobs on the campus for students and are literally advertising with no takers.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Congress created Superfund -- clean up waste sites of future toxic chemical disasters. Now that the funds allocated in this program have run out, what are the possibilities for getting more funding?

The President. Well, there will be more, and right now it's a case of how much and that, because as you know, and as I said before, we have some financial restraints, what with our big deficit. But one of the problems is how fast can that be used. You can lay out some money and then find that there's a restriction just through the very doing of the work in cleaning up these various pollution sources, that the money lies there and you just can't use it that fast. So, we're trying to arrive at what would be the sensible amount for us to appropriate, that is.

The President. Yes, I can. We're working with South Africa. There is a large element in South Africa that finds apartheid as repugnant as we do and is trying to do something about it. And the government has made progress. But like something here in our own country, when you have a Congress that has to be incorporated, sometimes he can't get as much as he's asking for. We are trying to be of help in this and in the progress that they're making. And the ultimate goal is one, and hopefully without violence -- and we have been advocating quietly some approaches that we think might be helpful to them in what they're trying to accomplish. But our goal is, without any doubt, to see the end of apartheid in South Africa.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Do you think that Sullivan principle is a call of conduct mandating equal employment practices for black South Africans working for America's business corporations? And if so, why?

The President. Yes, I do. As a matter of fact, some of your contemporaries who are demonstrating a little and think that we should withdraw and our industries get out of South Africa would be hurting the very people we want to help. Because American industry in South Africa, and this also applies to industries of some of our allied countries also -- here, in our country, have adopted what was called the Sullivan code. And Sullivan is a black clergyman. And this is one in which for the first time in South Africa, in our plants, the rules that we go by in this country of fairness to all and with no discrimination apply. And it has set a mark that in competition for labor force has made many of the locally owned South African firms have to change some of their ways because the practices in the American-owned companies are the very thing we're trying to achieve.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. It seems to me that there will be no end in the arms race. If both the U.S. and Russia have created enough weapons to destroy each other in entirety, why are we still spending outrageous amounts of money building up our defense? And what would be accomplished by these other weapons?

The President. Actually, the United States -- we think of weapons as a deterrent to war. In other words, that the possible adversary -- and we have to believe that the Soviet Union is expansionist. They have a belief that their purpose must be to bring about world revolution to one-world Communist State. Karl Marx said that that was the only way it would really succeed, is when the whole world was that way. So, they are expansionist. We believe the means to maintain peace is to be strong enough to ensure that anyone taking a look and having a thought about an assault on us would recognize that the result and damage to themselves would not make it worthwhile.

Now, all of this talk about how much we have and what we're doing -- in the last 5 years the Soviet Union has outbuilt us in fighter planes, in bombers -- 50 times as many as we and the NATO nations together -- in artillery pieces, in tanks, and in ballistic missiles. You've got to remember that big as the military budget sounds -- and some people have tried to make it sound very big indeed -- that about two-thirds of that budget is to pay for the people that are in uniform and the rest is for spare parts and fuel and ammunition and new weapon systems and so forth. But, also, let me tell you that our military spending, as a percentage of the budget and as a percentage of gross national product, is smaller than it has been, heretofore, in the past.

At one time it was believed that the military -- because national defense is the prime responsibility of the Federal Government, to be able to protect our citizenry, and so we're spending a smaller percentage than has been spent in the past, than was spent in 1960. And we are playing catchup. We are trying to maintain a deterrent force so that no possible adversary is going to take a look and think that we're an easy target.

Now, a possible adversary has to know that you would and you can. We have done a great deal to rectify a situation that when we took office, on any given day, half the airplanes in our service couldn't fly for lack of spare parts; half the ships in our navy, which had been reduced from a thousand ships to just a few hundred, couldn't leave port at any time because of lack of spare parts or not enough crew.

So, we're not just building weapons to build weapons. The answer to holding down defense spending must come when the Soviet Union will legitimately meet with us for a reduction in weapons. And we are ready to sit down with them, and have been any time in the last 5 years, to totally eliminate nuclear weapons. That is our goal and what we dream of.

Q. Good morning, Mr. President. On behalf of the students at Overland High School, I would like to thank you for taking the time to share your thoughts and ideas with us this morning. Mr. President, we know that Congress has increased its aid to the Afghan rebels. Our question is: What is the ultimate objective of the United States financial aid to Afghan rebels, and how do you propose that these goals be accomplished?

The President. Well, there are several channels. We're working with the Soviet Union, as in the last summit conference on this subject, to persuade them to withdraw. How we see this coming about, or the settlement of this problem, is when the Soviet Union will withdraw and when, perhaps with international help, we can persuade the government, the then government of Afghanistan, which was established by the Soviet Union -- they chose the head man and put him there, even though he is an Afghan -- but then, that the people who are now fighting, the freedom fighters in Afghanistan, and the 3 million refugees who have been driven out of their country allowed to come back, that then, with help from the outside world, from countries like our own, to ensure order during the transition, that then the people of Afghanistan decide the kind of government they want and who they want to govern them. And we think that has to be based on a Soviet withdrawal, after 6 years of the bloodshed and the fighting that has been going on there.

Q. Hello, Mr. President. I would like to thank you for this opportunity for letting East High students speak to you today. Mr. President, there is tremendous amount of poverty and hunger in America, even in Washington, DC. Why is our government giving military aid and assistance to foreign nations rather than taking care of people at home?

The President. We are doing both. I know that there's been a lot of talk the other way that we aren't doing this. The aid that we're giving to foreign countries is aid to the lesser developed countries so that they can take their place in the world of nations with an economy in which they can have a living standard that is improved -- and no freedom. And some of that aid, also, is, very practically, military aid to them so that they can defend themselves. Which makes a lot more sense than if we, in our own protection, had to send troops there and maintain forces in those countries.

But at the same time, our programs of social aid to our own people are such that where there is hunger, you have to -- in our country -- you have to determine that that is probably because of a lack of knowledge on the part of the people as to what things are available. Not only is the Government doing much in that line, but there has been about a 3-times increase in private charity and aid in our country. We're unique in all the world. 1984, American people voluntarily gave $74 billion to charitable causes in this country; 1985, they gave $79.8 billion. It continues to go up. Much of that is in providing shelters, in providing programs of food, in school lunch programs and so forth. And between those two sectors, I don't believe that there is anyone that is going hungry in America simply by reason of denial or lack of ability to feed them. It is by people not knowing where or how to get this help.

The President. The Gramm-Rudman bill, I just think this has been long overdue. I know there are some factors in it that the court doesn't agree with and I don't either. But to have a plan -- for over 50 years our government has been running deficits. Here and there, maybe a single year back in that 50 when there wasn't a deficit, but there's been deficit spending. Many of us who complained openly about this and said, ``We've got to stop this. We've got to spend within our means.'' We had voices over the 50 years in Washington saying, ``Oh, it's perfectly all right. We owe it to ourselves.'' Well, now we've got a $2 trillion debt hanging over your heads.

And so, Gramm-Rudman came along, and what it is is what we've been asking for -- a plan. It's impossible to balance the budget in 1 year, to erase the deficit spending in 1 year. You would have to really disturb such programs that you'd cause hardship to our people. But we're on a path of 5 years in which if, annually, we start bringing the deficits down, and 5 years out we come to a balanced budget -- and then what we need, and have not gotten so far -- we need a constitutional amendment that says what Thomas Jefferson asked for clear back at the beginning of the Constitution -- then, let us have an amendment that says the Federal Government cannot borrow. It has to spend within its means.

But this 5-year program -- it means that now if someone stands up, for example, in the Congress and advocates a spending program, he's not just advocating something for this year and then you find out at the end of the year what happened to the deficit -- he's violating a scaled program. He's breaking a discipline that says over 5 years we're going to arrive at this point of a balanced budget. So, I think it's one of the best things that's happened.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Pell grants and other educational programs are being cut and instead are being spent on building sophisticated nuclear arms. At the same time, military schools have very low reading scores. Do you think it's wrong for us to have educated people run these weapons that threaten our lives instead of weapon systems?

The President. I don't think we're in that danger. First of all, as I say, there's been a lot of talk that what we're doing is cutting back on necessary programs and in education -- and that isn't true. There will be this year $260 billion spent on education in the United States. And as I said, we're making college loans available at a greater amount than ever before.

And I think you'd be interested to know that with all the years, and even in wartime when we've had to draft people into the military -- and we don't now; it's purely volunteer -- we have the highest percentage of high school graduates in the uniformed forces than we have ever had in the history of this nation. And there are three intelligence brackets in the military -- tests that are given to determine just what assignments these individuals are best fitted for. We have the highest percentage in the top intelligence bracket in the military than we've ever had in our history.

And at the same time, other programs having to do with education -- I'm sure many of you must know that we appointed a commission and came back with a report on excellence in education. And that in '85 there was a nine-point increase in the average SAT scores. You know what those are, the scholastic aptitude tests -- that's the biggest single-year increase since back around, I think it was 1963. And 35 States in the Union now have already upped their standards; 39 States have had an increase in graduates and so forth. So, education is undergoing, in our country, quite a reformation. Many States have increased the school day. They've increased the requirements for graduation and so forth. I don't think we have any danger of what you've just suggested.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. The State of Vermont is deeply concerned with its environment. Since Vermont suffers greatly from acid rain, I'd like to know what further steps your administration intends to take to protect the environment from acid rain.

The President. We're taking them right now. As you know, we and Canada -- we appointed two individuals to get together, Drew Lewis on our part and a gentleman from Canada, to review this whole thing and what is being done. And they have come back with some recommendations; many of them include some continued research. And we're doing that. In the last 5 years, we have cleaned our air of pollutants to a greater extent than many years back, until we get back to before there was pollution. And we're continuing all of this and taking action on it because we recognize it has to be solved. It is a complex problem too -- acid rain. It isn't just as simple as saying, ``Stop putting smoke out of the smokestack.'' We've got to figure the automobile factor in there, too. But we have made a 10-percent reduction in the last 5 years of one of the major pollutants that is responsible for acid rain. But we're going to continue until we get the job done.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. My question is -- I understand that you've proposed to reduce Federal spending on health care, such as freezing Medicare at the present levels and reducing Federal expenditure contributions on Medicaid. However, if this proposal is to be enacted, what do you plan to do to help those elderly and poor that will lose some of their health benefits?

The President. Actually, here again is one of the things where if there are savings made, we're going to try to make them with having more care as to who is included; in other words, to aim the program at the people of the greatest need -- have real need. We have found again that when bureaucracy gets going with a program of this kind, there comes into being a looseness, and you find that people who should be responsible for themselves are benefiting at the cost to their fellow citizens, the taxpayers. So, we're trying to make the program more efficient and more effective. And there is no intention on our part to, in any way, reduce or make impossible for needy people to get health care.

It has been -- incidentally, I hope you know that health care in America has known one of the biggest inflations in cost of almost anything, any service or any product that we buy; it has increased in cost faster than almost anything else. And I don't know, maybe part of that is due to the fact that if you go way back to 1952, there was eighty-four-hundredths of a person in a hospital -- as a worker in a hospital, nurse or whatever, for each patient. And by 1978 there were over three people employed in the hospital for every patient. And sometimes we think there are some things that can be done that won't hurt the patient but that will benefit the whole program.

The President. Well, it's a little difficult for me to speak to this right now because this is now before the Justice Department and under investigation. I can only tell you that I have known Mike Deaver for 25 years. He was associated with me in the State government in California and all. And I think it is well for us to note that he was the one who asked for an investigation and a special investigator, which I think shows his confidence in his innocence. But as I say, I can't go beyond that because it is now in the hands of the Justice system.

Q. I was wondering what your administration is doing to improve economic, health, and educational conditions on Indian reservations. And I was wondering what you, sir, plan -- your administration is going to be doing and what future plans future administrations are going to be doing for plans to improve the conditions on Indian reservations?

The President. Oh, well, this is the responsibility of the governments; this is what we're aiming at. And we think we'll be far better able to handle them if we get out from under this constant deficit spending for what we think are a number of programs that are not worth the cost and that government shouldn't even be attempting to perform. We're having some problems getting this done through the Congress. But having served 8 years as a Governor and now 5\1/2\ years here, I have to tell you that government is not always the answer to some of our problems.

We have a private sector, and we are a government of, by, and for the people. Right now, we've had the longest period of recovery and economic expansion that we have had in the last 50 years. And we have it because, number one, we reduced taxes, rather than raise them, so that the people had more money in their own pockets to do with what they wanted to do. We eliminated thousands of regulations imposed by government on every kind of business and even the private individual. In short, we eliminated -- trying to eliminate more government programs that we felt were simply interfering and unnecessary. When I was Governor I discovered, at that end where the programs were being implemented, that some of our welfare programs for the people were costing the Federal Government two dollars for every dollar they could deliver to a needy person. Now, that's too high an overhead. And these are the things we're trying to clean up, and I think we've made great progress.

And I have to tell you, I think that your future, all of you, with regard to the availability of jobs -- we have created almost 10 million new jobs in this country over the last 42 months. Our trading partners out in the world cannot point to a new job that has been created in the last 10 years. They have unemployment rates that are several times as great as ours. Today we have the highest percentage of the work potential in our country employed ever in our history. Now, the potential work force is considered to be everybody, male and female, from age 16 to 65. We have 110 million of those employed now. If the tax reform program that we're working on right now goes through, it is estimated that alone in the next decade will create 4 million new jobs.

The opportunities for you -- and a lot of that's going to depend on you remaining the kind of citizens that vote when there's an election. And I don't care whether it's somebody on the school board at the local level or whether it's for President of the United States -- vote. The people that are elected to serve you are no better and no worse than the people who send them into government to serve. But they're all better than the people who don't vote at all. And here in this country -- and I have -- do I have enough of a second to say another thing?

The President. You know, we're coming to the celebration, the anniversary of the Constitution. I've made it a point to read a lot of other constitutions, including the one of the Soviet Union. And you'd be surprised at how many of those offer the same things ours do -- right of assembly, freedom of speech. Of course, in Russia they don't observe it, but it's there in the constitution. All these things. So, what makes ours so different? Well, the difference is so slight that it's overlooked too often. But it is so great, it explains the entire world difference. All those other constitutions are written by the government saying, these are the privileges we permit the people. Ours says, ``We the People,'' permit the Government to do the following things, and the Government cannot do anything that we have not, in the Constitution, told the Government it can do.

So, don't just take it easy and miss an election day. Stay interested. Stay involved. Become public-spirited citizens when you're out, and this country will continue to offer the greatest opportunities of any place in the world.

I'm so grateful to all of you for being here, and I'm so sorry about all those hands that came up that I couldn't reach. I've often thought that he should do the choosing of the questions -- [laughter] -- and then my conscience would be clear, and I would just answer the questions.

Sounds, whether we produce them or receive them, are an integral part of our lives. Musical sounds bring us a whole range of delight. Much of our knowledge of the world around us we learn through sounds: conversations allow us to gather and convey information, to question and to receive answers; ringing fire alarms warn us to clear a burning building. Sounds -- both the ones we hear and the ones we make -- help us to understand others and be understood.

More than fifteen million Americans strive daily to surmount the isolation that hearing impairment so often brings. Over ten million Americans endeavor to communicate despite speech disorders. We can help people with communicative disorders fulfill their potential by identifying and removing the man-made obstacles that limit their educational and occupational opportunities. Our efforts will enrich not only their lives, but our own.

Today, in medical institutions across the country, scientists supported by the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and by numerous voluntary health agencies are carrying out a wide range of research to find better ways to prevent, treat, and cure hearing and speech disorders. Investigators have discovered much about the structure and function of the systems involved in hearing and speech. They have developed new devices and medications that offer hope where before there was none. Still, much remains to be learned.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Tourism is vital to the United States. It contributes significantly to our economic prosperity. It creates jobs and helps out on our balance of payments. Most of all, it creates better understanding of this Nation's social and cultural realities, including our history.

People are central to the travel industry. It supports, directly or indirectly, almost 7 million jobs. Travel and tourism have grown substantially over the years. The industry now generates business receipts of approximately $260 billion annually. Payroll income alone is $60 billion, and tax revenue is $33 billion. Indeed, international tourism now ranks as this Nation's largest business ``export'' in the service industries.

This Nation is blessed with a magnificent and varied array of tourist attractions: our extraordinarily diversified landscape, and some of the world's most vibrant cities, cultural attractions, and natural wonders. Nowhere else but in America can you find such beautiful coastlines and beaches, majestic mountains, lush valleys, rugged woods, rolling plains, awesome canyons, scenic deserts, tropical islands, and Arctic snowscapes. No wonder the world wants to come and see where we live. Let us welcome them and treat them as honored guests.

Skin cancer is the most common form of cancer, and its incidence is rising. Fortunately, it is also the most preventable form of cancer and the easiest to detect early and treat successfully. The risk of developing skin cancer increases throughout adult life, with the highest incidence occurring among people over 50.

There are two basic types of skin cancer: the common basal cell and squamous cell cancers, and the less common but far more serious type called melanoma. More than 400,000 new cases of nonmelanoma skin cancer are diagnosed in the United States each year. These cancers have a high cure rate, especially with early detection and prompt treatment. Most can be treated in the doctor's office.

Occurrence of nonmelanoma skin cancers varies directly with exposure to ultraviolet light from the sun (and ``sun lamps'' of various kinds), and indirectly with skin pigmentation. Older Americans can reduce their risk of skin cancer by avoiding excessive exposure to sunlight, particularly if they are fair-skinned; by avoiding exposure during the 10 a.m. to 2 p.m. hours; by wearing protective clothing; and by using sunscreen lotions and ointments. Prudent avoidance of too much sunlight is fully compatible with enjoyment of the great outdoors.

Older Americans may mistake the signs of skin cancer for normal skin changes due to aging, and they should be alert to these signs. Many skin growths are noncancerous, but any new growth on the skin, or a sore that does not heal, should promptly be brought to a doctor's attention. Skin cancer has many different appearances, but it occurs most frequently on sun-exposed areas of the body.

Melanoma is a far more serious health problem, but it also is highly curable when detected and treated early. About 23,000 new cases will be diagnosed this year. Melanoma is also related to exposure to ultraviolet light but not as directly as nonmelanoma skin cancers. Older Americans should be alert for changes in the size or color of a mole or rapid darkening, ulceration or scaliness or changes in the shape or outline of a mole, or development of a new pigmented lesion or bulge in a normal skin area. These are some of the most common signs that may signal melanoma, and a doctor should be consulted without delay.

The American Academy of Dermatology and other dermatologic organizations are committed to educating the public about all types of skin cancers. This year marks the Second Annual National Melanoma and Skin Cancer Detection and Prevention Program, a coordinated national effort of professional dermatologic organizations to reduce the increasing incidence of skin cancers and to better control these cancers by prompt diagnosis and appropriate treatment.

Our remarkable agricultural system has enabled our Nation to make great strides in efforts to conquer hunger and to meet the food and fiber needs of our people as well as countless others around the world. But we cannot afford to let up in the battle against accidental injuries and illnesses that take an unduly high toll of those whose toil is responsible for this abundance.

Although much has been accomplished over the years to make farm life safer and healthier, much more remains to be done. Everyone in the agricultural community should make renewed efforts to be informed about potential hazards and take steps to minimize those dangers. This includes the conscientious use of mechanical safeguards like protective equipment and safety belts. I commend our farm equipment manufacturers for their emphasis on building safeguards into their equipment and warning of possible hazards in operational misuse, but there is no substitute for vigilance and common sense in using equipment. Awareness, on the job and off, is the surest way to avert mishaps and tragedies.

For the past two weeks, I have shared your concern for our ability to gain necessary congressional support for the Saudi missile sale in its present configuration. Yesterday I met with the Saudi Ambassador to the United States, His Royal Highness Prince Bandar bin Sultan, to discuss this issue. Prince Bandar informed me that the Saudi Government, recognizing the particular sensitivity of Stingers being transferred to any country and the importance of the sale to the security of the Persian Gulf area, has decided to withdraw its request for Stingers.

The U.S. defense relationship with Saudi Arabia was started by President Roosevelt in 1943 and endorsed by every President since. I cannot permit the Congress to dismantle this long-standing policy, damage our vital strategic, political and economic interests in the Middle East and undermine our balanced policy in that region.

The American people and their representatives should understand that this sale is in our interests. It is not just a favor to our friends in Saudi Arabia. Moreover, it is not being done at anyone's expense.

Stability of the oil-rich Persian Gulf is another goal of great importance. In a region living in the shadow of the tragic and gruesome Iran-Iraq war, and threatened by religious fanaticism at its worst, we cannot afford to take stability for granted. Saudi willingness to stand up to Iranian threats has been key in preventing the spread of chaos. It has been Saudi Arabia's confidence in our commitment to its security that has allowed it to stand firm.

But Saudi Arabia produces no weapons of its own and we have not sold the Saudis new arms in almost 2 years. If we suddenly shut off that supply, it will weaken our own credibility, as well as the Saudis' ability to defend themselves. It would send the worst possible message as to America's dependability and courage.

Behind the scenes, the Saudis have aided the effort to combat terrorism, which is as much, if not more, of a threat to them as it is to us. Recently, they refused Qadhafi's requests for aid. Several times in recent months, they have been instrumental in offsetting unjust criticism of the United States and preventing radical states from undertaking joint action against our country.

The Saudis have proven their friendship and good will. They have assisted our efforts to support responsible governments in Egypt, Jordan, and Sudan. They have worked quietly in the search for peace in Lebanon, in the Arab-Israeli conflict, and in the Iran-Iraq war. They also provide impressive assistance to the government of Pakistan and to Afghan refugees.

Thank you, Guy, and thank you all very much for this wonderful evening and the privilege for being here. If I remembered one sterling lesson from the profession that used to occupy my time, I'd sit down now while I'm ahead.

But we've got some other urgent business at hand, and that's the Senate and House campaigns in 1986. You haven't heard that mentioned here tonight yet. And we've certainly got our work cut out for us. The elections in '86 will chart America's course into the 1990's and beyond. Will America be strong, economically and militarily? Will we march into the 21st century with pride in our accomplishments, a leader in freedom, a force of hope to the other nations of the world? Or will we slide back into the malaise that George [Bush] mentioned that gripped our nation just 6 short years ago, forsaking the future of greatness that is rightly America's? That's what will be decided in these midterm elections.

I know and you know that without a Republican majority in the Senate and a strong Republican base in the House that enabled us to build a winning coalition, without that critical mass of Republicans in the Congress, all that we've accomplished in these last 5\1/2\ years would never have been possible. We slashed tax rates, yes. We cut back needless regulations, liberating the entrepreneurial genius of the American people and giving our nation one of the longest sustained periods of economic growth in postwar history. We began rebuilding our military, regaining the trust of our allies and the respect of our adversaries. And we stand proudly on our record. I wonder, can the other side say as much?

The other side still seems to have only two ideas: raise taxes and slash defense. And they still talk about America's defense as if it were somebody else's special interest. Well, maybe there's something revealing in that. There is one overriding question that is not being addressed by the other side: Has the Soviet Union in any way reduced its enormous and dangerous military buildup or its drive for domination that threatens the security of the West? And the answer is no. Today the Soviet Union has deployed over 1\1/2\ times as many combat aircraft as the United States, over 2\1/2\ times as many submarines, over 5 times as many tanks, and over 11 times as many artillery pieces.

As long as this heavy responsibility is mine, I cannot sit back and permit some reckless antidefense budget to tear down all that we have done. Ladies and gentlemen, none of us can sit back. If the Republican Party must stand a lonely vigil to guard the gates of freedom, then so be it. We must meet this challenge. We must speak frankly and firmly and rally the people's support. We must protect the security of America. And, yes, we must and will protect the brave young men and women who risk their lives to keep us free. They deserve the best that we can give them.

The House budget demonstrates that the Democratic Party is still thinking exactly the same way they did back in the seventies, when its policies produced orbiting interest rates, stratospheric inflation, and a mothballed military. It should give America fair warning of what will happen if the other side takes control of the Senate. All that will stand between America and an instant replay of the late seventies is the Presidential veto. Our program for a strong, vital, and growing America will become stymied by partisan politics and obstructionism.

Well, we can't let that happen. Our agenda is too full for the years ahead. The Republican Party has its eye set on the future. It's our job in these next 2\1/2\ years to lock in the gains we've made to institutionalize this second American revolution of hope and opportunity. We must create a momentum for growth at home and strength abroad, a momentum so strong that it will even sweep up the other side and carry them along. That may sound like wishful thinking, but it's not. We've already seen it happen this year with the dramatic breakthrough of what has already been mentioned here tonight: tax reform in the Congress. A consensus is forming in America around low tax rates and progrowth policies. Looking back on the redistributionist high-tax policies of the late seventies, it now seems like the Dark Ages. The Democratic Party's politics of envy has been consigned to the trash heap of economic history.

As the tax reform bill now before the Senate exemplifies, by cutting tax rates, all of America will benefit; every American can come out a winner. And pulling together, rather than pulling apart, we can all contribute to fulfilling America's destiny of greatness. You know, we've talked of simplification of the tax structure. I'll just give you one classic example. There is one section of the tax code, the opening line of which contains -- the opening sentence -- 478 words. It only took 16 words to put the income tax into being.

In foreign affairs we've seen that we can count on the Republican Senate to stand firmly on the side of freedom. Where does the House stand? Unfortunately we can't know, because the Democratic House leadership has twisted the rules so that a fair up or down vote on aid to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters was not possible. Can we turn our backs on our brothers and sisters to the south and still remain worthy of our own forefathers? Can we renounce the good and worthy ideals for which these Nicaraguan patriots shed their blood and believe their freedom lost there may not one day be lost here as well? Some say, ``Yes.'' I say, ``Never.'' And I say a few words that are not mine; they belong to that immortal Winston Churchill: ``We must never give in. Never, never, never.'' Never, until the people of Nicaragua can live in the full sunlight of freedom and democracy.

So, this is the choice in '86: legislative finagling or leadership; high taxes and overspending or balanced budgets and economic growth; a weak, isolationist America in a world held hostage by pro-Soviet tyrants and Third World despots or a strong, secure America that accepts its destiny as leader of the free world. We've built the foundations of a future full of hope, an American future of unparalleled achievement and prosperity. We've got a proud record of success on our side. The other side should be forewarned: There ain't no stoppin' us now.

I want to thank each and every one of you for all you're doing for the party and for America. The next time I address one of these gatherings, I am counting on there being so many new Republican Senators and Representatives that it will be standing room only. If you've missed what I've been trying to say here, it really is -- and there just aren't enough words to say it properly -- just all of you -- this country started out with a revolution that had never taken place before or since, a revolution that changed the entire philosophy of government, a revolution based on three words: ``We the People.'' And you, the people, are going to keep that revolution in existence, and I thank you from the bottom of my heart, and God bless you all. Thank you.

It's an honor to be able to speak to you, the members of the American Retail Federation. You represent a vital sector of our economy -- one that employs 18 million Americans -- and I want you to know how much I appreciate the support that you've given to our administration from the very first. It's been a while now, and we're getting to be the best kind of friends: old friends. We can look back on many a battle that we've been through together -- and isn't it nice to be able to say that most of the time, we've won?

But we've begun rebuilding our military and regaining the trust of our allies and the respect of our adversaries. And we've made strides toward getting deficit spending under control once and for all. Of course, we've faced opposition every step of the way -- just look at the budget the House of Representatives passed last week. What does that budget call for? You guessed it: weakening our defenses and raising our taxes. There's something about this that would be ridiculous if it weren't so sad. For nearly 5\1/2\ years now the American people have been repudiating the old policies of high taxes at home and weakness abroad, but the opposition keeps coming back with the same old thing. To borrow a comparison from retailing, the opposition is beginning to look as out of it as a department store that stocks wide ties and and bell-bottom pants. The American people just aren't buying; neither is the Senate, and neither am I.

In addition to this budget, the Democratic leadership in the House has put together a trade bill -- well, rather, I should say, an antitrade bill -- that is openly and rankly political. This antitrade bill, this protectionist legislation, would have our nation violate the most basic tenets of free and fair international trade. Indeed, it would plunge the world into a trade war, eroding our relations with our allies and free world trading partners. Economic growth in America and around the world would be the casualty. And again, there's a certain sense in which this effort on the part of the opposition is embarrassingly old-fashioned and out of date. We've known since the Smoot-Hawley tariffs of 1930 that protectionist legislation doesn't work, that it means less world trade and less prosperity here at home. Now, I'm one of the few around here maybe that has a firsthand memory of trying to get a job in the Great Depression. But the Smoot-Hawley tariff that we adopted spread that Depression worldwide and lengthened out by decades our ability to recover.

So, our administration has worked to open markets, not to close them, and to keep those markets fair. Where trading partners appear to be cheating Americans, we're taking action. Already, we have a number of investigations underway. But the House bill would cost American consumers billions and undercut the millions of American jobs connected with foreign trade. And believe me, I don't intend to let that happen. And I'd like to ask your help in letting the Congress know that the answer is more world trade, not less. And I don't think I can ask if I need to count on you -- or can count on you. I'm taking that for granted.

A consensus is forming in America around low-tax rate, progrowth policies. Looking back on the redistributionist, high-tax policies of the late seventies, it now seems like the Dark Ages. The old politics of envy are over. As the tax reform bill now before the Senate makes clear, by cutting tax rates every American can come out a winner. And pulling together, rather than pulling apart, we can all contribute to fulfilling America's destiny of greatness.

Well, so this is not the moment to bring tax rates down to their lowest level in half a century. I said that wrong. [Laughter] I reversed the sentence. Is this not the moment to bring tax rates down to their lowest level in half a century, to open the doors to opportunity for every American, no matter what their background or color of their skin, and to fire the entrepreneurial engines that will carry America into the 21st century? Yes, the time is now.

And you know, I believe we have the chance to combine progrowth tax reform with spending restraint and a balanced budget. Inflation will become a memory of the distant past, rather than a slumbering beast, always ready to be awakened by overspending. Interest rates can fall further, making that first home no longer a dream but a reality for young couples today. Declining interest rates, low inflation, a healthy, growing economy -- imagine what this means to our nation's retailers, and imagine what it will mean in time to our struggling farmers; to our homeowners and car buyers; or to the millions of American entrepreneurs trying to raise capital to start a new business.

The Bilateral Investment Treaty (BIT) program, initiated in 1981, is designed to encourage and protect U.S. investment in developing countries. The treaty is an integral part of U.S. efforts to encourage Cameroon and other governments to adopt macroeconomic and structural policies that will promote economic growth. It is also fully consistent with U.S. policy toward international investment. That policy holds that an open international investment system in which participants respond to market forces provides the best and most efficient mechanism to promote global economic development. A specific tenet, reflected in this treaty, is that U.S. direct investment abroad and foreign investment in the United States should receive fair, equitable, and nondiscriminatory treatment. Under this treaty, the parties also agree to international law standards for expropriation and compensation; free financial transfers; and procedures, including international arbitration, for the settlement of investment disputes.

Section 213(c) of the Caribbean Basin Economic Recovery Act (CBERA) requires that all beneficiary countries exporting beef or sugar to the United States under the duty-free provisions of the Act submit a stable food production plan. Food plans consist of measures and proposals to ensure that food production in and the nutritional level of the population of a beneficiary country are not adversely affected by changes in land and other resources use that could result from increased sugar and beef production undertaken in response to the duty-free treatment for these exports into the United States.

Fellows serve for 1 year as Special Assistants to the Vice President, members of the Cabinet, and the President's principal staff. In addition to the work assignment, the fellowship includes an educational program which parallels and broadens the unique experience of working at the highest levels of the Federal Government. The program is open to U.S. citizens in the early stages of their careers and from all occupations and professions. Federal Government employees are not eligible, with exception of career Armed Forces personnel. Leadership, intellectual and professional ability, and commitment to community and Nation are the broad criteria employed in the selection of fellows.

The United States has followed closely the recent negotiations among the five Central American governments to resolve the conflict in that region. We note that at the meeting in Panama on May 16 - 18, the Governments of Guatemala and Costa Rica, with the support of the Governments of El Salvador and Honduras, offered constructive proposals for resolving important security issues. We also note that representatives of the Government of Nicaragua stated their strong opposition to the positions presented by the four democratic countries of Central America.

The position of the United States has remained constant toward the negotiations arranged through the good offices of the Contadora group as well as other efforts to promote a negotiated solution in Central America. It is an objective of United States policy in Central America to seek the resolution of regional disputes and conflicts through dialog and the achievement through negotiations of political settlements with verifiable agreements. Philip C. Habib, the President's Special Envoy for Central America, has been working to achieve this objective through his consultations with the countries involved.

These four objectives are equal in importance. The implementation of the 21 objectives agreed to by the five Central American countries in September 1983 would achieve these four objectives. The United States would support a treaty which would achieve all 21 points in a comprehensive settlement in which all political and security commitments are simultaneously implemented, with concrete verification procedures to ensure compliance by all five parties. The United States would not consider itself bound to support an agreement which failed to achieve in a verifiable manner all the agreed objectives of the Contadora Document of Objectives.

Memorial Day is an occasion of special importance to all Americans, because it is a day sacred to the memory of all those Americans who made the supreme sacrifice for the liberties we enjoy. We will never forget or fail to honor these heroes to whom we owe so much. We honor them best when we resolve to cherish and defend the liberties for which they gave their lives. Let us resolve to do all in our power to assure the survival and the success of liberty so that our children and their children for generations to come can live in an America in which freedom's light continues to shine.

The Congress, in establishing Memorial Day, called for it to be a day of tribute to America's fallen, and also a day of national prayer for lasting peace. This Nation has always sought true peace. We seek it still. Our goal is peace in which the highest aspirations of our people, and people everywhere, are secure: peace with freedom, with justice, and with opportunity for human development. This is the permanent peace for which we pray, not only for ourselves but for all generations.

The defense of peace, like the defense of liberty, requires more than lip service. It requires vigilance, military strength, and the willingness to take risks and to make sacrifices. The surest guarantor of both peace and liberty is our unflinching resolve to defend that which has been purchased for us by our fallen heroes.

In recognition of those brave Americans to whom we pay tribute today, the Congress, by joint resolution approved May 11, 1950 (64 Stat. 158), has requested the President to issue a proclamation calling upon the people of the United States to observe each Memorial Day as a day of prayer for permanent peace and designating a period on that day when the people of the United States might unite in prayer.

I also direct all appropriate Federal officials, and request the Governors of the United States and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the appropriate officials of all units of government, to direct that the flag be flown at half-staff during this Memorial Day on all buildings, grounds, and naval vessels throughout the United States and in all areas under its jurisdiction and control, and I request the people of the United States to display the flag at half-staff from their homes for the customary forenoon period.

The skies of our United States are host to hundreds of species of birds, but among the most awe-inspiring and magnificent are the more than fifty species known collectively as the birds of prey. These include the hawks, the owls, and our national symbol, the bald eagle.

These birds are not only some of the most graceful and impressive flyers, they play a vital role in the ecological balance by maintaining predator-prey relationships so essential to the stability of the natural world.

While nearly all Americans today recognize the beauty and value of these great birds, this recognition was long in coming. As we settled the land and developed our Nation, we were slow to heed what loss of habitat and indiscriminate shooting could do to this priceless resource. Fortunately, however, our knowledge and appreciation of these splendid creatures has deepened, as have our efforts to protect them. We now see the bald eagle nesting populations increasing each year. Once again, the peregrine falcon is a fairly common sight for bird-watchers along our coasts and even in several of our major cities. Motorists along our interstate highways can enjoy the frequent sighting of redtailed hawks resting in trees along the rights of way. Indeed, bird-watching for birds of prey is becoming an economic plus to many local economies.

Thanks to increased public interest and effective conservation law enforcement, illegal shooting of these great birds is on the decline. More and more, our citizens grow to understand the importance of these creatures to the American landscape and to treasure the spirit of strength, freedom, and boldness they represent.

To celebrate the continuing restoration of this magnificent resource, and to remind our citizens of the abiding need for wildlife conservation, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 288, has designated the month of May 1986 as ``National Birds of Prey Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this month.

The House of Representatives this morning passed H.R. 4800, the omnibus trade bill. This legislation, if enacted, would be a major step backward for the U.S. economy. They call it an omnibus bill; it is really an ominous bill. It is trade destroying, not trade creating. The bill would harm American consumers, who would pay higher prices on thousands of products; businesses and workers, who would find foreign markets closed to them; and farmers, who would face additional financial hardships as the result of closed foreign markets. Moreover, the bill would hamper efforts we have underway to create more jobs and more opportunities for Americans through an active program of opening foreign markets, not closing our own.

H.R. 4800 is, in the worst spirit of Smoot-Hawley, pure protectionism. The House of Representatives has failed to learn the lessons of history. Within months of the enactment of Smoot-Hawley, our key trading partners began raising tariffs and imposing protectionist exchange controls to the point where U.S. exports fell some 60 percent in 3 years. H.R. 4800, with its emphasis on retaliation and closed markets, will do the same. H.R. 4800 would reverse the progress we've made. By imposing mandatory quotas against countries like Japan, Taiwan, and West Germany, it would clearly violate our commitments under GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] and invite massive retaliation against key American industries. By imposing mandatory retaliation in certain of our trade cases, the law would remove our flexibility to negotiate market-opening settlements. Its meat-ax approach to export control would jeopardize our national security. And it would establish government councils to carry out industrial planning, regardless of what the free market would say.

H.R. 4800 is not a trade policy, but an abandonment of trade policy. This administration is pursuing an activist trade policy grounded squarely on the notion of free and fair trade. Our aim is removing foreign trade barriers and opening foreign markets. In the past year alone we have made more aggressive and creative use of our laws to enforce our trading rights than any previous administration. We have used our trade laws to address unfair foreign practices ranging from European restrictions on our agricultural exports to the dumping of Japanese semiconductors in the U.S. market. Our actions have been aimed at foreign practices which hinder competitiveness and cost us jobs across the full industrial spectrum -- from our most basic industries, such as steel, to the cutting edge in services and high tech.

We will continue to take whatever actions are necessary to protect our trading rights. At the same time, we intend to carry our message -- that market opening, not market closing, is the answer -- to our trading partners through a new round of multilateral negotiations in the GATT aimed at increasing market opportunities for everyone. We are correcting the value of the dollar so as to improve American competitiveness. Since February 1985 the Japanese yen and the West German mark have risen about 60 percent against the dollar. These changes should show up in our trade accounts later this year. This process will continue as the result of efforts we began last September at the Plaza Hotel and continued earlier this month at the summit.

We stand by what the President said in September: We will vigorously pursue our policy of promoting free and open markets in this country and around the world. H.R. 4800 would do neither of these things.

In addition to work on the government-to-government claims, the Department of State, working together with the Department of the Treasury and the Department of Justice, filed five pleadings in disputes concerning the interpretation and/or performance of various provisions of the Algiers Accords. The Tribunal held two hearings on interpretive disputes. The first dealt with the standard of proof that a corporate claimant must satisfy to establish that it enjoys the requisite U.S. or Iranian nationality for bringing a claim before the Tribunal. The second hearing dealt with the disposition of the balance remaining from the $3.667 billion transferred in January 1981 to the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, as fiscal agent for the United States, for the payment of Iran's syndicated indebtedness.

Since my last report, no settlements of nonsyndicated debt claims of U.S. banks against Iran have been paid from Dollar Account No. 2. Thus, among banks responding to a December 1981 Federal Register notice requiring the registration of all U.S. banks with claims against Dollar Account No. 2, about 16 banks have yet to settle their claims. In addition, a number of those banks that have already reached settlements with Iran have reserved claims against Dollar Account No. 2. The balance in Dollar Account No. 2 currently exceeds $625 million, an amount clearly sufficient to satisfy both outstanding nonsyndicated debt claims and the January Interest claims now payable out of this account.

These unique institutions are in the best tradition of American voluntarism. They have brought together public agencies, private industry, church groups, various associations, and individual Americans in a concerted drive to meet a basic human need. America's food banks provide immediate, temporary assistance at a neighborhood level to individuals and families who often do not know anywhere else to turn.

Private donors of food have greatly assisted in the maintenance and expansion of these worthwhile programs. Schools and neighborhood groups have contributed thousands of hours of manpower by helping collect and distribute the vast quantity of foodstuffs that food banks handle each year. The food banks themselves are staffed by dedicated citizens who seek nothing for themselves but the satisfaction of knowing that they have served as an invaluable resource to their fellowman. Without the humanitarian and charitable concern of all those involved in this mission, the sense of community and brotherly love that is indispensable to the quality of life in our cities and towns would be undermined.

Time and again in American history the people of this great Nation have joined together in demonstrations of concern for the plight of their fellowman. Throughout the world, the people of the United States are known for their tradition of generosity and voluntary service to others. The strength of this tradition, which has been revitalized in the 1980s, lies in a key insight: The well-being of each and every individual in our society is a matter not only of public interest, but of personal responsibility as well. No form of charitable endeavor can truly succeed if it is not grounded in the recognition that the benefits it confers are as important to the giver as they are to the recipient.

On May 25, 1986, millions of Americans will participate in ``Hands Across America,'' a visible symbol of the determination that unites Americans in the fight against hunger and homelessness. By joining together in this way, in cities and towns, along the back roads and mountain highways, from sea to shining sea, the people of this blessed land are reaffirming their willingness to sacrifice so that adequate food and shelter are available to all. This occasion represents an opportunity for all Americans to reflect on the root causes of these persistent problems, and to rededicate ourselves to finding lasting solutions that will allow everyone to live, eat, and work in circumstances befitting their dignity as human beings.

After considering all relevant aspects of the case, including those set forth in Section 202(c) of the Trade Act of 1974, I have determined that provision of import relief in the form of a tariff for up to 5 years is in the national economic interest. The tariff will apply to all U.S. imports of western red cedar shakes and shingles. The additional duty will be 35 percent ad valorem for the first 30 months of the period, 20 percent ad valorem for months 30 through 54, and 8 percent ad valorem for months 54 through 60. This 5-year relief program should be sufficient to enable the domestic producers of red cedar shakes and shingles to adjust to competition during the relief period.

In conjunction with providing import relief, I hereby direct you to request that the ITC advise me of the probable economic effect on the domestic industry of the termination of import relief after 30 months. This advice is to include a review of the progress and specific efforts being made by the domestic producers of western red cedar shakes and shingles to adjust to import competition. I also direct you to request, on my behalf, advice regarding termination of relief from the Secretaries of Commerce and Labor. The ITC, Commerce, and Labor advice is to be provided to me, through you, 3 months prior to the expiration of the 30-month period. It is my intention to continue relief for the entire 5-year period if general market conditions continue to warrant relief and if the domestic producers have begun to make reasonable progress toward adjustment during the first 30-month period.

I have decided to modify the ITC remedy by providing for a declining tariff over the period of relief, rather than a constant 35 percent duty as recommended by the ITC. The relief program I am implementing calls for a duty of 35 percent ad valorem for the first 30 months of the period, a 20 percent ad valorem duty for months 30 through 54, and an 8 percent duty for months 54 through 60. This 5-year graduated relief program will facilitate the industry's transition back to free market competition and will help reduce consumer costs in the latter months of the relief period. Petitioners have indicated that the industry would support the concept of graduated relief.

In conjunction with providing import relief, I have directed the United States Trade Representative to request that the ITC advise me of the probable economic effect on the domestic industry of the termination of import relief after 30 months. This advice is to include a review of the progress and specific efforts being made by the domestic producers of western red cedar shakes and shingles to adjust to import competition. The Trade Representative is also directed to request, on my behalf, advice regarding termination of relief from the Secretaries of Commerce and Labor.

The ITC, Commerce, and Labor advice is to be provided to me, through the Trade Representative, 3 months prior to the expiration of the first 30-month relief period. It is my intention to continue relief for the entire 5-year period if it appears at the end of 30 months that market conditions warrant a continuation of relief and that domestic producers have begun to make reasonable progress toward adjustment.

As we begin this Memorial Day weekend, I'd like to take a moment to consider one of the wellsprings of our greatness as a nation: our willingness to serve each other. When the Frenchman Alexis de Tocqueville traveled across our country more than a century and a half ago, he was struck by the volunteer spirit that he encountered. ``The Americans,'' he wrote, ``make associations to found seminaries, to build inns, to construct churches, to diffuse books, to send missionaries to the ends of the Earth.'' In large part because of this concern for their fellow men that he saw in the American people, de Tocqueville concluded that America is great, because she is good. Today our nation remains great and good, and the spirit of private sector initiative has become a major part of American life.

Indeed, just yesterday it was my honor to sign a proclamation requested by Congress that proclaims tomorrow, May 25th, Hands Across America Day. And my family and I plan to join in the line as it passes through the White House grounds. Hands Across America represents a nationwide effort to help the poor and homeless who live in our country. Tomorrow millions will join in that ancient gesture of good will and friendship, the linking of hands, in a demonstration of concern for the less fortunate. To all those participating: Good luck. I can wish you nothing finer than the satisfaction of knowing that you've given of yourselves to help others.

In the past few years we've witnessed an unprecedented outpouring of charity and good will -- a reassertion of good, old-fashioned neighborliness now that our country has regained its self-confidence. The figures tell the story. Last year alone, individuals, corporations, bequests, and foundations gave nearly $80 billion to good causes. That amount marked an all-time high and came to over $6.5 billion more than the amount donated in 1984. And according to a recent study, some 89 million Americans perform volunteer work every year. I think we're entitled to feel pretty good about that. In a way, though, the individual stories are even more impressive than the figures. This past Thursday, Nancy hosted the first international Just Say No walk here at the White House. Just Say No is an organization teaching children around the world to say no to drugs. Indeed, this week was Just Say No to Drugs Week, and the White House rally involved 2,300 youngsters from Just Say No clubs throughout our nation's Capital. As you might expect, these clubs require school officials, teachers, and especially parents to give a great deal of time. Nancy told me everyone she spoke to at the White House rally was absolutely convinced that it's truly vital.

One private sector initiative I find most moving is called Christmas in April. Founded by Bobby Trimble of Midland, Texas, Christmas in April organizes volunteers across the country to repair the homes of needy older and handicapped Americans. Right here in Washington, Christmas in April helped a woman named DeLois Ruffing. DeLois ran a home for the elderly that badly needed repairs. The ceiling was virtually falling down around her. With her permission, early one April day more than a dozen volunteers -- attorneys, journalists, housewives, even a judge -- arrived to do what was needed. Ten hours later, the plumbing and ceiling had been fixed, and the walls were gleaming. And today DeLois is a Christmas in April volunteer herself.

As these and so many other organizations prove, the generosity and character of the American people that de Tocqueville observed more than 150 years ago remain a powerful and life-giving force. So, let us reflect this Memorial Day weekend upon the unselfish millions who are improving the quality of life for all Americans in so many wonderful ways. And as always, let us remember those who gave the greatest gift of all, the gift of their lives, so that we today might live in a nation of freedom.

Critical care medicine is a newly defined term that describes a category of medical treatments for patients who are in life-threatening situations and require immediate care. Coronary, respiratory, neonatal, trauma, and intensive care units are elements of critical care medicine. Patients may need such critical care after auto or boat accidents, heart attack, stroke, industrial injuries, or as a result of premature birth.

Critical care units, where they are available, often serve as many as 15 percent of a hospital's in-patients. Approximately 4,300 critical care units have already been established in the United States.

Public awareness of the special medical needs of the critically ill is important if America is to maintain its preeminence in the development and spread of medical advances in the area of critical care. Patients such as trauma and burn victims, AIDS victims, and postoperative patients with complications need critical care units within hospitals, and America needs the progress in treatment strategies these units and the professionals who staff them accomplish. The Society of Critical Care Medicine and its members throughout the United States are dedicated to improving the care of critically ill patients through research and education.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 25th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Today is the day we put aside to remember fallen heroes and to pray that no heroes will ever have to die for us again. It's a day of thanks for the valor of others, a day to remember the splendor of America and those of her children who rest in this cemetery and others. It's a day to be with the family and remember.

I was thinking this morning that across the country children and their parents will be going to the town parade and the young ones will sit on the sidewalks and wave their flags as the band goes by. Later, maybe, they'll have a cookout or a day at the beach. And that's good, because today is a day to be with the family and to remember.

Arlington, this place of so many memories, is a fitting place for some remembering. So many wonderful men and women rest here, men and women who led colorful, vivid, and passionate lives. There are the greats of the military: Bull Halsey and the Admirals Leahy, father and son; Black Jack Pershing; and the GI's general, Omar Bradley. Great men all, military men. But there are others here known for other things.

Michael Smith is here, and Dick Scobee, both of the space shuttle Challenger. Their courage wasn't wild, but thoughtful, the mature and measured courage of career professionals who took prudent risks for great reward -- in their case, to advance the sum total of knowledge in the world. They're only the latest to rest here; they join other great explorers with names like Grissom and Chaffee.

All of these men were different, but they shared this in common: They loved America very much. There was nothing they wouldn't do for her. And they loved with the sureness of the young. It's hard not to think of the young in a place like this, for it's the young who do the fighting and dying when a peace fails and a war begins. Not far from here is the statue of the three servicemen -- the three fighting boys of Vietnam. It, too, has majesty and more. Perhaps you've seen it -- three rough boys walking together, looking ahead with a steady gaze. There's something wounded about them, a kind of resigned toughness. But there's an unexpected tenderness, too. At first you don't really notice, but then you see it. The three are touching each other, as if they're supporting each other, helping each other on.

I know that many veterans of Vietnam will gather today, some of them perhaps by the wall. And they're still helping each other on. They were quite a group, the boys of Vietnam -- boys who fought a terrible and vicious war without enough support from home, boys who were dodging bullets while we debated the efficacy of the battle. It was often our poor who fought in that war; it was the unpampered boys of the working class who picked up the rifles and went on the march. They learned not to rely on us; they learned to rely on each other. And they were special in another way: They chose to be faithful. They chose to reject the fashionable skepticism of their time. They chose to believe and answer the call of duty. They had the wild, wild courage of youth. They seized certainty from the heart of an ambivalent age; they stood for something.

And we owe them something, those boys. We owe them first a promise: That just as they did not forget their missing comrades, neither, ever, will we. And there are other promises. We must always remember that peace is a fragile thing that needs constant vigilance. We owe them a promise to look at the world with a steady gaze and, perhaps, a resigned toughness, knowing that we have adversaries in the world and challenges and the only way to meet them and maintain the peace is by staying strong.

That, of course, is the lesson of this century, a lesson learned in the Sudetenland, in Poland, in Hungary, in Czechoslovakia, in Cambodia. If we really care about peace, we must stay strong. If we really care about peace, we must, through our strength, demonstrate our unwillingness to accept an ending of the peace. We must be strong enough to create peace where it does not exist and strong enough to protect it where it does. That's the lesson of this century and, I think, of this day. And that's all I wanted to say. The rest of my contribution is to leave this great place to its peace, a peace it has earned.

The President today announced the support of the people of the United States for the success of the historic Special Session on Africa which opens today at the United Nations in New York. Secretary of State George Shultz will head the U.S. delegation. A year ago Americans were deeply moved by the famine and human suffering across the continent of Africa. We demonstrated the strength of our free enterprise system in meeting Africa's emergency needs through the great productivity of our farmers. Americans and other donors, in both the public and private sectors, can be proud of our role in saving African lives and inspiring hope for a better future.

It is fitting that Africans and the international community meet now to debate Africa's economic crisis, so that we can avoid future famines. Much has happened since last year. Africans have demonstrated that they can dramatically increase food production, and today large surpluses in coarse grains exist in numerous African countries. Yet hunger persists in areas where economic incentives and marketing networks are weak, where rains were again inadequate, and where civil strife prevails.

Overcoming hunger and poverty in Africa requires addressing the broader issues of economic growth and social justice. Just as Africans can produce food, they have the capacity to establish economic systems which meet the needs of all their people. The twin pillars of political and economic freedoms cannot be separated; together they foster social, economic, and political responsibilities which sustain individual growth and promote national development as well as democracy.

Many African countries have adopted economic policies which emphasize a market orientation and which will release the energies of their indigenous private sectors. These free market policies can promote broad-based, equitable development based on social justice, self-reliance, and the proven skills of the African people. When individuals are encouraged to be creative and productive, they contribute to a strong economic base which constitutes the foundation of economic growth, social justice, political stability, and true independence.

This special session is an historic occasion, when the world has come together to confirm a stronger partnership with Africa, based on shared ideals, a renewed sense of purpose and commitment, and hope for the future. Working as true partners, the African people and the international community, through both its public and private sectors, can lay the basis for a prosperous Africa in which the African people contribute fully to their own as well as their national well-being. It is the prayer of the American people that peace will come with prosperity, so that the great continent of Africa can realize its vast potential.

The summit meeting of the Central American Presidents indicates that Nicaragua and the four Central American democracies are still far apart on a number of issues. The five Presidents decided that their joint declaration would not refer to the date of June 6, because there was a general sense that the date for signature of a treaty is unrealistic. I point out the fact that the President of Costa Rica made strong statements critical of Nicaragua. And we understand he rejected the inclusion in the joint declaration of the reference to the attending heads of states as freely elected, because Daniel Ortega does not fit that description.

The Nicaraguans also posed objections to reducing their military forces. The Nicaraguans continue to block progress toward achieving a treaty by demanding that the verification provisions and other military provisions of the treaty be negotiated only after the signing. This, of course, is not acceptable to the Central American countries.

President Reagan. It's been my honor to welcome to Washington and to confer with President Azcona of Honduras. And we've had extremely useful discussions today. We both expressed our appreciation for the positive and solid relationship that our two countries enjoy. We reviewed recent developments in Central America, including the summit meeting this past weekend.

President Azcona and I are in full agreement on the necessity of working for greater economic growth in Central America and the importance of democratic institutions to the cause of peace in the region. I reaffirmed the commitment of the United States to cooperate closely with Honduras, both in helping to build its economy and in bolstering its democracy. I expressed to President Azcona my personal thanks and that of the American people for his government's responsible stand on regional issues.

Our two governments share a serious concern over the threat to peace, stability, and freedom posed by the Communist regime in Nicaragua. The Nicaraguan Communists, with extensive Soviet and Cuban support, persist in repressing their own population and in backing the subversion of their democratic neighbors. This endangers all of Latin America and ultimately the United States as well. In this regard, I underscored to the President our promise to stand by Honduras in defense of its national sovereignty and territorial integrity, as is in accordance with our reciprocal international rights and obligations. A joint communique will be issued today reiterating this mutual commitment. President Azcona and I agree that our countries and the other democracies in the region must act together to end the conflict that plagues Central America, but it's not just up to us.

Securing regional peace will require an end to Communist aggression as well as national reconciliation and democratization within Nicaragua. Honduras has been diligent and persistent in its pursuit of a comprehensive and verifiable solution within the framework of the Contadora negotiations, and, Mr. President, you have our support in these efforts. The United States continues to believe that a realistic and enforceable agreement, based on the full implementation of the Contadora Document of Objectives, is one way to bring peace to Central America.

And finally, it was a great personal pleasure to meet President Azcona. I look forward to continuing our work in the same spirit of friendship and respect that was so evident in our meeting today. So, Mr. President, we thank you for coming. Godspeed on your way home.

President Azcona. It has been a great pleasure to talk with President Reagan. I believe that these exchanges of views, held in a climate of great cordiality and frankness, are always beneficial, because they lead to greater understanding and a better relationship between our governments and peoples.

With President Reagan, we have reviewed the various aspects of the harmonious bilateral relations between our two countries. I am happy to say that in the economic field he was receptive to the points I made to him. So, I am certain that his great country will give broad support to the measures which my government is taking to reactivate the Honduran economy and reduce our present high unemployment levels, as a complement to Honduran short- and medium-term efforts, all without neglecting our security needs.

I have told President Reagan about the efforts we are making in Honduras to develop our country. In this context, I reiterated the fact that our government assigns the highest priority to foreign investment, while at the same time recognizing that at present we also require the participation of government and the cooperation of friendly countries, among which the United States is one of the closest. Because of the fact that we believe in the necessity of offering the foreign investor a climate of tranquillity, encouraging his participation in the effort being made by Hondurans to develop our country, and of offering him guarantees which ensure the protection of his legitimate rights, I have authorized the Foreign Minister to sign during this visit the treaty on the settlement of investment disputes between states and nationals of other states. This treaty will provide the foreign investor in Honduras with access to international legal mechanisms of recognized impartiality and competence, which together with those offered by Honduran law will guarantee to him the full enjoyment of his rights. In the political field, we reaffirmed our identity as a regime governed by rule of law and based on the effective exercise of democracy and on respect for human rights.

When we examined the situation in Central America, we noted with concern that conditions jeopardizing peace and security still exist. We agreed that major new efforts must be made to find a negotiated solution to the crisis, based on concrete actions for national reconciliation, on free and honest elections, on disarmament, and in general, on the creation of a climate in which freedom and security for all can guarantee the economic and social development of the peoples of Central America. To that end, it is necessary to conclude fully verifiable, juridical arrangements among the Central American States. President Reagan reiterated to me that, in accordance with the special security relationship which exists between our two countries, as long as grave threats to Honduras security and to the stability of our institutions persist, the Government of the United States will be prepared, in the case of armed aggression against Honduras, to render it any necessary assistance which the Honduran Government may request.

Finally, I would like to say how very gratified I am that in the course of this visit, the relations of friendship and cooperation which exist between Honduras and the United States have been strengthened within a framework of trust and mutual respect. Thank you very much.

The Presidents reaffirmed the joint communique issued in Washington, D.C., on May 21, 1985, with particular reference to the review of the security relationship. The two Presidents reiterated their governments' intention to continue to work closely together in the face of the serious threats to the peace and security of both countries through mutual assistance and the development of defensive capabilities. To this end, the Government of the United States will continue to cooperate, as necessary and appropriate, in the strengthening of Honduras' defenses and the modernization of its armed forces.

In view of the close cooperation in the two countries' political and security relationships and the very serious security threats that exist in Central America, the Governments of the United States and Honduras reaffirmed the rights and obligations in the three above-mentioned instruments, including Article 3 of the Inter-American Treaty of Reciprocal Assistance, Article 51 of the Charter of the United Nations, and Article 21 of the Charter of the Organization of American States.

In case of an armed attack against Honduras, the United States will take appropriate measures, consistent with the rights and obligations cited above, to consult with and to support the Government of Honduras in a timely and effective manner in its efforts to defend its sovereignty and territorial integrity against communist aggression.

The two Presidents, recognizing the importance of democratic political and economic development to ensure peace and the economic and social well-being of the region's people, reaffirmed their intention to enhance bilateral cooperation to achieve the economic prosperity and to strengthen the democratic social development of Honduras. In this regard, the Government of the United States reaffirms its intention to disperse during this year the full $61.25 million available from 1986 United States Economic Support Funds to assist the implementation of the economic stabilization program recently announced by the Government of Honduras.

The two Presidents also reaffirmed their conviction that Central America can achieve its full development only in a climate of peace and complete freedom. In this sense, they reiterated their firm support for the efforts undertaken by the four Central American democracies to conclude a comprehensive and verifiable agreement for peace and democracy in Central America through the Contadora process. In particular, they noted the need for a treaty in which all commitments are fulfilled simultaneously and which provides for the clearly verifiable implementation of national reconciliation, democratization, and the limitation of armaments and troops. Such an agreement would guarantee the exercise of democracy in the five nations of the region.

On the eve of the strategic arms reductions talks (START) in 1982, I decided that the United States would not undercut the expired SALT I Interim Offensive Agreement or the unratified SALT II agreement as long as the Soviet Union exercised equal restraint. I took this action, despite my concerns about the flaws inherent in those agreements, to foster an atmosphere of mutual restraint conducive to serious negotiations on arms reductions. I made clear that our policy required reciprocity and that it must not adversely affect our national security interests in the face of the continuing Soviet military buildup.

Last June I reviewed the status of U.S. interim restraint policy. I found that the United States had fully kept its part of the bargain. As I have documented in three detailed reports to the Congress, most recently in December 1985, the Soviet Union, regrettably, has not. I noted last June that the pattern of Soviet noncompliance with their existing arms control commitments increasingly affected our national security. This pattern also raised fundamental concerns about the integrity of the arms control process itself. A country simply cannot be serious about effective arms control unless it is equally serious about compliance. In spite of the regrettable Soviet record, I concluded last June that it remained in the interest of the United States and its allies to try, once more, to establish an interim framework of truly mutual restraint on strategic offensive arms as we pursued, with renewed vigor, our objective of deep reductions in existing U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals through the Geneva negotiations.

Therefore, I undertook to go the extra mile, dismantling a Poseidon submarine, U.S.S. Sam Rayburn, to give the Soviet Union adequate time to take the steps necessary to join us in establishing an interim framework of truly mutual restraint. However, I made it clear that, as subsequent U.S. deployment milestones were reached, I would assess the overall situation and determine future U.S. actions on a case-by-case basis in light of Soviet behavior in exercising restraint comparable to our own, correcting their noncompliance, reversing their unwarranted military buildup, and seriously pursuing equitable and verifiable arms reduction agreements. Later this month the eighth Trident submarine, U.S.S. Nevada, begins sea trials. In accordance with our announced policy, I have assessed our options with respect to that milestone. I have considered Soviet actions since my June 1985 decision and U.S. and allied security interests in light of both those actions and our programmatic options. The situation is not encouraging.

While we have seen some modest indications of improvement in one or two areas, there has been no real progress toward meeting U.S. concerns with respect to the general pattern of Soviet noncompliance with major arms control commitments, particularly in those areas of most obvious and direct Soviet noncompliance with the SALT and ABM agreements. The deployment of the SS - 25, a forbidden second new intercontinental ballistic missile (ICBM) type, continues apace. The Soviet Union continues to encrypt telemetry associated with its ballistic missile testing in a manner which impedes verification. The Krasnoyarsk radar remains a clear violation. We see no abatement of the Soviet strategic force buildup. Finally, since the November summit, we have yet to see the Soviets follow up constructively on the commitment made by General Secretary Gorbachev and myself to achieve early progress in the Geneva negotiations, in particular in areas where there is common ground, including the principle of 50-percent reductions in the strategic nuclear arms of both countries, appropriately applied, as well as an interim agreement on intermediate-range nuclear forces (INF).

Based on Soviet conduct since my June 1985 decision, I can only conclude that the Soviet Union has not, as yet, taken those actions that would indicate its readiness to join us in an interim framework of truly mutual restraint. At the same time, I have also considered the programmatic options available to the United States in terms of their overall net impact on U.S. and allied security. When I issued guidance on U.S. policy on June 10, 1985, the military plans and programs for fiscal year 1986 were about to be implemented. The amount of flexibility that any nation has in the near term for altering its planning is modest at best. Our military planning will take more time to move out from under the shadow of previous assumptions, especially in the budgetary conditions which we now face. These budgetary conditions make it essential that we make the very best possible use of our resources.

The United States had long planned to retire and dismantle two of the oldest Poseidon submarines when their reactor cores were exhausted. Had I been persuaded that refueling and retaining these two Poseidon submarines would have contributed significantly and cost-effectively to the national security, I would have directed that these two Poseidon submarines not be dismantled but be overhauled and retained. However, in view of present circumstances, including current military and economic realities, I have directed their retirement and dismantlement as planned. As part of the same decision last June, I also announced that we would take appropriate and proportionate responses when needed to protect our own security in the face of continuing Soviet noncompliance. It is my view that certain steps are now required by continued Soviet disregard of their obligations.

Needless to say, the most essential near-term response to Soviet noncompliance remains the implementation of our full strategic modernization program, to underwrite deterrence today, and the continued pursuit of the Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI) research program, to see if it is possible to provide a safer and more stable basis for our future security and that of our allies. The strategic modernization program, including the deployment of the second 50 Peacekeeper missiles, is the foundation for all future U.S. offensive force options. It provides a solid basis which can and will be adjusted over time to respond most efficiently to continued Soviet noncompliance. The SDI program represents our best hope for a future in which our security can rest on the increasing contribution of defensive systems that threaten no one.

It is absolutely essential that we maintain full support for these programs. To fail to do so would be the worst response to Soviet noncompliance. It would immediately and seriously undercut our negotiators in Geneva by removing the leverage that they must have to negotiate equitable reductions in both U.S. and Soviet forces. It would send precisely the wrong signal to the leadership of the Soviet Union about the seriousness of our resolve concerning their noncompliance. And it would significantly increase the risk to our security for years to come. Therefore, our highest priority must remain the full implementation of these programs.

Finally, I have also directed that the advanced cruise missile program be accelerated. This would not direct any increase in the total program procurement at this time, but rather would establish a more efficient program that both saves money and accelerates the availability of additional options for the future. This brings us to the question of the SALT agreements. SALT II was a fundamentally flawed and unratified treaty. Even if ratified, it would have expired on December 31, 1985. When presented to the U.S. Senate in 1979, it was considered by a broad range of critics, including the Senate Armed Services Committee, to be unequal and unverifiable in important provisions. It was, therefore, judged by many to be inimical to genuine arms control, to the security interests of the United States and its allies, and to global stability. The proposed treaty was clearly headed for defeat before my predecessor asked the Senate not to act on it.

In 1982 on the eve of the START negotiations, I undertook not to undercut existing arms control agreements to the extent that the Soviet Union demonstrated comparable restraint. Unfortunately the Soviet Union did not exercise comparable restraint, and uncorrected Soviet violations have seriously undermined the SALT structure. Last June I once again laid out our legitimate concerns but decided to go the extra mile, dismantling a Poseidon submarine, not to comply with or abide by a flawed and unratified treaty, but rather to give the Soviet Union one more chance and adequate time to take the steps necessary to join us in establishing an interim framework of truly mutual restraint. The Soviet Union has not used the past year for this purpose.

Given this situation, I have determined that in the future the United States must base decisions regarding its strategic force structure on the nature and magnitude of the threat posed by Soviet strategic forces and not on standards contained in the SALT structure, which has been undermined by Soviet noncompliance, and especially in a flawed SALT II treaty, which was never ratified, would have expired if it had been ratified, and has been violated by the Soviet Union.

Since the United States will retire and dismantle two Poseidon submarines this summer, we will remain technically in observance of the terms of the SALT II treaty until the United States equips its 131st B - 52 heavy bomber for cruise missile carriage near the end of this year. However, given the decision that I have been forced to make, I intend at that time to continue deployment of U.S. B - 52 heavy bombers with cruise missiles beyond the 131st aircraft as an appropriate response without dismantling additional U.S. systems as compensation under the terms of the SALT II treaty. Of course, since we will remain in technical compliance with the terms of the expired SALT II treaty for some months, I continue to hope that the Soviet Union will use this time to take the constructive steps necessary to alter the current situation. Should they do so, we will certainly take this into account.

The United States seeks to meet its strategic needs, given the Soviet buildup, by means that minimize incentives for continuing Soviet offensive force growth. In the longer term, this is one of the major motives in our pursuit of the Strategic Defense Initiative. As we modernize we will continue to retire older forces as our national security requirements permit. I do not anticipate any appreciable numerical growth in U.S. strategic offensive forces. Assuming no significant change in the threat we face as we implement the strategic modernization program, the United States will not deploy more strategic nuclear delivery vehicles than does the Soviet Union. Furthermore, the United States will not deploy more strategic ballistic missile warheads than does the Soviet Union.

In sum, we will continue to exercise the utmost restraint, while protecting strategic deterrence, in order to help foster the necessary atmosphere for significant reductions in the strategic arsenals of both sides. This is the urgent task which faces us. I call on the Soviet Union to seize the opportunity to join us now in establishing an interim framework of truly mutual restraint.

Finally, I want to emphasize that no policy of interim restraint is a substitute for an agreement on deep and equitable reductions in offensive nuclear arms, provided that we can be confident of Soviet compliance with it. Achieving such reductions has received, and continues to receive, my highest priority. I hope the Soviet Union will act to give substance to the agreement I reached with General Secretary Gorbachev in Geneva to achieve early progress, in particular in areas where there is common ground, including the principle of 50-percent reductions in the strategic nuclear arms of both countries, appropriately applied, as well as an interim INF agreement. If the Soviet Union carries out this agreement, we can move now to achieve greater stability and a safer world.

Since the President came into office, he has done everything that he could to try to persuade the Soviet Union to meet its obligations with respect to SALT and to agree to significant reductions in U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals. In 1982 he said the United States would continue not to undercut the flawed SALT agreements so long as the Soviets exercised equal restraint. Regrettably, the Soviets didn't. In June 1985 the President tried again. He once again stated his great concern that Soviet noncompliance was ever more deeply undermining the SALT structure. He called upon the Soviet Union to join us in building an interim framework of truly mutual restraint until a START agreement replaces the SALT structure.

Today the President announced that the United States cannot continue to support unilaterally a flawed SALT structure that Soviet noncompliance has so grievously undermined and that the Soviets appear unwilling to repair. Therefore, in the future, the United States will base decisions regarding its strategic forces on the nature and magnitude of the threat posed by the Soviet Union, rather than on standards contained in expired SALT agreements unilaterally observed by the United States.

The President has decided to retire two older Poseidon submarines as the eighth Trident submarine begins sea trials tomorrow. This means the U.S. will stay in technical observance of SALT for some months. This gives the Soviet Union still more time to correct their erosion of SALT. If they do, the President will take this into account. Our attempt to use the structure of SALT as the basis for interim restraint until a START agreement can be achieved has always been based on the assumption of Soviet reciprocity. It makes no sense for the United States to continue to hold up the SALT structure while the Soviet Union undermines the foundation of SALT by its continued, uncorrected noncompliance. Therefore, the President believes we must now look to the future, not to the past. The primary task we now face is to build a new structure, one based on significant, equitable, and verifiable reductions in the size of existing U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals. This is what we are proposing in the ongoing Geneva negotiations.

Until this is achieved, the United States will continue to exercise the utmost restraint. Assuming no significant change in the threat we face as we implement the strategic modernization program, the United States will not deploy more strategic nuclear delivery vehicles or strategic ballistic missile warheads than the Soviet Union. It is high time that the Soviets honor their obligations, match U.S. restraint, and get down to negotiating seriously in Geneva. If they do, we can move together now to build a safer and more secure world.

Dr. Johnson has been serving as Assistant Director for Space Science and Technology, Office of Science and Technology Policy in the Executive Office of the President. In 1956 he joined the Lockheed Palo Alto Research Laboratory of the Lockheed Missiles and Space Co., where for 27 years he conducted a broad range of research in low energy nuclear physics and in the space sciences. He was manager of the Space Sciences Laboratory for 10 years and senior science adviser to the director of research for 5 years. He was a visiting professor at the University of Bern in 1980.

The future of our Nation is in the hands of our children. The effects of the loving support, the nurturing, and the instruction we give them now will be felt and magnified a thousandfold in the generations to come.

Sadly, not all of our children live in a warm, loving family environment. In every part of America there are children who are abused, exploited, or abandoned, or who run away from an intolerable home situation to endure worse depravity on the streets of our cities. Unfortunately, this mistreatment may also be a legacy passed on to future generations.

I believe that the American people can accomplish miracles when they are aware of the gravity of a situation. Fortunately, evidence that this awareness is growing is available in community after community across the country, as well as in the increasing involvement of voluntary associations and the private sector in developing programs to protect our children. We are recognizing anew our responsibility as neighbors and friends to extend a helping hand to families and children in trouble. We are examining once again the root causes of the various stresses that families face today, and we are acquiring a stronger sense of society's task to shield families, and especially children, from influences that undermine their sense of harmony, security, and well-being. We have begun to see more clearly than ever the importance of values to happiness and stability in the home. These are the best preventives at our disposal.

Where problems in the family have exhausted its resources to cope, much can be done now in the way of treatment and counseling. Communities can contribute by working together to provide safe shelters for runaways and to find adoptive parents for children in need of a loving home.

The President today accepted the Secretary of Energy's report and recommendation to select three sites for the Nation's first radioactive waste repository. The sites recommended and approved are located at Yucca Mountain, NV; Deaf Smith County, TX; and Hanford, WA. These three sites were recommended from five as the Nation's first geologic repository for the permanent disposal of high-level radioactive waste and spent nuclear fuel. The Secretary's nominations were based on the environmental assessments required by the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982 and were supported by environmental assessments evaluating on a technical basis the five sites from which the three were recommended and selected. As prescribed by law, the Secretary of Energy will further study these three sites and a recommendation to the President will be made in 1994 as to which of the three should be the final site.

Today I want to address you on one of the most important challenges that faces our nation: keeping our trading system free and fair -- an open, vibrant, and expanding source of prosperity through the end of this century and beyond. I've noticed that dinner speakers or luncheon speakers often start off by saying, ``Before I begin, I'd like to say a few words,'' which I always thought was a pretty handy trick. [Laughter] Today I'd like to try that myself. So, before I begin talking about trade, I'd like to say a few words about your vote tomorrow on the Senate Finance Committee's tax reform bill. You can probably guess my feelings on the subject.

Now, you know, there's 57 feet of Internal Revenue Code lined up on the shelf with things like that in it. Well, as for fairness, by dropping millions of working poor off the tax rolls, giving families with children a long-overdue break, lowering the top rate down to its lowest level in half a century, we'll make it easier for every American to climb that ladder of opportunity and to keep the fruits of his or her achievement. You know, more than a century ago, a Scottish economist, John Ramsay McCulloch, spoke of the principle of the progressive tax. To paraphrase him: When we start taxing individuals on any other basis than proportional to their earnings or property, we are at sea without rudder or compass and there is no end to the mischief that can be done. Well, I think we can all say amen to that.

This bill represents a new consensus in America, a progrowth, pro-opportunity consensus. The politics of envy, which produced only bitterness and division, has been consigned to the trash heap of history -- economic history -- and the days of the malaise economy and the zero-sum society are over. We no longer believe that one man's gain is another man's loss. We have a new vision of America, one in which we are all pulling together rather than pulling apart, one where we're marching forward together as one, proud and united. A growing economy with ever-expanding horizons, an economy of boundless energy and infinite possibilities -- this is a vision that does not and cannot stop at our borders. Unfortunately, when it comes to the issue of trade, that old zero-sum thinking still persists. The same faction that brought us high taxes, that locked out opportunity, now wants to throw up barriers to lock out trade.

You know, it's said that if all the economists in the world were laid end to end they still wouldn't reach a conclusion. [Laughter] I can make cracks like that now, because my degree was in economics. But the one thing that practically every economist agrees on -- whether they're left, right, or center -- is that international trade is vital to a growing, high-employment economy, and trade barriers do nothing but destroy jobs and stunt economic growth. But you don't have to be an economist to know that. No one who has lived through or learned the lessons of this century doubts how dangerous it is to play a game of chicken with our trading partners. Because it won't be long until we're both driving over that cliff.

Having celebrated my 39th birthday 36 times now -- [laughter] -- I've been around to witness a sizable chunk of this century. I well remember the antitrade frenzy in the late twenties that produced the Smoot-Hawley tariffs, greasing the skids for our descent into the Great Depression and the most destructive war this world has ever seen. That's one episode of history I'm determined we will never repeat. I also remember that after the war the peoples of the free world pulled themselves from the ashes and swore it would never happen again. From their vision and determination came a great act of statesmanship. With the unimpressive title of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, or GATT for short, the global trading system was opened up and the free world entered an era of cooperation and prosperity unparalleled in human history. In that postwar prosperity, the United States became the world's greatest trading nation in history.

I don't have to tell you about the benefits of trade: that greater choice and lower prices for consumers, businesses, and manufacturers means greater productivity and improving living standards for all. Over half a trillion dollars in goods were traded across our borders last year. Exports account for one out of every four farm acres planted and one out of every six manufacturing jobs. But even more important, trade is a spur to innovation. Despite the faint hearts constantly putting down this country's ability to compete, we remain today the world's largest exporter and the most competitive nation on Earth.

The American economy is blazing a trail toward the future. Since 1980 we've seen commitments to venture capital increase fourfold, record numbers of new businesses incorporated, and a 42-percent increase in companies listed over-the-counter in the stock market. Our entrepreneurs and scientists are in the vanguard of technological innovation. From custom-made computer chips to genetically engineered vaccines to the latest developments in robotics, the label reads ``Made in America.'' And we heard some good news from the Labor Department this morning. The index of leading economic indicators rose 1\1/2\ percent in April, the largest increase since October 1983, while the previous 2 months were revised to show greater gains than earlier reported and productivity figures for the first quarter were revised upward, too -- all signaling good times ahead.

Now, that doesn't mean that in some sectors of our economy the pain isn't very real. In some cases the disruptions of a changing world economy have caused personal hardship for America's workers. And in those cases it's our commitment to help those workers move into healthy and growing industries, and we'll meet that commitment. But no one benefits by antitrade legislation that pits one worker's job against another, that divides American business and industry and sets them off against each other, fighting for a piece of a shrinking pie. America doesn't need to hide behind trade barriers. Given a level playing field, Americans can outproduce and outcompete anyone anywhere on Earth. That's why it is the policy of this administration to open markets abroad, not close them at home.

Now this doesn't absolve other nations from playing by the rules. Free trade means, by definition, fair trade. And where other nations aren't playing by the rules, this administration is more activist, more aggressive, than any other in blowing the whistle on unfair trade practices against American producers. In the past year alone we have gone after Korean abuse of intellectual property rights and we've increased access of American agricultural products to European and Taiwanese markets. And while we prefer to negotiate, we have taken and will take strong action when necessary against markets closed to American goods and services. And to prevent other countries from selling below cost and unfairly moving in on American markets, we have initiated 528 antidumping and countervailing duty cases.

Constant negotiations with Japan are opening markets previously shut to American exporters. Over the past year we've worked to open Japan to American exports of telecommunications equipment, medical equipment, pharmaceuticals, electronics, and forest products; and we're going after transportation equipment. We've been intensively negotiating with the Japanese on semiconductors, and I'm pleased to announce that we have the framework of an agreement which would open Japanese markets to U.S. computer chips and prevent Japanese companies from dumping their chips on American markets. While the precise details still have to be hammered out by Ambassador Yeutter, this framework should allow for significant new market access.

Just last week we began negotiations with Canada, our largest trading partner, on a new, comprehensive free trade agreement which would lower barriers to U.S. exports. From insurance in Korea to computers in Brazil to tobacco and products in Japan, this administration is making sure that American exporters get a fair shake abroad. Now, all these initiatives are important. But if our critics are seriously interested in creating a level playing field for American industry, they have to look with us at the underlying reasons for the imbalance in world trade. The first we have corrected: The dollar is now at a more competitive level with foreign currencies, and that means increasing American exports. The second important reason for the imbalance in trade is the basic imbalance in the world economy. Because we cut tax rates and regulations, controlled spending, and squashed inflation, our economy's been growing and prospering. But the world is not growing along with us. Burdened by tariffs, quotas, oversized governments, and marginal tax rates as high as 80 percent, economies in Europe, Africa, and Latin America have stagnated, even declined. With incomes falling and unemployment high, they can no longer afford to buy our products. And that's one major reason why between 1980 and 1984 imports into Western Europe dropped by 18 percent, Africa by 17 percent, and Latin America by 34 percent.

Now, despite this devastating decline in world trade, America has stayed competitive. The members of NAM deserve a lot of credit for the fact that in 1984 exports of U.S. manufactured goods increased by over 8 percent. And they went up again in 1985. Our share of world exports of manufactured goods has increased, too, from 17 percent in 1978 to 20 percent in 1985. America's manufacturing production has risen steadily and is just as big a part of our overall economy as it was 30 years ago. All those who talked about the so-called deindustrialization of the United States should take a look at the real figures. And then maybe they'd realize that America's best days aren't over; they're just beginning. When it comes to America's future, believe me, you ain't seen nothing yet.

The world doesn't need more tariffs and taxes and the unemployment they produce. It needs more progrowth policies that lower tax rates and interest rates, create jobs, and expand world trade. And once again, America is taking the lead. We're strengthening the world monetary system, the foundation of international trade. And as I mentioned before, the dollar is now at a more competitive level with foreign currencies. We're combating economic decline in the debt-ridden developing countries by promoting high-growth, low-tax, free-market reforms. We're encouraging Japan to reform the bias against consumption that is built into its system. And next September we expect to launch a new round of GATT negotiations with our trading partners aimed at opening up markets for everyone. The docket will be full, including current rules that aren't working properly -- for example, those in agriculture and the settlement of disputes -- as well as the trade issues of tomorrow, like services, intellectual property protection, investment, and high technology.

All of these are real solutions to the real problem of getting the world economy back on the growth track. And that's the track to a future of open vistas and unfolding opportunities, a future where we all grow together, where every nation's prosperity augments our own. Unfortunately the House of Representatives last week turned its back on the future and started marching right back to Smoot-Hawley. Its so-called omnibus trade bill is really an ominous antitrade bill that could send our economy into the steepest nosedive since the Great Depression. This reactionary legislation would force American consumers to pay billions in higher prices, throw millions of Americans out of work, and strangle our economy as foreign markets slam shut in retaliation.

This antitrade bill isn't protectionism; it's destructionism. We've created nearly 10 million new jobs since the recovery began 40-odd months ago. More jobs in the last decade than Europe and Japan combined. But this bill would start wiping them out. The Commerce Department has estimated that the jobs of 5\1/2\ million Americans -- workers -- are dependent on exports. That's 5\1/2\ million American jobs that would be threatened if this bill were passed into law. And who would be some of the first victims? Well, you don't have to look very far. They're right here at home: the aerospace machinist at Boeing's plant near Seattle who builds some of the world's finest passenger planes, the recording engineer at CBS Records, the wheat farmer in Nebraska, and the longshoreman in New Orleans loading grain on ships destined for foreign ports, to name just a few. No job is safe in a trade war. In this modern society all our fortunes are connected by a million links in a chain of interdependence. If these people lose their jobs, what of the automobile dealer who hoped to sell them a new car or the trucker who hauled the cars or the auto worker who made them or the steel worker who fashioned the raw material or the miner who provided coal to the steel factory? And what of the retailers, service people, doctors, and teachers whose livelihoods ultimately depend on their jobs?

Well, I don't share that pessimism, that defeatism; I never did. And neither does young America. There's got to be a pony in here someplace. [Laughter] And neither, by the way, do our trading partners who marvel at what Europeans call the American miracle -- 3\1/2\ years of expansion and job creation and advances in science and technology that have left the whole world gaping at the near-limitless capacities of the American people. I saw that firsthand at the economic summit in Tokyo. The leaders of the world's major industrialized democracies all wanted to know how they could inject some of that American spirit of enterprise into their economies.

Well, let me restate, then, the trade policy of this administration. We will root out and take action against unfair trading practices targeted at American products or American workers. We will be alert and aggressive in opening up foreign markets closed to American exporters. We will bring the world with us into a new era of free and fair trade. Free trade with free traders is our byword. But we will not seek false security behind restrictive quotas and import duties. Nations that hide behind tariff walls soon fall behind. America's destiny is not to be second or third or fourth in the march to the future. It's to be in the vanguard, leading the free nations into a brighter and better era.

To those countries whose economies are still enmeshed in statist policies, the American economy is a shining example that freedom not only works, it works wonders. If we further reform our tax structure, closing loopholes and bringing our top rate down to 27 percent, we'll be opening the floodgates of progress and creating a momentum toward economic freedom that will sweep up the world in its currents. We will see a global economy of opportunity emerge, one where markets are not only open but constantly expanding. America has done it before in more trying times. And with your help, we can do it again. We can keep the miracle alive, not only for America but for the world.

But seriously, it is a great honor to receive this award from all of you. But it seems to me we have this award-giving a little backward tonight. I can't think of a more distinguished gathering than this one, nor can I think of any group whose accomplishments and devotion to country makes them more worthy of accolades and praise. And yet it's precisely that praise and those accolades that you decided to forgo when you chose a twilight war, a secret profession, a profession where praise and thanks can only come from history and not from your contemporaries. And it's because secrecy has been your business that you all know how vital it is to your nation's safety and freedom's survival.

And that's why I'm delighted to be here tonight. None of America's intelligence agents have inspired and protected their nation more than the men and women of the OSS. I cannot attempt to recount tonight the individual deeds. Bill Donovan, for example, what a remarkable man he was -- a member of the ``Fighting 69th'' in the First World War, a winner of the Congressional Medal of Honor, a one-man intelligence service in the thirties and forties, an American legend. And then there was the dedication and heroism of so many other OSS officers, from guerrilla leaders like Jim Kellis, Joe Alsop, and Carl Eifler to the strategists and planners like Dick Helms, Ned Putzel, and Bill Casey. All of this has been spoken of now in the many volumes about the secret war you waged 40 years ago.

So, tonight I join you to honor the memory of Bill Donovan and all the veterans of OSS, those who heard no bugles and received no medals, but who struggled and sacrificed so that freedom might endure. Let me say to each of you tonight what the American people would have said 40 years ago had they known your story. Let me say to each of you tonight what every living American would say if he or she had the chance: We honor you. We salute you. We thank you for a job well done. And yet it's not enough just to thank or salute you for the past, because Bill Donovan's and the OSS's contributions have continued in the postwar era. For more than half of the CIA's existence, that agency's leadership has been in the hands of OSS veterans -- the names are Dulles, Helms, Colby, and Casey. And so, too, I know each of you has continued to work for the cause of freedom since the end of World War II and especially the preservation of America's intelligence capability. You know better than most how important that capability is.

I think all of us can feel grateful that in the last few years that capability has seen a renaissance; indeed, the revitalization of an intelligence community is among the things we celebrate here tonight. And, yes, it's true this administration has given unstinting support to that effort. And let me assure you, that will continue. And while there are many who have made a vital contribution to that effort, I think all of you know who the linchpin is. A few years ago in his book, ``Piercing the Reich,'' Joseph Persico described a young OSS officer. ``A man,'' he said, ``with boundless energy and competence. A man with an analytical mind, tenacious will, and a capacity to generate high morale among his staff. He delegated authority easily to trusted subordinates and set a simple standard -- results.'' In every job he's held in government ever since, as Under Secretary of State, Chairman of the SEC, and now as DCI, that OSS officer has, by the end of his tenure, left even his harshest critics singing his praises. His name is Bill Casey. He has been your leader, he's our leader and good friend and surely one of the heroes of America's fight for freedom in the postwar era.

So, tonight, Bill Casey, your President and the veterans of the OSS salute you. And in saluting Bill Casey, we salute all those past and present who carry on the twilight war against totalitarianism. In your citation you speak of this administration's commitment to a forward strategy for freedom. And sometimes the question has been asked: What do we mean by this? Is this a return to John Foster Dulles? Are we preaching rollbacks? So the evidence -- got ahead of myself there. I would say to you, the phrasing of the question itself is wrong, for it contains an assumption there that the march of communism is something unavoidable, that those who stand in its way are trying to throw back the forces of history.

Well, look around the world today. More than 90 percent of the people of Latin America are living in democratic nations or nations moving toward democracy -- a striking change from only a few years ago. Many Asian and European countries are rejecting statism, moving toward the free market and democratic institutions. And then there is the revolution among the intellectuals, where statist and totalitarian ideology is now passe. And we're seeing anti-Communist insurgencies in many parts of the world. So the evidence is there; freedom is on the march. Our forward strategy for freedom means simply that we recognize this: that freedom today is a gathering tide, one that will soon engulf even the driest desert patches of totalitarian rule.

The truth is this: ``The march of providence is so slow and our desire so impassioned,'' Robert E. Lee said once, ``the work of progress so immense and our means of aiding it so feeble, the life of humanity is so long, that of the individual so brief, that we often see only the ebb of the advancing wave and are thus discouraged. It is history that teaches us to hope.'' Well, as we look at secret events in the light of postwar history, we can see that hope everywhere we look and turn. And it's not just us alone. Think how those must feel who only a few years ago despised us for what they saw as our weakness and staked their fortune on our doom. I think in particular of one man who is a symbol of much that was wrong with our world. How uneasy must be the Moscow nights of Kim Philby as he sees the new will, vigor, and energy of the West, and especially the renaissance of our intelligence services. How he and others like him must realize that it was those they betrayed who are on the winning side after all.

We pray God that it will be so, that the struggle against totalitarianism will end in freedom's triumph, perhaps even in our own lifetime. But whether we see that day or not, we're confident that it will come. And when it does arrive, historians will look back to moments like this and to people like you, to the veterans of the OSS, and say as the ancients said of their heroes: Here were the brave, and here their place of honor.

I especially would like to congratulate Jon Pennington for being this year's National Spelling Bee champion and to Andy Larson and Rachel Henderson for being runners-up. I understand the winning word was odontalgia. Odontalgia?

And while we're offering our congratulations, let's not forget two young people who have had to overcome even greater odds in order to be here today, Terra Syslo and Monica Van Doren. Your achievement -- I'm talking about everyone here today -- sets a fine example for young people across our country. Spelling, like mathematics and reading, is a skill to be mastered, a skill that will open the door of the future.

Being successful, as all of you are aware, takes much more than luck and much more than raw talent. Thomas Edison once said that genius is 1 percent inspiration and 99 percent perspiration. When I was your age -- now, some of you may think that was back in the time of the dinosaurs, but it wasn't quite that long ago -- I remember struggling over my spelling. My mother would go through the drill of asking me to spell this word or that word. Our family wasn't well-to-do at all, and yet my mother knew that in America everything was possible, including the hope that one day a son of hers would get a hundred percent on a spelling test.

Seriously, though, I think that much of our country's progress can be traced back to parents who made certain their kids learned the fundamentals. For many of you, this may be your first visit to the Nation's Capital. Well, all the people you see working in government are doing their best to turn over to you, the next generation of Americans, an opportunity-filled land, a country where you can go as far as your hard work and your natural talents will carry you. And every time a group of bright young people like yourselves comes here, it makes everything seem worthwhile.

Legend tells us that early in the last century, a young man from Illinois taught himself how to write, scratching out words on a wooden shovel. He was poor, he couldn't afford paper and pen. He later went on to be a lawyer, a Congressman, and then President of the United States. He was a true champion of freedom. And his name, of course, was Abraham Lincoln. Had he not put forth that effort, studied there by the fireplace, our country would have been denied the leadership that he provided. I hope when you get back to your schools in various parts of the country you carry that message to all of us and that all of us are counting on America's young people.

America will reach its potential only if you and other young people are willing to strive to reach your potential. And after meeting you today, I happen to think there's every reason to have confidence in the future. So, congratulations again to all of you. Thank you for coming for this visit. God bless you all.

But looking out, I can see what a diverse group we make up -- from Boy Scouts to businessmen, from campers to child-care workers. This is an all-American event, because this problem affects all of America -- every man, woman, and child. Originally, of course, tort law protected innocent people against wrongful damage or injury. Rooted in the Middle Ages, tort law became especially important at the onset of the Industrial Revolution, when ordinary men and women began to find themselves presented with services and products they'd never before encountered. By providing consumers with a measure of protection, tort law enabled them to enter this new marketplace with a certain confidence and ease. Back in the days when toothpaste was a newfangled invention, for example, consumers could purchase it with a much greater sense of assurance when they knew that, because of tort law, the manufacturers had to take all reasonable steps to make certain that the product was both effective and safe.

Maybe some of you'll remember a passage in ``Huckleberry Finn'' that deals with this very subject. Huck met a swindler who told him that: ``I'd been selling an article to take the tartar off the teeth, and it does take it off, too, and generally the enamel along with it.'' [Laughter] Twain never mentions tort law, but it is there in the background, the force that kept this character in the book constantly on the run up and down the Mississippi. And in the real world it was, in large part, tort law that reduced such swindlers from an actual presence in our economic life to figures that we remember with laughter.

So, over the years, tort law has helped us drive the malevolent and the negligent out of the marketplace. This, in turn, has permitted legitimate economic innovation to take its course and raise living standards throughout the Nation. More recently, however, tort law began to go terribly wrong. Twisted and abused, tort law has become a pretext for outrageous legal outcomes -- outcomes that impede our economic life, not promote it. Listen to just a few cases, and I hope I won't be repeating some that maybe have already been told to you.

In California, a man was using a public telephone booth to place a call. An alleged drunk driver careened down the street, lost control of her car, and crashed into the phone booth. Now, it's no surprise that the injured man sued. But you might be startled to hear whom he sued: the telephone company and associated firms. That's right, according to Chief Justice Rose Bird of the California Supreme Court, a jury could find that the companies responsible for the design, location, installation, and maintenance of the telephone booth were liable. In another case, suit was brought by a man who suffered a heart attack while having some trouble starting a lawnmower. He claimed that pulling the starter rope was the cause of the attack. His award? More than a million dollars.

I suppose all this might be amusing if such absurd results only took place occasionally. Yet today they have become all but commonplace. In the past two decades the number of awards involving a million dollars or more has climbed from just 1 a year to more than 400 a year. Between 1975 and 1985, the average award in a product liability case more than quadrupled, to some $1.8 million. During the same period, the average medical malpractice verdict -- I said average -- went up more than 350 percent, to over a million dollars. This expansion of tort liability penalizes virtually every American -- manufacturers, doctors, small businessmen, government at all levels, nonprofit organizations, entrepreneurs, and perhaps most severely, the consumer. Again, listen to a few more cases.

On one of the Hawaiian islands, all the doctors on that island who had once delivered babies have stopped doing so because their malpractice premiums were outstripping their fees; pregnant women must now travel elsewhere, to another island, for their needs. In 1984 Connaught Laboratories discontinued distribution of an important vaccine for children because it could not obtain liability insurance. It later succeeded in doing so, but only at a very high cost. As a result, in just 3 years the cost of this vaccine rose from 11 cents per dose to $4.50. Hundreds of American cities and towns find themselves unable to afford basic liability coverage. The city of Blue Lake, California, has been forced to shut its skating rink, tennis court, and parks. And at New York's famous Coney Island Amusement Park, they've had to close the roller coaster.

Even everyday items contain hidden costs that arise from the expansion of tort liability. It's been estimated, for example, that 20 percent of the cost of an ordinary stepladder goes to pay for liability insurance, lawyers, and related costs. And because the Boy Scouts of America have been forced to increase their insurance coverage, it's feared that every Boy Scout and Cub Scout troop may have to be assessed some $20 -- not an insignificant sum in the underprivileged neighborhoods that perhaps need the Boy Scouts most. These problems have begun to eat away at the fabric of American life. My friends, I think you will agree: There's still such a thing as common sense, and this ain't it! The time has come for action.

Earlier this year I endorsed the report of my Domestic Policy Council's Tort Policy Working Group. This report contains a number of recommendations, recommendations that include fixed-dollar limitations for certain kinds of awards and the establishment of assurances that liability judgments go to those actually wronged or injured and not to the lining of their attorney's pockets. Now, one of the report's most important recommendations urged our administration to submit reform legislation to the Congress.

This legislation, carefully drafted, has now been introduced in the Congress by Senator Robert Kasten and Congressman Hamilton Fish. It restores the fault standard, which requires that actual fault or wrongdoing must be established in most cases before liability can be assessed. It limits pain-and-suffering and punitive damage awards, awards the amount contingency-fee lawyers could earn, and restricts the joint and several liability doctrine that can force a single defendant to pay all damages even if he is only partly to blame. To be sure, much tort law would remain to be reformed by the 50 States, not the Federal Government. And in our Federal system of government this is only right. Many of the Tort Policy Working Group recommendations, for example, would have to be implemented at the State level to be fully effective. This administration's bill represents a much-needed overhaul of Federal laws governing interstate commerce -- one of the fields of authority the Federal Government is specifically granted by the Constitution -- and sets an example of common sense for the rest of the Nation to follow.

Many here have been following this issue closely. Indeed, there are stalwarts in this hall who have been out front since the beginning, and I'm grateful for your support. Now I ask you to join me in urging the Congress to pass this bill and to do so with dispatch. I said at the outset that tort law is a practical matter that affects us all, but in making the case for reform I find that I may have had to be a little more technical than I intended.

Maybe with the Boy Scouts' help I can bring it all back down to Earth. Boy Scouts know a code by heart, a list of characteristics that they promise they will try to live up to; and the first word on that list is ``trustworthy.'' A scout is trustworthy. That's really what tort reform comes down to -- asking our fellow citizens to be trustworthy. It means writing laws that tell all those who provide us with goods and services that we expect them to pay attention to their work and to do a good job. But it also means eliminating legal constraints that place upon these same people undue burdens. Trustworthiness, my friends -- let us make this our ideal, and let's see to it that our laws reflect that ideal for the good of all.

Drug-related corruption is a serious problem in Mexico, as it is in every drug producing, transiting, and consuming nation. The Government of Mexico shares our concern about the corruption and also shares our belief that the problem is best countered by coordinated efforts to eliminate the evils associated with the drug trade.

The Mexican and U.S. Governments have been engaged for many years in joint efforts to reduce drug production in Mexico. We have had considerable success in the past. However, we have been concerned about recent increases in drug production and transhipment. Accordingly, we are increasing our efforts to improve U.S.-Mexican cooperation to meet the challenges posed by powerful and wealthy international drug traffickers. The Mexican drug eradication program has become more effective, and there is a closer coordination between U.S. and Mexican authorities in investigating major traffickers and their organizations.

The Mexican Government is committed to overcoming the obstacles and achieving success in its antinarcotics programs. It has affirmed its commitment to investigate and prosecute any persons involved in drug trafficking or corruption, regardless of their position in the government or society. And we are resolved to continue working closely in a responsible manner with President De la Madrid and his administration to combat drug trafficking in Mexico. The meetings between Attorney General Meese and Mexican Attorney General Garcia have been particularly useful in strengthening our joint antinarcotics efforts. These meetings have been frank and productive. We intend to continue our joint efforts to eliminate the scourge of international drug trafficking.

America's neighborhoods are made up of families representing a great variety of ethnic, social, and economic backgrounds. From this rich mix of cultures and experiences, a strong sense of cooperation and commitment has emerged that enhances our sense of the Nation as a larger family of people caring for one another. As we complete our preparations for the national celebration of the centennial of the Statue of Liberty this July 4, we are made even more aware of the special blessings, the strengths, and the virtues that flow from our long heritage of welcoming and drawing on the experiences of people from diverse backgrounds to make our free society ever more dynamic, cohesive, and productive.

When any neighborhood suffers from decline due to loss of business or other factors, all of its residents feel the pinch, but the elderly and the poor suffer most. Homes decline in value, economic growth stops, businesses relocate, and residents face real hardships. The Nation as a whole suffers, since thriving neighborhoods are the living cells of our national life. That is why it is so important to arrest the deterioration and revive the strength and vigor of America's neighborhoods.

Traditionally, Americans have recognized such problems and have worked together to develop practical solutions at the grass-roots level. Neighborhood Housing Services programs, which are partnerships made up of local residents, business leaders, and government officials, reflect this spirit and give scope to the ingenuity of the American people. Throughout the United States, Neighborhood Housing Services programs are working to revitalize more than 200 neighborhoods. Already, they have generated more than three billion dollars in reinvestment funds. Rather than looking to the Federal government for assistance, these programs have relied primarily on local and private resources and the help of hundreds of volunteers. These volunteers have contributed countless hours of work to help rebuild and revitalize neighborhoods.

The efforts and accomplishments of Neighborhood Housing Services programs have earned the respect and gratitude of all who recognize that local initiatives and self-reliance will always be the major factor in solving local problems. It is fitting and appropriate that their efforts be recognized by all Americans.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirtieth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Theatre lets us stand apart from the flow of life: to feel pity and understanding and empathy; to smile at human foibles and to weep at human tragedies. Theatre is an art form for all seasons and all moods. It can refresh our spirits with comic hijinks, dazzle us with the splendor of pageantry, and impart rich insights into human relationships. It can convulse us into gales of laughter, wring our hearts with pathos, and dramatize eternal moral truths. In the works of such giants as Shakespeare, Goethe, Moliere, and O'Neill it can do all these things.

In one respect theatre is an art of the present moment -- once performed it is gone, save in the memory of the audience. Yet new productions and performances give it a kind of ever-renewed immortality. It can put us in touch with the culture, conditions, and viewpoints of many civilizations. Indeed, theatre is at once a reminder and an affirmation of the continuity of civilization and the fundamental unity of all mankind.

That continuity is manifested not only in performances of plays of the past, but also in the attempts of modern artists to give voice to the conditions and experiences of our own time. These efforts, in turn, will enrich the legacy we will leave to future generations.

Today, theatre exists not only in the traditional cultural centers of our country but all across the land. Theatre at all levels -- professional, community, and school -- has sprung up in every region of our country. There is no greater testimony to mankind's need for theatre than this. Today we are experiencing a renaissance of the living theatre, with great gains in artistic excellence, in aesthetic variety and diversity of cultural voices -- and in growing and loyal audiences throughout America.

History is likely to record that 1986 was the year when the world, at long last, came to grips with the plague of terrorism. For too long, the world was paralyzed by the argument that terrorism could not be stopped until the grievances of terrorists were addressed. The complicated and heartrending issues that perplex mankind are no excuse for violent, inhumane attacks, nor do they excuse not taking aggressive action against those who deliberately slaughter innocent people.

In our world there are innumerable groups and organizations with grievances, some justified, some not. Only a tiny fraction has been ruthless enough to try to achieve their ends through vicious and cowardly acts of violence upon unarmed victims. Perversely, it is often the terrorists themselves who prevent peacefully negotiated solutions. So, perhaps the first step in solving some of these fundamental challenges in getting to the root cause of conflict is to declare that terrorism is not an acceptable alternative and will not be tolerated.

Effective antiterrorist action has also been thwarted by the claim that -- as the quip goes -- ``One man's terrorist is another man's freedom fighter.'' That's a catchy phrase, but also misleading. Freedom fighters do not need to terrorize a population into submission. Freedom fighters target the military forces and the organized instruments of repression keeping dictatorial regimes in power. Freedom fighters struggle to liberate their citizens from oppression and to establish a form of government that reflects the will of the people. Now, this is not to say that those who are fighting for freedom are perfect or that we should ignore problems arising from passion and conflict. Nevertheless, one has to be blind, ignorant, or simply unwilling to see the truth if he or she is unable to distinguish between those I just described and terrorists. Terrorists intentionally kill or maim unarmed civilians, often women and children, often third parties who are not in any way part of a dictatorial regime. Terrorists are always the enemies of democracy. Luckily, the world is shaking free from its lethargy and moving forward to stop the bloodshed.

Nearly a month ago in Tokyo, the leaders of the major Western democracies hammered out an agreement on tough measures to eradicate this evil. Ironically the progress made in Tokyo is now imperiled by a lack of consistent support at home. For nearly a year now a handful of United States Senators have held up approval of a supplementary extradition treaty between the United States and the United Kingdom. This agreement, when ratified, would prevent terrorists who have kidnaped, killed, or maimed people in Britain from finding refuge in our country. Today these killers are able to do just that by labeling their vile acts as political. Well, in Tokyo the democracies declared there is no political or any other justification for terrorist acts and those who commit them should be brought to justice. The world is watching. If actions by a few Senators allow terrorists to find safe haven in the United States, then there will be irreparable damage. Refusal to approve the supplementary treaty would undermine our ability to pressure other countries to extradite terrorists who have murdered our citizens. And rejection of this treaty would be an affront to British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher, one European leader who, at great political risk, stood shoulder to shoulder with us during our operations against Qadhafi's terrorism.

Some members of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee have gone so far as to prepare a substitute treaty permitting those who have murdered British policemen and soldiers, for so-called political reasons, to avoid extradition. Well, this substitute is not a compromise; it's retreat. Its passage would be a victory for terrorism and a defeat for all we've been trying to do to stop this evil. One concern about the treaty is that it may set a precedent for other treaties, which will then be used against those who simply oppose totalitarian regimes. We can never permit that to happen. Our country will always remain the beacon of hope and freedom to all oppressed peoples.

I therefore urge the Senate to promptly approve the revised treaty and reinforce the momentum building against terrorism. With good sense, courage, and international cooperation, our struggle against terrorism will be won. And the United States will lead the way into a freer and more peaceful tomorrow.

The President. I have been pleased to welcome Prime Minister Nakasone to Washington. He is a friend, a wise colleague, and the leader of America's most important partner and ally in the Pacific. Prime Minister Nakasone and I have worked together now for more than 4 years, and I've greatly valued his advice and cooperation. Our talks covered a wide range of issues. We reaffirmed our shared commitment to peace and democracy throughout East Asia and the Pacific. And Prime Minister Nakasone was briefed on the current status of arms talks with the Soviet Union, and we agreed on the vital importance of Western solidarity in this endeavor.

He and I also discussed in detail the upcoming Venice summit. We agreed that agriculture will be an important topic, along with macroeconomic matters, and debt. Many governments, including our own, have constructed impediments to agricultural trade and have market-distorting subsidies in place. We've agreed these costly and harmful policies should be removed. I emphasized this to Prime Minister Nakasone and told him that early improvements in access for U.S. agricultural products to Japan's markets are vital, economically and politically. The Prime Minister and I affirmed that all of the policies of our respective nations affecting trade and agriculture are subject for discussion in the new round of trade negotiations along with the agricultural policies of other countries.

Trade between our two countries was, as expected, an area of heavy discussion. Both Japan and the United States recognize that the current trade imbalance is politically unsustainable and required urgent attention. The Prime Minister described to me measures his government intends to take, and I am supportive of those positive actions and optimistic that we will soon see the situation begin to improve. In this regard, we reaffirmed our commitment to cooperate closely on economic policy as described in our joint statement. Of course, the United States, too, must do its part, and I made clear that we are committed to cutting the budget deficit and are strengthening the competitiveness of U.S. industry. Consistent with the approach Prime Minister Nakasone and I have agreed to, protectionism will be strenuously opposed on both sides of the Pacific.

The Prime Minister and I also discussed our two countries' shared commitment to assist the world's debtor nations. I welcome the Japanese Government's plans to make available to developing countries on an untied basis more than $20 billion in new funds over the next 3 years.

On the semiconductor issue, we have agreed to review the data in mid-May. It's my hope that, with the Venice summit coming up, our ongoing review of the semiconductor agreement will demonstrate a persuasive pattern of compliance, thereby allowing removal of the sanctions as soon as possible.

America's relationship with Japan is both close and broadly based. We share a host of common interests in the world. Prime Minister Nakasone and I agreed that the leaders of our two great countries should hold regular annual meetings. The widespread economic and social contacts between our peoples will, of course, continue, and we will remain each other's close friends and trading partners. Of that there is no doubt. I look forward to seeing Prime Minister Nakasone again in a few weeks in Venice and now wish him and his wife Godspeed on their journey home.

The Prime Minister. I would like to thank you, Mr. President, for your warm hospitality, and I'm very pleased that we have had 2 days of very fruitful meetings. The President and I placed most of our emphasis on the future of the world economy, recognizing that our respective huge current account imbalances could bring about serious consequences for the health of the world economy. It is necessary to rectify this situation fundamentally and as soon as possible. We affirmed our shared political determination that our two countries will take vigorous and consistent policy measures. In this connection, we are determined to cooperate closely on microeconomic policy and exchange rates, as described in our joint statement. I emphasized to the President that between our two countries problems should be solved by cooperation and joint endeavors and that the measures of the United States concerning semiconductors should be withdrawn promptly.

The President and I noted with satisfaction the progress seen on other specific issues. The two governments will continue to work to resolve remaining issues. I explained to the President that our government is taking the lead in the effort to expand the import through extraordinary and special budget measures of substantial magnitude. I also told him that our government intends to complete our 7-year target for doubling our ODA [foreign assistance] 2 years in advance; to recycle more than $20 billion, new funds, in totally untied form over 3 years, mainly to the developing countries suffering from debt problems, totaling more than $30 billion if added from the previous pledge; and to extend positive assistance to sub-Saharan and the other less developing countries. The President expressed his high appreciation for our decision.

The President and I agreed to actively promote the GATT Uruguay round. We noted that all of our nations' policies affecting trade in agriculture are a subject for discussion in the Uruguay round, along with the agriculture policies of other nations. The President explained that he's endeavoring to reduce the budget deficit and to promote measures to improve competitiveness. I stated my strong wish for the success of these policy measures. Moreover, I was encouraged by the President's statement of his determination to stand firm against protectionism.

We noted with satisfaction that the security relations between our two countries are excellent and agreed that Japan and the U.S. will continue our efforts for further strengthening the credibility of the Japan-U.S. security arrangements. I reiterated my firm belief that the global and total elimination of long-range INF is the best solution for the security of the West and that this remain the ultimate goal. Should an interim agreement be arrived at, the President concurred with my statement: Japan, in close communication with the United States, will expand its effort for the political and economic stability of the regions of the Middle East, Africa, the South Pacific, and Latin America as well as Asia. In particular, we reaffirmed our further support for the Philippines.

We also agreed, given the present severe international economic situation, on the need for stronger political leadership in promoting policy coordination among the nations at the upcoming Venice summit. We should also further consolidate the solidarity of the West in political field in light of the present state of East-West relations and of arms control negotiations. Taking into account the results of our meetings, including our mutual agreement to hold regular, annual Japan-U.S. summit meetings, I renew my determination to do my utmost to further consolidate U.S.-Japan relations for the peace and prosperity of the world.

President Reagan and Prime Minister Nakasone reaffirmed their commitment made at the 1986 Tokyo Summit to strengthen international economic policy coordination. They welcomed the progress that has been made toward this end, including the commitments and actions embodied in the Louvre Accord, and in the recent statement of the G - 7 in Washington. They agreed that reducing the large trade imbalances of the U.S. and Japan -- which they view as politically unsustainable -- is a key objective of their policy efforts.

In this regard, the President emphasized his determination to reduce the U.S. budget deficit. He also pledged to pursue vigorously policies designed to improve the competitiveness of American industry, and to resist firmly protectionist pressures. Prime Minister Nakasone outlined his plan to take vigorous action to stimulate domestic growth in Japan. This action includes the step just taken by the Bank of Japan to begin operations to lower short-term interest rates. The Ministry of Finance supports this action. Other short and medium-term policy actions to stimulate growth will include: support for the governing Liberal Democratic Party's proposals for near-term enactment of a comprehensive economic package, including unprecedented front-loading of public works expenditures and fiscal stimulus measures amounting to more than 5 trillion yen; further measures to liberalize Japanese financial markets; and redoubled efforts to implement the recommendations for structural reform in the Maekawa Report.

The President and Prime Minister agreed that outstanding trade issues between the two countries need to be resolved expeditiously. In this connection, they referred to the specific discussion of trade policy matters in their respective departure statements.

The President and Prime Minister agreed that a further decline of the dollar could be counterproductive to their mutual efforts for stronger growth in their economies and for reduced imbalances. In that connection, they reaffirmed the commitment of their governments to continue to cooperate closely to foster stability of exchange rates.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Michael A. McManus, Jr., to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Communications Satellite Corporation until the date of the annual meeting of the Corporation in 1990. This is a reappointment.

I should confess one little secret of mine. Ever since coming to Washington, I've had mixed feelings about these annual ALEC get-togethers. Each year I look out at all of you outstanding legislators, and I can't help thinking: Why can't the Congress look like this? [Laughter] But even so, you ALEC members have been allies these last 6 years. You helped us as we fought to bring down tax rates twice, to cut needless regulations, and to get control of government spending.

When others were saying that our tax cuts meant more inflation and less growth, you helped us counter with the truth: that the American people know better than the Federal Government how to spend their own money. When the big spenders were saying that government costs couldn't be controlled, all across the Nation, you showed that they could, by controlling State government costs. By your example and voice, you've helped change America's course and start the great American journey of hope, climbing once again up the mountains and to the stars.

Of course, our critics won't hear any of this. They've talked about a declining middle class and about what they call reindust -- or deindustrialization. That means that American manufacturing is in decline, too. Well, our critics have spent 6 years getting things wrong. During our recovery, American manufacturing productivity has shot ahead at the fastest pace in 20 years and, overall, our manufacturing productivity is way above that of our next closest international competitor. Not only that, but in the last 4 years, American manufacturing output has soared almost 30 percent, and we've added more jobs in manufacturing than either Europe or Japan.

You've been in the lead in helping the poor as well. Enterprise zones are one example. Again, while Congress fiddled, you went to work. In the last 6 years, despite congressional inaction, 31 State legislatures passed enterprise zone programs into law. From New Jersey to California, 25 States have actually designated the zones. Today, in hundreds of communities, enterprise zones are bringing investment, hope, and jobs for the poor by the thousands.

Now, we've sent our welfare reform package up to the Hill. As with enterprise zones, our guiding principle is to lessen dependency and increase opportunity. And this time, from the very start, you're out in front. Knowing what you don't know is the beginning of wisdom. The Federal Government does not know how to get people off of welfare and into productive lives. We had a war on poverty -- poverty won. [Laughter] But when we went around the Nation looking, we found States and communities that do know how. So, we don't plan to serve up another program from Washington. We want to give States and communities the room to experiment, room to find out more about what works. Our welfare reform proposal asks a simple question: In looking for a solution to the poverty problem, isn't it time Washington got a dose of humility and turned to you for help?

You've been leading in education reform, as well. You've been ahead of the Federal Government in recognizing that the SAT scores didn't go down in the sixties and seventies because we failed to spend on education. Year after year, we spent more than ever before. Quality slipped because we got away from teaching mastery of the basics of readin', writin', and 'rithmetic. We got away from teaching the basics of our national heritage. And we got away from teaching simple standards of right and wrong. It's time to take standards seriously again. Young people expect adults to correct them and tell them what is right and what is wrong.

But that's not enough for Congress. There's a supplemental appropriation coming down the pike that has five more highway projects worse than those that made me use my veto pen before. The others were only partially Federally-funded; these are entirely Federally-funded. Isn't it time to give the President what 43 Governors have: the power to cut wasteful projects item by item, a line-item veto?

And we also need a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. Here again, you can be in the lead. Time and again, Congress has failed to pass a balanced budget amendment. When it comes to spending, three words they never want to hear are, ``Just say no.'' [Laughter] Well, State legislatures have it in their power to make Congress say no to deficit spending. Thirty-two States of the 34 necessary have called for a constitutional convention to enact a balanced budget amendment. Doesn't it make sense for State legislatures to give Congress a clear choice: Pass a balanced budget amendment on their own or have a constitutional convention pass one for them? That would be among the most eloquent statements of the principle of federalism in the last 200 years, and it's about time.

The constitutional foundations for federalism have been seriously eroded in recent decades. The fault is on both sides of the Federal-State line. Time and again, the National Government has intruded into the domain of the States. Too many State leaders have traded sovereignty for a few pieces of Federal silver. Our welfare reform proposal is one of the practical steps that we're taking to restore that balance. I know you agree; there's no more important battle to finish than that of restoring government to the people. And that's what federalism is all about.

In the last 6 years, working together both here in Washington and in the State capitals, we conservatives have changed America's course. We've opened up doors of opportunity and hope for all the American people. We've restored America's strength. But the job isn't done -- far from it. In the months ahead, we'll need your support on welfare reform, on restoring values to education, and on stopping legislation that would stop our expansion. I mean big spending and protectionist legislation. So, let's roll up our sleeves and get on with it.

For nearly 30 years, Americans have celebrated May 1 as Loyalty Day. This is a day to reaffirm our loyalty to our land of liberty and to recall with pride and gratitude the generations of our countrymen who preserved our freedom by their loyalty to America.

It's been a busy week here in Washington with the issue of international trade on the front burner. Legislation that would erect a new trade barrier was voted on by the House of Representatives, and here at the White House, I discussed trade issues at length with Prime Minister Nakasone of Japan, one of America's most important trading partners. These developments are important to all of us, because one of the gravest threats to economic expansion and American jobs is protectionist legislation that sets up trade barriers and higher tariffs.

By sparking retaliation from foreign governments, this approach ultimately ignites a trade war, shuts down foreign markets, and stymies economic growth at home. Unfortunately, the House of Representatives decided to go down that track, but there's a positive twist to the vote. You see, in an encouraging bipartisan showing, a good many Democrats joined with Republicans in opposition to an especially bad amendment. This week's vote in the House indicates we have a strong hand in keeping bad proposals like this from gaining final passage in Congress. Believe me, I would like to sign sound trade legislation, but I will not sign bills that close down markets and shut off expanded job opportunities.

Now, with regard to my discussions on the trade issue with Prime Minister Nakasone, the news was more positive. I've already stressed that we're against protectionism and in favor of free trade, but there's another side to this: Free trade is also fair trade, and that means not permitting other nations to take advantage of our trade policies by erecting barriers of their own. Now, I recently ordered increased duties on certain Japanese products coming into this country in response to Japan's inability to enforce our agreement on semiconductor trade.

This action and our entire trading relationship with Japan was one of the issues Prime Minister Nakasone and I discussed at length. We are of one mind about avoiding protectionist steps on either side of the Pacific. I made it clear that I hope our ongoing review of data related to the semiconductor agreement will provide evidence of compliance and allow us to remove the recently imposed restrictions on Japanese products as soon as possible. The Prime Minister reiterated his own government's commitment to honoring our trade agreements and working together for free trade in the Pacific and throughout the world. Prime Minister Nakasone also agreed to measures to stimulate the Japanese economy, which should increase demand for U.S. products in Japan.

Let me turn now to another issue on the docket this week, one that's related to trade: the budget and excessive spending. Our trade deficit reflects the fact that this nation is spending more than its income, and a key to solving this problem is to get deficit spending by the Federal Government under control. Two years ago we took a major step in this direction when the Congress agreed to a bill called Gramm-Rudman-Hollings that gradually reduces deficit spending and eventually leads to a balanced budget.

But unlike the trade issue, the developments this week on this front were not encouraging. The Senate, for example, adopted certain procedures that make it far easier to exceed the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings spending targets, targets they agreed to just 17 months ago. Maybe your reaction is the same as mine: Here we go again. Congress just keeps passing higher and higher spending bills, all the time ignoring its promises to the American people under Gramm-Rudman-Hollings: a promise to stop enacting a hodgepodge of excessive spending bills and come up instead with a comprehensive budget that keeps deficit spending under control.

As I've been saying right along, the problem is the congressional budget process itself. Congress just refuses to exercise any budget discipline. That's why it's essential that the President be given the power to step in and cut out the waste. I need what the Governors of 43 States use to -- used, I should say, to accomplish this: the line-item veto, a way of reaching into these massive congressional spending bills and cutting out the wasteful items. And, of course, Congress is also showing that we really need a Constitutional amendment that would mandate a balanced budget. If Congress can't discipline itself, then the American people must say no. Believe me, the events of this week show again how important both these initiatives are.

The President. Let me just say one thing because of the questions you have been asked and the answers I gave. With regard to whether private individuals were giving money to support the contras, yes, I was aware that there were people doing that. But there was nothing in the nature of a solicitation by the administration, to my knowledge, of anyone to do that.

The President. I had no detailed information. I did know -- and the people I met with, I met with to thank because they had raised money to put commercials on television urging the Congress to support the contras.

The President. No, as the program went on -- I listened to him very carefully -- he made it plain what he was actually saying: that no, I did not have knowledge of things of that kind. What he had said in the first place was that I was not off some place on an island not paying any attention.

Thank you, Dr. Graham, for being here, Mr. Chairman, Mayor Koch, ladies and gentlemen -- there she is. I was just looking for the other woman in my life. [Laughter] It's a great honor to be here with you on this the 100th anniversary of your convention. The truth is, it's always a great pleasure to be addressing something older than I am. [Laughter] I'm beginning to feel right at home here in New York Harbor. Last year, of course, we celebrated another centenary: that of the Statue of Liberty, the generous lady who for 100 years now has stood watch over this gateway to freedom. It couldn't be more appropriate that a year later we gather here on Ellis Island to celebrate with all of you, the ladies and gentlemen of the fourth estate, who also have stood watch over our freedoms and who have been the guardians of our liberty.

Well, of course, Presidents aren't always entirely objective themselves, like Harry Truman when he read the reviews of Margaret's recital. And then Bill Moyers likes to tell the story of one day at lunch with President Johnson. Bill was saying grace when Johnson bellowed, ``Speak up, Bill, I can't hear a darn thing.'' And Bill looked up and said, ``I wasn't addressing you, Mr. President.'' [Laughter] The fact is, if those of us in government and the press sometimes think of ourselves as antagonists, it's only in the context of transitory events, the rush of daily business that can obscure for us a deeper truth: that we're two complementary institutions, each drawing life and strength from the other, and that together we hold the sacred trust of democratic government and freedom. The life and hope of liberty in an all-too-often threatening world -- that is our solemn responsibility.

Mr. Jefferson also wrote that the truth of human liberty is ``self-evident,'' but he knew its success was anything but so. It was only the courage and the will of free men that gave freedom a chance, and once established, it was only their continuing dedication that kept freedom alive and allowed it to prosper. That dream of freedom has a special meaning to us today as we gather here on Ellis Island, beneath the gaze of Miss Liberty. It would be easy to come here and tell once more the story of those who have passed through these gates, to simply celebrate once again the freedoms Americans enjoy, but my job today is more difficult. It's not about those who came to this land, but it's about the dream that brought them here.

Today another people are in search of that dream, and theirs, too, is an inspiring story, one that must speak to the heart of all who came to this island and cherish the great lady of this harbor. I speak of the people of Central America. And let me begin in 1981. I wonder how many remember that when we first drew attention to the crisis in El Salvador we were met with an almost fatalistic acceptance of Communist victory in that country -- if not the whole region. Democracy, it was said, couldn't work in El Salvador. The people were too poor. They had no democratic tradition. They didn't want the chance for democracy that we offered; in fact, their sympathies lay with the Communist guerrillas, we were told.

But then one day the silent, suffering people of El Salvador were offered a chance to choose for themselves -- a national election. And despite the bullets, the bombs, and the death threats of the Communists, the people of El Salvador turned out in record numbers, standing in line for hours waiting to vote -- to vote for democracy. Congressional observers in that national election told me of a woman who was wounded by rifle fire on the way to the polls, because the guerrillas tried to keep the people from getting there. She refused to leave the line and have her wound treated until after she had voted, and the wait in the line was hours long. One grandmother, as she started to the polls, had been warned by the guerrillas that if she voted she would be killed when she returned from the polls. She told them, ``You can kill me, kill my family, kill my neighbors, but you can't kill us all.'' That was the voice of Central America, the testimony of a people determined to be free.

Much has been achieved since 1981. In a region in which military dictatorships have dominated society, democracy is taking root. A decade ago, only Costa Rica was a democracy. Today Costa Rica has been joined by elected civilian governments in El Salvador, Guatemala, and Honduras; only Nicaragua remains a dictatorship. But while the trend toward democracy is unmistakable, the threat to freedom and democracy in Central America remains powerful because of Sandinista totalitarianism in Nicaragua. The aspirations of millions for freedom still hang in the balance. The elected leaders of neighboring Central American countries understand this; they have personally told me this. They know the Nicaraguan regime threatens their own future and the stability of this hemisphere. They know that the establishment of a genuinely democratic system in Nicaragua -- with the full, guaranteed liberties of free assembly, free speech, and free press -- offers the only real hope for the long-term peace and security of the region. They know such a system provides a check and balance on any government, discourages militarism, and ensures the people's right to choose their own destiny.

And that's why the views of our Central American friends and the aspirations of the Nicaraguan people are one and the same: the establishment of full, popularly elected, legitimate democratic rule in Nicaragua. So, what we seek for Nicaragua is simple enough: self-determination for the Nicaraguan people, the right to select their own leaders in free, fair, contested, and regularly scheduled elections. The majority of Central Americans have made this choice. And I have come here today to say to you that the freedom fighters of Nicaragua are fighting for the same thing that the brave woman in El Salvador risked her life for: democracy, real democracy rooted in sound, stable, democratic institutions and ensuring the full range of political liberties and human rights. And I have come here to say that the United States Government pledges to the American people what the freedom fighters have pledged to their own people: that our objective in Nicaragua is clear -- free elections.

On the other hand, the Soviets and the Sandinistas have also made a choice, not for democracy, not for a free press, and not for free elections, but for control through force. In 1986 alone, overall Soviet-bloc assistance to the Sandinistas exceeded $1 billion. These Soviet shipments have made the small country of Nicaragua an aggressor nation with the largest military machine in Central America, threatening the security of the entire region. Make no mistake, the Soviets are challenging the United States to a test of wills over the future of this hemisphere. The future they offer is one of ever-growing Communist expansion and control. And this is the choice before Congress and our people, a basic choice, really, between democracy and communism in Nicaragua, between freedom and Soviet-backed tyranny.

For myself, I'm determined to meet this Soviet challenge and to ensure that the future of this hemisphere is chosen by its people and not imposed by Communist aggressors. Now, I could go on for hours about our negotiations with the Sandinistas: the Contadora process and the missions of my regional diplomatic negotiator, Philip Habib. But since those first negotiations back in 1979 in which the Sandinistas promised a democratic, pluralistic society, we've seen that these Marxists-Leninists never intended to honor those promises. We've seen them use negotiations time and again simply to delay, to manipulate world opinion. And that's why the choice remains the same: democracy or communism, elections or dictatorship, freedom or tyranny.

The debate in this country over Central American policy has been direct and tough and, yes, even heated at times. While such debate is healthy, we all know that a divided America cannot offer the leadership necessary to provide support and confidence to the emerging democracies in Central America. I do not think there's anyone in Congress who wants to see another base for Soviet subversion, another Cuba, established on American shores; and yet that is what is happening right now. It's now an issue on which all Americans must unite; it's simply too important to become a partisan firefight in the next election. If we cut off the freedom fighters, we will be giving the Soviets a free hand in Central America, handing them one of their greatest foreign policy victories since World War II. Without the pressure of the Central American democracies and the freedom fighters, the Soviets would soon solidify their base in Nicaragua, and the subversion in El Salvador would reignite. The Nicaraguans have already infiltrated operatives, even into Costa Rica, and they're simply waiting for the signal. Soon the Communists' prediction of a ``revolutionary fire'' -- it's their words -- sweeping across all of Central America could come true.

Let us not delude ourselves about the ultimate objective of the Soviets' billion-dollar war in Nicaragua. There is a line attributed to Nikolai Lenin: ``The road to America leads through Mexico.'' I do not intend to leave such a crisis for the next American President. For almost 40 years, America has maintained a bipartisan consensus on foreign policy. The Democratic Party -- the party of Franklin Roosevelt, Harry Truman, and John Kennedy -- has stood in firm support of democracy and our national security. This is no time for either party to turn its back on that tradition or on the cause of freedom, especially when the threat to both is so close to home.

The survival of democracy in our hemisphere requires a U.S. policy consistent with that bipartisan tradition. So, today I want to describe the framework of that policy, a policy that begins with support for the stable, long-lasting democracy in Costa Rica and the democracies taking root in El Salvador, Guatemala, and Honduras. Many in Congress have stressed the importance of maintaining sufficient levels of economic aid to assist those democracies. I couldn't agree more. That's why additional economic assistance must be approved for the four Central American democracies. Second, close cooperation with our democratic friends in Central America is also essential. And our policy is to continue now, as in the past, diplomatic efforts to achieve a lasting peace.

Earlier this year, President Arias of Costa Rica put forward a proposal aimed at achieving a peaceful settlement of the conflict in Nicaragua. At the center of his proposal is an insistence on democracy in Nicaragua. The United States welcomes this initiative and supports its general objective. At the same time, we have some concerns which need to be resolved, particularly on the sequence of implementation. It's essential that any cease-fire be negotiated with the full range of the opposition. It is our profound hope that a Central American consensus can be reached soon and that a process leading toward freedom in Nicaragua can go forward. Congress has expressed its support for the efforts of the Central American democracies to achieve a diplomatic settlement to the regional conflict. They've asked for an increased effort by the United States to examine ways for a peaceful conclusion to the civil strife in Nicaragua. This administration has always supported regional diplomatic initiatives aimed at peace and democracy, whether it be through Contadora, through face-to-face meetings with the ruling party in Nicaragua, or through current Central American initiatives. Let me say right now that I will lend my full support to any negotiations that can build democracy throughout Central America without further bloodshed.

So, while Congress gets no argument from me in seeking a peaceful, diplomatic solution in Nicaragua, you can see the key is democracy and that a majority in Congress clearly recognized this. That's why I strongly believe there is a solid basis upon which to build a common effort with Congress to resolve this conflict in Central America. I plan to make every effort to work toward these goals, and I hope Congress will join with me.

And that brings me to the third element in our policy: our commitment, our support for the freedom fighters, who have pledged their lives and honor to a free Nicaragua. This administration's support of the Nicaraguan freedom fighters in their struggle for peace and democratic government will not change unless the regime in Nicaragua accedes to the democratic aspirations of the Nicaraguan people. Every day the Nicaraguan people are becoming more outraged by the repression of their Communist rulers. The democratic Nicaraguan resistance, including the freedom fighters, today offers the only political alternative to the dictatorship of the past and the communism of today. That alternative is democracy, and it's winning increasing support from the people of Nicaragua.

For as long as I'm President, I have no intention of withdrawing our support of these efforts by the Nicaraguan people to gain their freedom and their right to choose their own national future. In the next few months, I'll be asking Congress to renew funding for the freedom fighters. Again, I stress the danger of the course argued by some in the Congress: that the most expeditious route to peace in Central America is abandoning our commitment to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. Delays and indecision here at home can only cause unnecessary suffering in Nicaragua, shake the confidence of the emerging democracies in the region, and endanger our own security.

Well, now the question before the American people and the United States Congress is: What do we do about it? Well, despite almost universal acknowledgment of the brutal, totalitarian, and subversive intentions of the Sandinista regime, the renewal of aid to the freedom fighters is still a debated question. But I think there's increasing recognition that the freedom fighters are the only ones who stand between the Sandinistas and their expansionistic aims, that they are the major obstacle to preventing all of Central America from being engulfed in the Communists' ``revolutionary fire,'' that the freedom fighters are the only ones who offer the hope of freedom to the people of Nicaragua and a chance for a stable and long-lasting peace in Latin America. They're worthy of our support.

So, that's why the upcoming vote in Congress on whether to continue providing support to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua may well be the most important vote our representatives cast in 1987, and possibly one of the most important cast in their careers in public office. It's an important question for the press and media, as well. I can't help but note that in the new democracy of El Salvador, Communist-supported guerrillas continue to try to bring down democratic rule. There's little or no media attention. Yet just across a border in Nicaragua, the freedom fighters battle against a totalitarian Communist regime and are assailed far and wide as lawless terrorists or worse. Forgive me, but the story needs perspective. And that perspective is provided by the aggressive nature of Sandinista communism.

Well, that's the choice we face: between the light of liberty or the darkness of repression. When, after terrible voyages of sickness and hardship, our ancestors first spied Liberty's torch, they knew that light shone for them -- ``those huddled masses yearning to breathe free.'' For those who've known only the bitterness of want and oppression, that torch burns especially bright.

Today the light of freedom is our sacred keepsake, the promise of America to all mankind. We must forever hold its flame high, a light unto the world, a beacon of hope that extends beyond this harbor, all the way to the jungled hills of Nicaragua, where young men are fighting and dying today for the same liberties we hold dear, all the way into the hearts of people everywhere who fight for freedom.

Since the early days of my administration, our number-one arms control objective has been the achievement of significant and verifiable reductions of offensive nuclear forces, particularly the most destabilizing weapons -- fast-flying ballistic missiles.

I have directed our U.S. START negotiator to intensify efforts to reach agreement on reducing strategic offensive nuclear arms by 50 percent. Toward that end, the United States will shortly table a draft START treaty text. This text will reflect the basic agreements on strategic arms reductions reached by General Secretary Gorbachev and myself in our meeting at Reykjavik last October. It will be responsive as well to Soviet concerns expressed subsequent to Reykjavik and will provide ample basis for the creation of a fair and durable START agreement.

Tomorrow marks the opening in Geneva of the eighth round in our negotiations with the Soviet Union on strategic arms reductions and strategic defense issues. With the negotiations on intermediate-range nuclear forces having resumed on April 23, all three negotiating groups of the nuclear and space talks will now be underway. We have made great progress in START. I am firmly convinced that a START agreement is within our grasp, even this year, if the Soviets are prepared to resolve the remaining outstanding issues. And most important among these issues is the need, for the purpose of ensuring strategic stability, to place sublimits on ballistic missile warheads.

To build mutual confidence by further enhancing predictability in the area of strategic defense and in response to stated Soviet concerns, we are also proposing that the United States and the Soviet Union annually exchange data on their planned strategic defense activities.

We also seek to have the United States and Soviet Union carry out reciprocal briefings on their respective strategic defense efforts and visits to associated research facilities, as we have proposed in our open laboratories initiative. In addition, we have proposed establishing mutually agreed procedures for reciprocal observation of strategic defense testing.

Since the April 23 opening of the INF negotiations in Geneva, there have been some new developments in these talks. Last week the Soviet Union presented a detailed draft INF treaty text which now joins our own draft text on the negotiating table. We are studying carefully the Soviet proposal and requesting the Soviets to clarify some important points in their text. The Soviet proposal appears to reflect the agreements General Secretary Gorbachev and I made at Reykjavik on longer range INF missile limits and to accept the principle of global equality between our two countries in regard to shorter range INF missile systems (SRINF).

Nevertheless, important issues remain to be resolved before an INF agreement can be concluded, including verification and shorter range INF missiles. Verification is a particularly crucial issue. While the Soviet draft indicates that they will seek agreement in some basic areas which we require for effective verification, they have yet to provide the all-important details which are essential to working out an effective verification regime. In addition, they have not met our requirements for inspection of sites suspected of violations of an INF agreement.

Another major issue is that of shorter range INF missile systems. We and our allies continue to insist that an agreement on these systems must be bilateral in nature, global in scope, concurrent with an initial INF treaty, and effectively verifiable. In addition, Soviet efforts to include the missiles of any country other than the United States and Soviet Union are patently unacceptable. We are continuing our close consultations with our allies in Europe and Asia on SRINF and other INF issues.

Our negotiators in Geneva -- led by Ambassadors Max Kampelman, Mike Glitman, and Ron Lehman -- have done an excellent job, and they continue to have very full agendas. We are well prepared for hard bargaining, and we are resolved to do our part to bring about -- for the first time in history -- actual reductions in nuclear weapons. It is up to the Soviets now to demonstrate similar determination to move ahead on these important issues.

Despite all the progress that has been made in Geneva, there are events occurring right here at home which could destroy the groundwork which we have laid so carefully in bringing the Soviets back to the negotiating table and getting them to negotiate seriously for the first time on deep reductions in our respective nuclear arsenals. An effort has been made by some Members of the House of Representatives to attach to the defense authorization bill amendments on arms control which would pull the rug out from under our negotiators and undermine our most vital defense programs, such as our Strategic Defense Initiative. And now it seems that some Senators want to move in the same direction.

Let there be no mistake about it: I will veto any bill which cuts back our ability to defend ourselves and leaves the Soviet Union free to continue its military buildup. The United States remains fully committed to achieving deep, equitable, verifiable, and stabilizing reductions in the U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 4th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Thank you very much. I bet you didn't know the Rose Garden looked like this. [Laughter] Well, today we commemorate the enormous contributions made to the United States by citizens of Asian and Pacific heritage. Coming from California, I've long been aware of the role played by Asian and Pacific peoples in the development of our country. Many came first as laborers -- as was true of so many immigrant groups -- but then, they took advantage of America's opportunity and excelled in all walks of American life.

Today our citizens of Asian and Pacific descent are admired for their hard work, their commitment to education, and their commercial and scientific genius. In the last century, people spoke of a Protestant work ethic. Well, today no one can miss the fact that there are other cultural-based work ethics, not the least of which is an Asian-Pacific work ethic. At this time, it's my pleasure to announce my intent to nominate as our new Equal Employment Opportunity Commissioner, Joy Cherian. You know him, of course, as the president of the Asian-American Voters Coalition.

Citizens of Asian and Pacific heritage have earned the respect of their fellow Americans and, in signing this proclamation, we underscore this respect and admiration. I received a letter a few weeks ago that gave me a new insight I'd like to share with you. This letter pointed out that someone can move to Greece, live there, and yet never become a Greek; move to Japan and never become a Japanese; France and never become French; and so forth through all the countries. Yet anyone from any corner of the world can move to America and become an American.

Our fellow Americans did, indeed, come here for freedom and to improve their lot. We rejoice in this and that's why we have ceremonies like this one today. Part of our heritage is this rich diversity that we find all around us. Of course, Americans of Asian and Pacific descent are a unique element in our society. But wasn't that true for every other ethnic group that emigrated to America? Henry David Thoreau, a great American writer-philosopher, once wrote: ``We go eastward to realize history and study the works of art and literature. We go westward as into the future, with a spirit of enterprise and adventure.'' Our citizens of Asian and Pacific descent truly bring East and West together.

I can't help but say -- I've said it many times to other groups -- call it mysticism if you will, but I have always believed there was some divine plan that put this continent here between the two great oceans to become a haven for all those who had that extra ounce of love for freedom in their hearts and courage to find their way here and build this great force for good in all the world.

Like all Americans, those of Asian and Pacific descent share twin heritages -- the rich cultural legacy of the lands of their forebears and the liberty that is the birthright of every American. Drawing on the values and traditions of their homelands and the promise of this land of opportunity, Asian and Pacific Americans have long helped build and strengthen our Nation. They have also gallantly defended our country and our freedom in time of war.

Through the years, many of the indelible contributions by Asian and Pacific Americans to our land have come from immigrants. These quiet heroes and heroines have known oppression and poverty in their native lands and have courageously struggled to reach the United States and make a new life for themselves and their children. Their story is America's story, and their spirit is America's spirit.

Every American can be profoundly grateful for the achievements of Asian and Pacific Americans. Their hard work, creativity, and intelligence have inspired their fellow citizens and added new dimensions to our national life.

Through the centuries, the American merchant marine has helped our country grow and safeguarded our security. During peacetime, the merchant marine has linked the United States in commerce with trading partners all over the world. In times of war or national emergency, merchant seamen have served with valor and distinction as the lifeline of our armed forces.

Today, the United States is the leader in world trade and the military bulwark of the Free World. The dual roles of the merchant marine in trade and defense remain crucial to our national interests, so the maritime policy of the United States must always keep it strong and competitive. Every American should give thanks for the merchant marine's legacy of service and sacrifices for our freedom and prosperity and for its continuing contributions to our way of life.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The commission will (1) review research done to date and identify future areas of research that would be needed, (2) assess the long-term impact on our health care systems, (3) recommend ways to protect Americans who do not have the disease, and (4) suggest comprehensive, practical responses by both the public and private sectors.

AIDS is clearly one of the most serious health problems facing the world community and our health care establishment is working overtime to find a cure. The commission will help us to ensure that we are using every possible public health measure to contain the spread of the virus.

No group of Americans has a more difficult or less publicly visible job than the brave men and women who work in our correctional facilities. Correctional officers who work in jails and prisons are currently responsible for the safety, containment, and control of more than 600,000 prisoners. Correctional officers must protect inmates from violence from fellow prisoners, while encouraging them to develop skills and attitudes that can help them become productive members of society after their release.

The general public should fully appreciate correctional officials' capable handling of the physical and emotional demands made upon them daily. Their profession requires careful and constant vigilance, and the threat of violence is always present. At the same time, these dedicated employees try to improve the living conditions of those who are being confined.

Since January 1985 Dr. Crippen has served as executive director of the Merrill Lynch advisory council. The council is chaired by former Secretary of State William P. Rogers and until recently included Senator Howard Baker. The council is composed of prominent members of the business and political community from around the world who provide advice and support to Merrill Lynch. He served Senator Baker in the Office of the Majority Leader during the years 1981 - 1984 as economic adviser and chief counsel. Previously, Dr. Crippen worked at NASA, the budget office of the State of South Dakota, the Brookings Institution, and conducted research on revenue sharing for the Department of the Treasury.

Yesterday representatives of the United States and the Soviet Union concluded 2 days of negotiations on the establishment of Nuclear Risk Reduction Centers. At these meetings the sides reached agreement on the establishment of such centers, which agreement will be referred for final approval to the leaders of both countries.

The delegations were headed by Assistant Secretary of Defense Richard Perle and Special Assistant to the President Robert Linhard for the United States side and Ambassador Alexsei Obukhov for the Soviet side. Agreement to explore the establishment of such centers was reached at the summit between the President and General Secretary Gorbachev in Geneva, November 1985. Senators Sam Nunn and John Warner played a particularly helpful role in the deliberations that led to the President's proposal.

The administration welcomes this agreement as a practical measure that will reduce the risk of conflict between the United States and the Soviet Union, particularly nuclear conflict that might result from accident, misinterpretation, or miscalculation. This agreement complements U.S. efforts in the nuclear and space talks to reach agreement on broad, deep, equitable, and effectively verifiable reductions in nuclear arms, as well as other U.S. efforts to achieve a more stable and secure international environment.

Thank you all. Members of the Congress, here, and members of the Cabinet and all of you, ladies and gentlemen: It's a pleasure to have you all join us here in the Rose Garden as we kick off the White House Conference on a Drug Free America. I think we see in this conference and in the efforts of Americans across this land a growing commitment to solving the problem of drug abuse in our society.

It's a little bit like a story I like to tell and maybe have told to some of you. Pretend I haven't, if you've heard it. [Laughter] But the fellow that took up golf -- and he lined one out there and went down and found his ball was sitting right in front of an ants' nest. Got out an iron, and he took a cut at it. Didn't hit the ball at all, but lifted the ant nest into the air -- the anthill and about a thousand ants. And he lined up again and took another crack at it, and all he hit was more sand and ant nest. And when he lined up for the third shot, there were two ants down there, and one of them said to the other, ``If we want to survive, we'd better get on the ball.'' [Laughter] It comes in handy in occasions like this -- this story.

But America is on the ball. We've come a long way from just a decade ago, when it was trendy to talk about recreational drugs that should be decriminalized or simply regulated. We now know what drugs are, and we're not shy about saying it. Drugs are an evil, pure and simple -- an evil that destroys lives, steals our children's future, and undermines the foundations of our free society. We've seen a nationwide revolt against this permissive attitude of the past. The catchphrase of the seventies, ``Do your own thing,'' has been replaced in the eighties by ``Just say no.'' And thanks in great part to the work of a very special lady in my life, there are now, you might be interested to know, something over 12,000 Just Say No clubs in schools across the United States. We've seen antidrug demonstrations, marches, and vigils held all over America, as people confront the crisis of drug abuse head on. And make no mistake, that is exactly what it is -- a crisis.

I could go into all the statistics. They are, to put it simply, frightening. But most troubling of all is the testimony of our children themselves. Not just our college students or our high school students or even our junior high students -- as early as the fourth, fifth, and sixth grades, students are already identifying drugs as a major problem among their schoolmates. No wonder the conscience of our nation has been shocked, and no wonder that Americans have decided that the time has come as a nation to just say no, to be clearly and firmly intolerant of drug use. And when I say ``as a nation,'' I mean just that. Combating this drug epidemic is the responsibility of every American: parents, teachers, school administrators, employers, workers and union officials, public office holders, and private organizations. And it's a responsibility that many are taking up with dramatic success. Let me cite just a few trail-blazing examples.

Recognizing that simple drug education is not enough, parents and school principals are sending out a no-nonsense message. In Northside High School in Atlanta, for example, principal Bill Rudolph announced a two-call policy. When students are caught with drugs, the first call is to the police, the second is to the parents. And let me say quite frankly here, too, that we're looking to our college administrators to become serious about fighting drug use on our nation's campuses. The time for excuses is over. Our colleges can no longer be neutral on the subject of drugs. Nobody has a right to take illegal drugs. Taking illegal drugs isn't experimenting; it's breaking the law.

Businesses, too, are getting serious and getting tough. Commonwealth Edison, to name one, offers treatment to any of its employees who ask for it. At the same time, they'll fire anyone caught with drugs at work. And the result: Absenteeism is down, and there are fewer accidents on the job. Not only employers but unions, too, have a responsibility to rid the workplace of drugs. At stake is the health, even the lives, of our nation's working men and women.

And finally, I'd like to say something about my old business, movies and the media. A 1985 report in Parade Magazine identified 60 major motion pictures, most of which had been made in the previous 5 years, that treated drug use in a positive, upbeat way, including movies that were honored in the Academy Awards. We know the tremendous influence that movies and the media have over young minds. Though some are aware of their special responsibilities and are taking positive steps, it saddens me that my old industry hasn't gotten its act together and really begun to combat drug abuse. The movie industry should be part of the solution, not part of the problem. Perhaps it's time to give a thought to tightening up on that ratings system. It's hard to see why any film promoting drug use should ever be available to minors, under any circumstance. Likewise, our music industry has a responsibility to keep those who glorify drug use away from minors. I just can't help but think that some of these people who talk about their constitutional right to free speech are really more concerned with their own profits. No one has a constitutional right to sell prodrug propaganda to minors, but parents and communities have a right, indeed they have the responsibility, to protect their children.

As I say, we must no longer be shy in demanding the right of our children, the right of all Americans, to live in a drug-free society. And the work of this Conference will be a major step forward in initiating and organizing America's antidrug campaign at every level. The White House Conference will be a continuing opportunity for citizens to share their ideas and experiences in order to vigorously and directly attack drug abuse at all levels. It will review the Nation's progress, assess what works and why, and reinvigorate our national strategy to stop the use of illegal drugs.

And I am particularly pleased to be naming Lois Haight Herrington as Chairman of the Conference. Lois has had a distinguished career and an extraordinary record working with problems extending from child safety to crime prevention, nationally and internationally. And I know that, in more ways than one, she certainly doesn't lack in energy.

Section 1. Establishment and Purposes. (a) There is established the White House Conference for a Drug Free America within the Executive Office of the President. The Conference will bring together knowledgeable individuals from the public and private sector who are concerned with issues relating to drug abuse education, prevention, and treatment, and the production, trafficking, and distribution of illicit drugs.

Sec. 3. Administration. (a) The heads of Executive agencies, to the extent permitted by law, shall provide the Conference such information with respect to drug abuse law enforcement, interdiction, and health-related drug abuse matters, including research, as it may require for the purpose of carrying out its functions.

Sec. 4. General. (a) The Executive Director is authorized to procure contractual services as necessary to support the purpose and functions of the Conference and other services, as authorized by title 5 U.S.C. 3109.

The maltreatment of older Americans -- physical and emotional abuse, neglect, financial victimization, and other denials of human dignity -- is a tragedy that affects citizens of every regional, economic, religious, and racial grouping. Victims of this abuse are often among the most helpless and vulnerable members of society, and many cases go unreported to the proper authorities. All of us should realize our responsibility to provide for the safety and well-being of older Americans.

This responsibility means, of course, that each of us must protect the older people we know. But it also means that we must safeguard the lives and the dignity of every elderly person in our communities. That can be accomplished when concerned and determined citizens, families, church and civic groups, and government officials formulate much-needed programs for prevention, intervention, and public awareness. It can also be achieved through devoting ourselves to the promotion of strong family life and personal morality, and by reminding ourselves that our God-given, unalienable rights to ``Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness'' come with no age limits whatever.

His nation and all those who love freedom, honor today the name and memory of Bill Casey. In addition to crediting him with rebuilding America's intelligence capability, history will note the brilliance of his mind and strategic vision, his passionate commitment to the cause of freedom, and his unhesitating willingness to make personal sacrifices for the sake of that cause and his country.

Nancy and I have lost a long-time supporter, a wise and unselfish counselor, and a good friend. In extending our condolences to Sophia, Bernadette, and other members of the family, we pray that the knowledge of his countrymen's respect and admiration, as well as the hope inherent in his own deep religious faith, will provide them comfort and consolation. America has lost a patriot, and the cause of freedom, an able champion.

My Administration has done a great deal to build the Nation's foundation for long-term energy security and to strengthen the domestic oil industry. Price and allocation controls on oil have been eliminated; the Strategic Petroleum Reserve (SPR) has been increased nearly fivefold to more than 500 million barrels and, with our encouragement, our allies have built up their stockpiles by about 350 million barrels; several important energy tax incentives were retained in the Tax Reform Act and full-cost accounting provisions for independent producers were preserved; and I have recently forwarded to the Congress a $2.5 billion clean coal initiative. Because of these actions, the United States is now capable of withstanding a supply interruption comparable to the 1973 and 1979 interruptions without experiencing the same economic distress.

More remains to be done. Secretary Herrington's recent report on energy security points out three major concerns: (1) our increasing dependence on imported oil; (2) the sudden decline in oil prices in 1986, which has harmed significant segments of the U.S. petroleum industry; and, (3) the serious implications for national security raised by both of these events. The Department of Energy study concludes that by the mid-1990s we may be importing more than half our oil. Capital expenditures for oil exploration and development have dropped significantly, as has employment and U.S. oil production. Coupled with this production decline is increased consumer demand for oil, which together have resulted in a rise of one million barrels per day in oil imports. In recent months, while market prices have rebounded to some extent, the industry remains under pressure and the outlook is uncertain.

Secretary Herrington and I will continue to push hard for higher levels of oil stockpiles among our allies, particularly at the Ministerial Meeting of the International Energy Agency and the Venice Economic Summit. The Vice President is also leading the Task Force on Regulatory Relief to look at unneeded regulatory barriers to greater energy security, including evaluating regulatory changes to facilitate the use of alternative fuels for the transportation sector.

In addition, today, I am urging the Congress to consider several steps that will lead to more exploration and development, reduce early well-abandonment, and stimulate additional drilling activity. I am suggesting the Congress consider two tax changes of a relatively technical nature: increasing the net income limitation on the percentage depletion allowance from 50 percent to 100 percent per property; and repealing the transfer rule to permit use of percentage depletion for proven properties that have changed ownership. These changes will be of significant value but avoid reopening basic issues considered in tax reform. To continue our efforts to build a stockpile protecting us against supply interruptions, I am prepared to support an SPR fill rate of 100,000 barrels per day, which will achieve by 1993 my goal of an SPR of 750 million barrels, provided that budget offsets are made available to cover the higher costs of this fill rate. I also am reducing the minimum bid requirement for Federal offshore leases from $150 per acre to $25 per acre, which will encourage exploration and development by reducing the up-front costs.

I believe all these measures are important steps toward ensuring that our Nation has a strong domestic oil and gas industry and substantial protection against oil supply interruptions. They would, taken together, increase production and make a significant contribution to our national security interests.

I am also instructing the Secretary of Energy to provide, through the Domestic and Economic Policy Councils, periodic assessments of our energy security risks. It may be necessary to consider a variety of options for encouraging exploration and production if our U.S. industry continues to be diminished and national security risks increase. I will consider further actions as warranted.

The President. I have to tell you, this has been very exciting to see all of this. And at the same time, I had a great feeling of familiarity, because as I was telling you earlier, during my 8 years on a television program called ``The GE Theater,'' I would spend about 10 or 12 weeks every year visiting GE plants. And I met 250,000 employees in those years, and I think it was 139 plants in 39 States. And I came to the conclusion then if the people who are the customers out there could see what goes into the products they take for granted, they'd be deeply moved and very excited.

But I've heard a lot about this comeback before coming here today. But what's impressed me most was not any one thing -- not changes in financing or marketing or in the product or the way it's made, but something much bigger. And it's been very evident here in what I've been hearing right now: that Harley-Davidson is moving forward because Harley-Davidson has become a team. You're working together; there's literally a hotline between the factory floor and the top office; and ideas are coming from every part of the company. You work in small teams to figure out how to do things better. And this isn't a top-down company; this is a company in which everyone is standing shoulder to shoulder on the front line -- everyone. It didn't take huge, new investments, as you've pointed out here today, in exotic technologies to put Harley-Davidson back on top; it just took a huge, new investment of faith in each other.

You know, listening here, I can't help but think that there's something familiar about the source of your success. It sounds a lot like what was at the bottom of another success story. Now, we all know that story, but maybe sometimes we get a little indifferent and let it slip from our minds. It concerns people from every corner of the Earth. They had a little more drive, and they dreamed a little more than others around them, and they had that little extra ounce of courage to leave everything behind and make a long, difficult journey across the ocean to a new continent, a new world, and where they built a new nation called America. And the strength that comes when free men and women join together and work for a common purpose -- it's a story as old as our great nation and as young as the reborn Harley-Davidson.

And, yes, it's the key to America's success in the competitive world of the 21st century. For the last few months, I've been talking about how we've got to begin preparing for the 21st century. I've talked about quality in education, about training for the jobs of the future, and about how America will continue to grow. The economy of the 21st century will be an international economy where American companies like Harley will compete on every continent and in every country.

Now, some want to hide from that world, not to compete, just to throw up walls and protection and hide. But if we really look back, America has never been afraid of a challenge. We've always been ready to compete and always been ready to win. And I think you have proven, and it's confirmed, all that I had heard before I got here, and that is that you are ready still to compete, to not ask for quarter, and to go forward.

And I just thank you for all you've done. I was president of my own union one time. [Laughter] God bless you. This is what it's all about, and you've shown it. And I hope that this is a seed that spreads throughout American industry.

Thank you, Vaughn Beals, and thank all of you very much. And let me answer that question about Nancy. [Laughter] The government gets one employee free: the First Lady. [Laughter] You've heard about politics making strange bedfellows; I found out politics, with their scheduling, can kind of break up some bedfellows. [Laughter] They've got her on another schedule today.

And that's just what you did. You cut the hours of work needed to make a motorcycle by one-third. You cut inventory by two-thirds. You tripled the number of defect-free machines you shipped. And with productivity up, you kept price increases small, and on some bikes even lowered prices. You expanded your product line from 3 models 10 years ago to 24 today and once again became a leader in developing new motorcycle technology. And each year, on virtually every continent of the Earth, you're selling more and more bikes compared to your competition. You're the only major motorcycle manufacturer in the world to have increased production last year. Like America, Harley is back and standing tall.

Last weekend I read a statement by Harry Smith, the president of Local 175 of the International Association of Machinists, and said -- who said -- he said, I didn't -- he said: ``The tariffs helped to slow up the imports, and that helped us. But the backbone of our comeback as a company is our people here. They have a lot of skill and craftsmanship, and they went through a lot of hardship to get the company where it is today.'' Well, this is what we need to ensure a more competitive future for America, and this is precisely what I was talking about when I called for a ``quest for excellence'' in my State of the Union Address.

Earlier this year, I said it was time to begin a great American discussion about our future and how to prepare America for the world of the year 2000 and beyond. What kind of a country will we pass to our children? It includes being sure we make the best use of our science and technology; improving the climate for entrepreneurship and growth; working to build a fair, open, and expanding world economy; and finally, making sure that American education is the best in the world. Yes, it's a challenge for every American, the challenge of preparing America for the next century, and it's a challenge being met by those of you here at Harley-Davidson.

Well, you may not be putting out the fire of volcanoes, but you've shown you're just as effective. Just a few weeks ago, a year ahead of schedule, you said to us you didn't need any more breathing room. You were ready to take on the world. And in doing that, you gave some folks in Washington an important lesson about how we go about buying and selling with other nations. You see, we've shaken hands on an agreement with most of the other nations of the world, an agreement that sets the rules for international trade. We have problems, of course, with some of those nations -- the ones that don't let us sell to their people as freely as they sell to ours. But the agreement, called the GATT agreement -- that's the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade -- gives us ways of dealing with those problems, and it also gives us ways of giving industries the kind of breathing room we gave you. And if they're as serious as you were about shaping up -- now we're about to begin worldwide talks on how to make this agreement even stronger.

Because of the GATT agreement, when you were ready to sell more bikes around the world, no one stopped you. But now there are some in Congress who say, in effect, that the United States should break its word with the other countries. They say American workers need to run and hide from foreign competition, even if that means other countries will strike back by not letting you sell your bikes to their people. Well, Harley-Davidson has shown how wrong that is and what the truth is. American workers don't need to hide from anyone. America does best when America sticks by its word. And American workers can take on the best in the world, anywhere, anytime, anyplace. No one is better than you are.

You may have heard that my temperature's up about some trade legislation that's before the Congress right now. On TV the other night, it was called one of the toughest trade bills of this century. I remember the last time we had a so-called tough trade bill. It was called Smoot-Hawley, and they said it would protect American jobs. Instead, after other nations were through retaliating, it helped us -- or it helped give us, or at least deepened, the Great Depression of the 1930's. I'm probably the only one here that's old enough to remember that. I was looking for a job then. [Laughter] Twenty-five percent were unemployed, including me.

The Harley-Davidson example makes a very strong statement about how government, through the judicious application of our trade laws, can help the best and the brightest in American management and labor come together in ways that will create new jobs, new growth, and new prosperity. Government's role, particularly on the trade front, should be one of creating the conditions where fair trade will flourish, and this is precisely what has been done here. Our trade laws should work to foster growth and trade, not shut it off. And that's what's at the heart of our fair trade policy: opening foreign markets, not closing ours. Where U.S. firms have suffered from temporary surges in foreign competition, we haven't been shy about using our import laws to produce temporary relief. Now, there are those in Congress who say our trade policies haven't worked, but you here at Harley-Davidson are living proof that our laws are working. The idea of going to mandatory retaliation and shutting down on Presidential discretion in enforcing our trade laws is moving toward a policy that invites, even encourages, trade wars. It's time to work to expand the world market, not restrict it.

The best way to meet foreign competition is also the right way: by sticking to our agreements with other countries and not breaking our promises, by making sure other countries also stick to their agreements with us, and by being the best. As America prepares for the 21st century, you've shown us how to be the best. You've been leaders in new technology. You've stuck by the basic American values of hard work and fair play. And I've heard that you have outstanding schools here in York that are teaching those values, too. I can't say that everyplace I've been, because we're still having a job getting some of our schools to catch up. Most of all, you've worked smarter, you've worked better, and you've worked together. And that's the American way.

You know, I received a letter not long ago. And I've been sharing this with some of your fellow Americans from podiums like this, because this letter pointed out something that I don't think any of us have ever stopped to think about. This man said that you can move to Greece, live in Greece, but you can't become a Greek. You can move to Japan, live there, but you can't become Japanese; or France and become a Frenchman; or German -- or become a -- all of these things. But he said, everybody or anybody from any corner of the world can come to America and become an American.

The President. Etta Hulme, members of the Association of American Editorial Cartoonists, distinguished guests, it's a pleasure to welcome America's editorial cartoonists here to the White House this morning. I know cartoonists are an independent lot who often march to the beat of a different drummer. Of course, sometimes when I see the way some of you draw me, I wonder if it's just a different drummer you're marching to. Maybe it's the ``Tune Tones.'' [Laughter] But it's a tribute to the hard work and careful organizing of Etta and her staff that all of you free spirits have arrived here today at the right time and in the right place. Next week I want Etta to show you where you should arrive on the question of contra aid. [Laughter] Anyway, to Etta and to all of you, let me just say: Thank you for coming.

Seriously though, one thing that I, and no politician, will ever forget is the importance of the work that each of you does. Cartoons show America politics from a special angle -- irony, wit, satire, outrage, as well as, occasionally, sympathy and affection. These are the qualities that animate your work. And it's these special qualities, captured in your illustrations, that have become so much a part of our political culture from our country's very first days. Cartoonists' drawings of the Boston Massacre helped ignite the fire of the American Revolution. A century later, the cartoons of Thomas Nast helped wash the soil of corruption from the fabric of democracy. As Boss Tweed said, and I'll quote: ``I don't care a straw for newspaper articles. My constituents don't know how to read, but they can't help seeing them darned pictures.'' Now, actually, he didn't say ``darned,'' but Presidents have a few restrictions now that weren't imposed on him.

Political cartoonists have helped every one of us express our feelings about the great national events of our day. Who can forget Bill Mauldin's mourning Lincoln? Bill drew for all Americans a picture of the grief that ached in our hearts after the tragic loss of a young President. Yes, you are part of our national debate and our national experience. Your humor helps give America's political dialog its characteristic way of humanity. And in doing that, you keep us here in Washington from taking ourselves too seriously, and I can't think of any greater service to the national sanity than that.

Yes, it's hard to believe now, but just 30 years ago one leading journal of opinion ran an article entitled ``The Decline and Fall of the Editorial Cartoonist.'' A cartoonist for the Army Times, John Stampone, saw the article. And John was determined that a profession that had been so much a part of our country's history would not be wiped out. And the result -- your organization. At first there were just 83 members. Today there are over 300 all across the United States and in Canada and Mexico, as well. Far from being an extinct or even endangered species, your profession is thriving now as never before.

Here at the White House during my Presidency, we've taken notice of your work -- more notice than it's ever received, I think, in the past years. In fact, since my first days in Washington, our News Summary office has produced a weekly anthology of editorial cartoons. It's called ``The Friday Follies.'' For me, and probably for most of the White House staff, it's the most eagerly awaited document of the week and gives new meaning to TGIF. But let me put one rumor to rest. It's not true that ``The Follies'' is the only reason we don't schedule state dinners on Friday nights. I don't need all night to stew over them.

Yes, you're an integral part of our free society, and your vitality is a sign of the vitality of freedom itself. As I said, I enjoy your work. But since you're so free at critiquing the job I'm doing, I thought that it would be only fair, now that I have the chance, to take a shot at critiquing your work. I know you can dish it out, but can you really take it? Now, I have here a random selection of some cartoons from ``The Follies,'' and I'll just offer a few words about each. Since we're interested in promoting family values, I'll use language other than what you're accustomed to hearing from your editors. Before I begin, I'd like to add that the signatures on the cartoons have been deleted to protect the innocent and the guilty.

Now, this first one is not one of that display. I just put that there to thank you all for doing this for me. And I assure you it's going to be framed, and it will be hung in a place of honor. And it's sure to wind up in a Presidential library. But, Etta, could I ask you to lend a hand? Don't let that get away from us.

Now, I guess, we come to number five. And this one must be a reprint from an old Hollywood publicity piece. It's funny it hasn't gotten brown around the edges lately. But what I have it here for is, I'm going to ask Ted Turner to colorize it. [Laughter] I must confess I rather like that last one. You may try to guess the cartoonist. I'll give you a hint. It wasn't Tip O'Neill. Thank heavens he never learned to draw.

In my West Wing study with my other cartoons, I also have a number that are particularly special to me. They are the get-well messages that many of you sent me after I had a little accident not far from here in late March of 1981. For me, they're a daily reminder of your sensitivity, compassion, and devotion to the Nation's welfare. So, let me leave you with two pieces of advice: first, keep drawing; second, take it easy on the old boy. And if I could suggest a subject for all of you right now, it's that monkey business that's going up on the Hill with regard to your money and how the Government's going to take it away from you. I think that'd be a fine thing.

Ms. Hulme. Turn the mike on? Is the mike not on? Now is the mike on? Now the mike's on. We have a question before I make a presentation. Is it true that you had us here in the Rose Garden because you heard we drew on the walls? [Laughter] But I would like to present you with this book, ``The Best Editorial Cartoons of the Year,'' that's signed by many of our members. And we appreciate your invitation today.

The President. Well, then he was misinformed. I did not know that there was any excess money until the day before I told all of you that Ed Meese came in and said he had found a memo that indicated there was additional money. I did not know about it. And I did not know -- and I'm still waiting to know -- where did that money go.

The President. Well, I knew that Mr. Secord is a private citizen, was engaged with other private citizens in trying to get aid to the contras and so forth. And there's nothing against the law in that. And I'm very pleased that American people felt that way.

It gives me great pleasure to join with the people of Mexico and everyone of Mexican heritage in the United States in commemorating the anniversary of a great day in the cause of Mexican freedom and independence -- El Cinco de Mayo.

As the people of the United States begin to celebrate the Bicentennial of our Constitution, Mexicans around the world are commemorating the 125th anniversary of the Battle of Puebla, when the Mexican Army, outnumbered three to one, still won a great victory. The spirit of those brave soldiers gives eloquent testimony to some of the most cherished ideals we share -- liberty, self-government, and the right to make our own destinies.

Today, our two nations have a special friendship and all those of Mexican descent in the United States continue to make many outstanding contributions to this country. I am happy to send warmest congratulations and good wishes to the people of Mexico and all those in the United States who celebrate this day in reaffirmation of liberty.

Americans today are living longer and healthier lives. One consequence of this increased longevity is the growing number of men and women in the older age brackets. Most of our Nation's elderly are leading independent lives outside any institutional setting. Another group of older Americans, some 1.5 million men and women -- a third of them aged 85 years or older -- reside in our Nation's nursing homes.

These citizens represent a great national treasure, not only for their contributions to our society during this turbulent century but for what they represent now: a wealth of accumulated experience and learning. As we celebrate National Nursing Home Week, 1987, all of us can resolve not to overlook the treasures to be found in these fellow Americans who have reached their golden years.

Our debt to them is written plainly across the face of our society, in the homes and cities they have helped build, in the astounding inventions and works of art they have created, in the families they have raised, in the churches and voluntary groups they have helped sustain, and in the freedom they have sheltered from bitter harm.

But to acknowledge this debt is not enough. If we are really to pay tribute to all that these honored Americans have accomplished, a more personal thanks is in order. During National Nursing Home Week, I urge all Americans to make some visible sign of gratitude to the residents of these homes and to those who have assumed the noble duty of caring for them. Let us show our love and appreciation for those who nurtured us by nurturing them now, when they need us most. Let us show our concern by visiting, writing, or sending a special gift to someone for whom such small deeds of kindness do so very much. Let us remind them that they are, indeed, treasures of our hearts and our communities.

Section 1. An individual who is employed in a Professional or Administrative Career position under Schedule B under the authority of 5 C.F.R. 213.3202(1) may be converted noncompetitively to a career or career-conditional appointment at GS - 9, provided the individual meets the qualifications and other requirements established by the Director of the Office of Personnel Management, and further provided the individual's performance is determined by the employing agency, in a careful and formal evaluation, to warrant such conversion at GS - 9.

Nancy and I were saddened to learn of the passing of Congressman Stewart McKinney. For the past 16 years he has served the people of Connecticut's 4th District with effectiveness and dedication. He was a forceful advocate for the causes in which he believed, and he will be sorely missed by all who knew him. We send our deepest sympathy to his wife, Lucie, and to their children and grandchildren.

That's a drop of a full .3 percentage point in a single month, and it marks the lowest unemployment rate in more than 7 years. And it's worth pointing out that these numbers exceed the expectations of most private forecasters, and taken together with the healthy gains in employment during the first quarter of this year, these April statistics indicate that economic expansion and creation of jobs continues at a strong pace.

The President. Well, I'm not going to take any questions except, because you asked that one on this point, it is my understanding that for some period now the unemployment rate for minorities is dropping faster than the general unemployment rate.

Here we go again. Democrats in the Senate have decided to hold our national security hostage to a $137 billion tax increase over the next 4 years. They have also decided that further reductions in domestic spending cannot be made. The time has come, long since, to restore our credibility and discipline to the budget process. The Senate budget is a giant step in the wrong direction.

The bill reported yesterday by the Senate Finance Committee represents an improvement over the original Senate version, but very serious problems remain with several of its provisions. Other Senate committees will be reporting their related bills in the days ahead. As the President has said, he would like to get trade legislation from Congress he can sign, but what we have seen to date is not at all encouraging.

I have directed the U.S. START negotiator in the nuclear and space talks in Geneva to present to the Soviet Union at today's meeting of the START negotiating group a draft treaty which provides for 50-percent reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive nuclear arms. The text of the U.S. draft treaty reflects the basic areas of agreement on strategic arms reductions General Secretary Gorbachev and I reached at our meeting at Reykjavik last October.

Our draft treaty provides for both sides to reduce to 1,600 strategic nuclear delivery vehicles and 6,000 warheads, with appropriate sublimits, over a period of 7 years after such a treaty enters into force. It provides a solid basis for the creation of a fair and durable agreement. The United States proposal, in addition to the overall limits, provides for specific restrictions on the most destabilizing and dangerous nuclear systems -- above all, fast-flying ballistic missiles. It includes detailed rules designed to eliminate any ambiguity as to what is agreed, and extensive verification provisions designed to ensure that each side can be confident that the other is complying fully with the agreement. The treaty is the result of intensive work by all appropriate agencies of the United States Government. I have reviewed the treaty, and it has my approval.

By tabling this text, the United States seeks to build on the significant progress made in START and to provide a vehicle for resolving the remaining differences. If the Soviets are prepared to work with us on the remaining outstanding issues, especially the need -- for the purpose of ensuring strategic stability -- for sublimits on ballistic missile warheads, we will be able to take a significant step toward a safer and more stable world.

While tabling this treaty is an important indication of our desire to achieve deep, equitable, and verifiable strategic arms reductions as soon as possible, I do not wish to minimize the difficult issues which remain to be resolved, particularly Soviet insistence on linking a START agreement to measures which, if accepted by the United States, would seriously constrain SDI. This is unacceptable. I cannot and I will not accept any measures which would cripple or kill our SDI program. In view of the continuing Soviet offensive buildup, combined with the long-standing Soviet activities in strategic defense, the SDI program is vital to the future security of the United States and our allies.

As we begin detailed discussion of our proposed treaty with the Soviets, we are resolved to do our part to bring about, for the first time in history, real reductions in strategic offensive arms. I hope the Soviets will demonstrate similar determination and work with us on the basis of our draft treaty to translate the areas of agreement reached at Reykjavik into concrete reductions.

Digestive diseases represent one of our Nation's significant health problems. Each year digestive diseases affect roughly 20 million Americans. Their cost to Americans in terms of surgery, hospitalization, and time away from work is reckoned in tens of billions of dollars; but their cost in terms of suffering and mortality is incalculable.

Fortunately, private and public support has made continuing research into digestive diseases possible. In addition, concerned organizations -- including the Digestive Diseases National Coalition, the National Digestive Diseases Advisory Board, the National Digestive Diseases Education and Information Clearinghouse, and the National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and Kidney Diseases -- have been conducting a national public awareness program about these serious diseases and their prevention.

My message today is taped so I can attend the memorial service for a great patriot and dedicated public servant, my good friend, Bill Casey. Before I get into the substance of my remarks, I would also like to wish all of our nation's mothers a happy Mother's Day tomorrow. I've often thought that our mothers are the most hardworking of all Americans. Raising a family, as we all know, is a 24-hour-a-day duty. How often it was our mothers who picked us up when we fell, comforted us when we were sick, schooled us in our faith, and gave us the security and courage to go out and face the world. So let me just say to all America's mothers: Thanks, Mom, for a job well done.

Turning to business in Washington, the Congress is in the midst of working on the defense budget, and I must say quite frankly that the indications up to this point are alarming. Too often many Members of Congress treat defense like it was someone else's responsibility. It's always the first thing to be sacrificed, to be canceled or cut, or delayed, even while wasteful boondoggles and pork-barrel spending sail right through untouched.

Now the progress we've made in the last 6 years rebuilding our defenses is once again being put in jeopardy by the shortsightedness of some in Congress. For 2 years in a row, Congress has cut defense appropriations below previous levels in real terms. The current 1987 defense budget is actually 6 percent smaller than the one Congress itself approved for 1985, yet some actually argue that it, too, should be gutted. Add to this the fact that some have attached irresponsible amendments to defense bills that would tie my hands and undercut my ability to conduct arms reduction negotiations with the Soviets. I think you'll agree it's time Congress took stock of itself and thought seriously about its responsibility for maintaining our national security.

When we were elected in 1980, our defenses were in a dangerous state of disrepair. Years of neglect had produced planes that couldn't fly for want of spare parts, ships that couldn't leave port, a Rapid Deployment Force that was neither rapid nor very deployable and wasn't much of a force. At the same time we were confronted with a massive Soviet buildup. While our defenses were cut to the bone, the Soviets steadily increased military spending, shifting the military balance heavily in their favor. Even today the annual Soviet output of nuclear missiles, tanks, and other ground equipment is still twice that of the United States and NATO combined. Such a severe and dangerous imbalance can't be redressed in a few years. It takes a steady, determined effort.

Now, some will tell you that we're spending too much on defense, that defense spending is responsible for the deficit, but that charge is belied by the facts. The great surge in spending has been on the nondefense side of the budget. In fact, the increase in nondefense spending, including interest, has been nearly twice as great as in defense spending. My budget proposal for the next 5 years asks for a modest 3-percent real growth in defense. This is the minimum we need for a stable, consistent growth in defense that will maintain the progress we've made.

Also of grave concern are the many amendments that threaten our arms reduction negotiations with the Soviets. Our talks have already progressed to the point that, in the last round, the United States tabled a draft treaty on intermediate nuclear force reductions, and just yesterday in Geneva, we tabled a draft strategic arms reduction treaty as well. For the first time in history, we seem to be on the verge of major arms reductions. Still, some in Congress would pull the rug out from under our negotiators with some legislation, such as that dealing with our strategic defense program and nuclear testing. Congress would be handing the Soviets free of charge what they can't win at the bargaining table. This is no way to run America's foreign policy. Let me be clear: If Congress passes legislation that endangers our arms reductions or undermines our national defense, I will have no choice; I will veto it. For the sake of our national security, however, I hope we can reestablish a bipartisan consensus on national security and meet our defense needs so we can keep America free and strong and at peace.

Finally, I'd just like to say a few words about the hearings that started in Congress this week. We're all eager to get the facts out before the American people. We hope Congress will be thorough and also expeditious so that we can get on with the business at hand.

It is truly fitting that Americans pause each year to celebrate Jewish heritage, a tradition measured in millennia and one that has given much to our land. American Jews have helped build our Nation, enriching our ideals, fighting for our freedom, and making significant achievements in the arts, labor, business, academia, medicine, and every segment of American life.

This time of year calls us to reflection and remembrance about Jewish heritage. The observance of Passover tells the story of the passage from bondage to freedom and rekindles hope for mankind. The National Days of Remembrance of victims and survivors of the Holocaust and commemorations of the anniversary of the Warsaw Ghetto Uprising solemnly remind us that the shining glory and goodness of the spirit can arise from unutterable evil and tragedy -- and that the words ``Never Again'' must always be our guide.

Chappie's mother told him at a young age that there was an Eleventh Commandment: ``Thou shalt not quit.'' He took that to heart. And Chappie James is one of the very few officers ever to attain the rank of four-star general. He had 4 stars on his shoulder and 50 stars in his heart. Chappie James was an unabashed patriot; his expressions of affection and dedication to the cause of freedom stirred the hearts of his countrymen. He loved America, and America loved Chappie James.

This unique individual began his career here at Tuskegee. This is where he earned his degree. This is where he trained young men how to fly and how to fight. And these warriors put his lessons to good use, destroying 261 enemy aircraft and wreaking destruction and havoc upon the enemy. They served their country with valor and distinction. As you may be aware, in 1944, I narrated a film about the Tuskegee Airmen. I was presently in uniform serving with the Army Air Corps at the time, but my past occupation caught up with me, and I was given the opportunity to do that narration. And I'm proud that in a small way I was able to contribute to the change in climate that gained public acceptance for black pilots.

And with us today is Air Force General Bernard Randolph, who I've nominated to receive his fourth star. His contributions to America today are possible because of men like Chappie James and the Tuskegee Airmen. The lessons Chappie taught the Tuskegee Airmen were of great service to our country. Today it's most fitting, then, that we dedicate this center to carry on that spirit. The James Center will help train young men and women in the discipline of aerospace science and health education. And we expect from the ranks of these students will come young leaders who will follow the proud traditions of this university, men and women who will be a lasting tribute to Chappie James and all that he stood for.

Chappie, who fought in war and in peace to make this a better, freer country, once said: ``This is my nation. I love her. If I see Miss Liberty ill, I'll hold her hand. If she is in the hospital, I'll bring her roses.'' Well, now, let his spirit hold the hand of these students and guide them through the challenges of higher education and through the frustrations of life.

Reporter. Mr. President, [former Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs] Bud McFarlane says you ordered contra aid at a time when Congress had banned such aid. What do you have to say about that?

The President. I'm not going to take any questions now on things like that. We're here for a different purpose. And let's, just for a few moments, decide that there's enough controversy, and we'll leave it in Washington for today.

This is a most fitting day for a graduation ceremony because it coincides with the day we give thanks to the individuals to whom we really owe everything, people who sacrificed and sometimes themselves went without so that we could have happier and more complete lives. Today we remember and give thanks to our mothers. I'd like to ask every woman who has a child graduating today to stand, if they would. [Applause] Ladies, we honor your children today for their outstanding accomplishment, but we know that you deserve our accolades, as well. God bless you, and thank you all for all you've done to bring this happy day about.

And speaking of mothers, Mrs. Punch, would you come up here on the platform for a moment? I know Tuskegee students have had a special one here on campus for 40 years. She's retiring this year. Mrs. Punch, love and thanks are yours today. And Nancy and I would like to give you something on behalf of all of us.

Well, in a free society, as that story suggests, the individual makes the ultimate decision as to the direction of his or her life. This freedom is one of the greatest sources of strength from which this or any country can draw, a wellspring of hope that can be seen in the optimism of free people. And looking at your faces today, one cannot but have confidence in you and in our country's future. Your generation of Americans will usher the world into a new era of freedom and progress, a time when our technology and our creativity will carry us beyond anything that we can now imagine. Already computers are expanding our productivity and opening doors of opportunity only dreamed of a short time ago. Small businesses, for example, have computer facilities formerly reserved for giant corporations.

When I was attending college -- now, I know many of you probably think that that was back when there were dinosaurs roaming the Earth -- [laughter] -- actually, they weren't; it was about the time when Moses was parting the Red Sea. [Laughter] Seriously, the goals Americans set for themselves in the days of my youth seem so modest: indoor plumbing, electricity, a family car, having a telephone or a radio crystal set. Traveling to distant cities was rare; traveling overseas was within reach of only a few. For my family, even going to a movie was not always within reach.

Today we explore technology that might someday conquer the remaining threats to our health and increase our longevity. While jet airliners carry passengers, even those of modest means, from coast to coast and overseas, our engineers are busy developing crafts that one day will take off from a runway and carry us into space, aerospace planes that will deliver us anywhere in the world in just a few hours' time. Discoveries in the field of superconductivity are coming so rapidly that research results are often out of date before they're in print. Scientists are bringing us to the day of pollution-free electric cars and magnetic trains that carry cargo and travelers at speeds of 300 or 400 miles per hour.

During my teens, one in four Americans was still on the farm; more often than not, toiling to achieve extremely limited production. It took one farmer then to feed four Americans in those days. Today that same farmer can feed 60 Americans and 15 foreigners. Those were also the days when most people, trying to earn a meager living, shut their eyes to the injustices suffered by minority citizens. It was Thomas Jefferson who once said, ``I like dreams of the future better than the history of the past.'' Well, Americans have never lacked vision, never lacked the desire or the courage to attempt great deeds.

After the Second World War, during another time of tremendous economic and technological progress, our society moved forward to make a long-overdue commitment to extend freedom to those who had been denied, to make real the dream of a land of freedom and justice for all. In the 1950's and 1960's, great strides were made through political action. The legal sanctions of bigotry and discrimination were torn away, laws protecting the civil rights of all Americans were put in place, and racism was, in effect, outlawed. These great achievements did not come easy. They were the result of the struggle and commitment of generations and the outstanding leadership of individuals like Dr. Martin Luther King. The civil rights movement earned the respect and gratitude of all good and decent Americans, even some who may at first have had reservations about what was happening. Yet changes in the law -- and the political struggle itself -- brought social progress that enormously strengthened the moral foundation of the United States.

The political and legal battle is obviously not over. We must remain vigilant, inside and outside of government. We must maintain our moral solidarity against intolerance and racial hatred. We cannot shrug off incidents of racial violence or interracial crime. Yet today, if black Americans are to progress socially and economically, if they are to be independent and upwardly mobile, it is imperative that they be part of the great technological and scientific changes now sweeping our country and the world. And it's just as vital for America that all her citizens march into the future together.

If there's any lesson now being learned, it is that there is a relationship between human freedom and the progress of man. The discrimination and prohibitions suffered by minorities in this country were undoubtedly some of the greatest impediments to the forward thrust of our nation. One need only look at the invaluable scientific contributions, especially in the area of agriculture, made by George Washington Carver, to wonder what more he might have accomplished had he not been overcoming prejudice as well as conducting scientific experiments. An American pioneer in heart surgery was Dr. Daniel Hale Williams, a black physician. Another black physician, Dr. Charles Drew, discovered a method of storing blood plasma. How many of our countrymen would have lived longer, more productive lives had these outstanding citizens been freer to reach their potential?

The United States, in all these cases and so many more, did not know what it was losing. Ironically, today America often isn't aware of what it's gaining by having opened doors that were long closed. Our citizens may know of the three black astronauts now in line for becoming [upcoming] shuttle missions. Yet how widely known is it that a large portion of NASA's work force is black, including 422 engineers and scientists? One of them, David Hedgly, was responsible for a breakthrough in computer graphics a few years ago, solving a problem that had confounded the scientific establishment for years. The press release announcing the accomplishment did not -- as was proper -- mention his race. Dr. Jewell Plummer Cobb is president of California State University at Fullerton. She's a distinguished scientist who's known for her work in cell physiology.

There's nothing wrong with the attention focused on black athletes and entertainers; I would be the last one to play down the role of entertainers. [Laughter] However, I think it's high time the media and the rest of America began paying more attention to those black citizens who are prominent in other professions, as well. We must be concerned about the perception children of every race are developing about themselves and about others. Certainly, problems in the black community cannot be covered up or ignored; yet rather than dwelling almost exclusively on the negative, let's make certain our children see stories of black successes and triumphs. And there are many from which to choose.

Today there are some 843,000 minority-owned businesses in the United States. Over and above what they buy and sell in the private sector, the Federal Government is doing an unprecedented $6\1/2\ billion in business with them. Black entrepreneurs often overcome great adversity. Their stories lift the human spirit and give credit to individuals who should serve as role models for our children. Coming up, for example, is National Small Business Week. An engineering and technical services company named Analysis Group Incorporated, has been selected for distinction. The president of the company, Arthur Paul, received his bachelor's and master's in engineering from Howard University and his doctorate from the University of Virginia. As our country moves into the 21st century, it's crucial that more young black Americans follow the path of Dr. Paul and of our black scientists, physicists, and mathematicians. America must not be denied the benefits of the creativity and talents of its citizens.

Our administration is moving aggressively in a number of fronts. We have an agenda that is aimed not only at overcoming the problems of today but also preparing the ground for black economic independence in the technological era that we're entering. We threw out the old, inefficient CETA [Comprehensive Employment Training Act] program and put in its place the Job Training Partnership Act, which provides more training for every dollar spent. It was Booker T. Washington who said: ``The world cares very little about what a man or woman knows; it is what the man or woman can do. . . .'' Well, our new training programs are designed to provide marketable, up-to-date skills.

We've done our best to put in place spending and tax policies that will keep our economy healthy and growing. Certainly, black unemployment has remained far too high and is totally unacceptable, yet there are some figures that give us hope. Black employment has increased 1.8 million since 1980, and today more black Americans are working than ever before and a higher percentage of the black work force is employed than at any time in this decade. Since the economic recovery began, about one in seven of all new jobs being created has gone to black Americans. I care deeply about the unemployed. I saw my father suffer from the pain of not being able to support his family. I witnessed what it did to him and his self-respect and to my mother. And it's not something I or anyone in the administration take lightly. And I can assure you, we won't be satisfied till every American who wants a job has a job and is earning a decent living.

Our preparation for the next century goes far beyond our efforts to build an economy that will provide jobs for the unemployed. By our campaign for excellence in education, we have not been offering easy answers in this regard; instead, we set out to mobilize the public, to get the people involved in their local schools and in the education of their children, to encourage them to insist on high standards and discipline. And let's not kid ourselves -- we can't expect children to excel in an environment of drugs and permissiveness. All Americans should stand shoulder to shoulder against this evil that undermines the moral fiber of the Nation and attacks our youth. It's time to get drugs off our campuses and out of our schoolyards. We want to make certain that by the time young people get to college, they're of sound mind, good character, and have the basic educational skills to carry them into any field they choose.

We're also engaged in an effort to encourage them as to what choice to make. At the college level, we're helping to provide incentives for black Americans to choose math, engineering, and the sciences. And next year, in response to our direction, the National Science Foundation -- whose budget is being doubled -- will move to ensure the widest participation in the sciences. This includes funding comprehensive projects to improve the teaching of science and engineering to pre-college and undergraduate students in minority schools.

And this isn't just a job for the Government. One of the goals we've set for ourselves in recent years has been to enlist the citizenry and private corporations in such community-building programs. Today there are partnerships between Texas Engineering Experiment Station and Prairie View A&M University, between Lawrence Berkeley Laboratory and Jackson State University, and others that provide hands-on engineering and scientific experience to minority students. We're doing our best to encourage these partnerships, whether they take the form of apprentice programs or consulting arrangements or joint research. In the public sector, the full support of our administration has been thrown behind the effort to greatly strengthen the research capabilities of black institutions of higher learning. In 1986, 27 Federal agencies and departments invested more than $600 million in our nation's historically black colleges, much of it in the form of research grants and projects.

One example: Tuskegee competed for, and won, a $2\1/4\-million Navy contract to help in the development of automobile, aircraft, and spacecraft engine components. More of Tuskegee's students are enrolled in engineering and architecture than any other area of study. Furthermore, among your faculty and staff, in keeping with the standards established by Dr. Carver, are some of the best higher education has to offer in electrical, mechanical, chemical, and aerospace sciences. Tuskegee has a tradition of top-quality scientific research from its earliest days.

Dr. Carver once said: ``Race and creed find no recognition in the eyes of the Deity when He bestows His generous gifts.'' Dr. Carver not only said that; he proved it. Tuskegee made history with its agricultural research, which continues even now to be a source of pride. Yet let me suggest that this fame may someday be surpassed by contributions your institution will make in the field of aerospace engineering.

The President. He's ready. [Laughter] This potential is the reason the George C. Marshall Flight Center and other similar organizations, as well as private corporations, are humming around here. This is the reason NASA donated to this institution some of its most sophisticated aviation-related computers last year. And, of course, it is the reason that you have received $9 million in support from the Department of Education for the opening of this Aerospace Science and Health Education Center, this center I was honored to inaugurate shortly before joining you here today. This center, of course, is dedicated to the memory of one of this country's great patriots, a hero of three wars, America's first black four-star general, Daniel ``Chappie'' James. He has been mentioned here repeatedly. As a youth he washed airplanes for 25 cents. He earned his degree here at Tuskegee and helped train the famous Tuskegee Airmen, pilots who during the war destroyed 261 enemy aircraft and won a basketful of Distinguished Flying Crosses.

Some of you may be aware that back in 1944, in the midst of that great conflict, I narrated a film about these brave pilots. I can't tell you how proud I am to be an honorary Tuskegee Airman. And if they hadn't made me wear this robe, you'd have seen I was wearing the button in my lapel. [Laughter] The skill and courage of these individuals, Chappie James and the Tuskegee Airmen, is part of an heroic tradition, from the Revolutionary War, when some 5,000 black Americans fought gallantly for our country's independence, to Pearl Harbor, where a black seaman named Dorie Miller was one of the first Americans to bring down an enemy aircraft. Dorie Miller, the Tuskegee Airmen, and others who fought and often paid the supreme sacrifice for their country did so in a segregated military. Their courage and patriotism undoubtedly helped bring an end to this outrage.

Today one of the greatest strengths of our military is that it is one of the most successfully integrated institutions in the country, an open door of opportunity to all citizens. Over 10 percent of the Army's officers are black, as are 34 percent of its sergeants. Blacks are in more positions of managerial and command authority in the military than in business, education, journalism, or any other part of government. Chappie James' mother once predicted: ``Someday there will be so many black people doing so many things that are noteworthy that it will no longer be newsworthy.'' Nowhere is it more apparent than in the Armed Forces.

The military is seen by many as an avenue for advancement, a job where individual merit will be recognized and rewarded. The technological training and skill development provided in the military is some of the best in the country. And that could mean learning about car and truck engines. It could also mean learning to build bridges or space stations. Astronaut Guy Bluford was an ROTC graduate who went into the Air Force after receiving a B.S. from Penn State. While in the service, he earned his doctorate degree in aerospace engineering, with a minor in laser physics, from the Air Force Institute of Technology. I might add that he was at the White House on the day we announced the initial grant for the Chappie James Center here in Tuskegee.

These Americans in the military service of the United States do us proud because of their achievements and because they, like the brave men who went before them, are willing to put their lives on the line to defend our country. With us today are 27 newly commissioned ROTC second lieutenants who will soon be joining the ranks. Would they please stand? [Applause] You young people are a great source of pride to all of us -- your families and your fellow students and your countrymen. I know I speak for all of us here when I tell you that we're confident that you will never let us down. And let me pledge to you, we will never let you down. As an old ex-second lieutenant of horse cavalry, I consider it an honor to salute you. Thank you.

I'd like to close with one story. Being from this campus, you know of Chappie and the Tuskegee pilots. I'd like to speak with you of a man whose name is not so well known as these -- Ensign Jesse Brown, the first black naval aviator. He was a husband and a father, a deeply religious man, an individual who studied engineering at Ohio State and left college to become a naval aviator. He loved to fly. In December 1950, Ensign Brown was a member of Fighting Squadron 32, aboard an aircraft carrier somewhere off Korea. He flew 20 close air-support missions, providing cover for our outnumbered marines at the Chosin Reservoir. The battle was fierce; our men on the ground were in a desperate situation.

On December 4th, 1950, Ensign Brown's aircraft was hit while making a strafing run against the enemy. With tremendous skill, he managed to crash land on a rough, boulder-strewn slope. He survived the crash, waving to his friends as they circled overhead. They knew he was in trouble when he remained in the cockpit even as smoke began to billow from the wreckage. Finally, a fellow member of his squadron could stand it no more. As the others attacked and held off advancing enemy troops, Lieutenant (jg.) Thomas Hudner ignored the dangers of the mountain terrain and enemy troops and made a deliberate wheels-up landing. He ran to Ensign Brown's plane, now erupting in flames, and found his friend alive, badly injured, and trapped in the cockpit. Lieutenant Hudner shoveled snow with his hands to keep Jesse from the flames, burning his own hand badly in the process. Finally, over the battle-scarred terrain, came a marine helicopter. Lieutenant Hudner, joined by a crewman from the helicopter, struggled desperately to get Jesse out.

Today, you become part of the continuing saga, the history shaped by individuals like Dr. Carver, Chappie James, and Ensign Jesse Brown. What you do with your lives will keep America shining like a beacon of opportunity and freedom for all to see. Thank you for letting me be with you here today. Good luck in the years ahead, and God bless you all.

Mr. Hope. All I want to do, Mr. President -- I just want to welcome you. And I just want to tell you that they've been waiting, you know. They publicized that you were going to be here, so they've been waiting. And they've been waiting. They started at 10 o'clock this morning, and they've been waiting for you. And I can't tell you how happy I am that you're here, but I thought with this particular crowd that you might drop in by parachute.

The President. Robert, I just want to say something to all these people here, and that is that I'm sure that many of them know this has been a career with you. On birthdays, on holidays of all kinds, dating clear back to the draft days before World War II, you were out entertaining our people in uniform. And then through three wars, you went wherever our fighting men and women were to bring a little touch of home to them. And you left, and you were there, and now we're at peace, and you're still doing it. And I think it's just great of you. But also, I would like to say on behalf of your audience: Nothing in the job I have has made me more proud than these young men and women in uniform. Believe me, Bob, they are the finest we've ever had.

Mr. Hope. I love it. I remember when you gave me a tip years ago at the Kentucky Derby. It's the first horse I ever saw make a pit stop. [Laughter] Anyway, it's a thrill to have you here. You've thrilled a lot of people here, and they've been waiting for you, as I told you, since 10 o'clock. And you're awful good to show up.

I commend the Attorney General's decision today in calling for an independent counsel to review this matter. It would be inappropriate to comment upon an investigation. Ed Meese has been a longtime associate and adviser who has acted in the public interest. I have always known him to be a man of honesty and integrity.

The President. Helen, as I say, I can't get into taking questions on that. We're here on a matter of the debt ceiling. It's all important. And I have made answers to those particular questions over and over again and I still stick with them.

The President. Well, thank you all for coming down this morning. And we have several items to discuss, so we might as well get started. This week Congress will take up necessary legislation to raise the public debt limit, and this is something that both Republicans and Democrats in Congress must address. We also need to discuss this morning the budget process and how that can be improved.

But first I want to speak again of my growing concern with the course of legislation in Congress that could have a direct bearing on the arms reduction talks. The House already has attached to the defense authorization bill several unacceptable provisions. The Senate bill is equally troublesome on the strategic defense issues. As I said on Saturday, some in Congress would pull the legs out from under our negotiators with amendments to this legislation, such as those dealing with our strategic defense program and nuclear testing.

I simply can't go along with those who would hand the Soviets, free of charge, what they can't win at the bargaining table. This is no way to run America's foreign policy, and I would be compelled to veto any legislation that endangers our arms reduction efforts or undermines our national defense. Many of you have been outspoken in your opposition to such proposals, and I want to thank you for your steadfast support in working to give me a free hand in the negotiations with the Soviet Union. And I also want to thank Bob Dole and John Warner for sending me a letter with 34 signatures in support of striking an amendment that unduly restricts our SDI program. That's the end of that, and now, shortly, we'll get underway with our discussion.

Note: The President spoke at 9:36 a.m. in the Cabinet Room at the White House, prior to a meeting with Republican congressional leaders. Hashemi-Rafsanjani was the Speaker of the Islamic Consultative Assembly of Iran. A tape was not available for verification of the content of these remarks.

The President published a new white paper on the U.S. Antisatellite (ASAT) Program today. The white paper notes that over the past 2 years the administration has experienced congressional setbacks in the deployment and testing of a U.S. ASAT system. The President's paper expresses his belief that these setbacks have been detrimental to U.S. national security, and states his desire to seek relief from the Congressional moratorium on testing of our non-nuclear miniature vehicle ASAT against objects in space.

The white paper examines the impact to our national security of continuing to allow the Soviets to have the world's only operational ASAT and notes that the Soviet space threat is growing more serious. In this white paper, the President expresses his deep commitment to the U.S. ASAT program as an important deterrent to the Soviets' use of their ASAT system and pledges the President's desire to work with Congress to restore bipartisan support for the U.S. ASAT program.

Thank you very much. And to David Rockefeller and Ambassador George Landau and Robert Helander and all of you, welcome to the White House complex. I think they call this the White House complex because nothing in Washington could ever be simple -- [laughter] -- except maybe Congress' compulsion to spend. [Laughter] And it is a pleasure to have you the members of the Council of Americas here today.

In 1933 Franklin Roosevelt said: ``Common ideals and a community of interests, together with a spirit of cooperation, have led to a realization that the well-being of one nation depends in large measure upon the well-being of its neighbors. It is upon these foundations,'' he said, ``that Pan-Americanism has been built.'' Well, F.D.R. could easily have been speaking for you. For nearly 30 years, the Council of the Americas has promoted understanding and cooperation between the United States and the nations and peoples of Latin America. The council has brought leaders of our private sector together with business and government leaders throughout Latin America. It's helped strengthen the old and enduring friendship between the United States and Latin America. It's been helping to make our nation's great engine of hope and opportunity, the private enterprise system, the engine of hope and opportunity for Latin America as well. And let me just say that the entire hemisphere owes its gratitude to the council, and in particular to your chairman, one of the great citizens of the Americas, David Rockefeller.

Well, from one end of Latin America to the other, the message of reform is on everyone's lips, and despite problems, progress is being made. In the south, Argentina, for example, has reformed its tax code, liberalized trade, and moved to privatize and reform publicly owned companies. Between 1984 and '86, it reduced its budget deficit from over 12 percent of gross domestic product to 4 percent. It has cut inflation dramatically, and once again the economy is growing -- not sluggishly, but at a robust 5.5 percent last year. Meanwhile, on the American border, Mexico has also reduced the number of parastatal companies and is moving toward tax reform and more market-oriented pricing and has begun to make trade more open.

Debt remains a burden for too many countries, but the final and best way to lighten that burden is not by jeopardizing access to the international financial markets but with freer trade, sounder monetary and fiscal policies, and greater economic growth. To take one example, Colombia is following this path and last year was able to make its first voluntary Euro-financing since 1982. And other nations have eased their debt loads with debt-equity swaps. All the countries of Latin America need to rely less on borrowing, by one course or another, and more on investment from abroad. The United States is determined to help the countries of Latin America grow as a young tree grows toward the Sun, pushing the boulder of debt out of the way as they do. We've encouraged continuing private lending. We're encouraging Latin American leaders to trust more in the energies of their people and less on government.

And just as important, we've provided the market that Latin America needs if it is to pay off its foreign debt. We buy nearly half of Latin America's exports, while Europe and Japan together buy less than 10 percent. If our trade balance with Latin America had been the same over the last 5 years as it was in 1981, our overall trade deficit would have averaged $25 billion less a year. Put another way, one quarter of the trade deficit during our administration came about as a result of the debt crisis. We're convinced that if Latin America commits itself to sound policies for economic growth, it's going to bounce back. Then our sales to them will rebound as well, which will be good for everyone. So, you see, this is an investment in the future of our entire hemisphere, an investment in our future as well as Latin America's. That's the best investment the United States can make.

You know, there's a thundering sound that echoes from the peaks and across the plains of Latin America. It's the sound of people marching, not in uniforms, not behind red banners, but rather marching one by one in simple, everyday working clothes -- marching to the polls. Ten years ago, 33 percent of the people of Latin America and the Caribbean lived in democracies or in countries that were turning to democracy; today over 90 percent do. Several of these new democracies have faced crises in the past few years, but unlike earlier times, every crisis has ended with democracy's forces still in control.

In recent years, the American people have begun to work together and make significant progress against the intolerable effects of illegal drugs on our way of life. The possibility of realizing our dream of a drug-free generation of American youth took a giant step forward when young people started to join together and organize around the battle cry of JUST SAY NO TO DRUGS.

Today, Just Say No Clubs are setting a new standard of leadership with young people who want to be drug-free. The clubs are an expression of the concerns and the responsibility of young Americans -- a positive, constructive step against the tyranny of drugs in schools and communities. The demand to be drug-free is one all of us should heed in our homes and workplaces; our Nation has a commitment to the safety and well-being of young people, and much remains to be done if we are to have a drug-free society that refuses to tolerate the presence and use of illegal drugs. The heritage and the promise of America bid all of us to live up to our responsibility to say no to illegal drugs and alcohol abuse.

I salute the young people who demonstrate their common sense by saying no to drugs and who exhibit leadership by encouraging their friends to do the same. I urge every American to support and emulate the commendable actions of these young people who give us the hope that our next generation may be drug-free.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 12th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Every American should know the seriousness of osteoporosis and the need to find ways to cure and prevent it. This disease causes bone mass to decrease, which weakens bones and makes them susceptible to fracture. Osteoporosis afflicts 15 to 20 million Americans, most of them women. It affects half of the women in the United States age 45 or older, and 90 percent of women over 75 -- bringing pain, decreasing mobility, hampering daily functions, and sometimes ending independence. Every year more than a million Americans suffer fractures because of this disease, most often of the spine, wrists, and hips.

Because the number of elderly Americans continues to rise, so does the incidence of osteoporosis. Fortunately, private organizations and the Federal government are conducting research into this malady. Together they are making new research findings and developing new approaches to prevention, diagnosis, and treatment. In this way, working together, we can discover the causes and cure of this major public health problem and eliminate or diminish it.

Sec. 2. The Secretary of Transportation is designated and empowered to receive on behalf of the President any decision of the Department of Transportation (hereinafter referred to as the ``DOT'') subject to Section 801 of the Federal Aviation Act, as amended. The Secretary of Transportation is further designated and empowered to exercise, without the approval, ratification, or other action of the President, the authority of the President under Section 801 of the Federal Aviation Act, as amended, to review and determine not to disapprove any such decision that is not the subject of any written recommendation for disapproval or for a statement of reasons submitted to the Department of Transportation in accordance with section 5(b) of this Order.

Sec. 3. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, decisions of the DOT subject to Section 801 of the Federal Aviation Act, as amended, may be made available by the DOT for public inspection and copying following transmission to Executive departments and agencies pursuant to section 3(c) of this Order.

Sec. 4. (a) Departments and agencies outside of the Executive Office of the President shall raise only matters of national defense or foreign relations in the course of the presidential review established by this Order. All other matters, including those related to regulatory policy, shall be presented to the DOT in accordance with the procedures of the DOT.

Sec. 6. (a) In advising the President with respect to his review of a decision pursuant to Section 801, departments and agencies outside of the Executive Office of the President shall identify with particularity the defense or foreign policy implications of the DOT decision that are deemed appropriate for consideration.

Sec. 7. Individuals within the Executive Office of the President shall follow a policy of: (a) refusing to discuss matters relating to the disposition of a case subject to the review of the President under Section 801 with any interested private party, or an attorney or agent for any such party, prior to the decision by the President or his designee; and (b) referring any written communication from an interested private party, or an attorney or agent for any such party, to the appropriate department or agency outside of the Executive Office of the President. Exceptions to this policy may be made only when the head of an appropriate department or agency outside of the Executive Office of the President personally finds, on a nondelegable basis, that direct written or oral communication between a private party and a person within the Executive Office of the President is needed for reasons of defense or foreign policy.

Sec. 9. This Order is intended solely for the internal guidance of the departments and agencies in order to facilitate the presidential review process. This Order does not confer rights on any private parties.

Sec. 11. The provisions of this Order shall become effective upon publication in the Federal Register and shall govern the review of any proposed decisions of the DOT that have not become final prior to that date under Executive Order No. 12547.

President Reagan. Bill [Bill Plante, CBS News], you know we're not going to take questions at a thing like this. But the error there was discussed. My diary shows that I never brought it up, and it shows that the King, before he left, told me that he was doing that and that he was going to increase the aid.

President Reagan. President Cerezo, it's been a pleasure to welcome you and to get to know you as a respected democratic leader and as a man of strong conviction. The last time a president of Guatemala visited Washington was in July of 1882. And I don't think we should wait another century before the next meeting. As neighbors, our freedom and security depend on our friendship and cooperation. We owe it to our peoples to remain close and stand shoulder to shoulder in defense of human liberty.

As Guatemala's first freely elected civilian President in two decades, you face the challenge of building and protecting democracy while ensuring the economic well-being of your people. Mr. President, your courage and tenacity are well respected here. You have begun a difficult process of economic reform and have taken effective measures to reduce violence and protect human rights. You have supported national reconciliation to heal the wounds of years of political violence. Underscoring your success, Guatemalans of all backgrounds and occupations have rallied to join your democratic crusade. The United States, Mr. President, supports your goals of a strong, economically viable, democratic Guatemala.

And we're also pleased that you joined with the other democratically elected Presidents of Central America to bring democracy and peace to the region and security to your respective countries. The United States is ready to cooperate with you and other democratic leaders in any process that brings democracy to Nicaragua, which is the key to peace in Central America. Democracy, if it is to have a chance in your region, must not be threatened by a dictatorship bent on expansion and supported and maintained by the enemies of freedom. The United States stands with you and others who seek freedom and would live at peace with your neighbors.

Well, President Cerezo, as I bid you farewell, I want to congratulate you once again on your achievements. It's been an honor to have you as our guest. And I look forward to cooperation continued between our two nations in the years ahead.

President Cerezo. Dear Mr. President, I have to tell that I came to the United States to inform how the Guatemalan people is working now to build democracy in that country. We are working in a process. It's a process builded by the Guatemalan people after a long term, a long period of violence and confrontation. We are tired to see our people killed. We are looking for the peace in our country and in the region.

And we came here to discuss how we can contribute with the United States and other countries in our region to build the real peace and the real democracy in our countries. We really believe that democracy, solidarity, and respect of the other countries is the only way to build the peace in our region and in the world. Please, all the Americans, feel in Guatemala a country, friend of the United States, a country who respects the United States, who want to be respected by the United States. Thank you very much for receive us.

I direct you as the United States Trade Representative to notify the Government of Argentina of my determination and to take any actions necessary to implement and monitor it. I also direct that the Section 301 proceeding be suspended temporarily until the Government of Argentina fully implements its decision, at which time I direct you to terminate the proceeding.

In its petition, the National Soybean Processors Association alleged that Argentina's differential export tax system had caused an increase in exports of Argentine soybean meal and oil to third countries and a decrease in U.S. exports of these products. Currently, the Government of Argentina imposes a 15 percent export tax on soybeans, but only a 3 percent tax on soybean meal and oil.

Recently the Government of Argentina informed the United States Trade Representative that it had decided to eliminate the export taxes on soybeans and soybean products within 180 days. When implemented, this action will eliminate the practice under investigation.

President Reagan told the U.S.-Philippine Business Committee today that the time is right to invest in the Philippines. In an Oval Office ceremony for the U.S. charter members, the President praised the commitment of these American corporate leaders, their chairman, Maurice Greenberg, and the sponsoring institution, the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, to expand American trade and investment ties with the Philippines. He recalled the extraordinary progress President Aquino has made toward restoration of democracy and the rekindling of economic growth, and pledged to continue to seek ways to contribute to Philippine economic recovery.

The Business Committee, a joint initiative agreed upon during President Aquino's visit to the United States last September, is designed specifically to promote and facilitate trade and investment flows between the two countries. The group will coordinate strategy with a counterpart of over 30 Philippine business leaders. Committee leaders and their Philippine counterparts will meet next month in Manila for an initial joint planning session.

The President. Thank you all, and welcome to the White House. I'm delighted we could have a few moments together today, and I'm anxious to get to your questions. But first I thought I'd begin by giving you a little report on two stories that have been coming over the wires. They're what those of you in the newsroom would call developing stories that will be, I hope, a source of increasing focus and interest.

When Gramm-Rudman-Hollings was first enacted, there were all sorts of pious declarations from Congress about living up to its yearly deficit targets. However, I have to tell you that that commitment to Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is rapidly disintegrating. The House continues to pass spending bills like the highway authorizations bill that I had to veto recently. As I said at the time, I hadn't seen so much lard since I handed out blue ribbons at the Iowa State Fair. Over in the Senate, a legislative procedure was recently adopted that makes it far easier to override the budget deficit and spending limits. Congress is back to doing what comes natural: playing to the special interests and failing to meet its budget responsibilities. If the Congress continues on this course, we'll go to the American people and make our case. And as this battle heats up, I think it's going to be increasingly understood that the congressional budget process itself, with its missed deadlines and its gigantic catchall spending bills, is fatally flawed.

The executive branch must be given new powers to reach into those pork-barrel spending bills and cut out the waste, and that means giving the President what the Governors of 43 States have: the line-item veto -- or better yet, enhanced rescission authority. I've noticed that everywhere I go, to any audience, I've mentioned that line-item veto, and it gets a strong reaction. Whoever would have thought a few years ago that line-item veto would be an applause line? I think the public is increasingly aware of the problem in the Congress and the need to do something about it. And that's why I think you're also going to see increasing support for the balanced budget amendment. Unlike Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, it would make a balanced budget in the 1990's a matter of the Constitution, and not just a law. We need that amendment.

But there's another twist to the budget problem that you should know about. Well, it's called: Let's cut defense. As I said in my radio address on Saturday, defense spending is always the first thing to be sacrificed, canceled, or delayed, even while the boondoggles sail through untouched. Despite all the progress that we've made in rebuilding our nation's defenses, the Congress now wants to reverse course. For 2 years in a row, it has cut defense appropriations below previous levels in real terms. The current fiscal year 1987 defense budget is actually 6 percent less than the one Congress itself approved for 1985. And even now we hear voices saying that the fiscal year 1988 defense budget should be taken even lower. Now, this isn't only irresponsible from the standpoint of our national security, it also goes to the heart of our bargaining credibility with the Soviets.

At the very moment when vitally important arms reduction treaties are on the table in Geneva, some in the Congress want to take on responsibilities that are not theirs, and I refer here to the business of conducting arms negotiations. And this is the second point that I wanted to make. Several amendments have been offered in the Congress such as those dealing with nuclear testing and SDI that would undermine our negotiating positions in Geneva and tie my hands in the conduct of a vital part of our foreign policy, not to mention the fact it would give the Soviets negotiating victories that they can't win at the bargaining table. These trends are dangerous and if they continue will become the focus of a major national debate. I bring all this to you for a simple reason: The Congress is a large, amorphous institution; it can't be held as accountable as an individual can. But those in the Congress have a duty to report to the folks back home on where they stand on these issues, and I think you would agree that no one plays a more vital role than you in asking them about these issues and their stand on them.

Incidentally, on that short answer that I gave you on mortally wounded -- I have to say that I get around quite a bit in the country, and the audiences range from blue-collar workers in a factory, as they did just a few days ago, to students and their families at a graduation ceremony. And I haven't seen any evidences that I've been mortally wounded, nor do the people seem to be unhappy about what we've been doing here.

Q. Mr. President, Meredith Oakley with the Arkansas Democrat. Mr. McFarlane has claimed that he briefed you dozens of times regarding the activities that were going on regarding contra aid, and yet you have repeatedly said that you were not aware of any of the nuances of the things that were going on. In light of his testimony, what action have you taken to make sure that your directives that the NSC [National Security Council] not be involved in implementing such operations -- what actions have you taken to see that those directives are followed out?

The President. Well, we have taken actions in that, and I know that Frank Carlucci has made a number of changes there in the NSC. But I think something that's gone on in all of these investigations -- that could also lead to your question -- is this linking of Iran and contra aid. And they've seemed to try to portray me as claiming to be uninformed about everything.

No, in the Iranian situation, in which representatives of their government, not the Khomeini -- we were not doing business with him at all. We were doing business with people that could have gotten shot if exposed as dealing with us, and they were thinking in terms of what might be a future Iranian Government in view of the health of Khomeini and so forth. And they wanted to make a contact to see if we couldn't discuss how we could have better relations. I immediately took them up on that.

We've been, for months and months -- years, as a matter of fact -- trying to find ways to bring an end to that brutal war there that's killed a million people so far. And they were the ones that brought up the subject of arms for them, first of all, to enhance their stature, but also to prove that they were talking to representatives that could reach up to the top of our government -- in return for that -- because we had put Iran on the ``no trade'' list due to their support of terrorists.

Our answer to that was, well, they could do something -- we told them we couldn't do business for that reason. They replied that they were opposed also to the support of terrorism. Well, we said there's a way to prove it. Maybe you'd like to use your influence with the Hizballah [radical Shi'ite terrorist organization in Lebanon], which has a kind of philosophical relationship with Iran, to get our people back, our hostages. And so this is what happened in that situation.

It was kept covert to protect the lives of those people we were dealing with. When the news leaked and it suddenly burst all over the world, we were very concerned about that. But out of that, for the first time, we learned that I had not been informed -- that our representatives somehow -- there was more money than the $12 million that we received and that some of that money was deposited in an account that it was reported funneled aid to the contras. Now, this was all new. I am still waiting to find out the final details of where did that extra money come from, who did it belong to, and where did it go.

Now, the Iranian situation -- or I mean the contra situation -- and I'm going to start calling them freedom fighters. Contra was a term of derogation imposed on them by the Sandinistas. These are people who are fighting for democracy and freedom in their country. And here there's no question about my being informed. I've known what's going on there. As a matter of fact, for quite a long time now, a matter of years, I have been publicly speaking of the necessity of the American people to support our program of aid to those freedom fighters down there in order to prevent there being established a Soviet beachhead here in the Western Hemisphere, in addition to the one we already have in Cuba. And to suggest that I am just finding out or that things are being exposed that I didn't know about -- no. Yes, I was kept briefed on that. As a matter of fact, I was very definitely involved in the decisions about support to the freedom fighters. It was my idea to begin with.

The President. I'm having some trouble remembering that, but then I want to tell you that there were so many things going on and so many reports, and some of this was during the time that I was laid up in the hospital and so forth. I don't recall ever anything being suggested in the line of ransom. I do know that we were constantly receiving ideas and exploring ways in which we could try to get our hostages back. And I believe this is a definite responsibility of the government, and we should do that.

But it's possible that what we're talking about was use of money to pay people and hire individuals who could effect a rescue of our people there. And I've never thought of that as ransom. But, again, I'm having some trouble, just as Bud had some trouble himself with some of the questions that were asked him. There was an awful lot going on, and it's awfully easy to be a little short of memory.

The President. Yes, but I would suggest that never would it be termed ransom, because that, from the very first -- we will not pay a ransom to kidnapers, because it's only going to cause more taking of hostages.

The President. Anyone who would tie things like that together -- they're just -- it's totally dishonest. No, there has never been any such thing. I have not myself directly ever engaged in soliciting from other countries, but I know that this wasn't even prohibited by the Boland amendment. As a matter of fact, it specified that under the Secretary of State we should encourage such support to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua.

It hasn't been just the Soviet Union, whose help has been counted in the billions. Other Communist countries, Libya, the PLO -- all of these, we're aware, have been providing help and support to the Sandinistas, to that Communist government there. And so, there was nothing wrong, and I don't see anything wrong with other countries that share our feeling about democracy -- even though this is in this hemisphere -- would come to the aid of these freedom fighters, just as we have come to the aid of causes similar to this, not only in the Western Hemisphere but in other countries in Asia and Europe as well -- Africa.

And so, I don't see any tie of that kind at all. And I see nothing wrong, also, with the joining in by volunteer groups and individuals, citizens here in our own country, of helping out in that cause. I'd like to call attention to the fact that in speaking to the British Parliament several years ago I called attention to the fact that only the Communist bloc seemed to be busy in trying to further spread their philosophy to other countries, and I suggested that we of the democracies should have some plans of doing that. And such a thing was organized in which we have been -- the democratic nations of the world, together -- trying to help democracy.

The President. Well, our own pollster, who I think is the best in the business, who's been with us for years, has found that my approval rating stays at 53. It is true that there have been peaks in which it has shot up higher than that. But 53 happens to be the same rating in the sixth year of the Presidency of a two-term president -- Dwight Eisenhower had that rating. And it is the only time in the history of ratings that in the sixth year of a two-term Presidency has a President had that high a rating. That's the highest.

But also, I think it's the way the questions are asked. For example, I know a question in a poll that revealed a great majority didn't believe that I had told all the truth to the people. But someone was smart enough to ask -- a poll of that kind -- another question: How many of them thought it was all right if they weren't hearing the truth? And a huge majority of that majority that thought I wasn't said they believed there were things that a President shouldn't be forced to tell the people while they were going on.

I have been telling the truth. I told the truth when I went before the press and before both the leadership of both Houses of the Congress. When the first hint came that there was more money than the $12 million -- as I spoke a moment ago, telling about that -- I told everything that I knew in both instances. And I am still waiting, as are others, to find out some of those answers, because I had not been informed of anything or any extra money and so forth. But I also know, too, that a recent question has just been taken by a pollster, and you know, a lot depends on how the questions are worded. And this one -- speaking of the freedom fighters in Nicaragua -- asked do the people believe and will they support opposition to the establishment of a Soviet beachhead here in the Western Hemisphere, and 80 percent said, yes, they would advocate support for resistance to such a thing.

Each year, World Trade Week celebrates the many benefits of international trade to our country and all countries. This commerce strengthens our economy in many ways. Exports expand our business and employment opportunities: in the growing world marketplace, over 5 million American jobs are related to foreign sales. Imports also enrich our lives. Foreign goods increase consumer choice both in terms of quality and price. Competition from foreign producers provides an important stimulus to American producers to maintain and enhance the quality of American-made products.

Americans can be proud of the role our country plays in international trade. We are the world's largest participant in international commerce. We have also taken a leading role in ensuring the expansion of international trade around the world. Our initiative has made possible successive monetary and trade agreements that have integrated world markets and offered unprecedented prosperity. We have extended friendship to former adversaries and have seen them grow into valued trading partners. Through our impetus, the developing and newly industrialized countries become fully accepted into the world trading community.

As increased trade has led to increased integration of world economies, the growth of the world economy has become more dependent on achieving better coordination of macroeconomic policies and continued adoption of sound microeconomic policies to facilitate structural adjustment. Thus, it is crucial that cooperative solutions be found to the problems faced in the international economy.

For its part, the United States must work to regain and sustain our competitiveness in world markets; continue with its efforts to expand and improve the ground rules of world trade provided by the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade; and resist pressures toward protectionism. The futile prescription of protectionism would only fuel inflation; lower economic growth; and invite retaliatory policies against our exports.

It is also important for our trading partners to do their part -- by dismantling protective barriers around their home markets and allowing more open competition; by adopting fiscal, monetary, and exchange rate policies that are in line with goals of stable growth with low inflation; and by helping resolve the problem of Third World debt.

The challenges we face are difficult. They require the strong resolve of all nations. We can and will succeed in these ventures that offer much for the American people and for the peoples of the world.

It is most fitting that we take time to salute the role of fishing in the lives of Americans. Fishing greatly aids our economy, is a source of healthful food, promotes respect for sound conservation and for the bounty and wonder of our natural resources, and introduces millions of people to the benefits of outdoor recreation.

Today, roughly a quarter of all Americans call sport fishing one of their favorite outdoor activities. Fishing represents a fine opportunity for all of us, especially children and young adults, to discover a wholesome, relaxing, and enjoyable pastime. Fishing can teach us the importance of clean water and a stable aquatic environment. Recreational fishing also contributes much to our economy, and each year provides millions of dollars in revenue for fishery restoration projects. Fishermen take pride in our abundant fishery resources and work diligently for their continued well-being.

Rita Hayworth was one of our country's most beloved stars. Glamorous and talented, she gave us many wonderful moments on stage and screen and delighted audiences from the time she was a young girl. In her later years, Rita became known for her struggle with Alzheimer's disease. Her courage and candor, and that of her family, were a great public service in bringing worldwide attention to a disease which we all hope will soon be cured. Nancy and I are saddened by Rita's death. She was a friend who we will miss. We extend our deep sympathy to her family.

Those provisions are unobjectionable. I must note my serious concern, however, with the extension of subsection 2(b)(3) of Public Law 99 - 656. That provision requires a particular bankruptcy trustee, in a case identified by reference to the circumstances of its bankruptcy proceedings, to continue to pay certain benefits to retired former employees. Under the Constitution, the Congress is authorized to establish ``uniform Laws on the subject of Bankruptcies throughout the United States.'' Subsection 2(b)(3) singles out a specific firm. It amounts to a private bankruptcy law, which is beyond the Congress' constitutional authority to enact. I believe, therefore, the extension of this provision is unconstitutional.

In considering this legislation, I am of course aware that when the Congress enacted the temporary bankruptcy provisions of Public Laws 99 - 591 and 99 - 656 it did so for the express purpose of ``freezing'' the status quo, while it considered possible permanent amendments of the Bankruptcy Code in the area of pension benefits. I understand that these deliberations are still under way. For that reason, and because the extensions contained in S. 903 are both temporary and brief, I am persuaded in this unique circumstance to give the Congress additional time to ponder a more permanent and constitutionally sound response to the problems facing retired workers by approving S. 903.

In approving this legislation, however, I must once again underscore my belief that the purported extension of subsection 2(b)(3) of Public Law 99 - 656 constitutes an unconstitutional private bankruptcy law. Because of its unconstitutional nature, I have directed the Attorney General not to defend it.

Thank you all very much. And Secretary Weinberger, Chairman Olch, Dean Sanford, members of the graduating class, and ladies and gentlemen, I must tell you before I start how relieved I was when Dean Sanford told me that I was going to walk on after the procession. I thought that I was going to come in with the dean, and with his reputation, I'd been afraid that the good news was that we might perch on the backstage rafters and rappel in -- [laughter] -- and the bad news, that we'd jump from 10,000 feet. [Laughter] But it's a pleasure to be here to welcome you the graduates of this the West Point and Annapolis and Colorado Springs for physicians into your new profession as military and Public Health Service doctors.

But seriously, there's no doubt about what you, with your hard work, have accomplished. The British poet Robert Louis Stevenson, once said: ``There are men and classes of men that stand out; the soldier and the sailor, not unfrequently, and the physician almost as a rule.'' Well, today you become both: soldier, sailor, or airman and physician. Today you enter one of the oldest and most honored ranks in the service of America's freedom. Today you take up the flag once carried by men like Army Major Walter Reed, Rear Admiral Edward Stitt, Air Force Major General Harry Armstrong, and Public Health Service Surgeon Joseph Goldberger.

Yes, ever since the Continental Congress established the Army and Navy medical services in 1775, patriots like these men and women, and like you, have carried their powers of healing onto the battlefields and to swamps and deserts, mountains and plains, all around the world. Their accomplishments reach into almost every area of medicine. For almost a century, for example, America's uniformed services have been the world's leader in the battle against tropical diseases. They entered the fight in the jungles of Panama after Walter Reed and his team took less than a year to determine the cause of yellow fever. Today, after decades of progress, your faculty at USUHS is helping military medicine to continue leading the charge. It is testing new vaccines for malaria as well as for adult dysentery, a major tropical killer.

In field after field, America's doctors in uniform have pushed forward the battle lines of medical treatment, even while under fire. Military physicians developed the use of massive blood transfusions in treating shock and trauma. They pioneered burn research and treatment. They found how man could live at higher and higher altitudes and finally in outer space itself. And again, of course, your faculty continues the tradition, leading in such areas as research on vascular surgery and reconstruction, the development of treatments for lacerated eyes, and in developing computer graphic tools for medical teaching and research.

America's physicians in uniform have always been leaders, and in the 10 years since its first class, USUHS itself has found a place as a leader in American medicine, a leader in teaching as well as in research. As students, you went through one of the most rigorous programs in the country. You took 640 hours of training in military medicine on top of your standard curriculum. You prepared yourselves to treat patients anywhere in the world, under any circumstance, because yours is the only medical school in America that trains physicians to be ready for duty on the bottom of the ocean or on the surface of the Moon and anyplace in between. Recently, the noted Houston surgeon, Dr. Ken Mattox, echoed the medical community's growing esteem when he said, in picking interns and residents: ``Give me a USUHS student any day.'' Yes, today USUHS is the kind of school that Congressman F. Edward Hebert had in mind during his 25-year crusade to establish a military university for medicine. It's helping our military become, in medicine as in so many areas, the best it's ever been.

You know, among the most gratifying parts of my job is visiting our Army, Navy, and Air Force bases around the world. Time and again, I've been told that our young recruits are the best we've ever had -- the best educated, the most dedicated -- and I've seen it for myself. For a long time, some people said that the weak economy was the reason. But then we began on what is now 54 months of economic expansion, along the way creating over 13,600 million jobs and still counting. Today a greater proportion of Americans is at work than ever before in our history, and yet we're continuing to get the best recruits.

A new burst of quality -- that's what I've heard about USUHS applicants, too. USUHS has always selected outstanding classes, from that first class of 32 over a decade ago to this year's entering class of 163. But I understand that the quality of the total pool of applicants from which the classes are chosen shot up 6 years ago, just as the quality of all those who wanted to enter the military did. And again and again, when you ask why, the answer has come back more or less the same: It has something to do with patriotism, service. It's again a proud thing to wear the uniforms of the United States. It's again a noble thing to serve in the cause of freedom and the defense of liberty around the world.

There are some who say we've been in a period of ``me, me, me'' the last 6 years. Well, I say they should go to any American military base in the world or they should come here today. They should meet you, America's young patriots. You're the best we've ever had. You carry on a more than 200-year-old tradition of service, and you carry it as proudly today as it has ever been carried. And that goes for your faculty as well. USUHS has more than 1,500 faculty members, most of them affiliated with other schools or institutions, but who donate their time to USUHS, donate it because that's a way to serve our country.

Duty, honor, country -- the motto of West Point. And like the men and women of West Point and all of our military institutions, our physicians in uniform have never failed us. They've been ready when called; ready for hardship and sacrifice, for adventure and exploration; ready to extend the hand of compassion and healing care; ready, if called, to give the last full measure of their devotion. And you now join that company. You now enter the service of your country in one of the world's most honored professions: that of physician.

There's been a great deal of talk lately about trade, some of it suggesting we should protect American companies from foreign competition. I don't believe the American people are afraid of competition. That was made clear to me when I visited a Harley-Davidson plant recently. It's a great story; let me tell you about it.

Not that long ago, it was being said that Harley-Davidson, America's preeminent manufacturer of motorcycles, couldn't keep up, that the company was running out of gas and sputtering to a stop. Well, one of the worst mistakes anybody can make is to bet against Americans. At Harley-Davidson the workers and management got together and decided not only to compete but to win. With unity of purpose and a commitment to excellence, they cut the hours of work needed to make a motorcycle by one-third. Their inventory was reduced by two-thirds. And they tripled the number of defect-free machines they shipped. Productivity was improved. Prices were kept under control; on some bikes, they even lowered prices. While doing all this, they expanded their product line from 3 models 10 years ago to 24 this year.

Today, Harley-Davidson is once again a leader in developing new motorcycle technology. They're now selling more and more bikes on virtually every continent of the Earth. In fact, they are the only major motorcycle manufacturer in the world to have increased production last year. And, yes, they have also increased exports. These Americans, confident in themselves and their product, have asked that their special tariff be removed so that they can meet their competition head on. Current law provides companies like Harley-Davidson breathing room by applying temporary tariffs. Unlike some of the broad, sweeping protectionist legislation being bandied about in Washington, the idea is, ultimately, to increase trade between nations, not impede it.

When you hear talk about a tough trade bill, remember that being tough on trade and commerce, the lifeblood of the economy, will have the worst possible consequences for the consumer and the American worker. First, it will drive up the price of much of what we buy. But worse than that, it could drag us into an economy-destroying trade war. I'm old enough to remember the last time a so-called tough trade bill passed Congress. It was called Smoot-Hawley, and it helped give us, or at least deepened, the Great Depression of the 1930's. Well, the way up and out of the trade deficit is not protectionism, not bringing down the competition, but instead the answer lies in improving our products and increasing our exports. The Government should work to create the conditions in which fair trade will flourish. We should be trying to foster the growth of two-way trade, not trying to put up roadblocks, to open foreign markets, not close our own. As I told them at the Harley-Davidson plant, it's time to gun the engines, not put on the brakes.

Well, after visiting the Harley-Davidson people, it's hard not to have confidence that, in the years ahead, America is going to be even more competitive, more aggressive, and more productive. We can meet the challenge and bring the trade deficit down. And the same is true of that other deficit we face. Each year our government has been spending more than it receives in tax revenues, pushing up the Federal debt. Some elected officials would solve the deficit spending problem simply by taking money out of your pockets via tax increases. Well, that would be unfair to you and could well knock the legs out from under our economy. I believe the more responsible course, the fairest approach, is to get Federal spending under control.

This year total Federal spending is projected to increase only 2\1/2\ percent over 1986, well below the rate of inflation. The U.S. Government will command less of the overall economy than it has since 1981, nearly a full percent of gross national product less than last year. But the budget and other legislation now being considered by the Democratic Congress threatens to undo the progress that we've made over the last 6 years. They would increase spending for a wide array of programs and raise taxes to reduce the deficit.

Well, that's not my idea of deficit reduction, and I don't think it's yours, either. This is not just an issue for Washington powerbrokers. It is something all of us should be concerned about, and I hope you will let your representatives know where you stand. Until next week, thanks for listening, and God bless you.

Secretary Baldrige, Ambassador Yeutter, and Secretary Lyng, good morning to all of you. It's a great pleasure to have all of you here, not only to celebrate World Trade Week but to celebrate you, the men and women at the cutting edge of American competitiveness. One of America's greatest assets is the skill and professionalism of its businessmen and women, and entrepreneurs. The can-do spirit of our business community is in stark contrast to the inefficiency and poor performance often associated with other economic systems.

But it is truly wonderful to have you here. Export leaders like you are living proof that we can compete in world markets. The latest trade statistics, which were released last Thursday, clearly show that things are improving and we're on the right path. Our overall trade deficit declined in March, closing out the third consecutive quarter with a substantial decline. The data on the actual trade volume, the physical amount of goods we import and export, suggests that we will continue to see these kinds of improvements in the months ahead. More important, exports rose by $3.6 billion to the highest level since March of 1981.

I've said all along that the solution to our trade deficit is to export more, not import less by closing our borders. I recognize that the substantial improvement in exports is due to people like you. You demonstrate that the American entrepreneurial spirit is still the guiding spirit of the world economy, just as the American economic recovery of the 1980's has been the energizing force of world growth. That recovery wasn't brought on by raising taxes. It wasn't brought on by protectionism -- trade barriers, tariffs, and quotas -- which is simply another form of taxes. Our economic renaissance was brought on because we cut tax rates and keep cutting them. We slashed unnecessary and counterproductive regulations and held back the destructionist threat to world trade while aggressively working to open markets abroad.

If you want to see how strong our expansion is you just have to look at the numbers -- and the numbers that really count. Unemployment just took another dive to 6.2 percent, the lowest level since the start of the decade. Three hundred and fifty thousand jobs were created last month alone, even more than the already impressive average of 257,000 jobs a month that we've been creating since this expansion began. Altogether, that's 13.6 million new jobs, and a full 60 percent of those jobs are in high-paying occupations, such as managerial, professional, and technical. So much for the so-called declining middle class. Since 1982 manufacturing productivity is shooting ahead at the fastest pace in 20 years, and output has soared almost 30 percent. In the last 4 years we've added more manufacturing jobs than either Europe or Japan. So much for deindustrialization. Venture capital is back on the upswing, presaging another boom on top of a boom of American inventiveness and entrepreneurial growth. In other words, what Europe has called the American miracle just gets more miraculous as our expansion continues.

There's a major danger on the horizon, one specter looming over all those millions of new jobs, threatening to wipe them out as fast as we created them. I'm talking about the destructionist threat. Some call it protectionism, but we saw in the 1930's with the Smoot-Hawley bill what that kind of thinking produces: industrial collapse, ballooning unemployment, and economic misery. At the same time we're working aggressively to close -- open, I should say, closed markets abroad, and we've been more aggressive than any administration in history insisting on free and fair trade practices with our foreign trading partners. Right now in our competitive legislation we're proposing calls for renewed authority to negotiate with our trading partners reduced trade barriers and tougher sanctions against unfair trade practices, antitrust reform, strengthening the export trading company program, amending the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, product liability reform, intellectual property protection, strengthening U.S. trade laws to reduce trade barriers to create fair opportunities abroad, and export control reform.

But we'll continue to oppose any legislation that threatens to plunge us back into the despair of the 1930's. I'm not going to let political grandstanding destroy millions of American jobs. I renew my promise today: Any protectionist legislation that comes across my desk is going to get a big, fat V-E-T-O written right across it. When our tax reform package is fully in place and all Americans have received the tax rate cuts they've been promised, then America will have the newest, sleekest, most competitive tax system in the world. Together with dynamos like you leading American industry to conquer markets abroad, I have no doubt that the American miracle has just begun.

I have an announcement here that I would like to make that is aimed directly at you of the press. I know and I share the sense of concern and anger that Americans feel over the yesterday's tragedy in the Persian Gulf. We have protested this attack in the strongest terms and are investigating the circumstances of the incident. When our investigation of the facts is completed, I will report to the American people about this matter and any further steps that are warranted. For that reason I have convened a meeting of the National Security Planning Group to review the entire situation in the Persian Gulf.

In the meanwhile, I want to express my deepest sympathies to the families of the brave men killed and injured yesterday aboard the U.S.S. Stark. Their loss and suffering will not be in vain. The mission of the men of the U.S.S. Stark, safeguarding the interests of the United States and the free world in the Gulf, remains crucial to our national security and to the security of our friends throughout the world. The hazards to our men and women in uniform in the defense of freedom can never be understated. The officers and crew of the U.S.S. Stark deserve our highest admiration and appreciation. And I would also like to express my sincere gratitude to Saudi Arabia and Bahrain for their prompt assistance in responding to the stricken U.S.S. Stark.

This tragic incident underscores the need to bring the Iran-Iraq war to the promptest possible end. We and the rest of the international community must redouble our diplomatic efforts to hasten the settlement that will preserve the sovereignty and territorial integrity of both Iran and Iraq. At the same time, we remain deeply committed to supporting the self-defense of our friends in the gulf and to ensuring the free flow of oil through the Strait of Hormuz.

It should be noted that the Council's recommendations do not reflect the Administration's views on reauthorization of the Older Americans Act. I urge the Congress to act favorably on the reauthorization proposal transmitted to the Congress by the Department of Health and Human Services.

The belligerents in the war, Iran and Iraq, will be formally notified today of this change in status. Under this status, aircraft of either country flying in a pattern which indicates hostile intent will be fired upon, unless they provide adequate notification of their intentions. The administration will consult with Congress on these changes and related issues.

We have issued a vigorous protest to the Government of Iraq. We have noted the profound regrets issued by the Iraqi Ambassador in the name of his Foreign Minister and Iraqi President Saddam Husayn. However, we are awaiting official notification of this statement. We expect an apology and compensation for the men who died in this tragic incident. We also seek compensation for the ship. The President shares the sense of concern and anger that Americans feel at this time. We will monitor the situation on a continuing basis.

Section 104(b)(4) of Title 17 of the United States Code provides that when the President finds that a particular foreign nation extends, to works by authors who are nationals or domiciliaries of the United States of America or to works first published in the United States, copyright protection on substantially the same basis as that on which the foreign nation extends protection to works of its own nationals and domiciliaries and works first published in that nation, the President may by proclamation extend protection under that title to works of which one or more of the authors is, on the date of first publication, a national, domiciliary, or sovereign authority of that nation, or which are first published in that nation.

Satisfactory assurances have been received that as of April 10, 1987, the Republic of Singapore has granted to works of United States nationals and domiciliaries and works first published in the United States protection in Singapore on the same basis as works of Singaporean nationals and domiciliaries and works first published in Singapore, and that such protection also has been extended to works of United States nationals and domiciliaries and works first published in the United States, which were in the Singapore public domain on April 9, 1987, if such works still enjoy copyright protection in the United States.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 18th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Today, as always, travelers from our country and overseas cross the United States to meet the American people, to see our cities, plains, and natural wonders, and to visit the historic sites of our Nation. We do well each year to pay tribute to tourism for all it means to our way of life and to understanding and friendship among people of many lands.

Travelers in the United States truly have a panorama of opportunities before them. This year, as we celebrate the Bicentennial of the Constitution, let us remember that the record of the winning and keeping of our precious liberties is written all across the face of our beautiful land. In countless American places -- courtyards and country lanes, fields and forts, monuments and memorials, battlefields and bridges, cemeteries and sanctuaries, hills and homes and halls -- we can ever read the struggles and sacrifices of a people and a glorious cause. That is nowhere more true than in Philadelphia, the home of so much of the history of liberty and our headquarters for the Bicentennial of the Constitution.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Q. Mr. President, you are determined to protect the flow of oil through the Strait of Hormuz. Yet some say your administration is not doing anything about bringing to an end the major cause of the threat, namely the Gulf war. There is a conviction in the area that your administration is taking advantage of that war in order to secure military facilities. Do you think that this reflects the reality of the American attitude?

The President. For more than 6 years, the war between Iran and Iraq has gone on, resulting in tremendous suffering and cost to Iran and Iraq as well as bringing instability to the Gulf region. As I have said many times, the United States is deeply concerned over the war's continuation. We are strongly interested in seeing it brought to a speedy conclusion through negotiations which will preserve the sovereignty and territorial integrity of both Iran and Iraq. Through our campaign to slow down and shut off the military supply pipelines to Iran, through our support of mediation efforts by the appropriate international organizations, we are working with many other governments in seeking to create a situation where the parties will sit down and negotiate.

At the same time, we also have a well-known policy regarding the Gulf. We are firmly committed to assisting our friends there with their collective and individual self-defense efforts. We are also strongly committed to ensuring the free flow of oil through the Strait of Hormuz and hold as a very important tenet the principle of freedom of navigation in international waters. In brief, we want to see this long, costly, destabilizing, and tragic war brought to a negotiated end in the quickest time possible.

Q. You acknowledged your mistake in the secret dealings with Iran, and you said that the Arab countries understand the implications behind this. The consequences of the deal are still reverberating within your administration and on the battleground of this war; therefore, may we frankly know from your exact policy towards both Iran and Iraq?

The President. The United States is neutral in the Iran-Iraq war. We do not now ship weapons to Iran or Iraq, nor do we intend to do so. This policy is firm. Through Operation Staunch we try to persuade third countries not to supply Iran with arms, munitions, and dual-use items it needs to continue fighting. Operation Staunch is not directed towards Iraq; that country for some time has agreed to negotiate a settlement to the war. Iran remains the intransigent party and is occupying Iraqi territory and trying to take more.

The United States has taken an active role in searching for a peaceful solution to this tragic war. We want neither victor nor vanquished and continue to work for a settlement that will preserve the sovereignty and territorial integrity of both Iran and Iraq. I have urged the international community, in the appropriate fora and through the appropriate mechanisms, to work for an immediate cease-fire, negotiations, and withdrawal to borders.

In line with this general policy, we have been actively consulting with other interested governments regarding efforts to bring the war to a negotiated end. I have asked Assistant Secretary [of State for Near Eastern and South Asian Affairs] Murphy to visit the Gulf to consult on this and other important issues of mutual interest. We believe the U.N. Security Council has an important role to play in the effort to end the Gulf war and would strongly support effective action by the United Nations to end this conflict. We have been consulting closely with the Arab League in efforts to gain support from other members of the Security Council. We welcome the effort by the Arab League in this regard.

Q. A lot of talk is being heard about adopting the idea of holding an international conference attended by all of the parties concerned to solve the Arab-Israeli conflict. Nevertheless, the American attitude is not clear. Would the U.S. agree to participate in such a conference if it is going to lead to the formation of two independent states, Israel and Palestine, and what would Arafat's role be?

The President. We remain committed to a negotiated peace between Israel and all of its Arab neighbors. To this end, we have stated our willingness to explore all possibilities, including an international conference, that might lead to direct negotiations and a peaceful settlement. Such a conference must lead promptly to direct negotiations and must not interfere with those negotiations. In recent weeks, this process of exploration has produced what we believe to be significant progress toward negotiations which would offer serious prospects of reaching agreements between the parties on peace. Much remains to be done before one can safely express optimism on further developments, but we are encouraged and will continue our efforts.

As I stated in my September 1, 1982, peace proposal, we firmly believe that self-government by the Palestinians of the West Bank and Gaza in association with Jordan offers the best chance for a durable, just, and lasting peace. We have always recognized that Palestinians should participate at every stage of the peace process. The form that Palestinian representation takes is a question that must be resolved by the parties to the conflict. The actions of the recent Palestine National Congress in Algiers indicate a negative, unrealistic attitude toward the peace process.

Q. The U.S.S.R. gave Egypt the means for settling her debts and granted her easy loans, although the relations between the two countries are relatively poor. But even though you consider Egypt as a friendly state, you refuse to reschedule her military debts and you impose stringent conditions on financial aid. Is this in your opinion friendship, or are you aiming at some other objectives with this ambivalent attitude?

The President. There is nothing ambivalent about our friendship for Egypt or our commitment to help meet Egypt's security requirements and development needs. We have a record unmatched by any other country. Since 1974 the United States has provided Egypt over $22 billion in economic and military assistance. Despite sharp reductions in our global foreign assistance budget, we have maintained funding for our Egypt program at $2.3 billion this year. We work closely with the Egyptian Government to ensure that our economic aid contributes effectively to Egypt's development goals. Our assistance has brought improvements in health, education, housing, and other basic needs, while also providing crucial balance of payments support to counter the effects of declining oil revenues and other external events.

Our assistance to Egypt is just one aspect of the special relationship that exists between our two countries. I am committed to working with President Mubarak to see our relationship expand and flourish.

Q. Your bitter experience in Lebanon pushed America to refrain from interfering in Lebanese affairs. Have you now entered into a new deal, a part of which contains a solution to the Lebanese problem, or will you leave local parties to solve it, and what could such a proposal be after 13 years of civil war?

The President. United States policy in Lebanon has for many years been based on support for Lebanon's unity, sovereignty and independence, and the withdrawal of all foreign forces. The United States continues to support an end to fighting in Lebanon, the restoration of a political dialog that could lead to national reconciliation and political reform, the strengthening of Lebanon's legally constituted central government, dissolution of illegal militias, and the extension of its effective authority throughout the country.

The lessons of Lebanon's 11 years of strife are clear, however; no outside power, however well-intentioned, can be a substitute for efforts by the Lebanese themselves, nor can Lebanon's political problems be solved by force. We and others are ready to help, but without initiative and effort by the Lebanese themselves, the assistance of foreign powers will be fruitless.

The President. We believe that any negotiations designed to lead to a Middle East peace must address the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people, together with the security of all states in the region. We have always recognized that Palestinians should participate at every stage of the peace process. Any agreement on the final status of the West Bank and Gaza should receive the prior consent of the inhabitants of those territories.

We will not support the establishment of an independent Palestinian state in the West Bank and Gaza, nor will we support annexation or permanent control by Israel. As I stated in my September 1, 1982, peace proposal, it is the firm view of the United States that self-government by the Palestinians of the West Bank and Gaza in association with Jordan offers the best chance for a durable, just, and lasting peace.

Q. Gorbachev rejected your invitation to visit Washington, DC, on the grounds that he does not want to waste his time. Does your administration feel that, as a result of the Iran-contra affair, it has lost the international stature it needs to carry on strategic debates with Moscow?

The President. The U.S.-Soviet relationship is fundamentally competitive and will likely remain that way. At the same time, the U.S. seeks to ensure that this competition remains peaceful and as stable and predictable as possible. We have established a framework, based on realism and political and military strength, that provides the basis for a productive U.S.-Soviet dialog in all areas of concern to us: arms control, bilateral exchanges, human rights, and regional issues. Through this dialog, including two meetings between myself and General Secretary Gorbachev, the U.S. has made progress in a number of areas, including arms control. But in other areas, such as regional conflicts, we remain very far apart. My invitation to General Secretary Gorbachev remains open. We're ready for hard and fruitful work ahead; I hope the Soviets are, as well.

Q. The state of Kuwait is a firm believer in neutrality and maintains a policy of balance between East and West in her international relations. Her position on the battlefield between Iran and Iraq has exposed her to further difficulties and dangers. What is your evaluation of Kuwait's role in that conflict within the overall relationship between our two countries?

The President. We have had long and harmonious relations with Kuwait and all the Gulf States. With Kuwait, our relationship goes back to the early days of its independence some 26 years ago. We admire Kuwait's many achievements.

Because of our strong ties with Kuwait and the other Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) States, and the common interests we share in stability in the region, we have been in close discussions for some time with all the GCC States on the war and the dangers it poses. I have made clear on numerous occasions that the United States would regard an expansion of the war as a major threat to its interests as well as to that of its friends in the region. We understand the difficult situation in which Kuwait has been placed by the pressures stemming from the Iran-Iraq conflict. We admire the courage and diplomatic skill with which Kuwait has met these pressures.

Q. Mr. President, capitalism and free enterprise are well-established principles in the West. You are an advocate of nonintervention by states in the functions of the private sector. Aren't Western governments denying these principles in their efforts to keep the price of oil low?

The President. The United States and other Western governments represented in the International Energy Agency continue to emphasize the importance of market forces and sound energy policy in achieving supply-demand balance. We do not work toward maintaining oil prices at any level, whether high or low. We have no preconceived notion of where world or individual countries production or pricing levels should be. We continue to believe these should be determined by the free market, operating without government interference or any other form of market manipulation.

Q. Recent events have proven that foreign investments in the U.S.A. are not immune from political considerations, although the free market economy of the U.S. is supposed to be free of state intervention -- investments by Iran, Argentina, and Libya are examples. Mr. President, do we, as Arabs with some of our surpluses invested in the U.S.A., have to think twice about whether our investments are safe and not subject to being frozen?

The President. The United States remains the most open and flexible capital market in the world, and the United States Government remains committed to the preservation of this openness. Responsible foreign governments, and investors from their countries, need not fear that their assets will be affected by U.S. political goals. Statistics clearly show that we continue to hold the confidence of foreign investors. Total foreign investment in the United States -- including direct investment, portfolio investment, and foreign government holdings -- more than doubled from just over $500 billion in 1980 to $1.3 trillion by the end of 1986.

I'm here to celebrate the graduation of the public high schools in the Hamilton County and Chattanooga city school systems. And I know there are fine private and parochial high schools here as well. I don't think any other city in America can claim to have two graduates of an area school in the United States Cabinet.

Over the past decade, the schools of the Chattanooga area and all of Tennessee have made great strides in improving the quality of education. And many have received national recognition for quality. And I'm here to recognize that quality. When it comes to quality in a school, the important thing is not what goes in, but what comes out, not how much money is spent or how new the buildings are, but how well students read, write and do math and what they know about our sacred national heritage. Today I'll see a lot of graduates who are coming out. And I'm going to have lunch and talk with a few of them. But I know that quality is something schools throughout the area -- not just those graduating this week -- care about.

So, thank you all for coming out to greet us. I know that I have to get into this car now and get on with the busy schedule that's been lined up. But this is a great honor that you've done me, and I'm very grateful. And I see that sign about my roommate Nancy. Yes, I'll tell her that you bid her welcome also. But thank you all again. God bless you all.

Note: The President spoke at 11:48 p.m. at Lovell Field. Following his remarks, he went to the University of Tennessee at Chattanooga's student center, where he had lunch with area high school seniors and faculty members.

The President. Before you start with your questions, I have just a little statement here that I would like to make and maybe will help -- something about yesterday's incident in the Persian Gulf. It's a tragedy that must never be repeated. Our ships are deployed in the Gulf to protect U.S. interests and to maintain freedom of access and navigation to the area's oil supplies. And following my review of the incident yesterday with the national security group, the area commander has ordered that a naval board of inquiry be convened to fully investigate the circumstances surrounding the attack on the U.S.S. Stark, and to report to me promptly their recommendations for any additional actions that may be warranted.

The President. Well, there's nothing further that we can do other than the orders that I have given that have already been announced: that hereafter, our ships there will, if any vessel of any kind appears to be putting itself in position for hostile action, that we will act accordingly.

Mr. Copper. Sir, do you have any other indications -- Saddam Husayn yesterday said that this was just an inadvertent incident and the Government thus far appears to have accepted that conclusion. Do you have any evidence as to exactly what prompted this attack, any further than has already been announced?

The President. No, and I've had a very fulsome apology from the President of Iraq. The whole thing -- the course of the plane coming down that coast was the course that's taken by Iraqi planes all the time, and we've never considered them hostile at all. They've never been in any way hostile. And this was at night, of course, so never had any visual sight of the target. They fired by radar, that missile. And this is why we're waiting for further investigation and to find out what the attitude was on the vessel. We can understand -- first of all, an AWACS plane of ours over Saudi Arabia had reported it as an Iraqi plane. And we didn't have any reason to ever suspect hostility from them, and we won't know until investigation is concluded whether this was an error of identification on the part of the pilot -- that, I'm sure, we'll hopefully find out from the Iraqis.

Ms. Clemons. I'm Carolyn Clemons, with the Herald News in Rhea County. I want to localize our discussion just a little bit, Mr. President. Rhea County paychecks come from the textile industry and farming and TVA, which gives you some idea of the situation we're in. Right now, the textile industry in Rhea County is in very, very bad shape like it is everywhere. Can you give us any hope that it's going to improve, say, anytime soon?

The President. Well, I know that we've made an arrangement that has reduced textile exports and put other countries on a quota system. We can't go into total -- you know, the kind of protectionism that some people have been advocating in which it might help somebody here, but it would lose other jobs here in our country if we get into that kind of a trade war. I would have to know more about the local situation here, because I do know that some of the unemployment situation in the textile industry, at least further east, has been occasioned not by competition but simply by modernizing and the new technologies that have reduced the number of employees needed to do the same kind of work. And the market generally -- as I understand it, nationally -- the textile market is doing better than it's been doing in quite some time.

Mr. Norton. Mr. President, if I missed this, I apologize. With the cameras flashing and things, I sort of had trouble hearing what you were saying. Did you, sir, offer a comment on why the Stark was unable to defend itself the other day?

The President. Well, as I said, the only thing that we know is that we're aware it was an Iraqi plane and they're not a hostile. And this is the normal trail or path that they use up and down that coast. So, they were just accepting it there and it had been identified as an Iraqi plane by our own AWACS. And then when it made its turn and fastened by radar onto our ship as a target -- once that button is pushed on the missile, you've only got a few seconds over a minute for anything, and the ship was not -- in other words, general quarters hadn't been sounded, as it might be if a hostile plane were coming into the area. So, what we're waiting to find out now in the hearing that has been ordered is what exactly was the situation on the ship and the attitude and why they hadn't prepared. And yet, I have to say in advance here that what would we have done if we were in the same position on there, believing that it was a totally friendly plane?

The President. Well, no, the investigation has just been ordered by the area commander there. So, I imagine that will get underway immediately. But the plane [ship] is in port, and I think that I heard that it was supposed to be in port about 2 o'clock our time.

The President. The only thing that's being considered -- there is the possibility of being a staging area until it can go to the permanent place and where, right now, the targets being looked for that -- the permanent disposal -- are the States of Washington, Nevada, and Texas. And so this, if it is done, would only be, as I say, a temporary point. But no decision has been made because no decision has been made yet on the ultimate disposal site.

Mr. Headrick. Doug Headrick, from Athens, sir. The Iranian Prime Minister said that the attack on the Stark demonstrated that the Gulf is ``not a safe place for superpowers.'' Is that anywhere near the truth? Is the Gulf becoming more unsafe? And are we going to beef up basically our security now and be much more alert after this?

The President. Oh, yes. I have already issued the orders on that. But quite sometime ago, a few years ago, there was a threat from Iran of closing the Persian Gulf, and I publicly stated then that there was no way that the United States could allow the Persian Gulf to be closed. First of all, it's important to us from our continued need to import oil. And to our Western allies, the same thing is true, and they feel the same way about it that we do. And we're going to do what has to be done to keep the Persian Gulf open. It's international waters. No country there has a right to try and close it off and take it for itself. And the villain in the piece really is Iran. And, so, they're delighted with what has just happened.

The President. No, I don't think we can be seen as that. And remember that all the other nations around there -- there are only two that are at war. And we have been doing everything we can and working with the other nations to try and bring about a peace in that war. And so far, we have had approval of that from Iraq and it has been Iran that refuses to go -- to find a way of ending the war.

Mr. Powell. Can I ask you one quick one? I know I shouldn't, but the Iran-contra hearings started again today. If there is any evidence down the road that you did do something illegal, is there any consideration whatsoever of resigning if it turns out that something was done illegally on your part?

The President. Well, I have to tell you, I know absolutely that I did nothing illegal. As a matter of fact, I have, over and over again, told the Washington press corps and told the leaders of Congress that the only thing about which I have no answer is the apparent funds in the Swiss bank accounts supposedly that came from our shipment of arms to Iran. Now, we got our money for that shipment and the only thing that we can figure is that somebody -- in the go-betweens there between us and Iran -- must have put an additional price on it and got more money from Iran than we were asking. And who did that, where the money came from or where it has gone, we absolutely have no knowledge of that, and I'm still waiting to find out who did it and what was done.

As far as just helping the contras, no, there's never been any restriction on my ability to speak publicly, as I have, in urging support for the contras. We did not violate any rules when the Congress, after appropriating money for help and then called that off after it had been used and refused to issue a new appropriation -- we haven't violated that in any way. And I never solicited a foreign country, although under the Boland amendment -- one of the versions of it, there are about five -- actually authorized the Secretary of State, who is certainly my appointee, to solicit other countries, democratic countries, to do as we were doing and try to aid the freedom fighters down there.

So I -- as I say, I never solicited anyone directly. And the one thing that has been mentioned -- I, myself, have told it -- and that is when King Fahd of Saudi Arabia was present in a meeting here -- that was never discussed in the meeting. And he simply made mention as he was leaving that he was going to increase the contribution that he had been making to the freedom fighters.

Just before I came out here, I met with a group of your teachers. All of them had received Laura Handly Brock Memorial Grants for excellence in teaching. I've brought along with me someone who had something to do with that. Bill Brock, we all knew Muffet. We all salute your caring and your generosity. Most of all, we salute the memory of a great and gracious lady.

Your students have worked hard to reach this graduation week. But we all know that you have too, and soon you'll be joined in congratulating them. But right now, all of us give our deepest thanks and congratulations to you teachers. And there are some others we should also remember. Would the parents of the graduates please stand. [Applause] Over the years, you've given the loving gift of long hours of work; of care in sickness, of health, in need; of being there to say keep going when maybe it wasn't so easy for your sons and daughters to keep going; of quietly standing back and smiling when hard work finally paid off. Graduation is your moment as well as theirs. God bless you, and thank you for all you've done to bring this happy achievement about.

You know, it sounds like there's a special excitement here. [Laughter] But then I've had a suspicion for some time that Chattanooga is some place special. This is the only city in America that has two graduates from the area in the Presidential Cabinet. They're great Tennesseans, great Americans, and you should be proud of them -- Bill Brock and Howard Baker.

But graduation is a great moment for all of you. For 12 years you've studied and worked, and now you're done and about to start on the next phase of your lives. And I'm here today to join with your parents, teachers, and friends to say congratulations. But before I do, I'm bringing congratulations from my roommate. [Laughter] She has special words of praise to all of you who, for yourselves, for your families, for your country, just say no to drugs and alcohol. And there are some of you who've been leaders in campaigning for drug-free schools here in Chattanooga. And let me say ``good work'' to the members of Students Staying Straight. We all thank you for your dedication to this great crusade.

And today, as we move towards the 21st century, we're exploring technologies that may someday conquer the remaining threats to our health. While jet airliners carry passengers, even those of modest means, from coast to coast and overseas, our engineers are busy developing crafts that one day will take off from a runway and carry us into space, aerospace planes that will deliver us anywhere in the world in just a few hours' time. This is the world of unlimited promise that stretches out before you, and yet those promises won't be realized on their own. America has achieved so much because across our blessed land, for more than two centuries, men and women have understood that America's greatest gift, the gift of freedom, is also a challenge. The challenge is to be all that we can be and, through meeting that challenge, to help build the future of this free nation.

Our preparation for the next century, of course, begins with what you've been part of: making sure that all young Americans get a good education. I'll talk about this in a moment. The key here is for parents to be involved in the local schools and for schools to set high standards. But teachers and parents should hear what your Triple S clubs -- and what they've been telling them -- that we can't expect excellence in an environment of drugs and permissiveness. All Americans should stand shoulder to shoulder against this evil that undermines the moral fiber of the Nation and attacks too many of the young. It's time to get drugs off our campuses and out of our schoolyards.

Let me pause here and tell you one thing that disturbs me. Though some are aware of their special responsibilities and are taking positive steps, it saddens me that my old industry, the movie industry, hasn't gotten its act together and really begun to combat drug abuse. Too often drug use is still shown in a positive, upbeat way on the screen. When it comes to drug abuse, the movie industry should be part of the solution, not part of the problem. Perhaps it's time to tighten up on the rating system. And this goes for the movie [music] industry, too. I just can't help but think those who talk about their constitutional right to free speech are really more concerned about their own profits. No one has a constitutional right to sell prodrug propaganda to minors, but parents and communities have a right, indeed, they have a responsibility, to protect their children.

There was a time in the sixties and seventies when some adults seemed to lose sight of the importance in education of moral and academic standards. That was also a time when the SAT scores and other test scores declined. Schools lost sight of teaching basic skills; they turned to fads, including abolishing basic academic requirements. One of the worst fads was something called value-neutral instruction. Too often, we heard school officials say that teaching right and wrong was none of their business. A story about this appeared in the newspaper some time ago. A guidance counselor asked a class what they should do if they found a purse with $1,000 in it. The class decided that returning it with the money would be neither right nor wrong; it would be just dumb. Well, when they asked the counselor what he thought, he said he wouldn't force his values on them. ``If I come from the position of what is right and what is wrong,'' he told the reporter, ``then I'm not their counselor.'' Well, I'm not sure what he thought he was.

Last year our Secretary of Education, Bill Bennett, participated in a kind of exchange program with his counterpart in Japan. The Japanese didn't have the same kind of decline in test scores during the sixties and seventies that we had, and we wanted to find out why. We looked at Japanese schools, and the Japanese looked at ours, and then we all compared notes. We found that in Japan when a student did poorly in math or science or any other subject parents and teachers said that the student should work harder. In the United States, when a student did poorly, as often as not, everyone made excuses and said, well, it was because of poverty or lack of ability or problems in the family. In Japan the message to students was always: You're responsible for what you make of your life. In the United States, too often, it was that you aren't.

Well, now, maybe you know someone who listened to those excuses, who said, well, I can't do it, I can't make it through school, I have this or that going against me, and, so, dropped out. Nothing is more important to opening up the opportunties of our country than finishing high school. Nothing could be better for your friends who dropped out than to go back. Nothing could be better for America either. So, if you have a friend who didn't make it or who's a sophomore or junior and is thinking of quitting, could you do something for me? Ask them to give it another try. Tell them they can do it if they stick with it. So many of you have helped friends ``just say no'' to drugs. Help your friends say ``just say yes'' to finishing school. And now, for my part, starting now, I'm going to ask Secretary Bennett and others in our administration to carry this message around the country. Let's make a big cut in America's drop-out rate. And let's pay more attention to basics, including simple literacy, so that by the year 2000 every American can speak, read, and write English and fully participate in the opportunities of our great country.

Tennessee and many other States have made a good start on the road to higher quality. Schools are once again teaching basic skills and basic values. They're once again saying that there are simple standards of right and wrong and that we're all responsible for the way we live our lives. And in Tennessee and some other States, they've begun rewarding excellence in teaching, as well, with a career ladder program for teachers. The funny thing is that as schools have done this test scores have started on the rise. You know, I think that would have happened a lot sooner if we'd listened to you, to America's students, more carefully, because every time adults take time to listen to you, the message is the same: Young people expect adults to set standards and to be honest about what is right and what is wrong.

In humanity's long journey from the caves to the mountaintops, there's never been a time or place of such promise as here in your lifetimes. Freedom, the freedom of America, gave birth to this era of opportunity, but your courage, your vision, your determination, your dedication to the fundamental moral values of our civilization -- these will determine if the promise of America in the century ahead is realized, not only for you but for all Americans. Earlier this year I said it was time to begin a great American discussion about our future and how to prepare America for the world of the year 2000 and beyond. This is the world that you will see, help shape, and be part of. If you tell yourself that you're ready, that you'll go for it, then your role in molding that future begins right here, right now, today.

This message, that America's future will be as great as your dreams, is not a new message; it's as old as America itself. You can find it written all around you. This great university -- started a century ago this year -- it is testimony to the men and women of this State who accepted the opportunities and responsibilities of freedom and, however imperfectly, began to build a great institution of learning. The Chattanooga school system itself -- started in 1872 when a group of both Union and Confederate veterans set aside old hatreds and joined hands for the common good -- this school system is testimony, too. Every farm, every factory, every store, every home across our land is a monument to men and women who took into their hands the clay of America's opportunity and shaped it to their dreams.

I want to say something about yesterday's incident in the Persian Gulf. This tragedy must never be repeated. Our ships are deployed in the Gulf in order to protect the United States interests and maintain freedom of navigation and access to the area's oil supplies. It's a vital mission. But our ships need to protect themselves, and they will. From now on, if aircraft approach any of our ships in a way that appears hostile, there is one order of battle: Defend yourselves, defend American lives! [Applause] America's sailors are putting their lives on the line in the Gulf. They have the right to protect themselves against any threat from any quarter at any time.

And now I would like to say a few words in tribute to our brave sailors aboard the U.S.S. Stark. We join with families, friends, and shipmates in mourning those who died. As have so many of our nation's fighting men before them, they gave the supreme sacrifice for our beloved nation. In life, they were our sons and brothers, our buddies and loved ones; in death, they are our heroes. Too often Americans are called upon to give their lives in the cause of world peace and freedom. Yet our glory as a people is that we do devote ourselves to those causes, not to conquest, not to territory, and not to supremacy, but to peace and freedom.

In memory of those who gave their lives I've directed that flags be lowered to half-mast. This land of freedom lives and grows stronger because the spirit of devotion and sacrifice that lived in Martin Treptow has lived in the hearts of free men -- including the men of the Stark -- through the ages. I know that's your spirit, too. You just showed that a moment ago. Let it shine like a great light. Don't hide it under a basket; lift it high so that its brightness will fill the land and is a beacon to the world.

I know that lately there's been kind of a tone of cynicism in our land, and some people have written and have spoken about it as if somehow we've strayed away and are going in wrong directions. Well, I don't believe that's true. You can't stand in this auditorium and look and hear all of you without knowing it isn't true. I've always believed there was a divine plan that put this continent here between the two great oceans for it to be found by people from every corner of the Earth who had an extra love of freedom and that extra ounce of courage that would enable them to tear themselves away from their homeland, family, and friends, and make their way to this strange land. There is so much for us to be proud of in the country that they have built, the good that is done. Last year we broke all records in our history in the private giving to charitable and educational causes -- to worthy causes -- $87 billion privately given in 1 year by the citizens of this country -- an all-time record.

I received a letter the other day, and I'm going to share just a few words in it with you. This individual wrote to tell me something -- I'd never thought of it this way before. He said you can go to Japan and live, but you can't become a Japanese. You can go to France; you can't become a Frenchman. You can go to live in Turkey or Germany, and you can't become a Turk or a German or any of those other people. But he said people who live anyplace in the world can come to America and become an American.

As a mark of respect for the American servicemen who died as the result of the attack on United States Ship STARK, which was struck by a missile on May 17, 1987, while on patrol in the Persian Gulf to keep vital sea-lanes open, I hereby order, by the authority vested in me as President of the United States of America by section 175 of title 36 of the United States Code, that the flag of the United States shall be flown at half-staff upon all public buildings and grounds, at all military posts and naval stations, and on all naval vessels of the Federal government in the District of Columbia and throughout the United States and its Territories and Possessions through Monday, Memorial Day, May 25, 1987. I also direct that the flag shall be flown at half-staff for the same length of time at all United States embassies, legations, consular offices, and other facilities abroad, including all military facilities and naval vessels and stations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 19th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Well, thank you Secretary Bennett. Today we are pleased to release a government report with some good news and some common sense in it. It's the third in Secretary Bennett's ``What Works'' series, and it's called ``Schools That Work: Educating Disadvantaged Children,'' and it should top the summer reading list of everyone who is concerned about the quality of education in our country. Its message is simple: Good schools make a difference. By giving students the knowledge and values they need to succeed, good schools can help children overcome poverty. They give our disadvantaged children hope, strength, and opportunity; they give them a future.

And the good news is that, as Secretary Bennett's book describes it, we have a number of these schools already, schools winning against the odds, schools that give their students just what it takes: respect for learning and the habits of heart and mind that are necessary for achievement. Instead of high dropout rates, these schools produce high test scores, regular attendance, and impressive college placement records. In schools such as these, a child's homelife or his parents' finances and education are no barrier to success.

And then there are schools like Hales Franciscan High School in Chicago, Illinois. At Hales Franciscan, 300 young black men from Chicago's inner schools -- or inner city, I should say -- most of them poor, most from single-parent homes, are given an academic and religious education designed to help them escape the poverty trap and get into college. Father Mario DiCicco, the principal, and the community of Franciscan friars and lay teachers give them what it takes -- a strong core curriculum, lots of homework, and an emphasis on values that encourages moral judgment and social responsibility. At least 90 percent of each year's graduates go on to postsecondary education. As many as three-quarters go to 4-year colleges. Yes, Hales Franciscan High School works. Father is not here with us today, but we can recognize what has been accomplished there.

And so does the Gaskins Freedom Youth Academy right here in Washington, DC. Henry and Mary Ann Gaskins have five children of their own and each works full-time, but they feel so strongly about education that 6 years ago they opened their home to neighborhood children and turned it into a thriving afterschool program. Today, Dr. and Mrs. Gaskins tutor 75 children, from kindergarten through 12th grade, giving poor and minority students one-on-one attention in all subject areas -- even computers. And they try to ``blend goodness of character with intellectual skills.'' And their students respond. And here, too, we find rising achievement scores and the attitudes necessary for success.

These schools and programs may seem miraculous, but their accomplishments are no mystery. They can be duplicated all over again, all around America. And they should be; we know how it's done. It's done through the effort of adults who care, men and women who never say die and who stick to traditional values and the basic principles that have always been the secret to good education.

First, schools that work for disadvantaged children are schools that believe they can make a difference. They don't use poverty as an excuse for failure. And they don't wait around for new Federal programs before they start to do their jobs. Their business is children, and their first and most important message to those children is: No matter who you are or where you're from, you can learn.

Second, schools that work for the disadvantaged are schools that help their students develop the same qualities of character and the same values that most Americans want for their children. They know there are no such things as black values and white values or poor values and rich values. No, they know there are only basic American values. They know that lower standards are double standards -- and double standards are wrong. Effort, homework, discipline, values, and quality teaching are the best any education can offer -- to any student, including a poor, disadvantaged child.

Finally, schools that work for disadvantaged children are, well, old-fashioned. They don't go for tricks. They use what's tried and true: clear standards of behavior, long hours, hard work, and measurable goals. They teach the basics -- reading, mathematics, science, and writing. And they teach about America -- our history, literature, our great heroes, and our democratic principles. In fact, Secretary Bennett tells me that one of the most striking things that he's learned in his many visits to our nation's classrooms is that those schools which instill a sense of patriotism in their students by saying the Pledge of Allegiance or singing ``The Star-Spangled Banner'' invariably are the most successful.

Study after study tells us that education is the surest way for individuals to rise above poverty. We've done a lot in the United States to guarantee access and opportunities for education to all our citizens, especially the disadvantaged. We've spent generously on education, more than any other nation on Earth. But too many disadvantaged children are still not getting the education they need. In some cases, we may have spent money on the wrong things. In some others, we may have tried to fix what wasn't broken in the first place. But whatever the reason, we can do better, and we have to, because universal access to education is simply not good enough. Americans need universal access to quality education -- education that works.

I just yesterday had the privilege to speak to the graduating seniors of the Hamilton County-Chattanooga City high schools -- all 13 of them -- not 13 students, 1700 graduates from 13 schools. And believe me, events like those are one of the best things about having this job I've got. Before me were thousands of bright, eager students ready to take to the world. America is lucky to have youth like those, like the young people one meets all over this country. And I just can't help but feel it's our duty to give them the very best education we can possibly provide. It's our duty to them, and our duty to a nation, because those young people are America's future.

And I have to relate just a little personal experience here in closing. I remember one day I was sitting in the principal's office. I wasn't invited in there for a social visit. [Laughter] And he said something that fortunately stuck in my mind, and I remembered. He said, ``Reagan, I don't care what you think of me now. I'm only concerned with what you'll think of me 15 years from now.'' And I thank the Lord that I had the opportunity to tell him shortly before he died how I felt about him 15 years afterward, after that visit in his office. And he was a very great influence in my life.

I recommend to you a poem written by Clark Mollenhoff, the journalist who was part of the White House press corps. He has written a poem called ``Teacher,'' and it talks to you about what teachers mean and the effect they have on children. And I think you'd all be very proud to read his opinion of you. And having read the poem myself, I share that opinion of you. Thank you, and God bless you.

In response to a requirement placed on the Department of Defense in the 1987 Defense Authorization Act, the Secretary of Defense has sent to the Congress today a report which describes the effect on our Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI) program if the President were to restructure the program consistent with the broad interpretation of the ABM treaty. When he determined in October 1985 that a broad interpretation of the treaty is fully justified, the President decided then as a matter of policy that it was not necessary to restructure the SDI program as long as it was adequately supported. The classified report submitted to the Congress today describes activities which the United States could conduct under a restructured SDI program aligned to the broader interpretation of the treaty. It also lays out the Department of Defense's estimates of some of the costs involved in continued adherence to the current U.S. policy of not restructuring the SDI program.

This report parallels material already provided to the President, at his request, by the Secretary of Defense. In order to provide a basis for a decision on whether to restructure the SDI program to exercise our rights under the broad interpretation of the treaty, the President requested an analysis of this issue as well as three legal studies of the ABM treaty prepared by the Legal Adviser of the Department of State. Two of the requested legal studies have been completed, and the third should be finished at the beginning of June. The two legal studies which have been completed have already been submitted to the Congress. The report which the Department of Defense submitted today is an element of our continuing consultations with Congress and demonstrates our commitment to providing Congress with as much information as possible on these issues.

The Strategic Defense Initiative is vital to the future security of the United States and our allies. Before the President makes a final decision about whether to restructure the program to exercise our rights under the broad interpretation of the ABM treaty, he would like the full benefit of consultations with the Congress and our allies. It is essential that the Congress, for its part, avoid taking preemptive steps which would undermine SDI. It is critically important that the executive and legislative branches of our government reach a consensus on a strong SDI program.

I have been fortunate to have had someone of your abilities and dedication on my team for most of the past six years. From your days as a campaign worker and a press aide to Nancy, to your tenure as a speech- writer, Assistant Secretary of Transportation for Public Affairs, and your present position, you have been an invaluable help to me in implementing the goals of this Administration with skill and efficiency. Your role as Director of Public Liaison has, I know, been an especially demanding one, requiring long hours, sensitivity to the demands of a multiplicity of groups, and organizational skills. You, as usual, rose to the occasion with enthusiasm, energy, and grace under pressure. Moreover, demanding as public service may be at times, the sense of accomplishment for serving our country in a public capacity is without parallel. You have my heartfelt gratitude for a job well done.

Once again, I ask for your understanding as I submit my resignation. It has been both an honor and an incomparable opportunity to serve you and the country as your Director of Public Liaison. As a granddaughter of immigrants, I share your love for America and the values and freedom that make it so great. It has been exciting to be a part of your team as you revived the confidence of our people and restored our natural strength.

As first a Reagan campaign worker, then speechwriter, then Assistant Secretary of Transportation and now as one of your Deputy Assistants, I have learned and grown and I hope contributed. Thank you for trusting me with such responsibility so early in my career.

Coordinating your outreach efforts hasn't been difficult because of the wellspring of love and support for you among the American people. Ensuring their views are heard as you consider policy has been rewarding because you embody the traditional values and beliefs of our citizens. Working to advance your agenda for a resurgent America has been a labor of joy.

I now would like to join U.S. Senator Bob Dole's Presidential campaign. There, I believe, I can be most effective in making certain the victories won so hard in your administration are continued and broadened in the next. Thank you for allowing me to share in the ``Reagan magic.'' I will always be deeply grateful.

My goodness, with all of these Congressmen here, I should have brought a gavel. [Laughter] Well, to get serious, this week, we were all given a grim reminder of the human cost of our national security. We grieve the loss of our brave sons, but let no one doubt our resolve to protect our vital interests in the Persian Gulf or anywhere else. The Gulf is a particularly volatile area, but an area of utmost importance to us and to the free world. Our fleet has been there for almost 40 years, helping to ensure freedom of navigation and protect commerce. This difficult yet essential mission will continue.

Today we import only about 5 percent of our petroleum from the Gulf. Western Europe and Japan have a much higher dependency. We saw in 1974 and 1979 the disastrous effects which a disruption of Gulf oil can have upon the economy of the United States and our principal trading partners. We're working to see that that experience is not repeated. Achieving this requires American military and political strength, the cooperation of our allies, as well as economic strength and independence, especially in matters concerning energy.

And today I'm pleased to sign House Resolution 1941 into law. This legislation eliminates unnecessary restrictions on the use of natural gas. It promotes efficient production and development of our energy resources by returning fuel choices to the marketplace. I've long believed that our country's natural gas resources should be free from regulatory burdens that are costly and counterproductive. This bill abolishes unnecessary restrictions on natural gas and petroleum markets. It also eliminates complicated natural gas pricing procedures which distorted supply and demand and raised energy prices paid by consumers and industry. Moreover, as natural gas is a clean-burning fuel, restrictions inhibiting its use have not been in the best interests of the environment. Removal of these and other regulatory obstacles will benefit our economy, energy security, and environment.

In my recent message to Congress on energy security, I urged several measures to ensure our nation has a strong domestic oil and gas industry and substantial protection against oil supply interruptions. These measures, taken together, will result in increased energy security. I have on three occasions proposed comprehensive natural gas legislation to the Congress. H.R. 1941, while not encompassing all that I proposed, is a step in the right direction -- a step away from bureaucratic controls and a step toward a freer and efficient marketplace. However, much remains to be done. Price decontrol and mandatory contract carriage are still needed if the great potential of our domestic energy resources is to be achieved and energy costs to consumers lowered. I would urge the Congress to move forward from here and take action on other deregulation proposals which are awaiting their action.

Austrian Chancellor Vranitzky and I have had a very good meeting. We talked over a set of international issues, including arms reductions and cooperation against terrorism. Chancellor Vranitzky explained to me the reaction of the Austrian Government and public to the U.S. Government's decision on Mr. Waldheim. I explained to the Chancellor the statutory basis for the decision. I also assured the Chancellor that the United States and Austria will remain close friends. We both share a strong commitment to human rights and democracy. I also told the Chancellor that Austria has every reason to be proud of its record since World War II. Its many achievements include assisting thousands of refugees fleeing political and religious persecution and providing a haven for emigrating Soviet Jews. Austria has also actively worked toward creating a more peaceful world. Austrian soldiers are helping U.N. peacekeeping efforts in Cyprus and in the Golan Heights. Both of us agreed at the conclusion of our meeting to work together to strengthen further the strong ties of friendship that exist between our two nations.

Any American who has ever listened to a bugler sound Taps, the last salute, whether on a green and grassy hillside, a muddy field halfway around the world, or a lonely tarmac stateside or anywhere freedom is cherished and defended, knows exactly why we set aside a special day each year to honor those who have died for our country and to pray for permanent peace.

We do so for the sons and daughters of our land who have perished in the cause of liberty, country, and peace, the cause that has called Americans from generation to generation. We do so for the Nation that was home to these heroes and heroines, the Nation that gave them their birthright of freedom. We do so for the sacred trust they have left us, to revere, defend, and preserve all that they have revered, defended, and preserved for us.

And we pray for our dead; we ask God to bless them and take them to Himself and reward their patriot's love. We pray for those who gave their lives in the hope of a future of freedom and peace for their countrymen. We pray for peace and for the devotion and strength of soul to build it and to protect it always. We pray and we resolve to keep holy the memory of those who have died for our country and to make their cause inseparably our own. We pray and we promise, so that one day Taps will sound never again for the young and the brave and the good.

I also direct all appropriate Federal officials and request the Governors of the United States and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the appropriate officials of all units of government, to direct that the flag be flown at half-staff during this Memorial Day on all buildings, grounds, and naval vessels throughout the United States and in all areas under its jurisdiction and control, and I request the people of the United States to display the flag at half-staff from their homes on this day.

Forty years ago today President Truman signed Public Law 75 of the 80th Congress, which provided $400 million in U.S. military assistance to Greece and Turkey. This was the first postwar commitment of the United States to provide the resources and support necessary for free countries of the world to meet the threat of Communist expansionism and brought into being the Truman doctrine.

The Truman doctrine was rooted in a fundamental assumption as true now as in 1947: A healthy democracy in the United States requires strong democratic partners in the world. Its purpose was to help the peoples of Greece and Turkey in their efforts to secure their freedom. It succeeded through the mutual efforts of the American, Greek, and Turkish people, who through their courage and perseverance met head-on and defeated the immediate postwar threat. Today Greece, Turkey, and the United States are linked together as members of the North Atlantic Treaty Organization, freedom's strongest shield.

Today we celebrate the wisdom and courage of President Truman and those who worked so hard to make this a cornerstone of American foreign policy. We also salute our Greek and Turkish allies. Our ties are built on a proud tradition of mutual respect and support, one that we are dedicated to preserving and nurturing in the years to come.

Every year, in the beautiful springtime, the American people pause on a special day to pay the heartfelt tribute of love and remembrance to all the sons and daughters of our land who have laid down their lives on the altar of liberty. This year, our Memorial Day remembrance is tinged with fresh sorrow as we honor and mourn the brave men taken from us a short week ago.

No words of ours can pay them the full tribute that is their due: their service, sacrifice, and love of country crown their memory on this day of grief and will do so as long as there is an America that defends freedom and honors its heroic champions. Let us pay tribute, then, to the dead and injured of United States Ship STARK by making their faithfulness and courage and love our own, ever and always. Without Americans like them, there would be no land of the free and no home of the brave; because of Americans like them, the lamp of liberty burns on undimmed, unvanquished, and unquenchable.

Nancy and I had a sad duty yesterday but one that also had its proud moments. We traveled to Mayport, Florida, to pay tribute to the young men of the U.S.S. Stark, 37 of whom were killed last Sunday after an attack on their ship in the Persian Gulf. Yesterday we saw the bravery of the families of these young men. Despite their terrible loss, their courage was a tribute to the valor of their fallen sons and husbands. But, as Lincoln noted long ago, at such moments there really are no words -- the deeds of our heroes are their own best testimony to their love for our nation, and for our people.

We can take some comfort, though, in knowing that the Stark's mission was a vital one for us as a free people. Since 1949 American ships have patrolled in the Gulf, an area that is a vital strategic and economic crossroad for the nations of three continents, an area that in the hands of a hostile power would be a chokepoint of freedom. And that's why we owe the crew of the U.S.S. Stark and their brave families such a deep debt of gratitude. It's a debt that should be on all of our minds this Memorial Day weekend as we recall those who have fallen in our nation's service.

In addition to remembering these young men and all the others whose struggle and sacrifice protected this nation, we celebrate this weekend another moment when brave men and women worked to make our country, one nation indivisible. Exactly 200 years ago delegates from 7 of the Original 13 Colonies met in Philadelphia to begin work on forming a new government. It marked the beginning of that famous miracle at Philadelphia, a miracle that brought forth perhaps the most enduring document or instrument, I should say, of human government ever known: our Constitution. Over the years, historical and legal scholars have continued to marvel at its wisdom and prudence. In some mysterious way it seemed to provide for every contingency; it set up a structure of government strong enough to maintain national unity but flexible enough to change with the times.

One part of our Founding Fathers genius was their provision for amending the Constitution. They knew they had created a good document but not a perfect one. In fact, even two centuries ago, some of them, especially Thomas Jefferson, were troubled by one omission: the lack of a limitation on public borrowing by the Federal Government. They knew from firsthand experience how tyranny abused the fiscal powers of government, how excessive borrowing and heavy taxation led to inflated currencies and economic hardship. Well, even in their reservations about the Constitution the Founding Fathers were perceptive and wise.

I think most of you know how badly out of control Federal spending has gotten in recent years; today the national debt is $2.25 trillion. In 1985 the Congress tried to do something about its excessive spending by passing a bill called Gramm-Rudman-Hollings that put deficit spending on a steady decline until we reached a balanced budget in the early 1990's. But lately, Congress has been returning to its old ways and forgetting the solemn promises it made under this law. That's why I'm one of those Americans who has always believed a constitutional amendment mandating that Congress balance the budget is the answer to what ails us. And we've tried to get such an amendment through the Congress so that the State legislatures could vote on it.

This reluctance by the Congress has inspired a number of Americans to try another method provided for in the Constitution: a constitutional convention, one with delegates from each State who could propose a balanced budget amendment and then send it on to the State legislatures for approval. Only two more States are needed to call such a convention. And believe me, if the Congress continues to balk at passing the balanced budget amendment, I think the drive for a constitutional convention will pick up steam. So, this Memorial Day, as we think of those who paid the ultimate sacrifice for our nation, we should not forget to also reflect on our own duties, to the way of life, and the system of government for which they died. Certainly, wasting our national wealth and burdening future generations with mountains of debt does not keep faith with those who have struggled and sacrificed to begin a new form of government here on our shores.

And I hope you'll do something else, as well. Keep especially in mind the brave sailors of the U.S.S. Stark. Do me a favor, won't you: Whisper a prayer for them and for their families, that God may bless them and their nation which they so nobly served and for which they so nobly died.

Ladies and gentlemen of the Central Intelligence Agency and the intelligence community, so important is the work you perform that it is a plain statement of fact to say in gathering here today to swear in your new Director, William Webster, we have come together for an event that will shape our nation's history and affect the course of freedom throughout the world.

The Central Intelligence Agency finds its roots in the earliest days of the Republic. General George Washington said that intelligence service demands those on ``whose firmness and fidelity we may safely rely.'' And during World War II, dedicated Americans answered the call -- sometimes the ultimate call -- in the Office of Strategic Services. Their creativity and achievement remain the building blocks for today. Among those was the late Bill Casey, whose determination and personal courage in the clandestine effort against Adolph Hitler meant the difference between victory and defeat. While the world changed in 45 years since the OSS was founded, his capacity for leadership did not, nor did the devotion of the men and women of our intelligence services.

From the days in the late seventies, where we found America's intelligence capabilities reduced and demoralized, today our intelligence community performs a vital role in the struggle against international terrorism and drug trafficking. It exposes and counters the huge, menacing apparatus of Soviet espionage and propaganda, and scouts future challenges. Unfortunately, many of your successes can only be celebrated in private. But those of us in the executive branch and the Congress know about these gallant efforts and recognize, for example, verifying arms reduction agreements and the continued expansion of freedom must rest on a solid intelligence foundation. So, we have a responsibility to assure the American people that they have the best intelligence service in the world, and that it is staffed by honorable men and women who work within the framework of our laws and our shared values.

That remark alone says a great deal about the judge. He does not look upon his nation's call to duty as something onerous, something to be endured. He looks upon it instead as something inviting, something even invigorating -- a bosun's pipe. And during these past 9 years, Judge Webster has done more than maintain the standards of the FBI; he has raised them. The Bureau under Judge Webster has for the first time become expert in drug investigations and white-collar crime. It has made innovative use of high-technology equipment. And I've often spoke of the need for dramatic, historic strikes against organized crime and praised the FBI's brilliant role in this endeavor. Morale in the FBI has soared. Today the Bureau is a proud institution, thoroughly imbued with a sense of public service. And confidence in the Bureau on the part of Congress, the President, and most important, the American people -- this confidence is strong and vital. Judge Webster, I know that as you leave the FBI, you leave behind much that you will miss. And I know that your colleagues at the Bureau will want to join me as, on behalf of the American people, I thank you for a job well done.

Now the bosun's pipe has sounded. In becoming director today of the Central Intelligence Agency, Judge Webster is stepping up to the leadership of an institution that is, by its very nature, a likely subject of controversy. Yet it is also irreplaceable. The CIA routinely places demands upon its employees that would elsewhere be deemed outrageous. Yet it offers them the satisfaction of keeping freedom's candle burning.

And now, Judge Webster, we turn over to you the stewardship of this devoted group of men and women. Their mission is nothing less than the defense of liberty. Just consider the agency's history. And although the specific undertakings must remain secret, today this agency uses all its resources to advance the cause of freedom. So, Judge Webster, we ask you to maintain this agency's high standards, as you pledged to maintain those of the FBI. We ask you to lead the Central Intelligence Agency on to still greater service to our nation. And we know that, given your service at the FBI -- given your entire career -- in leading this great and vital institution, you'll make it greater still.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Michael Gordon Wygant, a Foreign Service officer of Class One, to be the United States Representative to the Federated States of Micronesia. This is a new position.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Randolph J. Agley to be a member of the Advisory Board of the Saint Lawrence Seaway Development Corporation, Department of Transportation. He would succeed John R. Wall.

The President. Well, I can't deny wherever in the world I find a Communist movement their conduct has been such that it's of concern. But, no, and I think it would be improper for me to inject any opinions into your election there. But I have great confidence that the Italian people will do what's right, as they have for quite some time now.

Q. Mr. President, can you conceive any circumstances on which the United States would go to war with Iran as a result of military actions against the United States warships in the Persian Gulf, and what part would you expect the allies to play?

The President. Well, I think that all of us, the allies, have expressed ourselves very many times: that the Persian Gulf is international waters; it must stay open. It's vital to most of the countries of Western Europe because of the oil from there, as well as Japan. And it's important to us, although not quite as vital with regard to the amount of oil that we bring out of there. I don't see the danger of a war. I don't know how it could possibly start, except that it is true this is not the first place or the only place in the world where we have felt it necessary to maintain a military force. And always, we have followed the rule that we're not going to send our people anywhere unless they are permitted to defend themselves if attacked. And we're not out to attack anyone, but we will, if fired upon, will fire back.

Q. Mr. President, I'm the Canadian reporter, so you won't be very surprised with this first question I have for you. Just before leaving Ottawa in April, you told [Prime Minister] Mr. Mulroney that you would consider a bilateral accord to reduce the pollution that causes acid rain. When we got back in Washington 2 weeks later, your top environmental official, Lee Thomas, said that such emission controls were not justified. So, I'm asking you, Mr. President, are you willing to negotiate an accord that would set goals and timetables and controls or not?

The President. I have told our people that I think we should use the pattern that Canada and the United States used with regard to polluted air -- or polluted water along our borders. And we were very successful in cleaning up the lakes and the streams that either crossed our borders or that were very close to them. And we worked together on that. And that is the pattern that I said I thought we should follow here. And we are in consultation. And we have a great deal of work to do ourselves on pinning sources and so forth. But all of that is going forward. It isn't something that you can just say that we'll do it at 10 a.m. in the morning. But we intend to work closely with Canada and find an answer to the problem.

Q. I am a Japanese journalist. Many Japanese people are hoping that the United States will lift the sanctions as a result of the semiconductor codes prior to the Venice summit. Is there any chance that the United States will lift the sanctions prior to the summit?

The President. We are looking forward to doing that as quickly as we can, but it depends on those Japanese concerns agreeing to the -- or abiding by the terms that were agreed to earlier. And then that agreement was violated, and this is what brought about our retaliation. I don't know that it can be done as quickly as our going to the summit, which is almost upon us, but it will be done as soon as, as I say, all those conditions are met. And I know that Prime Minister Nakasone is doing his best and is being most cooperative in trying to arrive at a settlement.

Q. Mr. President, you have always emphasized that progress in arms control should be linked with progress in human rights. You are making progress in arms control at the moment, and as you're going to Berlin next month and as you're going to see the wall which divides the city, don't you think that the time has come for a new initiative on human rights? And what will be your message to the people of Berlin? And what will be the message to Mr. Gorbachev from Berlin?

The President. Well, I don't know what his message might be, but I'm quite sure that I will make reference to the wall and what it represents. I believe that we have made progress, some progress in human rights, not as much as we would like or as fast as we would like. But there has been an increase in the releasing of political prisoners, dissidents from captivity in the Soviet Union. There has been an increase in emigration of people of the Jewish faith -- allowed to leave the country. There's a greater distance to go, much more to be done, but at least we're seeing the signs of improvement in that field of human rights.

I think another thing also has to do -- that's tied into arms reduction, must be the regional aspect. And there, I think the Soviet Union -- they have expressed their desire to get out of Afghanistan, and I think we all should be encouraging them to make good on that statement and move as fast as possible to end an assault that has seen almost 5 million people have to flee their country as refugees and live in neighboring countries.

And it is a brutal assault on the people who remain. We're seeing attacks on children -- deliberately aimed at children by the use of weapons that are made to look like child's toys, but which, when picked up, cause either the death or the severe injury of the children. I recently had five children in this office right here who'd been brought to our hospitals from Afghanistan. And one of them, a small, tiny girl, was horribly disfigured by burns. But the other four were either missing a leg or an arm. And there must come an end to that.

Q. Peter Pringle, from the Independent in London. Over the years, Britain, irrespective of which political party is in power, has enjoyed a strong, special relationship with the United States, including an American military presence with nuclear weapons on British soil. Irrespective of the result of the general election now being fought in Britain, will you do everything in your power to maintain this relationship in general and specific terms?

The President. Yes. It's difficult for me to conceive of a time when we would not have the almost family relationship that we have between our two countries. I have admired your Prime Minister and the progress that has been made in many fields there, but I know that I can't go beyond that, because I'm not going to, again, intervene or express an opinion with regard to your politics.

Q. Mr. President, may I go back a moment to the Persian Gulf? People say, especially in Congress, that there is a danger of war. And in any case, confrontation with Iran could cause a resurgence in terrorism and dampen the peace process in the Middle East. Do you think these objections are true, and what do you expect the Europeans to do to help you there? Specifically, what do you expect Italy, for instance, to do to help you?

The President. Well, in the economic summit last year in Japan, we came to quite some sizable agreements with regard to terrorism and the cooperation between all of our countries on that. There is no question but that the Iranian Government does support terrorism. And I would think that the issues, as I expressed them earlier, about simply defending ourselves with regard to our own ability to maintain trade in the open waters -- I don't see that as bringing on a war.

As a matter of fact, we're doing everything we can, working with other countries to try and bring about an end to the war that we have. Now, Iraq has already expressed a willingness to simply end the war, both sides retreat to their own borders, no one gain any territory or suffer any penalty, just simply end the war. Iraq has expressed a willingness to do this, and the only holdout is Iran. We're going to continue to try and press for peace there. It's my understanding that war has taken about a million lives so far. I don't think that they would like to take on the United States in addition to Iraq. And we're not going to start a war, so it would have to be them if they tried to start one.

The President. Well, I think we're a long way from denuclearization of Europe. You have really three sets of weapons. The ones that we're talking particularly about in having a zero option are the intermediate range. Now, also there is a talk about the short range. But even if that should be done, you have that third group which, in the case of the allies, would number someplace in 4,000 warheads. These are the battlefield weapons, the airplane-carried weapons and so forth, and some nuclear submarines that are dedicated to our agreement with the European nations. So, denuclearization is a long way away. Then I would have to point out that as you proceeded -- if you did -- into that field that is where it would absolutely have to include conventional weapons. Because there is an imbalance that is redressed right now by way of nuclear weapons, without them would leave the Soviet Union with a tremendous advantage: conventional weapons. That would have to be redressed.

Q. Mr. President, you just talked a moment ago about freedom of navigation in the Gulf. There is another issue of freedom of navigation just here in North America. Ottawa is planning to buy 10 to 12 submarines from Europe to force your Navy to ask permission when you send ships in the Northwest Passage. Are we going towards a confrontation of some kind?

The President. Yes, I think that is a different situation there. And I am hopeful that we can -- and the good neighbors that we are -- that we can find an answer to that and that will, at the same time, will not set a dangerous precedent with regard to other international waters.

Q. Mr. President, I would like to ask concerning the value of the dollar. Is the United States Government planning any measures to maintain the value of the dollar, and will you make an announcement at the summit on this?

The President. Well, I don't think we want any more precipitous nosediving of the dollar. We do think that there was a readjustment that was needed, that our dollar, in relation to other currencies, was overpriced. And it was making competition a little unfair in worldwide trade; we were being priced out of the market. Sometimes when we see the dollar adjust as it has, I've often wondered if we're describing it accurately or if we shouldn't be saying that other currencies that have so far been undervalued have gained some value that is more realistic worldwide.

The President. We haven't even met or discussed that as yet. I know that I'm going to be faced with that decision down the road, or perhaps he has a decision he wants to make himself. I don't know. But we just haven't made a decision. But I think that out of the economic summit also, in the whole field of macroeconomics, we will be touching on the need for some stability with regard to currencies worldwide and cure any runaway volatility.

Q. If I may ask you a more personal question, you have experienced the worst political crisis of your life during the last months. Your wife has been criticized by some American columnists. You lost your Chief of Staff. Did it ever occur to you during this crisis to resign? And what gave you the strength to carry on?

The President. Well, I think the strength to carry on was because there wasn't any truth, and isn't any truth, in the charges that are being leveled at me. I did not know that there was money deposited with regard to our arms purchase in accounts or that any of that money was then going to be used for the contras. We had sold $12 million worth of arms. We got our $12 million. And it wasn't until the covert operation that we were -- or meetings that we were having -- not with Khomeini's government. These meetings were with people who were looking forward to what might be the Government of Iran in the absence of the Khomeini and wanted to establish better relations with the United States. And this was why it had to be a covert operation. They could probably get executed for what they were doing.

But anyway, when the whole thing did leak and burst in all the press of the world, it was only then that word was brought to me that apparently someone in the go-between in the arms transaction had raised the price and there was excess money and it had been put in a Swiss bank account. Now, I still don't know who did that, how much, where it went, who's gotten any of it; and I'm still waiting for these investigations to reveal it. So frankly, I sleep very well at night. And I know that the truth will come out. There was information that had evidently been withheld from me by some of those who are testifying. And I don't feel that I'm faced with any crisis, and, no, I never considered resigning.

Q. Mr. President, Secretary Shultz, before the House Appropriations Committee last March, was talking about the impossibility of the United States living up to any undertaking of confidentiality. He said that the result is that other countries are increasingly hesitant in dealing with us and they even hesitate to communicate with us because as soon as they put anything down, somebody will leak it. How big is the problem of leaks in the American Government, and does it affect the allies in Europe?

The President. I think it does. During these last several years, I wasn't prepared for how much leaking does go on from the White House or from -- let's just say in Washington. It's not just confined to the White House. Many times, if there's something in which you have to give information to the Congress, you know you're going to read about it in the paper almost immediately. As a matter of fact, may I say something here that might sound a little critical? A great deal of the leaking is not the leaking of valid information, it is the leaking of a rumor, an unsubstantiated statement. And yet our press goes all out, including the headlines with it. Now, I recognize the right of the free press; I don't want censorship. And I know also that the press, at least in our country, has a tradition of protecting its source.

So, when I see those stories that are written with ``according to a White House source'' -- no name. But since many times they print as fact this statement by this unnamed source, doesn't the press have a responsibility, if they want to protect their source, of at least before they go with the story checking out to see if the story is true? Would it kill them to make a telephone call and find out is this true, did you say this, or did you do that? And it is destructive to our relationship with other countries. As I say, a number of times I've had to pick up the phone and call one of my counterparts in another country because of embarrassment caused to them by a leak. And we have done, and continue to do, everything we can to try and find out who's responsible for these leaks, and we haven't been able to determine them, to pin them down. But also sometimes, I have to wonder: Was there a leak, or isn't just the attributing of the story to an unnamed source a way of writing a story someone wants to write, particularly among columnists?

The President. We don't know. It's up to him to tell us when he can come. He has agreed; he did agree to a summit in the United States; and that invitation is still open. And I'm hopeful that, before the year is out, we'll have that meeting.

Sir, let me ask you frankly this: Do you feel uncomfortable in going to Europe right now, considering that, in one hand, there are great challenges for the Western World -- let's consider the winds-of-trade wars and the Persian Gulf situation -- and on the other hand, all the seven leaders, they have problems, too; they look a little weak. And yourself have been damaged by the Iran-contra affair.

The President. Well, no. I'll tell you, we keep in touch to such an extent, the seven of us, the leaders of the seven countries represented here, and consult, and none of us go off on our own very much without keeping the others informed. So, I feel that it's a very good time. I think we have problems that can better be handled as we discuss them there. I think that the subjects will deal with macroeconomics -- the things that we decided on in Japan a year ago that we were going to do about trying to make trading more fair, remove some of the obstacles, market obstacles, to see if we could not stimulate more growth in all of our countries economically, things of that kind. And of course, the East-West situation will be discussed and also the matters that we launched again in Japan -- and that is our handling of terrorism and so forth. So, I'm looking forward to it.

Q. Sir, talking about the obstacles, are you ready, for example, to cut the budget deficit -- that these are proof, they say, of so many problems, not only in the United States but also abroad? And do you think that maybe the American people have to tighten their belts?

The President. Well, as far as the Government's tightening its belt -- long overdue. I've been trying to bring that about ever since I've been here in our governmental system. I know some others are hard to understand -- that system. There has been resistance in the Congress and from the opposition party to making some of the cuts we want to make. If I had been given the budget I asked for in 1982, for that first budget of 1982, the cumulative deficits through 1986 would be $207 billion less than they are.

So, we're continuing to do this. And now we have a congressional bill that was passed, signed into law, the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings bill, which has a definite plan for reducing the deficits annually, until down the road, in just a few years, we will have a balanced budget. At the same time, I am still seeking a constitutional change that will then require a balanced budget every year of our government. And I agree with all the others that our deficit spending, by a government, is one of the economic problems that has an effect on everything and all our trading partners.

Q. Mr. President, you'll be meeting Mrs. Thatcher when you go to Venice. She may shortly be replaced as Prime Minister of Great Britain. Will you preserve the special relationship between America and Great Britain, whoever is in power in Britain?

The President. Oh, I think the relationship between our two countries has been an almost family relationship for many years -- and many different governments of the United Kingdom in the past. I don't want to seem to, in any way, try to influence the election in England, but I have to tell you that I have great admiration for the manner in which Prime Minister Thatcher has handled not only the domestic affairs but the international affairs. And beyond that I can't go, with an election coming up.

Q. But we could be quite clear on the first part of my question: that even if there was a government in the United Kingdom which embraces unilateral disarmament and seeks the removal of U.S. nuclear bases from Great Britain, you would still maintain your special relationship with such a government?

The President. I would try with all of my might to persuade that government not to make those grievous errors. And yet, as I say, we've had a friendly relationship that has survived Labor governments in the past as well as Conservative governments there.

Q. The Iranian Ambassador to the United Nations declared 2 days ago on the American TV that should his government decide to attack oil tankers in the Gulf it would do it whatever these ships are protected by the American flag. Mr. President, don't you consider this statement as a sort of anticipated declaration of war from Iran to the United States?

The President. I doubt that Iran would ever declare war on the United States, knowing what the inevitable consequence would be. And I can only respond to that statement that was made, I'm quite sure, for domestic consumption. There are a number of flashpoints throughout the world in which the Western World -- all of us, our countries here -- have to take positions in the interest of world peace. The Persian Gulf is one. And I have said from the very beginning that wherever we have to put forces in those places to help maintain peace -- anytime they are attacked they will retaliate, they will fire back in self-defense. And we're going to continue on in that regard.

The President. Well, I know that there are warships of the other nations, our allies, that are in the Arabian Sea and the Indian Ocean, and nearby. And I understand that that's been part of the conversation that Secretary of Defense Weinberger has been having with our NATO allies in Europe right now -- about possible cooperation and a relationship between the military elements that we have stationed abroad.

Q. Well, Mr. President, about 1 month ago you said that you'd examine the new data on U.S.-Japanese semiconductor trade. What are your findings on Japanese compliance, and will you lift sanctions before the summit meeting?

The President. Well, while there seems to be some progress being made, we still have not reached what I think must be the answer, and that is a return to abiding by the agreement that both our countries had made in this regard. I hope that it'll be very soon that we will restore that agreement, and when they do, we shall immediately lift the sanctions that we've put on this.

The President. Well, I know there's been a kind of volatile situation It's always referred to as the dollar being overvalued and then suddenly the dollar losing value. We've had a feeling that the currencies of some other countries have been undervalued and that everyone will be better off if those currencies have come up, so that maybe it isn't all just our dollar -- that they have come up.

We think and believe that the dollar is at the place that it should remain. We don't look for any further serious drops in the value of the dollar. And we also look at the summit in taking up the things that have been discussed, in the Latin American meetings that we all -- or our representatives gathered: things that we started in Japan next year about review of the GATT treaty or agreement, and that we can have an opening of markets worldwide and an easier flow of trade that will benefit all of us.

Q. After all the discussions with the Soviets and the allies, how close are we to an INF agreement and another summit with Gorbachev this year? And would you favor, after eliminating all the INF missiles in Europe, a so-called fire break that means no reductions of short-range nuclear weapons below the range of 300 miles?

The President. Well, we've been, again, in close consultation with the allies on this. There seems to be some pretty general agreement on the basic terms of what we're negotiating. It does begin with the long-range intermediate weapons. We're hopeful of getting rid of those in the world.

Also, there is no thought on our side of totally denuclearizing Europe at the same time that this would leave the Soviet Union with a great superiority in conventional weapons. I would like to think that, ultimately, all nuclear weapons in the world could be done away with. They're inhumane. They violate all the previous rules of warfare in that their principal targets would be the noncombatants, the civilians. And I don't think that the threat of total destruction, mutual destruction, is exactly a sensible defense program. That's why we're going forward with the SDI. We believe we're on the track of something that could maybe render such weapons obsolete. But before any of that can come about, then there must be a bringing together of the ratio of forces between the Soviet Union and ourselves.

Now, as to the first part of your question, I am hopeful that this fall we will have the summit meeting. It is up to General Secretary Gorbachev now to set the date; the invitation is there. They have agreed to come. Now it's simply a case of when will that take place. And I'm always a little superstitious about being optimistic in advance about things like the agreement on the reduction of arms, but I do believe that great progress has been made, more than in all the years since World War II, and that we have the best opportunity for beginning the reduction of nuclear weapons that we've ever had.

Q. In connection with the arms discussions, three recent polls in my country show that for a majority of Germans Gorbachev is more popular and credible than you are. Does it worry you that in the heart of Europe people have more faith in the Soviet leader than in the American President?

The President. Yes, and I hope they'll wake up soon. I mean no personal rebuke or derogation of Mr. Gorbachev, but I do believe that on the record of abiding by treaties, on the record of striving for peace, that the United States record is one that the people should have confidence in, more confidence than the Soviet Union, which has a wrong record of violating treaties and of using subversion in order to spread its influence throughout the rest of the world.

The President. No, I have to say we're not just in there daring someone to do something. I think all of the nations that you represent have made it plain how important the Persian Gulf is. That's an international waterway. And I have said for several years, and I've had agreement with the leaders of your countries, that there's no way that we can sit back and let the Persian Gulf be closed to international trade. Now, it's far more important to Western Europe and Japan because of the percentage of oil that comes out of there for their total needs. We also get some from there, but it is a much smaller percentage from that particular area.

Q. Is the United States ready to recognize the Canadian claim to sovereignty up there in its own interest -- that is, so that the Canadians can perhaps use subs to intercept and keep track of the Soviets?

The President. We honestly want to find an answer to that. Now, on one side -- that sort of holds back completely accepting the Canadian position -- is the international precedent that, again, would be set if something that by definition is international water could be closed by the nearby countries. There are other chokepoints on the trade routes in the world where that could easily be invoked if the pattern was set. On the other hand, from the Canadian viewpoint, I have to say that that is unique, that area. When you look at the Canadian islands and the extent to which they dominate those waters, and know that a great many of those islands year round are connected by a solid ice cover upon which there are many people who live above those waters on that ice, that this is a little different than the other situations in the world. And we sincerely and honestly are trying to find a way that can recognize Canada's claim and yet, at the same time, cannot set that dangerous precedent that I mentioned.

The President. I don't think that's a question that I should even attempt to ask. First of all, our actions will be defensive. We will defend ourselves. Now, it is true that the Iranians have placed missiles on shore that can reach targets at sea. That has to be considered with regard to more than just shooting at another vessel or shooting at an airplane. But the reason why I don't think I should go farther is I think it's far better if the Iranians go to bed every night wondering what we might do than us telling them in advance.

Q. But isn't it the truth, now, that it is coming out that is actually causing so much damage? I wonder if you feel that your credibility has been damaged, perhaps as it's seen in some parts of the world, almost beyond repair now?

The President. I know the damage that's been done to my credibility, but it has not been by anything that has been proven -- quite the contrary. It has been the image that has been created by our own, particularly, Washington press corps in describing what took place. Now, there are two things linking Iran and the contras. That linkage is the thing that the press would have had no word of it had I not gone to them and told them what we had discovered.

Now, it wasn't until the leak through that Beirut paper that brought all of the press of the world into the knowledge of this covert operation we had. We had to be covert to try and save the lives of the people we were dealing with. We did get a couple of hostages back; more were scheduled to come out when the news broke and that ended everything. Well, this is when we discovered that I had not been kept completely informed in what our own representatives had been doing, that the whole arrangement had really kind of degenerated into hostage dealing rather than the thing that they had proposed first about how could we form a better national relationship. And in our digging into this, we discovered that there evidently was more money paid for our weapons than we had asked and than we received, and that that money had gone somehow into some Swiss bank accounts, and then one of those accounts was apparently one used for furnishing money to the contras in Nicaragua.

Immediately, the day we learned this, the very next morning, I went before our leadership in Congress and subsequently before the press and told them what we had discovered. Now, I'm still waiting to find out who charged Iran that extra money. We got our $12 million for the arms. How was that extra money put there, who got it, where did it go? That still has not been made clear. And I know no more than what I've just told you, and we were the first to bring this to the attention of the press.

Now, with regard to contra aid and our ongoing struggle with our Congress -- which has appropriated money for aid to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua against that totalitarian Communist government, then the Congress changes its mind and cuts off aid to them -- I, from the very first, have said the only hope we have for preventing the establishment of another Soviet base on the mainland of America is by way of the freedom fighters and then negotiating to have a democratic government there.

I made it plain, went to the public trying to arouse public opinion in this country in support of our position so that they would influence their representatives in Congress to continue providing the aid. I did that openly. I knew that there were individuals and groups in America which on their own, privately, were contributing. I didn't know who they were, and I never asked. And I never asked how they did it. And at the same time, I had expressed a belief that other democratic nations in the world -- it might be to their best interest also to lend support to the freedom fighters. And other countries did. But again, I never solicited any country and asked it to do that, and I never knew who was or who wasn't, until the head of state of one of those countries told me that they were contributing and were going to increase their contribution.

Now, that is the truth. But that's not the way the image is portrayed. I'm being portrayed as having, behind the scenes, violated the law and done all sorts of shady things to try and violate the Congress' restriction on aid to the freedom fighters. And it just isn't true. Now, I hope this will be carried word for word in each of your countries, and maybe my reputation will be restored.

Q. You have repeatedly condemned protectionism, but Europeans are not so convinced -- not to mention agriculture. I'd like to give you just an example of the European plane, Airbus. Our feeling is the American side plans nothing less than to kill the project.

The President. No. What we think is going to happen -- we've already had discussions and this, too, started in our meeting in Japan, our last summit meeting. The recognition that today the world is producing more agricultural products than there is a market for, and this is brought about by almost all of us subsidizing our farmers and in, literally, subsidizing them to produce more. And not to recognize this great surplus that's being created.

There was an agreement made in Japan that we were going to, all of us, look into this problem and see if we couldn't find a solution. And I think this will be taken up at this coming summit, because there seems to be a growing agreement that we must find a way in which the marketplace sets the goal and the productivity of farming worldwide, instead of us, each of us, paying to create overproduction. And I think that we're on the way to maybe finding an agreement that will be better, not only for everybody but better for the farmers themselves.

Q. But there's still one minute, and because I know you will do it, Mr. President, let me have one question on Berlin. You will be in Berlin. What are you going to tell the Germans in East and West, and what are you going to achieve there?

I am today signing H.R. 1157, a bill entitled the Farm Disaster Assistance Act of 1987. This bill would establish an acreage diversion program that waives the requirement to plant at least 50 percent of a producer's 1987 permitted winter wheat acreage, where adverse weather prevented planting, in order for a farmer to receive deficiency payments with respect to 92 percent of his acreage. This same requirement would also be waived with respect to producers of 1987 crops of feed grains, wheat, upland cotton, and rice who are unable to plant their 1987 crop because of residual damage from 1986 natural disasters.

The bill would also: (1) make full payment to producers who have not been fully indemnified for losses due to natural disasters in 1986 because of the inadequacy of the $400 million appropriated for it; (2) increase the acreage that would be taken into consideration when making prevented planting payments for the 1986 crops of soybeans, peanuts, sugar beets, and sugarcane; (3) require computation of upland cotton losses to take into account quality losses in estimating total losses required to qualify for payments with respect to the 1986 crop; and (4) require indemnification of certain producers of hay, straw, apples, and other commodities whose 1986 crop was lost due to bad weather.

In addition, a number of amendments broaden the coverage of H.R. 1157 beyond disaster provisions. These amendments include a discretionary loan program for sunflower seeds and a requirement that if marketing loan programs are not established for wheat, feed grains, and soybeans for 1987 before enactment of H.R. 1157, the Secretary of Agriculture must prepare a study of these marketing loans.

It should be clearly understood that I do not favor the enrolled bill's acreage diversion provisions even though they embrace the concept of a legislative proposal, known as the ``0 - 92'' proposal, that my administration submitted to the Congress earlier this year. Our ``0 - 92'' proposal, covering 1988 - 1990 crops, would sever the link requiring a farmer to plant a crop of wheat, feed grains, upland cotton, or rice in order to receive deficiency payments. Repealing this requirement would be a major step towards reducing Federal interference in farmers' decisions regarding how much land they devote to crop production and which crops they plant. These decisions should be made by farmers, based on market forces, and not by the Federal Government. Our proposal would do that. It would also reduce the current incentives for crop overproduction, which currently are grown with the virtual certainty they will be purchased by the Federal Government under the farm price support programs. Eliminating this overproduction would save $1.8 billion over the next 5 years. The enrolled bill's provisions are narrower in scope because they apply only to 1987 crops that could not be planted because of poor weather in 1986.

I am disappointed the Congress chose not to broaden the ``0 - 92'' provisions at this time. However, I am encouraged that during the debate on the conference report, sponsors of H.R. 1157 expressed support for expanding a ``paid diversion'' concept and indicated that a broadened ``0 - 92'' proposal ``has a lot of ramifications for the future.'' I intend to pursue these expressions of support and call upon the Congress to work with members of my administration to adopt not only a broadened ``0 - 92'' program, but the other commodity program reforms we have proposed.

I am opposed to the provision of H.R. 1157 that allows quality adjustments in the determination of losses caused by natural disasters with respect to upland cotton. To date, disaster payments have always been restricted to cases of reduced yield, or actual destruction, of crops -- to losses of quantity, rather than quality. The Department of Agriculture has advised me that it does not collect the data necessary to implement this sort of assistance, and that the provision therefore poses the very real risk of substantial abuse. This particular provision is limited to cotton and modest in scope; it should not serve as a precedent for future programs of similar assistance, lest we open up new opportunities for fraudulent abuse. I am also opposed to the provision that could broaden the 1986 disaster payments program. The administration will continue to encourage farmers to purchase crop insurance as the only reliable means for insuring against natural disasters. Finally, I am opposed to a new price support program for sunflowers at a time when we are trying to reduce government involvement in the agricultural sector and all data indicates chronic overcapacity in the sunflower processing area.

However, I do recognize the efforts of the bill managers to limit the scope of H.R. 1157 by preventing the addition of numerous amendments that threatened to further encumber our efforts to reduce Federal intrusion on what should be marketplace decisions. I urge the Congress to demonstrate fiscal responsibility and restraint by defeating efforts currently underway that would tamper with the way in which advance deficiency payments are made for grain crops.

Despite my reservations, I am approving H.R. 1157 in recognition of the serious crop losses that many farmers have suffered in the past year. These setbacks, experienced by some of our farmers, call for special consideration of their problem. In doing so, I once again urge the Congress to consider carefully and act favorably on my farm reform proposals. The current farm programs have increased the annual costs to the taxpayer from $4 billion to over $27 billion in only 8 years, with continued Federal control over production. They have not worked. The reforms I have proposed will, over the long term, do much to improve the condition of rural America while reducing the deficit.

Thank you all very much, and let me say a special thank you to your chairman, Stan Gault, and to your president, Sandy Trowbridge. It's a pleasure to be here today. This is the fifth time in my Presidency that I have addressed you, the representatives of more than 13,500 of America's manufacturers. For 92 years, the National Association of Manufacturers has spoken for the concerns of industry. Ninety-two years -- you know, it's great to find something older than I am. [Laughter] In those 92 years, NAM has had many proud achievements, but none prouder than its role over these past 6 years in helping us get the American economy off the ropes and back into fighting trim.

Six years ago, when we came to Washington, our economy was taking a pounding. It was reeling from an economic one-two-three combination of soaring inflation, record-high interest rates, and stagnated growth. The real income of the typical family was on a decade-long roller coaster ride towards the cellar, while taxes had rocketed towards the sky. American manufacturing had taken a particularly heavy beating. From the mid-seventies onward, productivity growth had dropped sharply. Venture capital for starting new businesses had virtually evaporated; the real value of stocks had slipped steadily down; and America had stopped investing in its future. Things got so bad that, in 1978, leaders of America's largest and most important industrial laboratories warned that even funds for research and development were drying up and we were in danger of losing our critical leadership in technology. All in all, America was facing the most alarming economic crisis since the Great Depression of the thirties.

Well, this is the mess that, beginning in 1981, you helped us clean up. Where our predecessors had talked of ``malaise'' and how complex things were, we simply placed our faith in the American people. We cut their taxes and even put a brake on the growth in government spending -- though not enough of a brake. We cut regulations as well, eliminating 40,000 pages from the Federal book of regulations. All in all, we got the tax-and-spend crowd on the run, and you know the results. Today we're in our 53d month of uninterrupted growth; that's just 5 months shy of the longest peacetime expansion in American history. In this expansion we have created over 13\1/2\ million new jobs; that's more jobs than Europe and Japan combined. We have brought interest rates to the lowest level in a decade, inflation to the lowest in a quarter of a century. Real family income has risen strongly and steadily.

Since our recovery began, there's been a new sense of looking to the future in the country, and that's reflected in our investment climate. Venture capital has once again become plentiful. We have created millions of new businesses. And the stock market, which is the source of new capital for established businesses, has more than doubled in value. Not long ago, there was a newspaper story about a German entrepreneur who has built three factories here in America and is building another. These factories make products for export to Latin America and the Far East. Explaining why he located export factories here, not Germany, he gave a simple answer: taxes. ``In the United States,'' he said, ``I have to earn $1.8 million in order to put $1 million in my own reserves.'' In Germany he had to earn not $2 million or $3 million, but $4 million to do the same thing.

But there's one thing about our critics: No matter how good things are, they're always with us. They can no longer complain about the lack of jobs, not when a greater proportion of Americans have been at work this year than ever before in our history. They can no longer talk about fairness, not when we slowed the climb in the poverty rate that they began, and then put the poverty rate into the fastest fall in almost two decades. So, now they've invented new charges. They say the American middle class is disappearing, and not just the middle class -- American manufacturing, as well. America is deindustrializing. Well, let's look at those charges.

I said these charges were to advance a political agenda; protectionism is part of that agenda. And some here in Washington point to our trade imbalance and say that the only answer is to throw out the international rule book and get tough. I remember the last time we got tough that way, in a way they mean tough. It was called Smoot-Hawley, and it brought on, or at least deepened, worldwide, the Great Depression.

Where unfair trade practices are the problem, we have and will make full use of our trade laws, laws that conform to our international agreements. Our recent semiconductor action is an example of how effective we can be. In the past 6 years, we've used the sanctions provided for in our trade laws more extensively than any other administration. Our goal is clear: Trade must be free, and trade must be fair. But the problem isn't always abroad. Here at home, we're working to make America more competitive. And the most important way to do that is to put a leash on runaway Federal spending. And that's why I'm here today: to ask your help in that effort, because here in Washington, the big spenders are on the hunt again. One Washington insider said recently that, ``You can see the pendulum starting to swing back toward more spending.'' And you know what that means. If the big spenders get their way, it'll be tax time again in Washington.

Already both Houses of Congress have passed budget plans that gut defense and raise taxes. And how they could attack pay and weapons for our men in uniform who are committed to protecting freedom and democracy, it's beyond me. The leadership of the House has come up with so many ways of increasing taxes that Capitol Hill is starting to talk about the ``Tax-of-the-Month Club.'' [Laughter] They've even suggested putting off the final year of tax reform. Well, let me say this in plain, unmistakable English: The ``Tax-of-the-Month Club'' is one club the American people aren't joining, and I'm not either. Congress' answer to the deficit problem is more taxes for more spending. It's time to say no to the free spenders. I will veto any legislation that raises the American people's taxes.

Now, this is not the time to give up on our battle against deficit spending -- not now, just as we've begun to make progress. In the first term, we slowed the growth of spending; this year we're going even further. Because of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, when this year is ended, the deficit will be down by about $50 billion. Yes, this year, for the first time in 14 years, the Federal Government will spend less, after taking out inflation, than it did last year. And as a proportion of gross national product, the deficit has declined from 6.3 percent in 1983 to less than 4 percent this year. But now the word among the big spenders on Capitol Hill is, as one lobbyist said a few months ago, ``It's feeding time again.'' The session wasn't 12 weeks old before this Congress began showing its true colors and passed two outrageous spending bills over my veto. NAM worked with us to try to stop those bills, and let me say, for all Americans, thank you.

Now, although you were behind us in those veto battles, I'm sure many of you didn't have the time to study the bills in detail, so I thought I'd give you a few samples from one of those porkers -- [laughter] -- the highway bill. This year's highway bill included 152 demonstration projects; 5 years ago, had only 10. That's because, traditionally, demonstration projects are supposed to test, that is, ``demonstrate'' new and revolutionary methods for building and maintaining highways -- period. Well, in this highway bill, Congress authorized a project that will -- in the words of the highway bill -- ``demonstrate the effectiveness of parking facilities in relieving on-street congestion.'' Another project will demonstrate -- to quote again -- ``methods of improving access to a flood memorial.'' The flood of projects like this is part of why I demonstrated where to park my veto pen. Override or no override, it was a bad bill.

Now, if you talk to the big spenders around town, you'll probably hear them say that the public mood has shifted, that polls show that the American people want more spending. Well, let me ask you to show them a little common sense. The American people don't want more spending; they want better results. For example, the American people care about the family farmer, and so do I. But neither they nor I want a farm program that makes farmers less able to compete in the world markets. And no one wants one that gives, as our current law does, more than $1 million a year in farm aid to each of 144 wealthy dairy farmers as well as to the members of the royal family of a foreign country whose American farms are bigger than their entire country.

Anyone who tells you we can't cut the deficit without raising taxes and attacking defense is just not telling you the truth. Last year we got the special interests out of the tax code; now it's time to get them out of the budget. And the way to start is by changing the way Congress does business on the budget. Ever since the middle seventies, when Congress shoved the President out of the way and took over the budget process almost entirely, deficits have soared. Today Congress' budget process is in shambles, with missed deadlines and budget resolutions that mean nothing. I have agreed to have members of my administration sit down with Congress and talk about the budget process. Congress needs a way of ensuring that it will honor budget decisions once it agrees to them -- no back-door spending, no missed targets. Budget process reform is essential, but let me add, the basic problem here is that Congress is attempting to do something it was never intended to do.

Well, this is why I've said, over and over again, it's time to give the President what 43 Governors have, what I had when I was Governor of California: the ability to veto spending, project by project, a line-item veto. If the President abuses the veto, Congress has the power to override him. Truth is, they just don't want to have to vote on some of those pure pork items when they're out there standing alone in the open and not buried and hidden in the budget bill.

We also need a constitutional provision that 44 States have written into their own constitutions. Polls show that 70 percent of the American people support a balanced budget amendment and have for years, but we can't even get an up and down vote in Congress. The reason: The big spenders don't want a balanced budget, pure and simple.

Well, maybe it's getting time for the American people to take matters into their own hands. An amendment enters the Constitution when three-fourths of the States approve it. But first, someone has to draft the specific amendment for all of them to consider. Under the Constitution, Congress can do that, or the States themselves can call a special convention to frame the common language. It takes 34 States to call such a meeting. Thirty-two have already issued a call for a meeting to draw up a balanced budget amendment. Now, I would prefer having Congress do the drafting, but one way or another, we owe it to our children to see to it that, before the decade is out, the Constitution of the United States of America includes a balanced budget amendment.

You know one of the principal goals of my last 2 years in the White House will be setting America on the road to eliminating deficit spending. In the last 6 years, we've taken America from the worst economic crisis since the Depression to one of the longest peacetime expansions, as I said, in our entire history. We have slowed inflation, produced a new era of growth and opportunity that has reached all Americans. We came into office with a plan: lower tax rates, less regulation, monetary stability, and controlled Federal spending through a constitutional amendment. We put three of the four parts into practice and got four of the best years in our history. But unless we get the big spenders in Congress under control, we could see inflation and stagnation returning. That's what the budget battle is all about: making the next 4 and 8 and 20 years as good as the last 4. Continued growth and opportunity for a generation -- that's what's at stake.

Next week I will fly to Venice for my seventh economic summit. I'll ask the leaders of the other industrial nations to stimulate their economies. We want them to buy more goods, not only from America but from throughout the world, so they can help us make prosperity worldwide. And I'll tell them that we, for our part, will finish putting our own house in order. I will tell them that I will spend this summer and fall going to cities and towns all over America. I will be asking the American people to help us keep the deficit spenders in Congress from wrecking America's economic future. This is my pledge; this is my promise. It's a fight I look forward to.

It's 40 years now since the end of the Second World War. These have been the most prosperous 40 years in the history of man. But if we can achieve the goals that I will set out in Venice, the next 40 can be even better. Here at home, I'm counting on your support in all these months ahead. America has come to a time for choosing. Will we complete the work we began 6 years ago, or will we turn back to the days of tax and spend and stagnation and decline? Help us see to it that the choice is to go forward so that the golden promise for America's future and the world's can become a reality.

The President today announced his intention to designate Ann Barbara Wrobleski as Representative of the United States of America on the Commission on Narcotic Drugs of the Economic and Social Council of the United Nations. She would succeed Jon R. Thomas.

The President met today with his national security advisers to review United States Persian Gulf policy and United States plans for the protection of United States-flagged ships operating in the Gulf. The President reviewed the diplomatic efforts being made to end the Iran-Iraq war. He reaffirmed United States efforts to obtain a United Nations Security Council resolution calling for an end to the war to include mandatory sanctions. Diplomatic efforts to strengthen Operation Staunch will be intensified.

The President directed additional consultation with our allies and will be raising the issue at the summit in Venice. The President also directed his advisers to provide continued full consultation to the Congress and to begin preparation of reports to the Congress on our proposed action. The President clearly reaffirmed United States policy to remain in the Persian Gulf to protect vital United States national interests.

The President received a detailed presentation on the military plan to protect United States flag and naval vessels and approved the plan for further development. It was clear from the presentation that United States military forces have the capability to escort United States flag vessels in the Gulf to deter potential attacks and defend themselves against threats from belligerent powers. The escorting of reflagged ships will begin when the President decides. The capability exists now.

I want to speak directly this afternoon on the vital interests of the American people, vital interests that are at stake in the Persian Gulf area. It may be easy for some, after a near record 54-month economic recovery, to forget just how critical the Persian Gulf is to our national security. But I think everyone in this room and everyone hearing my voice now can remember the woeful impact of the Middle East oil crisis of a few years ago: the endless, demoralizing gas lines; the shortages; the rationing; the escalating energy prices; the double-digit inflation; and the enormous dislocation that shook our economy to its foundations.

This same economic dislocation invaded every part of the world, contracting foreign economies, heightening international tensions, and dangerously escalating the chances of regional conflicts and wider war. The principal forces for peace in the world, the United States and other democratic nations, were perceived as gravely weakened. Our economies and our people were viewed as the captives of oil-producing regimes in the Middle East. This could happen again if Iran and the Soviet Union were able to impose their will upon the friendly Arab States of the Persian Gulf, and Iran was allowed to block the free passage of neutral shipping.

But this will not happen again, not while this President serves. I'm determined our national economy will never again be held captive, that we will not return to the days of gas lines, shortages, inflation, economic dislocation, and international humiliation. Mark this point well: The use of the vital sealanes of the Persian Gulf will not be dictated by the Iranians. These lanes will not be allowed to come under the control of the Soviet Union. The Persian Gulf will remain open to navigation by the nations of the world.

Now, I will not permit the Middle East to become a chokepoint for freedom or a tinderbox of international conflict. Freedom of navigation is not an empty cliche of international law. It is essential to the health and safety of America and the strength of our alliance. Our presence in the Persian Gulf is also essential to preventing wider conflict in the Middle East, and it's a prerequisite to helping end the brutal and violent 6\1/2\-year war between Iran and Iraq. Diplomatically, we're doing everything we can to obtain an end to this war, and this effort will continue.

In summary then, the United States and its allies maintain a presence in the Gulf to assist in the free movement of petroleum, to reassure those of our friends and allies in the region of our commitment to their peace and welfare, to ensure that freedom of navigation and other principles of international accord are respected and observed -- in short, to promote the cause of peace. Until peace is restored and there's no longer a risk to shipping in the region, particularly shipping under American protection, we must maintian an adequate presence to deter and, if necessary, to defend ourselves against any accidental attack or against any intentional attack. As Commander in Chief, it's my responsibility to make sure that we place forces in the area that are adequate to that purpose.

Our goal is to seek peace rather than provocation, but our interests and those of our friends must be preserved. We're in the gulf to protect our national interests and, together with our allies, the interests of the entire Western World. Peace is at stake; our national interest is at stake. And we will not repeat the mistakes of the past. Weakness, a lack of resolve and strength, will only encourage those who seek to use the flow of oil as a tool, a weapon, to cause the American people hardship at home, incapacitate us abroad, and promote conflict and violence throughout the Middle East and the world.

When we got to Washington 6 years ago, we set out to tackle the tough fundamental challenges to America's future. One of the toughest was drug abuse. Today I'd like to give you an update, an administrative report, if you will, on this issue. Since 1981 Federal spending on drug abuse programs has tripled; it is now nearly $4 billion, and we've included virtually every major Federal agency and department in the effort. To consolidate our initiatives and make certain the fight against illegal drugs is a well-managed and effective undertaking, this March I established the National Drug Policy Board. This Cabinet-level body, led by Attorney General Ed Meese and Secretary Otis Bowen, has developed a plan which will add new vigor and a more comprehensive approach to our crusade against drug abuse.

The strategy is aimed at coordinating the wide range of antidrug activities going on in our country. Education, prevention, treatment, rehabilitation, and research to reduce the demand for drugs as well as investigations, intelligence, interdiction, prosecutions, and international programs to reduce the supply of drugs to our citizens are all part of the same battle. The plan would designate a lead agency for each category of antidrug abuse authority. This means that one Federal agency will be the focal point for ensuring that all other Federal agencies are doing everything they can to stop illegal drug use. For example, the Department of Health and Human Services will lead on the treatment and rehabilitation issues, while the Department of Education will do the same for school programs. This approach is simple, straightforward, and avoids the temptation of adding another layer of bureaucracy.

Much of what we do at the Federal level is aimed at choking off the supply of illegal drugs. With the assistance of Vice President Bush, we're continuing to make tremendous progress in seizing drugs crossing our borders; with the Customs Service and the Coast Guard working more closely together, we'll seize even more. We arrest drug traffickers and send them to prison. With the Drug Enforcement Administration, FBI, and the U.S. Attorneys working more closely together, we'll be even tougher on those who traffic in drugs. But attacking the suppliers is not enough. As long as there is an illegal market for narcotics, the drug lords will find a way to meet the demand. That's why we cannot ignore the other half of our strategy. We need to keep up the pressure to prevent drug use. We want no new users, and we want those who are using drugs to stop.

We should all be concerned about the competitiveness of our national economy. Last fall I announced a broad antidrug plan which included the goal of a drug-free workplace. At that time, I signed an Executive order requiring drug testing for selected Federal workers in critical positions. Many companies, including more than one-third of the Fortune 500, already have a testing program in place. Drug testing, when done properly, can have dramatic results. Ask anyone in the Armed Forces. Through mandatory drug testing and a well-run, antidrug campaign, we have achieved a 67-percent reduction in the use of drugs across the board by our military.

We need to achieve these kinds of results in our schools, as well. Under the National Drug Policy Board plan, Secretary Bill Bennett will continue to lead the campaign for drug-free campuses. We owe it to our kids to do our very best to protect them against this menace. And that's why part of our plan will also focus on high-risk youth, those young people with serious drug problems. Drugs pervade every part of our society, and the United States isn't the only one confronting this problem. In June we will be participating in a United Nations conference in Vienna to spur international commitment to battle illegal drugs.

Of course, well-organized and coordinated Federal action is only part of the solution. State and local governments play an indispensable role through community school boards, hometown treatment and rehabilitation programs, as well as enforcing of law. Most of all, however, we need the active involvement of the American people in developing a national attitude of intolerance to illegal drugs. Nancy was asked for advice by a young student worried about what to say when approached by drug users and dealers. She told her the answer was simple: Just say no. Together, we can deal with this threat to our families and country. We can help our loved ones and friends. We all need to speak with one voice: Say no to drugs in the school; say no to drugs in the workplace; say no to drugs in the home. Together, say yes to a drug-free America.

Well, I do want to thank each of you for giving to the fight against AIDS. And I want to thank the American Foundation for AIDS Research and our award recipients for their contributions, as well. I'm especially pleased a member of the administration is one of tonight's recipients. Dr. [C. Everett] Koop is what every Surgeon General should be. He's an honest man, a good doctor, and an advocate for the public health. I also want to thank other doctors and researchers who aren't here tonight. Those individuals showed genuine courage in the early days of the disease when we didn't know how AIDS was spreading its death. They took personal risks for medical knowledge and for their patients' well-being, and that deserves our gratitude and recognition.

I want to talk tonight about the disease that has brought us all together. It has been talked about, and I'm going to continue. The poet W.H. Auden said that true men of action in our times are not the politicians and statesmen but the scientists. I believe that's especially true when it comes to the AIDS epidemic. Those of us in government can educate our citizens about the dangers. We can encourage safe behavior. We can test to determine how widespread the virus is. We can do any number of things. But only medical science can ever truly defeat AIDS. We've made remarkable progress, as you've heard, already. To think we didn't even know we had a disease until June of 1981, when five cases appeared in California. The AIDS virus itself was discovered in 1984. The blood test became available in 1985. A treatment drug, AZT, has been brought to market in record time, and others are coming. Work on a vaccine is now underway in many laboratories, as you've been told.

In addition to all the private and corporate research underway here at home and around the world, this fiscal year the Federal Government plans to spend $317 million on AIDS research and $766 million overall. Next year we intend to spend 30 percent more on research: $413 million out of $1 billion overall. Spending on AIDS has been one of the fastest growing parts of the budget, and, ladies and gentlemen, it deserves to be. We're also tearing down the regulatory barriers so as to move AIDS from the pharmaceutical laboratory to the marketplace as quickly as possible. It makes no sense, and in fact it's cruel, to keep the hope of new drugs from dying patients. And I don't blame those who are out marching and protesting to get AIDS drugs released before the I's were -- or the T's were crossed and the I's were dotted. I sympathize with them, and we'll supply help and hope as quickly as we can.

Science is clearly capable of breathtaking advances, but it's not capable of miracles. Because of AIDS long incubation period, it'll take years to know if a vaccine works. These tests require time, and this is a problem money cannot overcome. We will not have a vaccine on the market until the mid- to late 1990's, at best. Since we don't have a cure for the disease and we don't have a vaccine against it, the question is how do we deal with it in the meantime. How do we protect the citizens of this nation, and where do we start? For one thing, it's absolutely essential that the American people understand the nature and the extent of the AIDS problem. And it's important that Federal and State Governments do the same.

I recently announced my intention to create a national commission on AIDS because of the consequences of this disease on our society. We need some comprehensive answers. What can we do to defend Americans not infected with the virus? How can we best care for those who are ill and dying? How do we deal with a disease that may swamp our health care system? The commission will help crystallize America's best ideas on how to deal with the AIDS crisis. We know some things already: the cold statistics. But I'm not going to read you gruesome facts on how many thousands have died or most certainly will die. I'm not going to break down the numbers and categories of those we've lost, because I don't want Americans to think AIDS simply affects only certain groups. AIDS affects all of us.

What our citizens must know is this: America faces a disease that is fatal and spreading. And this calls for urgency, not panic. It calls for compassion, not blame. And it calls for understanding, not ignorance. It's also important that America not reject those who have the disease, but care for them with dignity and kindness. Final judgment is up to God; our part is to ease the suffering and to find a cure. This is a battle against disease, not against our fellow Americans. We mustn't allow those with the AIDS virus to suffer discrimination. I agree with Secretary of Education Bennett: We must firmly oppose discrimination against those who have AIDS. We must prevent the persecution, through ignorance or malice, of our fellow citizens.

The Public Health Service has stated that there's no medical reason for barring a person with the virus from any routine school or work activity. There's no reason for those who carry the AIDS virus to wear a scarlet A. AIDS is not a casually contagious disease. We're still learning about how AIDS is transmitted, but experts tell us you don't get it from telephones or swimming pools or drinking fountains. You don't get it from shaking hands or sitting on a bus or anywhere else, for that matter. And most important, you don't get AIDS by donating blood. Education is critical to clearing up the fears. Education is also crucial to stopping the transmission of the disease. Since we don't yet have a cure or a vaccine, the only thing that can halt the spread of AIDS right now is a change in the behavior of those Americans who are at risk.

As I've said before, the Federal role is to provide scientific, factual information. Corporations can help get the information out, so can community and religious groups, and of course so can the schools, with guidance from the parents and with the commitment, I hope, that AIDS education or any aspect of sex education will not be value-neutral. A dean of St. Paul's Cathedral in London once said: ``The aim of education is the knowledge not of facts, but of values.'' Well, that's not too far off. Education is knowing how to adapt, to grow, to understand ourselves and the world around us. And values are how we guide ourselves through the decisions of life. How we behave sexually is one of those decisions. As Surgeon General Koop has pointed out, if children are taught their own worth, we can expect them to treat themselves and others with greater respect. And wherever you have self-respect and mutual respect, you don't have drug abuse and sexual promiscuity, which of course are the two major causes of AIDS. Nancy, too, has found from her work that self-esteem is the best defense against drug abuse.

Now, we know there will be those who will go right ahead. So, yes, after there is a moral base, then you can discuss preventives and other scientific measures. And there's another aspect of teaching values that needs to be mentioned here. As individuals, we have a moral obligation not to endanger others, and that can mean endangering others with a gun, with a car, or with a virus. If a person has reason to believe that he or she may be a carrier, that person has a moral duty to be tested for AIDS; human decency requires it. And the reason is very simple: Innocent people are being infected by this virus, and some of them are going to acquire AIDS and die.

Let me tell you a story about innocent, unknowing people. A doctor in a rural county in Kentucky treated a woman who caught the AIDS virus from her husband, who was an IV-drug user. They later got divorced, neither knowing that they were infected. They remarried other people, and now one of them has already transmitted the disease to her new husband. Just as most individuals don't know they carry the virus, no one knows to what extent the virus has infected our entire society. AIDS is surreptitiously spreading throughout our population, and yet we have no accurate measure of its scope. It's time we knew exactly what we were facing, and that's why I support some routine testing.

I've asked the Department of Health and Human Services to determine as soon as possible the extent to which the AIDS virus has penetrated our society and to predict its future dimensions. I've also asked HHS to add the AIDS virus to the list of contagious diseases for which immigrants and aliens seeking permanent residence in the United States can be denied entry.

The President. They are presently denied entry for other contagious diseases. I've asked the Department of Justice to plan for testing all Federal prisoners, as looking into ways to protect uninfected inmates and their families. In addition, I've asked for a review of other Federal responsibilities, such as veterans hospitals, to see if testing might be appropriate in those areas. This is in addition to the testing already underway in our military and foreign service.

The President. Now let me turn to what the States can do. Some are already at work. While recognizing the individual's choice, I encourage States to offer routine testing for those who seek marriage licenses and for those who visit sexually transmitted disease or drug abuse clinics. And I encourage States to require routine testing in State and local prisons. Not only will testing give us more information on which to make decisions, but in the case of marriage licenses, it might prevent at least some babies from being born with AIDS. And anyone who knows how viciously AIDS attacks the body cannot object to this humane consideration. I should think that everyone getting married would want to be tested.

You know, it's been said that when the night is darkest, we see the stars. And there have been some shining moments throughout this horrible AIDS epidemic. I'm talking about all those volunteers across the country who've ministered to the sick and the helpless. For example, last year about 450 volunteers from the Shanti Project provided 130,000 hours of emotional and practical support for 87 percent of San Francisco's AIDS patients. That kind of compassion has been duplicated all over the country, and it symbolizes the best tradition of caring. And I encourage Americans to follow that example and volunteer to help their fellow citizens who have AIDS.

In closing, let me read to you something I saw in the paper that also embodies the American spirit. It's something that a young man with AIDS recently said. He said: ``While I do accept death, I think the fight for life is important, and I'm going to fight the disease with every breath I have.'' Ladies and gentlemen, so must we. Thank you.

Well, looking at all of you, I know why we've won so much of our war these last few years. When the history of our time is recorded, I believe that you, the members of the United States Chamber of Commerce, will occupy a place that few can match. I've heard talk over the years about a Reagan revolution, but in many ways I believe it would be better to call what we've done your revolution.

You gave us your drive. You gave us your support. And let me say to two personal heroes of mine, Dick Lesher and Richard Rahn [vice president of the chamber] -- and I know everyone here will second this -- for 8 years here in Washington you have given us energy, wisdom, intellect, and leadership, and that's why we've come so far.

The victory ribbons on your regimental colors read like a list of the great legislative battles over economic policy in this decade: Gramm-Latta, Kemp-Roth, Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. And let me interject my thanks to all of you for also standing with us in a battle we lost: the battle to sustain my veto of the Grove City legislation.

But to return to economics, today perhaps we're a little blase about our incredible accomplishments, but who in 1979 would have thought it possible that in less than a decade the top marginal tax rate on personal income would drop from 70 percent to less than half of that, that the era of high inflation be brought to an end, and that without reigniting the inflation we could light the torch of economic growth and see its lustrous beacon shine for longer than has ever been recorded in peacetime.

Eight years ago, in the now-distant epoch of double-digit inflation, 20-percent interest rates, and official handwringing about the limits of growth and the fatigue of our national economic mettle, we said -- you and I -- that the way to rebuild America was to restore faith in the greatest constructive force of all: the American spirit of enterprise. And to those who called for more government planning, more regulations, and even more taxes, we said that, in a nation, as in a man or a woman, economic success is not a matter of bricks, mortar, balance sheets, or subsidies. No, if a national economy is to soar, first the inventive, enterprising, pioneering, dreaming entrepreneurial spirit of the Nation's people must soar. And that meant not more regulations, but fewer; not more government decoration [direction], but less; and, yes, not higher taxes, but lower taxes.

I can't help remembering the fear and trembling and utter disbelief that greeted the arrival of our creed here in Washington. Sometimes it reminded me of a scene of a horrified crowd in some old science fiction film -- ``Attack of the Killer Tomatoes,'' maybe. [Laughter] Well, it occurs to me as I approach the end of my Presidency that the unparalleled resistance that greeted our policies and that we still face, despite our unparalleled success, was born of more than an ordinary political clash. After all, the struggle between those wanting more and less government spending was not due to Washington -- new to Washington, I should say. Neither was the struggle between those who wanted higher and lower taxes, or less defense versus a strong defense. No, our arrival in Washington represented not another skirmish among partisans but a collision of constellations. As George Gilder has written, in his words: ``The central conflict in the economy pits the forces of statist bureaucracy against entrepreneurs.'' And he adds that on one side are those who believe the economy, the Nation, and the world require, as he puts it, ``control by large corporations and governments.'' On the other are those who believe our future depends on ``small companies, entrepreneurs, inventors, and creators.'' And that's his list, not mine.

Yet before we came to Washington, the powers that be saw the economy as a kind of a repertory theater: a few well-known actors -- business, labor, government -- performing a few well-known plays. Well, we said this is not the way the world works; that there's a great surging, yearning, creative energy in this land of questing freedom; and that because of it, America is continually being born anew. New companies, new technologies bloom and have their day. Some grow; some fade. Some businesses become titanic overnight; others remain tiny. But just because this process of conception, birth, and growth is so fertile, so diverse, and so dynamic, government cannot regulate it, subsidize it, or control it. Government had just better get out of the way and let it happen.

You know, I sympathize with the liberals. When we first started talking about the economy in these terms, they predicted disaster. We predicted growth. And this year more people have been at work than ever before in the history of our country. A greater proportion of the work force has been employed than ever before. And after a decade of a falling roller coaster, real family income has been rising steadily ever since our expansion began more than 5 years ago. Exports are high and climbing. And in industry after industry, American manufacturing is the world leader. Unemployment is the lowest in almost 14 years, and month after month brings new word of hundreds of thousands of new American jobs. And over 90 percent of these new jobs are from businesses that are 5 years old or less; that is, entrepreneurial businesses, just the kind we've been talking about and the liberals dismissed.

You've got to hand it to our critics, though. With all that good news mounting, they didn't give up. When the stock market fell last October, they could hardly wait to dance on the grave. And when I said the economy was strong, they said I was ``irrelevant.'' Well, the first quarter economic figures came out last week.

To an economy that is strong and hearty, they're trying to feed a junk-food diet filled with empty calories. Some of the emptiest are in a box marked the ``Trade bill.'' The plant-closing restriction is the bill's worst provision, although not the only bad one. Mandatory plant-closing notification has no place in Federal law. It's a subject for labor-management negotiations, not government regulation. And before they start to argue with me on that, let me remind them, I was elected president in my union 6 times. And by the way, I'm calling it plant-closing notification because that's what it's called in the press. But it covers wholesalers, retailers, services -- every sector. And it applies to layoffs as well as closings.

You may have seen articles lately saying, ``Well, this restriction is not all that bad.'' Well, yes it is. It's a shackle on smaller companies that want to take the leap and become large -- one more risk, and a big one, if they cross the threshold and fall under the regulation, an important reason to say, let's hold off growing that big for awhile. And it's a ticking bomb in the back seat of any medium-size or larger company that is stripping down and overhauling so it can keep on the track with foreign racers.

The bill's elaborate exemptions that tell who must give notice and who doesn't have to will detonate lawsuits sending managers to the courtroom just when they're most needed in the factory pulling their weight. Whenever the choice is a close call about whether a company is so distressed that it doesn't have to give notice, legalities will swamp the crucial economics of holding customer loyalty and maintaining creditor confidence -- and, so, of saving American jobs.

Well, those who are for the provision insist that it won't hurt us because, after all, many European countries have similar restrictions themselves. Yep, and that's among the reasons for Europe's poor job performance over the last 6 years. If we had done as poorly, our unemployment rate would be up like theirs, not down from 10.8 percent to 5\1/2\ percent. What would organized labor say then? Anyone who would copy Europe in this way is no friend to American workers. For America, plant-closing restrictions are like playing Russian roulette with a machine gun -- a sure loser. I've said it loud and clear again and again: I want to sign the right trade legislation this year. For example, greater protection for intellectual property and greater negotiating authority in the current round of international trade negotiations are good ideas, and they're in the bill, but they don't make up for so much else. In the form it was passed, I will veto the trade bill.

Well, making America's economy more like that may not seem smart. Well, for those who look at the transformation of our industrial base with trepidation, it offers great comfort. Our opponents want to seize the seasons and stop time from flowing by. They look to the future with fear. They fear new technologies, new businesses, new international competition. We look to the future with hope and optimism. And why shouldn't we? We've made a long journey and, despite all the predictions of disaster, a good one. We aren't at the end yet. Of course, in the years ahead, as we work to reduce further the disincentives in the tax code, we should cut the capital gains tax. When you tax something, you get less of it. The capital gains tax is a tax on innovation, and we need more innovation, not less.

We also must get control of Federal spending, once and for all. Congress has had control of the budget process for 14 years and made a mess of it. One thousand page continuing resolutions you can hardly lift -- forget about vetoing by the line, I'm ready to veto by the pound. [Laughter] But it's time to strengthen the President's hand in the budget process. It's too late for me to have the benefit of this, but it's time to give the Presidency what 43 Governors have, what I had as Governor of California and used 943 times without getting overridden once -- a line-item veto. We need a 2-year budget cycle and more privatization. Last year Congress cut the Coast Guard and gave the money to Amtrak. I'd rather stop all subsidies to Amtrak and give those dollars to the Coast Guard to fight drugs. And most important, we need a no-fault insurance policy for taxpayers -- insurance against reckless spending -- a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution.

Now, this is just a short distance on the path of our unfinished journey. We're like the pioneers who settled this great land, who struggled across the prairie, who braved the mountain passes and deserts, who conquered a vast frontier. It is love and faith that drive us on -- love of the liberty and opportunity that America has offered so many for so long; faith that we, with our strength and our wit, can, like the pioneers and the patriots before us, help build, preserve, and perpetuate that heritage. It is a great gift God has given each of us -- making us Americans. Who knows why some are so blessed.

In these last 8 years you've shown your thanks by helping to rekindle America's fire of opportunity and optimism, by helping to ensure that it would burn for the generation to come, by feeding the flame that will guide our journey into the future. Yet the journey is not over, and without you, America could yet turn back. So many hopes rest with you -- so many dreams. And this is my appeal to you, my old comrades in arms, on this, our last gathering of my Presidency: Don't let that fire dim! Keep America on the path to the future. Do this not for me but for this land we love and cherish so well. Thank you, and God bless you all.

President welcomed Prime Minister Harri Holkeri to the White House as part of the celebration of the Year of Friendship with Finland and discussed the President's upcoming trip to Helsinki and the Moscow summit. Prime Minister Holkeri presented the President with a medal commemorating the 350th anniversary of the first Finnish settlement in America in what is now Wilmington, Delaware.

During the 30-minute Oval Office meeting, the President said that progress had been made in U.S. relations with the U.S.S.R. and expressed appreciation for Finland's support for that policy. The President noted that the Helsinki Final Act symbolizes recent efforts to overcome the East-West division of Europe and to build security and cooperation. Prime Minister Holkeri is visiting the United States to open a Finnish exhibit in Philadelphia related to the Year of Friendship with Finland designated by Congress and the President.

Prior to joining the White House staff, Mr. McKiernan served as the Chief of Staff to Secretary of Commerce William Verity and as Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Congressional and Intergovernmental Affairs. He served previously as the Director of Congressional Affairs for the International Trade Administration at the Department of Commerce. Prior to joining the Reagan administration, he served 10 years on Capitol Hill as a principal aide to Congressman Stewart B.

United States fishing industry interests have urged prompt consideration of this Agreement, and, similarly, I request that the Congress give favorable consideration to this Agreement at an early date to avoid disruption of ongoing cooperative fishing ventures.

Please be seated, and thank you and welcome, Members of the Congress, honored guests, and ladies and gentlemen. I am delighted to join you today in celebrating the great contributions made to the United States by citizens of Asian and Pacific island heritage. As you all know, next week marks the 10th Asian/Pacific American Heritage Week. And this occasion is being celebrated throughout the country. One of the events is a nationwide poster contest. And the picture is right here, and we're pleased to have the winning artist here with us today. She is a high school senior from Potomac, Maryland, Serena Lin.

Our country draws special strength from our rich cultural heritage and the shared values that unite America. Asian-Pacific Americans represent the full breadth of the American experience. For some, their family roots reach deep into American history and the building of this nation. Even before the American Revolution, the first sailors from the Philippines were settled here.

Citizens of Asian and Pacific heritage have enriched America in irreplaceable ways, but at the same time each person's story is distinctly American, each is a reaffirmation of the kind of country we are and the values that make us strong and free. I think of Wendy Gramm, whose grandfather came from Korea as a contract laborer to cut sugarcane in Hawaii. Wendy's father went on to become vice president of the same sugar company that her grandfather had worked for in the fields. And last February, Wendy was confirmed by the Senate as Chairman of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, and I can't help but note that one of the commodity futures she now oversees is cane sugar.

I think of Hoang Nhu Tran, who as a child saw Americans in uniform defending his native country of South Vietnam from Communist aggression. And when North Vietnam violated the Paris peace accords and Saigon fell, Hoang and his family were forced to flee. And they came to America. Last year, Hoang graduated from the United States Air Force Academy, and he was valedictorian of his class.

Elaine was eight when she boarded a freighter and made the long, slow journey across the Pacific to Los Angeles, then down through the Panama Canal, then up to New York Harbor, where a little girl saw the Statue of Liberty for the first time. She became a banker, did multimillion-dollar ship financing, then was named a White House Fellow. On Friday, Elaine was confirmed as Chairman of the Federal Maritime Commission, the first American of Asian-Pacific heritage ever to hold this position.

Well, for many groups, education has been a key ingredient in realizing the American dream. And one area in which Asian-Pacific Americans have particularly excelled is in education. Their accomplishments are proof that respect for learning, family encouragement -- plus a whole lot of hard work and diligent study -- pays off with high grades, advanced degrees, and successful careers. I know there's a growing concern that some universities may be discriminating against citizens of Asian and Pacific heritage, accepting a lower percentage of these applicants than get admitted from other groups, despite their academic qualifications. Well, to deny any individual access to higher education when it has been won on the basis of merit is a repudiation of everything America stands for.

Political differences over trade policy are one thing, and we can debate them, but racially-tainted appeals cross a very dangerous line. They're an affront to this country, and they threaten the tranquility and safety of all of us here at home.

Americans of Asian and Pacific heritage are one of the most successful groups in this country. What they've achieved is a great reaffirmation of the American values of work, education, family, and community. They've made this country the land of opportunity. They've distinguished themselves in many fields, from science and medicine to agriculture and commerce. They've contributed to our public life through the arts and literature, and also in government. Asian-Pacific Americans are part of the rich tapestry of American life. It's a tribute to the unifying power of America that such a diverse group whose members often have different national heritages, religious faiths, and historical experiences all come together to celebrate this occasion and to reaffirm our common bond as citizens of the United States. Let me give special praise to the Asian Pacific American Heritage Council, whose help brings people together -- or, whose work, I should say, helps bring people together, and makes this special week of celebration a reality.

We do well to salute Americans of Asian and Pacific ancestry for their accomplishments and for those of their forebears who through the decades have offered our land their talents, their determination, and a truly immeasurable gift, the treasure of their ancient heritages.

The contributions of Asian and Pacific Americans and their cultural vitality have benefited the United States in countless ways. Not least among them have been deep appreciation of the unalienable rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness that form the core of the American ethos, and the willingness and ability to defend these treasures always. Asian and Pacific Americans have won distinction in every field, and continue to strengthen our Nation with industry, initiative, and love of country; that is cause for rejoicing among all Americans, during Asian/Pacific American Heritage Week and the entire year.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 3rd day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Digestive diseases rank second among all of the causes of disability due to illness in the United States, and account for one-tenth of the economic burden of illness in our land. Their social and economic impact is enormous; half of all Americans are affected by them at some time during life. More Americans are hospitalized for digestive diseases than for any other family of illness.

In recent years major advances have taken place in digestive disease research, but efforts to determine their causes and to develop ways to prevent and treat them have only begun. Knowing the impact of these diseases and of the critical need for research in this field, private, scientific, and governmental organizations have committed themselves to increasing public awareness and understanding of gastrointestinal diseases.

In recognition of the fourth anniversary of the National Digestive Disease Education Program and of the importance of all efforts to combat digestive diseases, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 421, has designated the month of May 1988 as ``National Digestive Disease Awareness Month'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this month.

Digestive Disease Awareness Month. I urge the people of the United States and educational, philanthropic, scientific, medical, and health care organizations and professionals to take part in appropriate activities to encourage further research into the causes and cures of all types of digestive disorders.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Americans are thankful for the amount of water with which our country is blessed -- for our more than two million miles of streams, our more than 30 million acres of lakes and reservoirs, our other surface waters, and our subterranean reserves known as aquifers. We also appreciate our public water systems, whose complex processes provide us with some 12 billion gallons of generally inexpensive and high-quality drinking water daily.

We can be grateful too for the Americans who are helping to bring safe drinking water to millions in the developing world through the efforts of charitable, business, and other private groups and the Agency for International Development. From providing technical assistance to water systems in burgeoning cities to helping construct one-pipe water stands in countless villages in Africa, Asia, and Latin America, dedicated Americans are bringing water to a thirsty world. Water supplies in those developing lands mean improved health and well-being and often presage better productivity and economic vitality that benefit us all.

Less than a century ago, epidemics of waterborne disease were a major public health threat in our country. Today, behind every drop of good drinking water are dedicated individuals such as scientists, engineers, elected officials, water plant owners and operators, regulatory officials, and citizen groups, whose unceasing efforts allow us to enjoy the world's best drinking water.

We must be aware, however, that we do face some difficulties regarding drinking water. Lead eroding from the lead pipes and solder used in some water systems is causing health problems, especially for children; natural contaminants such as radon need attention in many water systems; and man-made contaminants are at levels of concern in some water supplies. Controlling these problems will be a challenge, but not one beyond our abilities or our determination.

State and local governments continue their efforts in this regard, and the Safe Drinking Water Act of 1974, as amended in 1986 (Public Law 99 - 939), enlists the help of the Environmental Protection Agency in preserving and improving our drinking water. Because of this law and growing public concern, dramatic changes in public water systems over the next 5 years are likely to affect every community.

Consumers and the private sector help protect and improve drinking water by checking the quality of local systems and regional supplies and by working with utilities and State and local officials to protect and improve them. They help preserve water supplies by supporting wellhead protection and watershed control measures. And consumers encourage improved operation and maintenance of water facilities, increased monitoring, replacement of aging pipes and equipment, and installation of new treatment technologies where necessary.

We desire drinking water of the highest quality and realize that our large water supply is neither limitless nor without expense. Knowing that good drinking water is a precious resource and one of the world's most important products, we need to continue to understand and identify potential hazards, how such hazards enter our water supply, and the best means to eliminate them.

As a weary child tumbles into his father's arms, to be lifted up and carried, he feels his father's strength and is content. In that perch he is like a captain, confidently scanning the horizons of his world, secure in the knowledge that his ship will carry him safely through any threatening seas. Children, vulnerable and dependent, desperately need such security, and it has ever been a duty and a joy of fatherhood to offer it.

Raising a family is no easy task, of course, but one of trial, frustration, and disappointment. Great strength and more than a little courage are needed to persevere, to fight discouragement, and to keep working for the family. In that strength, and with God's grace, fathers find the patience to teach, the fortitude to provide, the compassion to comfort, and the mercy to forgive. All of this is to say that they find the strength to love their wives and children selflessly. And it is above all for this wondrous, mysterious love that fathers shower upon their families, and that allows them to ceaselessly put their families' needs first, that we honor fathers with their own special day.

Our gratitude is not limited to Father's Day, but remains constant; indeed, there are not enough days in the year to express it properly. Still, it is fitting that on such a day the American people pause to celebrate all fathers for their loving care for their youngsters. Our Nation can only continue to prosper if our families prosper. Nothing can replace the family's role as prime nurturer and educator of children, and nowhere are our country's shared values more effectively transmitted to future generations.

So let us thank all fathers on this day; but, above all, let us each take this occasion to express our thanks and our affection to our own fathers, whether we can do so in person or in prayer. We are perhaps no longer little children riding on our fathers' shoulders, yet we will forever feel their firm and loving guidance through life's challenges.

Thank you all very much, and welcome to the East Room of the White House. This room has seen many important people -- Presidents, diplomats, world statesmen -- and none more important, none of greater faith and moral courage, than these four men that we are honored to have with us: Father Shibayev, Reverend Matveiuk, Mykola Rudenko, and Iosif Begun. I promise that the witness of faith that you have brought here today will not be confined within these four walls, or forgotten when this meeting is ended. I will carry it in my heart when I travel to the Soviet Union at the end of this month.

And I will say that the most fitting way to mark the millennium of Christianity in Kiev Rus would be granting the right of all the peoples and all the creeds of the Soviet Union to worship their God, in their own way.

While some new churches are being built and others, mostly Russian Orthodox, have been allowed to reopen, many other congregations are denied recognition and, therefore, legality. The Ukrainian Catholic Church, the Uniate Church, is still closed, outlawed, and persecuted. Religious instruction of children outside the home -- Sunday schools, Hebrew schools, or even confirmation classes, and the production of religious study material are all still illegal activities. And about those Bibles, the authorities have promised to print 100,000 copies for a country of 280 million people. Yet now, there are at least signs by Soviet authorities of a new law on the freedom of conscience, reflecting the interests of religious organizations.

So, while every positive step taken by the Soviets is welcomed, we realize that this is just a beginning. Let me also say, in particular, that the rights of Soviet Jews have taken up much of our official time, and this is very close to my heart. Our hope is for the doors to open fully to emigration and to full freedom for all faiths.

So, the earlier predictions by some that once the grandmothers died nobody would remember that there had been a church in Russia are wrong. Instead, the church in Russia is still full of grandmothers, women who were little children in 1917, and they're joined by the younger generation, longing to satisfy the need, the hunger, that no manmade institution in any society can ever fulfill. Today roughly 90 million people in the Soviet Union, or nearly a third of the population, proclaim some form of belief in God.

And it is not surprising that revolutions devoted to reshaping man as if he were so much clay deny one of the most basic teachings of Judeo-Christian belief: that after God shaped Adam from dust, he breathed into him the divine principle of life. There's a wonderful passage in ``Doctor Zhivago,'' in which Pasternak speaks of his bitter disillusionment with the philosophy of materialism and the bloody revolution it has spawned. ``When I hear people speak of reshaping life,'' he says, ``I fall into despair. People who can say that have never understood a thing about life -- they have never felt its breath, its heartbeat. They look on it as a lump of raw material that needs to be processed by them, to be ennobled by their touch.

The history of the 20th century has too often been brutal and tragic, but it has taught us one lesson that should fill our hearts with hope and joy, for we have found that the more religion is oppressed, the greater the attempt to extinguish that life principle, that divine spark -- the more it glows. History is etched with stories of those who suffered religious persecution, yes, but it also tells of transcendence, devotion, and sanctity, even conversion.

We think of the strengthened conviction Alexander Solzhenitsyn gained in prison, and the case of the Soviet psychiatrist Anatoliy Koryagin, recently released after serving 6 years in prison. He sought baptism as soon as he emigrated. And we think of heroism and courage that can only remind us of the early Christian martyrs. One such is Anna Chertkova, recently released after being held in a Soviet psychiatric hospital since 1973 for no other crime than her faith; or Alfonsas Svarinskas, a 62-year-old Lithuanian priest, who has spent 18 years in prison and is not scheduled to be released until 1990. He is gravely ill and has petitioned for permission to go abroad to receive medical care; or Bishop Julijonas Steponavicius, in internal exile since 1961 for refusing to collaborate with the authorities.

The faith of the peoples of the Soviet Union is pure and unbreakable. As Moses led his people from bondage in Egypt, as the early Christians not only withstood pagan Rome but converted an empire, we pray that the millennium of Christianity in Kiev Rus will mean freedom for the faithful in Russia, in the Ukraine, the Baltic States, and all the regions of the Soviet Union.

I have to add a little something here. Recently, a woman wrote me a letter and enclosed in the letter was a copy of what can only be called a prayer. But the story of that -- it's in that single page -- of a young Russian soldier in a shellhole in World War II, knowing that his unit was going to announce -- or going to advance the attack, looking up at the stars and revealing for the first time that he had been taught all his life that there was no God. But now he believed there was. And he looked up at the heavens and spoke so sincerely and said, ``Maybe before the night is over I'll be coming to You. And I hope You will forgive what I believed for so long, the foolishness, because I know now there is a God.'' And that letter was found on the body of the young soldier who was killed in the coming engagement. I thought sometimes of taking it to Moscow with me -- maybe the General Secretary might like to read it.

Congressmen so you'd know that it isn't true that we're totally separated -- your Congressman here, Dennis Hastert. Well, it's just a pleasure to be in Chicago -- Chicago has always been my kind of town -- and an honor to be able to speak to you, the members of the National Strategy Forum.

I'll keep my remarks brief today so that we'll have ample time for questions. I can't help but reflect here at the opening that it can be pretty tough in this State for a Chief Executive. In fact, let me tell you what the Illinois State Register had to say about the occupant of the White House. They said, and I quote, ``the craftiest and most dishonest politician that ever disgraced an office in America.'' Of course, they weren't talking about me. That was Abraham Lincoln, they said. [Laughter] It may have been that kind of treatment in the press that led Lincoln to answer this way when he was asked what it felt like to be President. Well, he said -- you've heard Lincoln is supposed to have said -- about the man who was tarred and feathered and ridden out of town on a rail. And a man in the crowd asked him how he liked it, and his reply was that if it wasn't for the honor of the occasion, he'd rather walk. [Laughter] Come to think of it, I must be doing something right.

Americans, of course, often speak about human rights, individual liberties, fundamental freedoms. We know that the promotion of human rights represents a central tenet of our foreign policy. We even believe that a passionate commitment to human rights is one of the special characteristics that helps to make America, America. It was Lincoln himself who said that the Declaration of Independence granted liberty not to our nation alone but ``gave promise that in due time the weights should be lifted from the shoulders of all men.'' And it's important to note that this American emphasis on human rights represents much more than merely a vague respect for human dignity. No, part of our heritage as Americans is a very specific and definite understanding of human rights, a definition of human rights that we can assert to challenge ourselves and our own institutions and that we can hold up as an example for all the world.

Ultimately, our view of human rights derives from our Judeo-Christian heritage and the view that each individual life is sacred. It takes more detailed form in the works of the French and English writers of the 18th century Enlightenment. It is the notion that government should derive its mandate from the consent of the governed, this consent being expressed in free, contested, regular elections.

Elected governments would reflect the will of the majority, but the Enlightenment writers and our own Founding Fathers gave the concept of human rights still more definite, specific form. For they held that each individual has certain rights that are so basic, so fundamental to his dignity as a human being, that no government, however large the majority it represents, no government may violate them -- freedom of speech, freedom of religion, freedom of assembly, freedom of the press. These and other rights enshrined in our Constitution and Bill of Rights consist in severe limitations upon the power of government. And this is another basic point: They are rights that every citizen can call upon our independent court system to uphold. They proclaim the belief -- and represent a specific means of enforcing the belief -- that the individual comes first, that the Government is the servant of the people, and not the other way around. That contrasts with those systems of government that provide no limit on the power of the Government over its people.

The authority of the Communist Party is not determined by a document -- a constitution, if you will -- but by the leadership who determine what is right for the people. Rights such as free speech, free press, and free assembly are granted if they are ``in accordance with the interests of the people and in order to strengthen and develop the Socialist system.'' And that last line I was quoting.

And I've always said that our negotiations must be undertaken with precisely this sort of realism, this sort of candor. And yet while establishing this context is essential, and reminding ourselves of these basic distinctions always useful, today I have something additional in mind. For, in recent months, the Soviet Union has shown a willingness to respect at least some human rights. It is my belief that there is hope for future change, hope that in the days ahead the Soviets will grant further recognition to the fundamental civil and political rights of all. But before discussing our hopes for the future, I'd like to turn for a moment to a subject that the Soviets themselves often raise.

United States may recognize civil and political rights, but what of economic and social rights? The Soviets point out, for example, that the United States has an unemployment problem. Or they point to the American problem of homelessness or to racial discrimination. Well, it deserves a full response. To begin with, so-called economic and social rights belong to an essentially different category from civil and political rights. The economic and social conditions in any society are constantly changing -- new social groupings constantly taking shape, as yours did, new markets forming as old markets disappear. And yet there's nothing shifting about civil and political rights like freedom of speech or worship; they are constant and immutable, forever basic to the dignity of each human being. They are fundamental -- fundamental to everything.

Yes, the United States has social and economic shortcomings -- unemployment, for one. As a free people, we've created an economic expansion that over the past 5 years has created nearly 16 million new jobs, but we still recognize we need to do more. Homelessness is indeed a problem, an agonizing one. To some extent, we are bound in dealing with it by our very commitment to liberty, for while we seek to help the homeless in every way possible, we must avoid at all costs coercive solutions. It's true that, as a free people, we spend hundreds of millions of dollars a year through our Federal, State, and local governments to care for the homeless. As a free people, our churches, synagogues, and a host of volunteer organizations do much to provide the homeless with food, clothing, and medicines. And yet there is no denying that a problem remains. Racial discrimination -- our strides as a free people during just the past three decades have been dramatic. Yet the problem lingers, and we continue to battle bigotry and prejudice. The problems, as I said, are serious. No one would seek to deny them. Yet in freedom we are constantly confronting them, criticizing ourselves, seeking to do better, in full view for all to see.

But consider, if you will, the economic conditions of the Soviet Union. Now, I do not mean to suggest that the Soviet economy has made no progress. But the limited successes of the past arose largely from constant additions to the labor force and the availability of inexpensive resources. Now that these have been to a great extent depleted, there remains a gap between the Soviet Union and the West. Indeed, given the enormous advances in Western technology, that gap is likely to widen.

Now, I do not bring this up simply for the sake of sounding critical. I mention it here because in recent months -- and this is a development of tremendous significance -- in recent months they've begun to mention it themselves, just like Americans do about their problems. Soviet economists have published articles about Soviet shortages. One recent article dealt with the inadequacies of Soviet housing. The Soviet press now carries stories about the need for progress. And, of course, Soviet economic progress is one of Mr. Gorbachev's chief aims.

And this brings us back to the subject of the day: human rights. For I believe that the Soviets may be coming to understand something of the connection, the necessary and inextricable connection, between human rights and economic growth. The connection between economic productivity and certain kinds of freedom is obvious. Private plots of land make up only 3 percent of the arable land in the Soviet Union, but on them is raised a quarter of all of the produce. The free flow of information, to provide another example, will clearly prove vital for Soviet science and technology to have hope of reaching new and higher standards.

And yet there's a still deeper connection. For it's the individual who is always the source of economic creativity, the inquiring mind that produces a technical breakthrough, the imagination that conceives of new products and markets. And in order for the individual to create, he must have a sense of just that -- his own individuality, his own self-worth. He must sense that others respect him and, yes, that his nation respects him enough to permit him his own opinions, respects the relationship between the individual and his God enough to permit him to worship as he chooses, even respects him enough to permit him, if he chooses to do so, to leave.

They should recognize human rights because they have accepted international obligations to do so, particularly in the Helsinki Final Act. But if they recognize human rights for reasons of their own -- because they seek economic growth or because they want to enter into a more normal relationship with the United States and other nations -- well, I want to say here and now, that's fine by me. The indications, as I've said, have been hopeful. Over the past 3 years, some 300 political and religious prisoners have been released from labor camps. More recently, the incarceration of dissidents in mental hospitals and prisons has slowed and in some cases stopped completely. And while the press remains tightly controlled by the party and state, we've seen the publication of stories on topics that used to be forbidden -- topics like crime, drug addiction, corruption, even police brutality.

Now, these changes are limited, and the basic standards contained in the Helsinki accords still are not being met. But we applaud the changes that have taken place and encourage the Soviets to go further. We recognize that changes occur slowly, but that's better than no change at all. And if I may, I'd like now to share with you a brief summary of the human rights agenda that I'll be discussing in my meetings in Moscow. It has four aims.

First, freedom of religion -- despite the recent relaxation of some controls on the exercise of religion, it is still true that the churches, synagogues, mosques, or other houses of worship may not exist without government permission. Many have been imprisoned in the past for acts of worship. And yet, to quote the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, ``Everyone has the right to freedom of thought, conscience, and religion.'' And General Secretary Gorbachev has indicated a willingness to consider a new law on the freedom of conscience.

Second is freedom of speech. There are still many serving long prison sentences for offenses that involve only the spoken or written word. Yet the clear, internationally recognized standard, as defined, once again, in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, is that, and I quote, ``Everyone has the right to freedom of opinion and expression.'' And today there's more such freedom in the Soviet Union than 2 years ago. Many persons imprisoned for expressing dissenting views have been released from prison. This issue can be removed by granting full recognition to this basic human right. And I know you join me in urging the freeing of people imprisoned for nothing more than the expression of their views.

Emigration, third, has long represented a matter of great concern to us. The Universal Declaration states that ``Everyone has the right to leave any country, including his own, and to return to his country.'' Well, it's true that during the past 12 months, the rate of people permitted to leave the Soviet Union has been significantly higher than during the preceding 6 years. And it's true as well that the number of those permitted to leave for short trips, often family visits, has gone up. We're heartened by this progress. Our hope is that the Soviets grant all their peoples full and complete freedom of movement. And one point in particular: The Soviets refuse many the right to leave on the grounds that they possess secret information, even though they had ended their secret work many years before and whatever information they had has become public or obsolete. I hope that such cases will be rationally reviewed and the decision will be made to free these people and their families.

And this brings me now to the fourth and final area I want to discuss: making the progress more permanent. As I've said a number of times now, we welcome the human rights progress that the Soviets have made and believe there is good reason to hope for still more. Yet it's only being realistic to point out that we've seen progress in the Soviet Union before. Khrushchev loosened things up a bit. The intellectual and cultural life of the Soviet Union underwent a kind of thaw, a kind of springtime. But it was a springtime followed by winter, for Khrushchev's relaxations were reversed. And for the nearly three decades until our own day, oppression and stagnation once again became the determining characteristics of Soviet life. And that's why those of us in the West, both publicly and in direct conversation with the Soviets, must continue to make candor and realism the basis of our bilateral relationship. My Chief of Staff, Howard Baker, told me recently of an old Tennessee saying: ``Plain talk -- easy understood.'' Well, exactly. And just as previous hopeful moments in Soviet history ended all too soon, so, too, glasnost, today's new candor, will succeed if the Soviets take steps to make it permanent, to institutionalize it.

Freedom of religion, freedom of speech, freedom to emigrate, and the willingness to make new freedoms permanent -- these are our hopes, these are our prayers for the future of human rights in the Soviet Union, in the world, in our own country. In granting greater liberty, I am confident that the Soviets will discover that they've made possible economic growth. But even more important, this recognition of human rights will advance the cause of peace. For in the words of Andrei Sakharov, a man who suffered much under the Soviet system, but who has also experienced the benefits of glasnost -- he says: ``I am convinced that international confidence, mutual understanding, disarmament, and international security are inconceivable without an open society with freedom of information, freedom of conscience, the right to publish, and the right to travel and choose the country in which one wishes to live.

Well, since I've been speaking today about the relationship of human rights and economic progress, let me say a few words about the present situation in Poland, a nation with which millions of Americans share bonds of kinship. We hope and pray that the Polish Government will hear the voice of the Polish people and that economic freedom, reform, and recovery will soon begin. The Polish have long been ready for it.

Now in concluding, I just want to say something that I've said many times to students. I delight in having an opportunity to speak on campuses or in high schools or something. And I like to point out something about our Constitution.

But I said, the difference is so tiny in ours that it is overlooked, and yet it is so great it tells the entire difference. Three words: ``We the People'' -- our Constitution is a document in which we the people tell the Government what it can do, and it can do nothing that isn't contained in that document. All those other constitutions are documents in which the Government is telling the people what it will let them do. And it's wonderful to see the look on their faces and to think that, well, maybe you've established another little shingle on the roof of patriotism where they're concerned. I told this one night at a dinner table in the White House, when the person beside me was the Crown Princess of Japan. They were there on a trip to our country. And very quietly she said something to me. I was only wrong in one respect. Since World War II, the Japanese Constitution now also says, ``We the People,'' and they have copied us. And I was very happy to be corrected.

Friedman. Thank you, Mr. President. Mr. President, we all thank you for your remarks, and now we come to the moment where we have a question-and-answer session. The rules of engagement, Mr. President, are these: The members have had an opportunity to write written questions -- hopefully legibly. We've had ushers pass among the tables, and the questions are now safely contained in a fishbowl.

The President. What it has been since as far back as 1949. And that is: Those are international waters, and no nation has a right to interfere or block those international waters to the traffic of the world. And we're going to stay there as long as it takes to see that they're recognized by everyone as international waters.

The President. Well, for one thing, we both do have, and are awaiting ratification in both countries, of the INF treaty -- because they also have a ratification process, just as we do with our Senate. And I am hopeful, and I know he is, that a part of that time could be spent with our signing, or recognizing that it has been signed, and it's in action.

START agreement, which is the desire to reduce strategic nuclear weapons, missiles, by half, 50 percent, but down to parity -- that's something that most people -- some of those who are complaining about what we might be doing with that treaty -- it's not just that each of us are going to come down 50 percent; we're going to come down to an equal number between the two nations, of warheads and missiles -- missiles to carry them. But it's far more complicated than the INF treaty was. And it's doubtful if we are going to -- we, our people, and theirs, are working in Geneva all the time, and have been steadily, but there are many complex issues there having to do with verification and things of that kind. And so, our desire that we would be able to sign the START treaty at this Moscow summit, as we did the other one at the Washington summit, may not happen.

But then, what we have to say is: We must not be bound by a calendar date. We don't want a fast treaty; we want a good one. And if it is not properly worked out before we get there, then I think that that will be one of the things we will discuss while we're there and see if we can advance it a little, but eventually that we will sign that treaty.

But we will also be discussing the things that I mentioned in my speech here. I'm willing to give him the benefit of the doubt up to a point -- a point in which, as I say, is -- the only thing I can say in Russian is, Dovorey no provorey. And he's tired of hearing me say it. It means: ``Trust but verify.'' [Laughter] But I give him the benefit of the doubt, that faced with the economic problems that he has -- glasnost with him -- he really is attempting to get that, and so I would hope that in our discussions, that maybe we could be helpful to him in suggestions as to how he might better bring that about. And that, I think, is preferable to staging a kind of contest with him so that someone looks like a winner or loser. And we very definitely will be on that subject of human rights because we are both signatories to a Helsinki pact that has us both pledging to observe those human rights. And I think that to go on with a better relationship between the two countries -- that is absolutely essential.

Transportation is essential to American life. Our safe, fast, economical, and convenient movement of people and goods is the cornerstone of our country's social and economic welfare and of our national defense. Now, as in the past, our transportation systems -- highways, airports, inland waterways, railroads and public transit, our merchant fleet and the Great Lakes and St. Lawrence Seaway -- provide a superior emergency response network and are available as a critical component of our national defense. As our citizens travel in record numbers for business or pleasure, our local, State, and Federal governments continue to work with the transportation industry to enhance transportation safety.

The growth of our Nation and the development of transportation have been intertwined throughout our history. Those who first explored this vast country were followed by pioneers who established settlements. Most of the road routes, river systems, and ocean ports used by our earliest settlers are still in use today. Many of our great cities originated as towns that were starting or end points for transportation systems. As trade and commerce grew, transportation provided the necessary link to vital resources that in turn enabled further national growth. On land and water, in the air, and in space, our transportation systems have become an essential element of our Nation's economic health, providing indispensable services and generating employment for millions of people.

This week we acknowledge the contributions of the dedicated people who build, maintain, and safeguard our transportation systems -- from the flagman on a highway project to the space engineer. We honor those who led the way in the development and improvement of ships, waterways, motor vehicles, highways, trains, airplanes, and our newest transportation vehicles, spacecraft. The recent announcement of our National Space Policy means that we continue to call for the help of modern-day pioneers on the frontiers of space technology. With public and private cooperation, our Nation is building a highway to space that will serve as an economic bridge to the 21st century.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

General Ignacio Zaragoza defeated invading French forces at the Battle of Puebla. The Mexicans, though greatly outnumbered, were carried on to victory by their unswerving belief in liberty and independence. Today, Cinco de Mayo stands as a symbol of the love of democracy and freedom which continues to burn in the hearts of men and women throughout the Americas.

Mexico and the United States share a proud tradition of courage and conviction. As neighbors both in spirit and locale, we look to the future with faith in our continued friendship. The United States has indeed been blessed by her citizens of Mexican descent, and I am confident that our two peoples will continue to grow in friendship and mutual enrichment.

Each year during May, through the vehicle of Older Americans Month, our Nation honors its senior citizens for their many contributions to our country, its communities, and its families. The vast majority of older Americans are active members of society -- working, creating, volunteering, or simply enjoying the fruits of long years of service to others. As parents and grandparents, they extend their contributions through formation of coming generations of our citizens -- their children and grandchildren. The commerce of love between generations -- fulfillment of a duty and recognition of a debt -- is a ballast that steadies our national enterprise on its voyage from past to future.

Not every older American leads an ideal life, however. Regrettably, some suffer from abuse and neglect, wounds all the more grievous for everything these citizens have done to build and strengthen this land of liberty. For these men and women, years that should be full of satisfaction and appreciation become instead manacles of torment and disrespect from which they cannot escape.

Abuse can take many forms -- physical, mental, or emotional. It can come from family members, friends, or professionals; it can even be self-inflicted. Neglect is also a form of abuse, a manifestation of carelessness that can be seen even in situations where an elderly person's basic needs for food and shelter are being met. Loneliness, of course, is its most obvious sign, and fortunately the most easily cured by others.

Abuse and neglect reach their ultimate expression, of course, in occasional cases of -- and even organized calls for -- euthanasia of the elderly infirm. Older Americans have done their duty. In their twilight years, especially, it is our duty to them that matters. No elderly person should live in fear that he or she is a burden to others or that his or her life will be cut short for reasons of utility or convenience. We can never have too many reminders that the gift of life is ours to cherish and preserve from malice and harm until natural death.

Across our country, State and Area Agencies on Aging, social service, and law enforcement agencies are supporting programs to deal effectively with the difficult problems posed by abuse of the elderly. I urge every concerned American to help ensure that local programs are available to educate people about these problems and to assist both the older person and the abuser to get the help they need.

Government employees, with their commitment to excellence and diversity of skills, contribute significantly to the leadership of the United States in the world. These dedicated men and women are a valuable national resource, serving in the Executive, Legislative, and Judicial branches at all levels of government, and dealing with nearly every aspect of national life.

Government employees provide such a broad range of services that few citizens remain unaffected by their work. They defend our Nation, enforce the laws, help protect the environment, maintain vital transportation systems, work to prevent the entry and abuse of illegal drugs, administer the Social Security system, conduct health research, help parents teach their children, and perform countless other vital tasks for society. These public servants have also helped develop innovative technologies to show the way in the critical fields of defense, health care, agriculture, and industry.

Setting aside a week in celebration of international trade is a fitting way to remind ourselves of the countless benefits of world trade for Americans and for people around the globe, and to remember that freedom is, and must be, an essential element in economic life -- individual, national, and international.

International trade can link individuals and nations alike by providing opportunities for the interchange of goods and services, the fruit of human talents that transcend boundaries of geography and culture. The key ingredient in every act of trade is freedom. Only freedom respects the inherent rights, dignity, conscience, and worth of individuals; only freedom encourages individuals to develop their creative abilities to the fullest and to command fair return for their labor; and only freedom provides a rational and humane basis for economic decision-making. The freedom of exchange that is at the heart of every genuine economic transaction benefits all parties and builds competition, enterprise, prosperity, justice, cooperation, and social well-being as people achieve economic success by finding their fellowman's unmet needs and filling them well.

Our country's prosperity likewise depends on our ability to identify needs and markets for goods and services and to meet them well. Our free market economy, our belief in free but fair trade on a global basis, and the American people's ingenuity and ability all make our products among the world's most competitive -- and we intend to keep it that way.

Administration has worked to improve the climate for international trade by seeking a renaissance in American competitiveness. Last year, as American goods regained price competitiveness overseas, exports hit a record level; more than 407,000 manufacturing jobs were created; and employment surged, with more Americans in the labor force than ever before. Exports spell opportunity for American business; thousands of U.S. firms have increased their profit margins by exporting, and thousands are beginning to discover their untapped potential to succeed in export markets. This year's World Trade Week theme, ``Export Now,'' champions the message that I have joined the Secretary of Commerce in sending and exemplifies America's winning spirit.

Foreign markets are now more open to American goods than in the past, but we have far to go in the quest to undo unfair restrictions on trade. We seek to encourage removal of foreign barriers to free trade, but we simultaneously work to discourage domestic protectionism -- more accurately described as ``destructionism,'' because it stifles progress and prosperity by preventing competition and economic transactions that people everywhere desire and need. We also reiterate the intention of the United States Government to ensure that our trade policies serve to reinforce our national security interests around the world. International trade policies and practices must promote the causes of freedom, human rights, and economic growth everywhere.

Trade Week is a truly appropriate time to remember the many benefits international trade has conferred on our country and to reflect on the many blessings the spread of economic freedom has brought, and can bring, to people in every nation.

The President. Okay. Well, I have just a brief announcement here to make, then you can all -- well, you can all get out of here. [Laughter] The good news on the economy continues: Unemployment is the lowest it's been since 1974, and the proportion of our population working is at an all-time high. The figures have been given out this morning that the rate of unemployment is 5.4 percent, but this thing of the proportion of the population -- out of what is considered to be the potential employment pool, all of the age groups for jobs -- 62.2 percent of that pool is now employed.

And one of the best barometers of the state of our economy is to see more people working. Today's report, coupled with those of the last 2 weeks, shows that the economy continues to grow at a moderate pace, and inflation is under control.

The President. Well, I will say this, that I would have preferred it if he decided to attack me. And apparently from what we hear, he's chosen to attack my wife, and I don't look kindly upon that at all.

Each year, however, our Nation's waterways become more crowded with new and faster watercraft as well as an increasing number of traditional vessels. Despite this fact, boating remains one of the least regulated transportation activities. It is essential, therefore, that all operators be familiar with the rules and courtesies of safe boating. National Safe Boating Week reminds all Americans who use the Nation's waterways to educate themselves about and to respect the dangers of the marine environment and to learn how to operate watercraft in a safe and prudent manner.

Boating has its very own ``rules of the road.'' An operator needs to know a great deal before going out on the water. For this reason, the theme of this year's National Safe Boating Week is ``Know Before You Go.'' Those who operate small boats for fishing, hunting, and other sporting activities should have detailed knowledge of the boats they are using, their handling characteristics, how to safely load them, how to prevent them from capsizing, and how to operate and maintain their equipment. In case of an emergency, all boat operators and riders should know how to use their craft's safety devices and be certain they will work as intended; for example, life jackets should be checked, tested, and properly fitted. In addition, boaters need to be watchful for potentially dangerous situations. They must have a thorough knowledge of the waters they are using, the particular hazards they may encounter, and the prospects for environmental conditions such as tides, currents, temperature, and weather that may be dangerous. To avoid collisions and keep traffic moving, all boaters should know the Navigation Rules and the courtesies of safe boating. Most of all, boaters should know their own limitations so that they do not involve themselves and others in situations beyond their skill or physical endurance.

One especially dangerous problem for boaters is the use of alcohol or drugs. Wise boaters will avoid the use of alcohol and drugs while operating a vessel. That wisdom is backed by the law: Operation of a vessel while intoxicated is a major impediment to safety and is now a Federal offense punishable by hefty civil and criminal penalties.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Next week the full United States Senate is expected to begin floor debate on the treaty on intermediate-range nuclear forces, known as the INF treaty. You'll recall that Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev and I signed this treaty at our summit meeting in Washington last December. The treaty represents a landmark accomplishment, an historic accomplishment, because, once implemented, it will bring about the elimination of an entire class of American and Soviet nuclear missiles.

Before our nation can commit itself to a treaty, our Constitution provides that the Senate must give its advice and consent. And therefore, last January I formally submitted the INF treaty to the Senate for its consideration. The duty of the Senate in giving its advice and consent to treaties is vital to maintaining our separation of powers, and the role of the Senate is considering the -- in considering, I should say, the INF treaty -- it's essential.

Officials from our State and Defense Departments, our intelligence community, and our arms control agency have provided many hours of testimony before three separate Senate committees, painstakingly responding to the detailed questions posed to them by the Senators on these committees. In addition, Senators have addressed to the administration numerous letters about the treaty and more than 1,200 written questions. We have provided full written responses. So, you'll see that we've worked very hard to meet any Senate concerns over the treaty. And as I've assured the Senate, we'll continue to do so.

Now that the Senate Foreign Relations Committee has approved the INF treaty, the entire Senate will be called on to discharge its constitutional responsibility to provide its advice and consent to the INF treaty. As this debate is about to begin in the historic Senate Chamber, permit me to take a moment to review with you the treaty's background.

INF treaty is the result of years of hard work by American officials, officials who, in representing you in our negotiations with the Soviet Union, held fast to the key security objectives that had been set out by the United States and our NATO allies. At one point the Soviet Union actually walked away from the table and stayed away from the talks for almost a year and a half. When in early 1985 the Soviets finally returned, we repeated our call for the elimination of this entire class of U.S. and Soviet missiles -- my zero option proposal, first put forward all the way back in 1981.

And in 1987 it was the Soviet Union that finally, after 2\1/2\ more years of negotiating, came around to the American position. To sum up: In the INF negotiations, we held fast to what we wanted, and we got it. And this is what comes of negotiating from strength. It's the same successful formula -- dealing from strength -- that we're applying to our other negotiations with the Soviet Union as well. And I assure you: If we don't get what we want in these other areas -- in other words, if we do not get good treaties -- there will be no treaties.

It's my hope that, in recognition of the important role they play in this process, the 100 Members of the United States Senate will now proceed expeditiously in their debate on the INF treaty. It is, after all, a solid treaty, carefully negotiated; a treaty that stands on its own substantive merits; a treaty that will enhance the security of our country and that of our European and Asian allies now threatened by the various Soviet missiles that will be removed once the treaty is implemented. Senate approval of the treaty will enable us to get on with the job of eliminating these nuclear missiles. It will also allow us to put into action the elaborate verification regime that we achieved in the INF treaty. The most stringent in arms control history, it will enable us to verify effectively that the Soviets are indeed complying with all of the treaty's provisions.

I know that you, the American people, strongly support this INF treaty. And on Capitol Hill, the House of Representatives has already given the treaty its endorsement by an overwhelming vote of 393 to 7. Now that the treaty is moving to floor debate in the Senate, let the debate be vigorous and full, and let it proceed without delay. For I'm confident that the final vote will indeed give advice and consent to this historic treaty, the historic step toward a safer peace.

Maritime Day reminds us that the American merchant marine has always been essential to our national security and economic growth -- and reminds us as well that the men and women of the merchant marine deserve our gratitude every day. The importance of the merchant marine to our national defense was never more clear than in World War II, when, at a cost of more than 6,000 lives and with the loss of 733 ships, the American merchant marine never faltered in delivering cargo for our Armed Forces throughout the world.

Today, the merchant marine continues its roles in trade and defense -- and the sailors of our commercial fleets continue to exhibit the patriotism and the many skills that have ever characterized them and their predecessors. It is truly fitting that we pause to salute these seafarers and all other Americans who support them and guard the lifelines of the sea that sustain us all.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

This year we again observe a period of special recognition for the place of fishing, both commercial and recreational, in American life. The lore of fishing is, of course, part of American tradition, from Huck Finn to Ernest Hemingway's Nick Adams. Today fishing continues to provide enjoyment for some 60 million American sport fishermen and women and to enhance our economy in many ways.

Commercial fishing supplies us with a tremendous amount of food and other products, and recreational fishing contributes some $25 billion to our economy each year and employs some 600,000 people. Fishermen know firsthand the joys of fishing -- it is an ideal family activity, for instance -- and realize the need for careful stewardship of our sport and commercial fishery resources. The private sector works closely with government at the Federal, State, and local levels to fund fishery conservation restoration projects throughout the States and Territories.

Fishing's countless additions to our economy, our way of life, and our attitude toward our natural resources are all excellent reasons for the American people to celebrate National Fishing Week in a spirit of appreciation for the hardworking members of the commercial and recreational fishing industries and of the place of fishing in our national history and heritage.

All of us can be very proud of the contributions of this nation's 18 million small businesses. The record, quite simply, is incredible. Small business provides well over two-thirds of all new jobs; about 40 percent of our aggregate national output; the bulk of new products and technologies; most of the jobs generated for younger, older, and female workers; and over 66 percent of all first jobs, and, consequently, the initial on-the-job training in basic work skills.

Today about 13 million Americans are engaged in some entrepreneurial activity, either full-time or part-time. The number of part-time entrepreneurs has increased fivefold in recent years. We've seen in the past 5 years the longest unbroken period of peacetime growth on record. The climate necessary to nurture small business development has never been better.

Clearly the economic policies of the 1980's, which have led to an unprecedented turnaround in inflation, from 12 percent to about 4 percent, coupled with commercial interest rates coming down by more than half since we took office, have made it immensely easier to start up a small business and keep it going.

And the 7th annual report on small business, which I am sending to the Congress this week, shows the unparalleled growth of small business not only in the past year but in each year since 1980. Small business has driven this country ahead with over 4.4 million new business starts. And I'm especially pleased that small business has been the first path of economic success for unprecedented numbers of women and minorities, people who started small businesses and became a part of America's economic mainstream.

During the next 25 years small business will provide nearly three-fourths of the 43 million new jobs this country will require. Small business will meet this challenge by virtue of its quicker response time, its flexibility, its willingness to take risk, and its willingness to face the very real possibility of failure. In the United States, we have the freedom to fail as well as to win. It is this readiness to risk, this suspension of disbelief as some call it, that sets us apart and drives us to new heights of accomplishment.

Let me leave you with this thought: Small business is about hopes and dreams. It's about making dreams come true -- the dreams of men and women who lie awake at night and consider how they can improve their lot in life. Those dreams, those hopes, are a singular and great natural resource.

There are many fine contestants, and they're to be heartily commended. As in any event -- in business, in sports, in politics -- someone must be declared the winner. Now, it doesn't mean necessarily that the other contestants have lost, because all of them are winners in their own right and well worthy of being finalists in this event. And that includes many of you who are here today.

This seventh report to the Congress on the state of small business continues the positive story of earlier messages. Small businesses continue to make significant contributions in expanding industries and in new job growth.

A wider appreciation of the innovation, the competitive strength, and the quality of life that small firms bring to our economy is an important goal for all who are interested in the long-term economic health of our Nation. We need to understand the small business sector because ignorance of its contributions and inattention to the effect of government activities on it will result in policies that squelch the vitality of small firms.

Over the last 7 years, the policies of this Administration have dramatically improved opportunities for the millions of men and women who are our entrepreneurs. Inflation, which ran at double-digit rates in 1979 and 1980, has averaged 3.3 percent since the recovery began. The prime interest rate, which was 21.5 percent just before I came to Washington, has been below 10 percent for almost 3 years. Lower tax rates, reduced regulation, and streamlined government have made our small business economy the envy of other nations.

The continuation of this strong small business record is a national priority. There is still much to be done. Important changes in Federal policies can further increase the opportunities for businesses to start up and expand. At the same time, we must be wary of proposals that directly attack the flexibility, adaptability, and innovative abilities of small business. If we saddle employers with excessive burdens of economic and personal risk, if we direct the Nation's savings to excessively high levels of government consumption, if we fail to provide opportunities for coming generations of entrepreneurs, then our economic leadership is clearly at risk.

We have made choices in this Administration, choices in favor of innovation, in favor of private enterprise, and in favor of jobs for millions of men and women. In fact, since 1980, the private sector of our economy has produced 13.8 million new jobs. A majority of these jobs have been in small businesses, whose constant testing of new markets, new ideas, and new ways of doing things assures our future strength. Policies to allow this activity to flourish have been the cornerstone of our economic agenda.

Tax rates have been slashed, leaving more resources in the hands of millions of Americans who operate or invest in small businesses. Business tax rates are at their lowest level since 1941; individual rates, which apply to the greatest number of small business owners, are at their lowest since 1931. Changes in tax rules have reduced the impact of tax-induced acrobatics on business decision-making. Estate-tax reform has allowed thousands of family-owned businesses to stay under family ownership.

Continued deregulation in transportation, communications, and financial services has allowed thousands of new firms to flourish and many thousands of new jobs to be established as firms discover new markets and better ways of performing old tasks. Elimination of many hours of Federal paperwork has allowed business managers to devote more of their valuable time to managing the business. With improved economic analysis, pursuant to my Executive Order No. 12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act, millions of dollars in regulatory costs have been avoided or eliminated. In hundreds of individual regulatory proceedings, we chose to reduce regulations, to search for alternatives that promote responsible, independent decisions by businesses. We chose not to believe that blind faith in the efficiency of regulation is the only answer to society's problems.

Reforms of our Federal procurement system have opened up new opportunities for small businesses to compete and have ensured that the government is a responsible business partner. Today, we do a better job paying our bills on time, and we draw on small businesses for a greater share of the $380 billion of goods and services purchased in 1987 by the Federal Government. This increased competition in Federal procurement assures us that tax dollars are spent more wisely.

The emergence of the private sector as a major provider of research and development support is one of the most important developments in science and technology in the last two decades. Approximately one-half of U.S. R&D expenditures are funded by private sources, up from about one-third in 1965.

We have sought to draw on the energy of firms large and small. The Small Business Innovation Development Act, the National Cooperative Research Act, and the creation of a tax credit for research and development expenses have refocused efforts to develop new products and ideas. Reductions in patent fees for small firms and steps to automate the patent system are making it simpler for small companies to protect their inventions.

I count as one of the central accomplishments of this Administration the shift in the debate on these issues. The steps we have taken to improve the small business climate reflect a new and broader understanding by policymakers.

Affordable credit, stable markets, simpler Federal regulations, and lower tax rates all combine to benefit thousands of people whose days -- and sometimes nights -- are occupied in pursuing their individual entrepreneurial dreams.

Much remains to be accomplished on the small business agenda. Many of the policy changes recommended by delegates to the 1986 White House Conference on Small Business are still before us. All of us must work hard to ensure that past gains are solidified and expanded.

Small business concern about the size of the Federal deficit is as warranted today as it was during the White House Conference in August 1986. I welcome small business support for a line-item veto, and I hope that the Congress will give future presidents the same authority that 43 governors have to pare the fat out of massive appropriations bills.

Similarly, our budget process needs the discipline of a constitutionally required balanced budget. Small business owners understand this, and I invite the Congress to join me and the plurality of Americans in supporting such a measure. A government that lives within its means will free billions of dollars in private resources for yet greater small business growth.

Progress in reducing Federal spending will allow more firms, large and small, to expand into world markets, a necessity as our economy becomes increasingly interconnected with those of other nations. Negotiations to reduce trade barriers around the world are underway. Small business owners will find considerable opportunity in new markets opened by the historic trade agreement we have signed with our largest trading partner, Canada. Legislative approval of the agreement with Canada and success in other negotiations will reduce tariff and other barriers to American products and expand opportunities for our service and agricultural sectors. Our economy is increasingly integrated into the world economy; we need the resources, talent, and energy of small business to meet the competitive challenges ahead.

In addition to reducing barriers to trade among nations, we need to make sure that our domestic laws and regulations do not themselves act as barriers to increased competitiveness. Small business owners have felt the effects of such constraints quite sharply, and the small business agenda highlights the types of policies we must work toward. For example, product liability reform has been an important goal of both small firm owners and this Administration.

Congress currently has before it several bills that aim at the heart of independent business decision-making. These are bills that layer rules, mandates, and employer obligations on top of each other in an effort to regulate the relationship between employers and their workers. Federally mandated leave and health care, duplicative notice requirements on workplace safety, advance notice of layoffs and plant closings or across-the-board increases in the minimum wage combine to limit the flexibility that is the strength of small firms and indeed the strength of our economy. Uniform, inflexible Federal requirements are not the best answer to the issues these bills address.

I urge the Congress to listen to the small business owners who have increased overall employment so dramatically, who have produced a disproportionate share of innovations, and who make our economy different from, and more lively than, that of other nations. Government did not create these jobs or produce these innovations. It cannot be presumed that this national resource -- small business -- can continue to flourish as it has in the past if it is overly burdened with mandates and obligations or with excessive taxation and regulation.

The report that follows, prepared by the Small Business Administration, details the latest information available on the state of the small business economy. It encourages all of us who have a hand in shaping Federal policy to redouble our efforts to ensure that all Americans who wish to can turn ideas and dreams into businesses and jobs.

And, Peter and Lady Carrington, we're all here today to honor you on the occasion of your final visit to the United States as NATO Secretary General. You've done a magnificent job at NATO. Your efforts on behalf of all of us during the past 4 years have set a new standard. But we're recognizing something more than simply 4 years of a job well done. Your stewardship of the alliance has continued a life's work in support of human decency and the ideal of freedom -- the very basis of the compact for peace we call NATO. It is that commitment and that contribution which the American people are honoring today.

When you took over the reins in 1984, common ground seemed a precious, scarce commodity in the alliance. The decision by NATO to deploy Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles in response to the Soviet SS - 20 threat had placed a number of allied governments under enormous political pressure.

The Soviets were waging an aggressive propaganda campaign aimed squarely at the cohesion and unity of NATO, and those were difficult days. But our adversaries have rarely understood the strength of our democratic societies and political leadership, and they certainly had not taken your measure, Peter. No one did more to hold the alliance consensus of INF together than Peter Carrington. You believed in NATO when it counted, and that spirit has been contagious.

The results of your leadership speak for themselves. Recognizing that we would not back down, the Soviets returned to the bargaining table in Geneva. And last December General Secretary Gorbachev and I signed the INF treaty. What it should have taught us is that political solidarity with our allies and a shared willingness to do what is necessary to defend ourselves are the indispensable keys to better relations across the board with the Soviet Union.

You've also shown uncommon vision in charting the way ahead. As frustrating as it must be at times to have to accommodate to so many views in NATO, you have understood perhaps better than any of us that it is in our diversity and independence that we find our strength. Reconciling the occasionally differing views of the European members of the alliance with those of the North Americans -- on a special challenge -- you have quipped to me that it can be cold and lonely out there in the mid-Atlantic, where you do your work. But just as your leadership fortified the alliance during INF, it has been your gift of statesmanship which has brought our transatlantic partnership to a level of unity and common purpose unparalleled in the history of NATO.

If there was any doubt about where the alliance was heading in the earlier part of this decade, that doubt is surely gone today. Under your able hand, we have recommitted ourselves to the indispensable task of maintaining our capacity to defend ourselves and each other. You have set in motion major new programs within NATO to help all the member states better utilize the defense resources which our publics have entrusted to us. We and our partners have settled on an arms control agenda which can move the world to a new era of international political relations.

Perhaps most important, you have personally symbolized the higher values which hold the alliance together: political and economic freedom, the protection of basic human rights, and a fundamental decency in the way in which nations deal with each other.

You will be sorely missed at NATO, Lord Carrington. Believe me, I know a hard act to follow when I see one. But as I said at the outset, your 4 years in Brussels have been only a small part of four decades of commitment to the ideals which unite the West. I am confident that you will continue to channel your singular talents and energy to the service of all that the alliance represents.

Alexander Rupert Carrington, the Sixth Baron Carrington, has proved himself the devoted servant of Her Majesty's government, a friend of the American people, and the faithful defender of human freedom.

Carrington. Thank you. Mr. President, you must realize how deeply honored and moved I am by the award which you have just given me, and immensely grateful. I know how rare an honor it is for an American to be granted the Presidential Medal of Freedom. How much more so for a foreigner -- but a foreigner, as you have reminded me, who sits marooned in the middle of the Atlantic, not obviously the world's most hospitable ocean. The NATO General Secretary does indeed have to detach himself from his own national roots if he is fully to serve the interests of the alliance, and particularly if he is going to keep the transatlantic bridge in good repair.

Now, you, Mr. President, have made that task for me an easy, an enjoyable, and a satisfying one. Your door has always been open to me. You have always been ready to listen when I've tried to convey the views of your European allies and my impression of the state of our alliance. And my task was not only made easy by your openness to me personally but also by your leadership of the alliance.

Council, as you last did just 2 months ago in Brussels, yours was a reassuring and a strengthening presence. You've seen to it that America's defenses remain strong, and thus that our collective security was preserved. With clarity and force you've shown how Atlantic security is indivisible, how its tight mesh unites all the 16 member countries of the alliance. We're united in the strategy to defend our peoples, our homelands, and our freedom.

And you have reminded us that to deter any potential aggressor we must maintain together a balance of conventional and nuclear forces. And your own and the American people's commitment to our collective security can, of course, be seen most clearly in the presence of 300,000 American troops you've stationed in Europe. And less visible, but of course equally important, are the U.S. strategic nuclear forces, which are the ultimate guarantor of our security. But security must go hand in hand with political effort to enable all of us to live more sensibly together. And we have in the INF treaty an historic agreement, the first negotiated reduction in nuclear forces since the advent of those terrifying weapons. And that in itself may hold out the promise of even better things to come.

Sir, we would not have managed without you. You and Vice President Bush have been supported by statesmen and public servants of great quality. George Shultz has been a rock of stability. He has taken Herculean pains to consult your European allies over every move in our relations with the Soviet Union. Frank Carlucci and Cap Weinberger have restored to American forces in the alliance a dynamism and an elan which could not have been imagined 8 years ago.

President, over the years it's so often been said that NATO is in crisis or that the alliance is beset by danger. No one would pretend that we don't have our problems and our challenges. But as I once said, though that we may not always as an alliance sing in unison, we nearly always manage to sing in harmony. And as I leave NATO after 4 rewarding years, I am as optimistic about the future of the alliance as I was when I first became associated with it, now over 30 years ago. And not least because the generous and the farsighted spirit of the American people continues to live today through the leadership which you, Mr. President, have given us in these last 8 years.

Chairmen, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the President, and of so many other members as may be appointed thereto from time to time by the Chairman of the President's Committee from among persons (including representatives of organizations) who can contribute to the achievement of the objectives of the Committee. Members appointed by the Chairman shall be appointed for a term of 3 years and may be reappointed. The Chairman of the President's Committee may at any time terminate the service of any member of the President's Committee, except any member appointed by the President.

Committee (hereinafter provided for), may designate as, or invite to be, associate members of the President's Committee any heads of Federal departments or agencies that have responsibility for training and rehabilitation services or advocate activities touching the field of interest of the Committee or that are leading employers of individuals with disabilities.

Representatives of business, industry, labor, private organizations, public agencies, other concerned organizations, and individuals with disabilities who are not members may be invited to attend meetings of the Committee.

Committee. The President's Committee shall provide advice and information as to the development of maximum employment opportunities for people who are physically disabled, mentally retarded, and mentally ill. To this end the Committee shall advise the President as to information that can be used by employers, labor unions, and national and international organizations, suggest programs for public education, and suggest methods of enlisting cooperation among organizations and agencies, Federal, State, and local officials, Governors' and local Committees on Employment of People with Disabilities, professional organizations, organized labor, and appropriate international organizations. In carrying out these functions vested in it by the Rehabilitation Act, as amended, the Committee shall be guided by the general policies of the National Council on the Handicapped and shall work closely with the Department of Labor, the Department of Education, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Veterans' Administration, State employment security agencies, and State vocational rehabilitation agencies.

Chairman of the President's Committee, and so many additional members as will provide an Executive Committee of not less than 15 and not more than 30 members. The said additional members shall be appointed for a term of 3 years by the Chairman of the President's Committee from among the members of the President's Committee or otherwise. The Chairman of the President's Committee may at any time terminate the service of any member of the Executive Committee.

Committee in the conduct of the business of the President's Committee and, as authorized by the President's Committee or the Chairman thereof (with due regard for the responsibilities of other Federal agencies), shall study the problems of people with disabilities in obtaining and retaining suitable employment, invite authorities in the various professional, technical, and other pertinent fields to advise it in the exploration of those problems, and review plans and projects for advocating the employment of people with disabilities.

Committee, and the Advisory Council shall each meet on call of the Chairman of the President's Committee at a time and place designated by the Chairman. In the case of the President's Committee and the Executive Committee, the Chairman shall call at least one meeting and two meetings, respectively, to be held during each calendar year.

The Chairman may from time to time prescribe such necessary rules, procedures, and policies relating to the President's Committee, the Executive Committee, and the Advisory Council, and to their affairs, as are not inconsistent with law or with the provisions of this Order.

Committee, the Executive Committee, and the Advisory Council shall serve without compensation. The Chairman and the Vice Chairmen of the President's Committee may receive transportation and per diem allowances as authorized by law for persons serving without compensation. Persons with disabilities serving as Chairman or Vice Chairmen may be compensated for attendant expenses, consistent with government procedures and practices.

Employees of the President's Committee shall be appointed, subject to law, and shall be directed by the Chairman of the Committee. To such extent as may be mutually arranged by the Chairman of the Committee and the Secretary of Labor, employees of the Committee shall be subject to the administrative rules, regulations, and procedures of the Department of Labor.

Committee necessary office space and to furnish the Committee, under such arrangements respecting financing as may be appropriate, necessary equipment, supplies, and services. The estimates of appropriations for the operations of the Committee shall be included within the framework of the appropriations structure of the Department of Labor, in such manner as the Director of the Office of Management and Budget may prescribe. The Chairman of the Committee, in cooperation with the Assistant Secretary for Administration and Management of the Department of Labor, shall be responsible for the preparation and justification of the estimates of appropriations for the Committee.

President's Committee shall report annually to the President, who may apprise the Congress, and other interested organizations and individuals on the progress and problems of maximizing employment opportunities for people with disabilities.

Transition. (a) To the extent that this Order is inconsistent with any provision of any prior order, or with any provisions of any regulation or other measure or disposition, heretofore issued, made, or taken by the President or by any other officer of the Executive branch of the Government, this Order shall control. Executive Order No. 11480 of September 9, 1969, as amended, is hereby superseded.

The tenure of persons as members of the Committee in pursuance of the provisions of section 7(b) of this Order, (i), in the case of persons appointed to the predecessor Committee by the President, shall be at the pleasure of the President, and (ii), in the case of other members, shall be for periods equal to their respective unexpired terms under Executive Order No. 11480, as amended, but shall also be subject to the provisions of the last sentence of Section 1(b) of this Order.

This year again we observe a period of time to reflect on our efforts as individuals and as a Nation to create a drug-free society. We do so in the knowledge that we have both cause for hope and cause to redouble our efforts.

Dedicated law enforcement officers and government personnel continue to fight the drug traffickers here and abroad who make war on all of us. Families, churches, schools, and communities are fostering wholesome and healthy attitudes and behavior that are guiding young and old alike. Public opinion polls and other measures show an increasing awareness of the seriousness of illegal drug use and alcohol abuse. And more and more of us see in our American heritage of faith, freedom, spiritual values, and personal achievement a true, rewarding way of life that far outstrips the false, harmful, and joyless path of drug addiction.

America's young people are responding to education and prevention efforts, but continued and intensified work is needed -- and at earlier ages. Positive peer pressure can significantly affect children and can create environments in which illegal drug use and alcohol abuse are unacceptable. The ``Just Say No'' movement, which grew out of great public concern and strong and effective encouragement by the First Lady, is now a rallying cry for youth who want to say ``Yes'' to life and to the future.

Just Say No Week this year, on May 11, children across our land will take part in a national ``Just Say No'' walk against drugs. This week of observance is an excellent time for each of us to commend -- and to assist -- the young people of our country and all of the parents, educators, and so many other Americans who continue to develop and carry out efforts against illegal drug use and alcohol abuse.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 10th day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

This year we again set aside a week to mark our concern over osteoporosis. This bone-weakening disease is the most common cause of bone fractures in the elderly and is a major health problem that afflicts millions of Americans. Osteoporosis can occur in men, but women are the majority of its victims. In fact, it affects half of American women over age 45 and 90 percent of women over age 75.

Any bones may be affected, although fractures of the spine, wrists, and hips are the most common. Osteoporosis is the underlying reason for 1.3 million bone fractures a year, and its incidence will increase as our population ages.

Fortunately, scientific knowledge about this disease has grown, and there is reason for hope. Research is revealing that prevention may be achieved through estrogen replacement therapy for older women and through adequate calcium intake and regular weight-bearing exercise for people of all ages. New approaches to diagnosis and treatment are also under active investigation. For this work to continue and for us to take advantage of the knowledge we have already gained, public awareness of osteoporosis and of the importance of further scientific research is essential.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The family is the indispensable foundation of society; at its best, it performs tasks that no other entity can hope to duplicate. The family has the primary responsibility for nurturing children, transmitting our culture, and building the character traits that make for healthy adults and good citizens. Upon the strength of the family rests the future of our Nation.

For a variety of reasons, however, some parents are unable to provide a minimally acceptable level of care for their children, and temporary or permanent alternative placement is necessary. National Foster Care Month presents an appropriate opportunity for all of us -- public officials, business, religious, and community leaders, and parents alike -- to reflect on the pressures facing families today and on the need for increased efforts to ensure that abandoned or abused children have the opportunity to live in healthy, loving homes.

The emphasis in foster care must be on the well-being of the child, and public policy must serve to promote alternative placement that represents actual care and not mere custody. Because the tasks facing foster parents often include special challenges, such as care of a child who is physically or mentally handicapped or who has been emotionally or physically abused, the mothers and fathers whom society qualifies to accept this added responsibility must be held to a high standard. To accomplish this goal, many more happy and successful families must be willing to step forward and to offer to share heart and home with children desperately longing for both. The aim of all foster care must be the establishment for the child of a sense of permanence and belonging.

Foster Care Month also provides an opportunity to offer public thanks for the sacrifices and dedication of the many foster parents and concerned professionals working in the field of foster care. Their jobs require extraordinary patience and love, and their rewards are often reaped only years after their primary labor is done -- when the child is grown and fully appreciates what has been done for him or her, or when society pauses from its hectic rush forward to recognize the good they have accomplished.

Finally, this month-long observance calls us to deeper thought on the role of values and ideas in the very formation of families. For if the goal of child care is the creation of a warm, stable environment, it is self-evident that the best place to start is in the pursuit of strong and stable marriages.

If the need for foster care is not to outstrip our society's capacity for remedial action, it is critical to focus more efforts on policies that promote and protect the triad of mother, father, and child as the harmonious chord God intended for them to be.

To demonstrate our esteem and appreciation for those who devotedly and selflessly share their lives with foster children, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 59, has designated the month of May 1988 as ``National Foster Care Month'' and has requested the President to issue a proclamation in its observance.

National Foster Care Month. I call upon all educators, churches, health care providers, the media, public and private organizations, and the people of the United States to observe this month with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

If we answer this summons, the need for commensurate action will be apparent to us. Senior citizens merit our express appreciation for their countless, invaluable contributions, past and present, to our Nation. They deserve as well our best efforts to avoid and to dispel false ideas about aging. This requires all of us to become more willing to familiarize ourselves with the many ways older people continue to achieve in every area of endeavor as they begin second careers, further their educations, and voluntarily serve their neighbors both at home and abroad. We can also resolve to lend our support as the private sector and public agencies help senior citizens maintain independence and as State and Area Agencies on Aging work with community leaders and groups to create responsive service systems for older Americans.

By every indication, those systems are working well, as is the overall economy whose growth and vitality are necessary for these systems to function as they are designed. The Social Security system, which began the decade in desperate straits, has been rescued and is on solid ground as we near the end of the '80s. Reform of the tax code has brought relief to many elderly taxpayers, and up to a quarter of all of these citizens will pay no Federal income tax whatsoever. The poverty rate among the elderly has been reduced to the lowest level in our history.

The true wealth of our older Americans -- some 30 million men and women over the age of 65 whose life expectancy continues to grow -- lies in the wisdom and experience they have to offer succeeding generations. We are wise ourselves to tap that accumulation of knowledge and good judgment and to pay the tribute of close attention to our venerable fellow citizens, the prime architects of the peace, freedom, and prosperity that are our present blessing and future hope.

President today announced his intention to appoint Louis F. Laun to be an executive branch Commissioner-Observer on the Commission on Security and Cooperation in Europe. He would succeed Alfred Hugh Kingon.

Nancy and I are saddened to hear about the death of Tabatha Foster. Many Americans were drawn to her because of her courageous battle against birth defects. We extend our deepest sympathies to her family.

Thank you, and thank you, Lee Greenwood. Lee, your music is an inspiration to America. Now it's my turn to sing for my supper. [Laughter] Ladies and gentlemen, thank you all very much for being here tonight. I want to thank all those who worked so hard to make tonight's dinner a success, especially the waiters: Al Gore, Bruce Babbitt, Dick Gephardt, and Paul Simon. [Laughter] But really, David Murdock, our dinner chairman, has done such a terrific job I may not let him go back to California until I do. And Rabbi Balkany, thank you for your outstanding efforts toward tonight's dinner.

By the way, in a few weeks a new film opens: ``Rambo III.'' You remember, in the first movie Rambo took over a town. In the second, he singlehandedly defeated several Communist armies. And now in the third Rambo film, they say he really gets tough. [Laughter] Almost makes me wish I could serve a third term.

But what I really want is for the next Republican President to have a Congress that will work with him, not against him. And that is exactly what Congressman Guy Vander Jagt and Senator Rudy Boschwitz are working to achieve and what tonight is all about.

I remember when George Bush and I took office, January 1981 -- or as another Republican President might have put it: 4 months and 7 years ago. You know, I've waited 125 years to say that. [Laughter] When we took office, the American economy was sinking rapidly in quicksand. Government spending was soaring out of control. Business was being crushed by massive regulation and taxation. Two consecutive years of double-digit inflation had raised consumer prices by a whopping 27.2 percent. And with inflation driving people into higher and higher tax brackets, take-home pay didn't go very far. The prime rate was at a record 21\1/2\ percent. Business failures and unemployment were climbing. Economists called it stagflation; the Democrats called it malaise; the liberal pundits said it was part of America's inevitable decline.

But we came in and said the only thing that was inevitable was that bad policies produced bad results. We said there may be no easy solutions, but there's a simple solution: Get government out of the way, and let free people in a free economy work their magic. When we proposed cutting tax rates and letting working people keep more of their own money, our critics warned that it would lead to runaway inflation. Instead, inflation was slashed to a fraction of what it had been, and interest rates were cut by more than half. The top tax bracket has now been lowered from 70 percent to 28 percent, and tax revenues are at an all-time high. Our critics warned that if we slowed the growth in government spending the economy would suffer. When I spoke to you last year, I reported that the U.S. economy had had 53 consecutive months of growth. Well, tonight I have to take that back because it's now 65 months. It is the longest peacetime expansion in our history. And jobs -- at the 1984 convention, I said the expansion had created 6\1/2\ million new jobs. Now it's over 16 million new jobs.

Now, does all this good news mean, as our critics argue, that America's prosperity has run its course? Hardly. The Democrats were wrong before, and they're wrong again. Our prosperity is based on sound fundamentals: increased production by individuals in the world's most dynamic and freest economy. And now new advances in the physical sciences, information systems, biology, and applied mathematics are producing new industries, new jobs, and increased productivity that will power our economy well into the next century.

So, the best is yet to come. If the American people vote in November to continue the progrowth economic policies of the last 7 years, believe me, the next decade will be known as the Roaring Nineties.

But the opposition that controls Congress has made perfectly clear where they stand. When I send them budgets that limit spending, they call them dead on arrival. And when they talk about reducing the Federal deficit, it's just a code word for raising taxes. That's why the 1988 elections are so important. We need a new Congress willing to hold the line on taxes and spending. And I promise you this, even after I leave office, I will never stop campaigning for the tools needed to limit the insatiable fiscal appetite of government. To protect our prosperity, the President needs the line-item veto, and America needs a constitutionally mandated balanced budget.

Just as we have rejected the permanence of totalitarianism, so too have we worked to put an end to nuclear terror. While our opponents were shouting for a nuclear freeze, we stood firm and demanded the total elimination of an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles, to be verified by on-site inspection. That's what we demanded, and I can tell you, that's what we got. The INF treaty has swept away the failed ideas of arms control or nuclear freeze. The new vision is nuclear arms reduction.

Well, carrying a record of peace and prosperity into a national election is a good beginning. But we're also going to keep talking about excellence in education, cracking down on crime, and continuing to press the war against drugs on every front. And that means passing new, tough laws, including the death penalty for drug kingpins and those who kill police officers. It means appointing no-nonsense judges, blocking drugs at our borders, confiscating it in our cities, and eradicating it in the fields where it is grown. And it also means -- and Nancy has led the way here -- teaching our children to just say no.

Eight years ago, George Bush and I said to the American people, ``The time is now.'' And it still is. The story of America is one of people who've made their dreams come true by realizing that the time for action is always now. It began with 13 Colonies in their battle for independence; and then westward expansion, an Industrial Revolution, the building of a great nation, and finally America's ascendance on the world stage. At every point, the time was now. It is history's greater story, and its greater chapters have not yet been written.

I was surprised by the news reports that have said my endorsement last evening of the Vice President was ``lukewarm.'' I am enthusiastic, fully committed and, as I have said, will go all out to make Vice President Bush the next President of the United States. George has been a partner in all we have accomplished, and he should be elected. He has my full confidence and my total support. I will campaign actively on his behalf.

Tuberous sclerosis is an inherited disease whose neurological symptoms can run the gamut from speech disorders, mental retardation, and behavioral problems to motor difficulties and seizures. Small benign tumors may grow on the face and eyes, as well as in the brain, kidneys, and other organs. In its most devastating form, tuberous sclerosis leaves patients completely helpless and dependent.

Approximately one in every 10,000 Americans has tuberous sclerosis, placing this malady among the more common genetic disorders. Yet it often goes unrecognized. White spots that generally appear on the skin early in life are one characteristic sign, but symptoms often take considerable time to develop and are easily misdiagnosed.

There is currently no cure for tuberous sclerosis, but some of its symptoms are treatable. Seizures may be controlled by new anticonvulsant drugs. Children with learning, speech, and language disabilities may benefit from sophisticated educational techniques. People with motor handicaps can learn skills to increase their mobility and enhance daily living.

The best hope for alleviating the suffering brought on by this disease lies in biomedical research. The National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke (NINCDS), the focal point within the Federal government for research on neurogenetic disorders, encourages studies on tuberous sclerosis. Some investigators are striving to develop improved methods of treatment; others search for the location of the responsible gene so that the defect that leads to tuberous sclerosis can one day be identified, analyzed, and corrected.

Two private, voluntary health agencies, the American Tuberous Sclerosis Association and the National Tuberous Sclerosis Association, share with the NINCDS the task of informing Americans about this disorder and stimulating more scientific research. All Americans can take heart in the success of this cooperative effort, which is fundamental to the conquest of this disorder.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The President. I'm sorry for the delay. We were waiting for one very special person, who apparently is not going to be able to get here. But I want to thank you all very much, and I'd like to welcome everyone gathered here at the White House for the National Safe Kids Campaign.

But seriously, I'm grateful for the contributions that the Children's Hospital National Medical Center, the National Safety Council, and Johnson & Johnson have made to save our most precious resource: our children. And seeing all of you young people here today reminds me of a story of my youth. Well, it was even more than youth. It was back to when I was 3 years old in a little town of Tampico, Illinois, where I'd been born.

And on the far side of the park was a railroad track, and the depot. And my brother, who was 2 years older than I -- we were out there one day. And you children -- would be hard to realize that there was a time when you didn't have ice cream wagons and things like that coming around.

Luckily my pride was really the only injury suffered that day, but for many others physical harm is altogether too personal and too real. With me are -- or with all of us here are several families whose stories I'd like to share with you.

On a hot August afternoon -- now, this is the individual we've been waiting for and is apparently not yet here -- Nancy Dunning was on the phone with her husband when she heard a loud thud. And as Mrs. Dunning ran into the backyard, she saw her neighbor rushing toward the street, where her 4-year-old son, Chris, lay bleeding. He'd been hit by a car. As the neighbor comforted Chris, Nancy ran and called the telephone number 911. Suffering serious neck and leg injuries, Christopher could easily have been paralyzed had any of the people who treated him made the slightest mistake. But fortunately his paramedics had completed a pediatric trauma course. And today he is fully healed. His mother Nancy Dunning describes herself as a much more cautious mother now. ``I know that the worst can happen, and I'm doing everything I can to make sure it doesn't happen again,'' are her words.

Joan and Jerry Langdon consider themselves conscientious parents who've taken much care to make their home safe for their baby daughter, Heather. Yet one evening Heather's natural curiosity led her to grab a hot, bright light bulb. At such a tender age this little girl's reflexes didn't tell her to pull away from the scorching heat. Her scream attracted Jerry's attention, and he pulled her hand off the light, but only after she'd been badly burned. Heather has received several skin grafts and, thank goodness, will heal completely.

Godown is a 12-year-old student who's being honored by the National American Automobile Association for saving the life of a kindergartner. On March 18th, 1987, Kristin was the lead school safety patrol member riding with kindergartners on their way home from Hybla Valley Elementary School in Alexandria, Virginia. At one of the stops, Kristin got off the bus to make sure the children exited safely. And just as the bus was about to pull away, a schoolchild ran under the vehicle to retrieve a piece of paper. Kristin shouted for the bus driver to stop, and because of her quick action, Anita Murphy is alive today. Next week Kristin will be honored, along with other children who've made similar heroic efforts, with the Triple A School Safety Patrol Lifesaving Medal at an awards luncheon here in Washington.

I thank you, and God bless you. And now I'm going to ask if a few people would come up here with me. I guess Chris Dunning hasn't yet arrived. No, he's not here. So, now would Heather come up and Kristin.

National Safe Kids Week parents, relatives, teachers, and everyone responsible for the care and safety of children should take notice of the many ways in which we can help youngsters avoid accidents and grow up safely. Children themselves should also become increasingly aware of ways to protect themselves and other young people. Each year accidents take a tragic toll of perhaps 8,000 young lives lost and 50,000 children disabled. We need to recall that we can prevent the majority of these incidents -- and we need to do as much as we can about it, in homes, schools, places of work and recreation, on the highways, and throughout our communities.

Much has been done already. Americans continue to take responsibility by exercising extra care around the house, as well as by using items such as infant and toddler car seats and seat belts, smoke detectors, flame-retardant clothing, and child-proof packaging; and emergency medical services are developing still greater capacities in the prevention of death and of serious aftereffects of injury.

As more and more of us understand that accidental injuries are avoidable, and as we act accordingly, we will substantially reduce this major source of death, disability, and injury to our hope for the future -- our ``safe kids.'' That is a goal to which we can all look forward.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Secretary of the Interior, as Special Representative to meet and to consider in good faith such issues affecting the relationship between the Northern Mariana Islands and the United States. She would succeed Richard Thomas Montoya.

Congress decided to send me a trade bill that threatens to destroy jobs and that would begin to reverse the policies of the last 7 years. After 3 years of hard work by the Congress and the Executive, it is unfortunate that I have no choice but to send this back to Congress. While there are many positive aspects of this legislation, some of its provisions would move us a step further toward protectionism. Others would create new bureaucracies. But my main objection to the trade bill involves the mandatory requirements it sets down for business to give advance notice of layoffs or plant closings.

Now, let me state very clearly that I believe businesses should give workers and communities just as much warning as they can when it looks as though layoffs or plant closings are going to become unavoidable. Advance notice gives the community and the workers themselves some time to begin adjusting. It's the humane thing to do. But when big government gets in the middle of something like this -- dictating all its rules and regulations -- well, the humane has a way of becoming inhumane. And what's intended to help everyday working men and women can actually end up hurting them.

Once a struggling business issued a notice that it is likely to close or substantially reduce its work force, then creditors, suppliers, and customers would disappear, eliminating any chance of survival the business might have had. Under these conditions, temporary layoffs are sometimes necessary to manage costs and production. And while the bill does contain a so-called struggling company exemption, this exemption is too vague and unclear to be workable. Then, too, businesses will be very reluctant to add workers when it would put them over the arbitrary thresholds in this bill and subject them to yet another regime of Federal regulation. Make no mistake, these concerns are very real. One independent study shows that if these provisions had been in effect between 1982 and 1986 America today would have almost half a million fewer jobs.

Yes, as I've said, our country should support advance notification of layoffs and plant closings. But this should be decided by bargaining between labor and management, not by some arbitrary rules laid down by politicians and enforced by Washington bureaucrats. And if I feel especially strong about this, I guess it's because I was a union president for years myself. There were times when the union, the Screen Actors Guild, took a hard line in negotiating with management. But, yes, there were also times when the motion picture industry was having its ups and downs, times when the union decided not to press quite so hard because we wanted to make sure the whole industry remained healthy and profitable. The point is, it was up to us, the unions and management, to run the motion picture industry together. We didn't need Washington in on this act.

I guess what it all really comes down to is this: Just what kind of a government do we want? For these past 7 years, the administration has limited government, cutting taxes and regulations alike. The result: the longest peacetime expansion in American history, unemployment at the lowest level in almost 14 years, the creation of 16 million new jobs. And I might add, in the last 3 years, four times as many businesses have opened as have closed. We could go back to big government, and indeed many of those in favor of these plant-closing provisions argue that they're already in effect in many European countries. Well, to tell you the truth, I'm sort of proud of being an American, proud that since 1983 the United States has created six times as many jobs as has Western Europe.

I don't want to leave the impression that the trade bill is completely bad. On the contrary, it contains a number of good and important measures, including new authority for American negotiators seeking to open markets abroad. It also included my proposal for helping workers affected by business failings by providing them with training, education, and job placement services -- the truly humane approach. That's why I want a trade bill and why I so regret the addition of counterproductive measures that outweigh the positive features of this legislation. So, I urge Congress to schedule prompt action on a second trade bill immediately after it sustains my veto on this one.

And now one final message. At noon tomorrow in Washington, hundreds will gather to pay tribute to police officers and other law enforcement officials who've died in the line of duty. So, wherever you are at noon, I hope you'll join me in bowing your head and in resolving to let our law enforcement officials know that we understand what our mothers and fathers taught us: The policeman is our friend.

Two hundred and eleven years have now gone by since that June day in 1777 when the Continental Congress adopted a flag for the United States of America, then a brand-new Nation fighting for its independence and for the novel notion that individual liberty was everyone's God-given birthright. The banner adopted then, the beautiful Stars and Stripes, was soon raised by a rebel hand for all the world to see. Our task and our glory as Americans is to keep the flag flying high, because freedom waves in its broad stripes and bright stars.

Stat. 211), by having public gatherings and activities in which they can honor their country in an appropriate manner, especially by ceremonies in which all renew their dedication by publicly reciting the Pledge of Allegiance to the Flag of the United States of America and to the Republic for which it stands, one Nation under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixteenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The President. You know, we can take credit for the fact that the Sun is shining out there, because this morning it was supposed to rain this afternoon, and as sure as we canceled it or moved it in here, why, the Sun is out, and it's not going to rain.

But a month ago in the Oval Office, I met with eight of you and wished you good luck and Godspeed. You were off to Helsinki to meet with a group of young Soviets to discuss issues of importance to all of you and to your countrymen. And I've heard you were even more successful than you had anticipated. You agreed to a set of resolutions on ways to develop better communication and understanding, to protect the environment, and to press for increased cooperation between our two countries. I know you've already presented your proposal to General Secretary Gorbachev and that you've come here today to present it to me. In a few days from now, I understand you'll also hand it to Secretary-General Perez de Cuellar at the United Nations.

In all seriousness, I know how satisfied you must be with your efforts. I can see that in your faces -- they're bright, expectant, and determined. I don't need to tell you that Mr. Gorbachev and I are both older than you -- a little bit.

I hope to expand our cooperative exchanges with the Soviet Union to increase the cultural, educational, and people-to-people contacts, like yours, that are indispensable. And I want you to know that I'll read your proposal carefully and take it to heart as I leave for Moscow for my next meeting with the General Secretary. We older folks must temper our enthusiasms with the wisdom and experience of age and by the reality of today's world. But that doesn't mean that we still cannot learn much from you young people. You know, I've often said, and I deeply believe, that if all the young people of the world could get together and get to know each other there would never be another war.

You know, as I look at your faces -- and I'll bet this is true for you, what I am going to say right now, too -- I can't tell which of you are from America and which are from the Soviet Union or if there are some of you from Finland. I see only freshness and beauty and intelligence and determination. Youth united can be a mighty force.

Audience member. Mr. President, we, the youth representatives of the United States and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics and Finland, gathered to create a vision for the 21st century. We believe that we have to help lay groundwork of a new and positive relationship of our two nations in the future.

Audience member. We are eager to present our generation's ideas and preparations for our future. Thus, we have carefully recorded some of the beliefs, visions, and tactical ideas which were produced at the conference. We would like now to present to you the fruits of our joint work: our agenda for the 21st century. Thank you for your time considering our ideas, and we ask for your support with our proposals by discussing them at the Moscow summit.

It is important as we work toward future arms reduction agreements that our country have all of the means necessary to assure compliance with these agreements. With or without future arms control agreements, it is important for our national security interests that we keep pace with changes in technologies in other nations.

For that reason, I welcome bipartisan support to start this year on a multiyear program to improve these systems. I will also include funding for the second year of this program in the final budget which I submit to the Congress, and I will urge the next administration to assure continuity of this vital effort.

President Reagan met with Israeli Foreign Minister Shimon Peres. The President and the Foreign Minister discussed bilateral issues, the upcoming U.S.-Soviet summit, and the urgent need to make progress toward peace in the Middle East. The President emphasized the value of deepening U.S.-Israeli bilateral relations and the emergence of meaningful strategic cooperation between our two countries. He remarked that the progress we've made together, embodied in the recently signed MOA [memorandum of agreement, April 21, 1988], owed much to Shimon Peres' efforts, both as Foreign Minister and as Prime Minister.

In discussing the summit, the President spoke of our four-part agenda -- bilateral relations, human rights, arms reduction, regional conflicts -- and emphasized that we will, as always, press for the unimpeded right of Soviet Jewry to emigrate. The President also spoke of our determination to make progress toward Middle East peace. He thanked Foreign Minister Peres for his efforts in behalf of peace and his continuing commitment to negotiate it.

While being steadfast in his commitment to Israeli strength and security, the Foreign Minister has a vision for the future, recognizes the increasing danger of the status quo, and understands the negative consequences of passivity and delay in the search for a settlement. The Foreign Minister is creative and has the courage and wisdom to say yes when real opportunities arise.

Resolution 242 and its call for an exchange of territory for peace. Those leaders who are negative, consistently reject new ideas, and fail to exploit realistic opportunities to bring about negotiations make progress impossible.

President also told the Foreign Minister that Secretary of State Shultz would be going to the Middle East after the summit to pursue our initiative, an initiative that we continue to believe offers the only realistic basis on which to make progress toward peace. The alternative is a drift toward a much graver future in the region. Extremist forces will gain strength at the expense of moderates at the very moment that proliferating ballistic missiles and chemical weapons are creating a far more ominous military environment.

Minister Peres agreed that regional trends should add to our collective sense of urgency in pursuing Middle East peace. He also thanked the President for his efforts on behalf of Soviet Jewry and world peace.

No single group is more fully committed to the well-being of their fellow Americans and to the faithful discharge of duty than our law enforcement personnel. Danger is a routine part of their job, and all too often we lose one of these valiant men and women to the sickness that is crime.

I invite all Americans to honor the memories of these courageous heroes on Police Officers' Memorial Day. Our Nation is blessed with the most able, professional, and caring peace officers in the world. What better time to show our deep appreciation for their selfless devotion than during Police Week.

The President. I have a statement here, a brief statement. First, I am pleased that Senate Majority Leader Bob Byrd and Republican Leader Bob Dole have agreed to take up consideration of the treaty to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missiles. This treaty, which was signed last December, has placed U.S.-Soviet arms discussions on a path that goes beyond arms control and toward real nuclear arms reduction. I am both hopeful and confident that after careful consideration the Senate will agree that this treaty is a diplomatic milestone and will give its consent to United States participation.

Second, the March trade figures were good news -- the best news on this front since March of 1985. With the trade deficit dropping $4.1 billion and with exports up $5.4 billion, this is clear evidence that the trade balance is improving as our economy continues to grow. Now, several days ago I received a trade bill from Congress, and my message to Congress on this matter is currently under review, and I expect to issue it within a couple of days. But today's news emphasizes what we've been saying all along: that this is not the time to be imposing restrictions on trade or reducing incentives for free, open markets or closing job opportunities. We want more jobs, not less, and we want a job market open to all working men and women in this country. I'm ready to roll up my sleeves and go to work with the Congress once again in crafting a trade bill that will continue this trend of more job creation and greater economic growth.

The President. Not if they'll wait until there's something to be announced. We're negotiating right now, and therefore I can't comment on negotiations that are underway. It would be foolish to do so. Some things you have to keep to yourself when you're arguing with someone else. But we're not -- as I say, negotiations are underway. There has been no decision made on some of the things that are being discussed, and I have to say that I think that much of what many of you've been dealing with as a story is based on some kind of leaks or misinformation because there are no facts to sustain it.

Mr. President, now that the conservatives, personified by the Washington Times, have jumped ship on Attorney General Edwin Meese. And the loss of morale in the Department and loss of respect for the Justice Department in the country and its integrity -- are you still backing Meese and have total confidence in him, or are you going to ease him out?

The President. Because there have been a great many allegations made, but nothing has been proven. And I've seen no evidence of any wrongdoing on his part of the kind that is inferred in the allegations that they kicked around. And right now, on this particular thing, I think you'd have to talk to him about that. I think there's more than meets the eye with regard to this latest departure.

Mr. President, if you can't discuss the negotiations with Noriega, I'd like to ask you, however, about your policy goal. You have said in the past the goal was to see that Noriega step down from power. And at various times you've talked about leaving the country and various times you haven't. Is your goal to see that not only Noriega leaves power but that none of his cronies continue to exercise power in his name?

The President. I've said I wouldn't comment, but I'll make one comment on that. What we're interested in seeing is a restoration of democracy in Panama. It didn't start with this particular man. But some time back, under another one, the commanding officer of the National Guard in Panama suddenly began to take precedence over the President of Panama and dictate to the Government. We feel that it's time that democracy return to Panama, and this is what we're negotiating toward.

The President. All that I knew about any of this, until the indictment came down with evidently evidence enough to get to an indictment -- that previously there had been some rumors he was providing information on -- situation in Central America, I think, to our intelligence people at the CIA. Some rumors came up about possible drug and -- but no one ever received or could get any evidence to substantiate those rumors. And then this latest thing happened, and I don't know whether he just had started or whether there was anything really going on.

But, sir, there are other charges that there was other involvement by this government in drugs on the same airplanes that were delivering weapons to the contras beyond Noriega. Did you know anything about that? Is there any truth to that?

Mr. President, how can you, given the hard line that you took at the very beginning in the situation in Panama -- saying that Noriega had to leave the country, saying once that the Dominican Republic wasn't far enough -- and our recognition of Mr. Delvalle as the President, how can you do anything in the way of a compromise without appearing to back down from your original policy goals?

Mr. President, you have repeatedly denied that astrology played any role in the setting of policy, but you have ducked the question as to whether or not it played a role in the setting of schedule. A number of aides, besides Mr. Regan, have indicated that astrology did play a role in the setting of schedule, including the timing of the signing of the INF treaty. Why did you allow that to go on, sir?

The President. It didn't go on. And this whole thing is built around an incident in which it was printed that this had to do with the scheduling of one of my operations. Well, it didn't happen that way at all. And you know something else: It didn't have anything to do with me being sworn in as Governor, taking the oath of office at midnight -- or 1 minute after midnight. Back when I first was elected Governor -- what I was doing that time was because once I became Governor-elect the incumbent Governor whom I defeated started filling up the ranks of term appointments and judges, to the place where I would have had a government all set up long before I got in. Well, I couldn't do much about it.

He was still in office till I was signed in. I asked the people who'd been in charge of my campaign, Bill Roberts, when was the earliest that I could become Governor. And he said, well, the minute after midnight, the night before the inaugural ceremonies. And I said, I'm going to get sworn in a minute after midnight. And I got sworn in and at least had headed off a half a day's appointments that he wouldn't have time, because the next afternoon I was inaugurated.

You're talking about a couple of specific incidents. Are you denying that either you or Mrs. Reagan, though, used astrology on any occasion during your time here at the White House to help set the schedule for trips or the signing of the INF treaty? I must say this goes against what a lot of aides are telling us, sir.

Mr. President, you have often spoke of your belief in the integrity and honesty of your Attorney General. I'd like to ask you another question, which is: Don't you think that all of these resignations and the difficulty of filling the job and the attacks from so many directions are -- even if he is a man of integrity and ability -- don't you think this is getting in the way of the Justice Department doing its job? And isn't that a reason for him to step aside on those grounds?

Are you saying then, sir, that unless Mr. Meese would be indicted that he should remain in office? Or can there be lesser allegations that don't require an indictment that would be grounds for him stepping aside?

Thank you, sir. One more about Noriega. The combination of sanctions and negotiations have been going on for an awfully long time, and it seems as if the United States looks progressively weaker. Aren't you a little angry that Noriega has managed to humiliate and embarrass the United States?

The President. Well, we had hoped that we could maybe make it possible for the people of Panama themselves to exert some pressure and do something, and I guess having run into their own armed troops willing to shoot, and shooting, kind of cooled that down. So, we're continuing to negotiate. And our goal remains the same.

The President. Whether I'm angry or not doesn't count. On the situation in Panama, I will not comment on the negotiations that are going on in Panama. And at the appropriate time, I expect to have a full statement and make it to the American people.

Some people are saying, Mr. President, that if the trade bill were to be overridden by Congress the effect of the trade bill would be similar to Smoot-Hawley. Why is it that the administration now is basically saying that it's only the plant closings provision that's wrong with this trade bill, that otherwise you would support it?

The President. Well, that is the main thing. There are other things in there that I don't think are helpful or belong there. There's been a habit of adding pork items to almost everything that's up on the Hill, and that's true there. But this is the main one.

And when all of my colleagues at the economic summit from the other countries, the heads of state of the countries with which we trade -- when they call what we have seen here in the last 5\1/2\ years -- called the American miracle -- and when I have talked to them, they've asked me for questions about what are some of the things that we had done. I found out in answering their questions that they themselves deplore the fact that in their countries the rules and regulations imposed on government -- including things like this and rules about hiring and firing -- are part of what they say is holding them back and keeping them from having the kind of economic recovery we have.

You know, as President, I have a military aide from each of the five services. My Coast Guard aides have been excellent. One of them taught me that ``The Coast Guard is that hard nucleus about which the Navy forms in time of war.'' But there's one thing I haven't been able to get a straight answer on. What I want to know is, how's the awning?

Well, since your service was founded by the first Congress nearly 200 years ago, it has served with courage and honor in every war our nation has fought. The first Coast Guard casualty of World War II came the day after Pearl Harbor, when a transport evacuating American families out of Singapore came under attack. On D-day, when our soldiers hit the beaches at Normandy, there were Coast Guardsmen piloting the landing craft. And some 1,500 soldiers whose craft were sunk by enemy fire were rescued by the Coast Guard on that fateful day. Back when Washington bureaucrats were not as sophisticated or numerous as they are today, we named things more nearly for what they were. One of my favorite examples is that one of the predecessors of today's Coast Guard was known simply as the Life Saving Service. And though the Coast Guard does many jobs, I suspect seafarers in distress will always think of you that way.

Today, one of the Coast Guard's most important missions is to fight the importation of illegal drugs. In the last 10 years you have arrested more than 8,500 drug smugglers, and for that, America salutes you. It's time to make illegal drugs public enemy number one. It's time to make -- well, it's time to say America's tolerance for illegal drugs is zero. The Congress made a serious mistake when our fiscal year '88 budget request for the Coast Guard was reduced by $72 million and forced a curtailment in the drug interdiction effort. I hope the Congress will restore the funds necessary for you to accomplish your vital mission.

But before I talk about what remains to be done, let's take stock of what has already occurred. Yes, it's true that across the breadth of the Federal Government we have assembled a strong antidrug team and enacted tough antidrug policies. In 1982 we set up the South Florida Task Force, which was headed by Vice President Bush.

Hundreds of additional drug agents were sent to Florida, along with extra judges and prosecutors. More Coast Guard cutters were deployed, and the other military services provided surveillance assistance for the first time. We made record drug seizures, and major crime in South Florida decreased nearly 20 percent.

Because of that success, the next year we formed the National Narcotics Border Interdiction System, also led by the Vice President, to coordinate Federal, State, and local law enforcement efforts against drug smuggling nationwide.

Since the formation of the Border Interdiction System in 1983, annual cocaine seizures involving the Coast Guard are up more than 20 times what they had been. In 1987 I established the National Drug Policy Board in order to coordinate all of the administration's efforts in this crusade. This board, chaired by Attorney General Meese, has developed a series of comprehensive strategies to reduce both the supply and demand for illicit drugs.

Another key part of the war on drugs has been the appointment of no-nonsense Federal judges. Not only have drug convictions doubled since 1979 but prison sentences are 40 percent longer. And last year, new, tougher sentencing guidelines were issued. The Comprehensive Crime Control Act, passed in 1984, helps put drug dealers out of business. Last year alone over $500 million in drug-related assets were seized. Drug eradication programs are now underway in 23 countries, up from just 2 in 1981. More funds than ever before are being spent on drug education and public awareness, and more funds still have been requested. Since 1981 we've tripled the antidrug law enforcement budget, and I'm asking for another 13-percent increase. That would give the Federal Government a total of $3.9 billion next fiscal year to fight this menace.

All told, it's an extraordinary demonstration of our commitment and a remarkable record of achievement. And that having been said, you know what else -- extraordinary as it is, remarkable as it is, as much a testimony as it is to those in law enforcement and the Coast Guard -- more has to be done. There's an additional step we must take, and without it, I don't know if we can succeed. I want to use this opportunity today to call for a special initiative. One of America's greatest strengths is our unique capacity for coming together during times of national emergency. We set aside those differences that divide us and unite as one people, one government, one nation. We've done this before. We must do it now.

Illegal drug use is the foremost concern in our country. And frankly, as I finish my final year in office and look ahead, I worry that excessive drug politics might undermine effective drug policy. If America's antidrug effort gets tripped up in partisanship, if we permit politics to determine policy, it will mean a disaster for our future and that of our children. That's why today, I'm calling on both Houses of the Congress, both sides of the aisle, to join with my representatives in a special executive-legislative task force to advance America's unified response to the problem of illegal drug use. Because if we cannot remove the politics from drugs, how can we hope to remove the drugs from our communities, workplaces, and schools?

Our task force should agree on solutions for every area of the drug problem, from blocking supplies to curtailing demand, from treatment to education to prosecution, from interdiction and confiscation to eradication -- nothing should be overlooked or left out. Our policy is one of zero tolerance for illegal drugs, and we're looking for solutions, not just a restatement of the problem.

First, to deter violent crime and narcotics trafficking, we have to deal with the drug syndicates on our terms. That means when a death results from narcotics trafficking or when a law enforcement officer is killed in the battle the law must provide for swift, certain, and just punishment -- including capital punishment. We've got to send a loud, clear message to drug kingpins and cop-killers. We also need to appoint more tough Federal judges who take drug crime seriously and to pass mandatory penalties for those who sell drugs to children.

When it comes to the military, let's give them a clear mission for specific situations. To assist in this effort I have also today directed Secretary of Defense Carlucci to tap the best minds both inside and outside of government to come up with creative solutions on how we can better use military resources and technologies to detect drugs and support civil law enforcement agencies in interdiction.

We need stepped-up international eradication programs to reduce the supply of drugs, and additional education and prevention programs to reduce demand, including the use of civil sanctions, such as fines and loss of Federal privileges. Our encouragement, our goal, should be for those who have never tried drugs to remain drug free.

I'm especially proud of the antidrug work that Nancy has done, which has changed the way we talk and think about drugs. You see, at the root of the drug crisis is a crisis of values and a spiritual hunger. I believe that as a society we're still paying for the permissiveness of the 1960's and 1970's, when restrictions on personal behavior came under attack by a cultural establishment whose slogan was ``just say yes.'' There were numerous calls for repealing our prohibitions on drugs. And those who favored tougher drug laws, or even just keeping the ones we had, were labeled conservative, moralistic, reactionary, and old-fashioned -- and that was back before those words were meant as compliments. [Laughter] The none-too-subtle message to young people was that they had to use drugs if they wanted to be cool. What greater shame can there be than that many of our young people began to use drugs not to rebel but to fit in? So, in the crusade for a drug free America, the next step is to enforce a policy of zero tolerance of illegal drug use. So, when we say no to drugs, it'll be clear that we mean absolutely none, no exceptions.

This concern with values goes beyond just the issue of drugs, of course. We worked hard in the early eighties on our national recovery so that we might be able to recognize, indeed, deal with social problems that had been too long ignored and sometimes obscured in the past. Well, today America is facing head-on social problems like drugs and crime. And this, as I say, stems from the renewal of our fundamental beliefs and values as a nation. And this renewal goes beyond just our own borders.

In one week I will depart for the Moscow summit. It'll be my first visit to the Soviet Union and my fourth meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev. Our goals there are something that I've been discussing for the last several months in detail, but let me summarize. There are four main agenda items in the U.S.-Soviet relationship: human rights, regional conflicts, arms reduction, and bilateral exchanges. With regard to human rights, though we note some improvements, we'll continue to press for full respect for the freedom of expression, travel, religion, and other rights contained in the Helsinki accords, and for institutional reforms that would guarantee such rights and the rule of law. We'll discuss a number of regional conflicts in which the United States supports the forces of freedom against brutal Communist dictatorships. In particular, we will note the progress of the Soviet withdrawal from Afghanistan. We will reaffirm America's support for the brave Mujahidin freedom fighters and the goal of an independent, nonaligned, and undivided Afghanistan, free to determine its own future. In the area of arms control, General Secretary Gorbachev and I will continue our dialog on the reduction of nuclear weapons, focusing in particular on strategic offensive systems. And with respect to bilateral exchanges, I especially want to encourage more student exchanges between our two countries.

Just the other day I met with 70-some students, 38 Americans and 38 Soviet students, who've held a conference in Helsinki, in Moscow, and are now here in the United States holding one. And I looked out at them, as I'm looking at you, and you couldn't tell which were Russian and which were American. And I had to say to them: If all the young people of the world could get to know each other, there'd never be another war.

Maritime Search and Rescue Agreement that has just been concluded. Other maritime issues we're currently discussing include the issue of fisheries and plans for dealing with emergency pollution spills. So, yes, the Coast Guard's concerns are the Moscow agenda.

It's been a great honor to be here with all of you. And you can be sure that when I'm in Moscow I'll think of all of you here today. You represent the best of America and carry in your hearts the values that are the source of our liberty and our spiritual strength. This is reflected in the path of the service that you've chosen.

We're a nation of free men and women, who use our God-given liberty to serve our country because we love her and all that she represents. It's our earnest prayer to serve America in peace. It is our solemn commitment to defend her in time of war.

I believe that America is standing before the brightest future the world has ever known, and that future is yours. And properly so, because you've chosen to wear the uniform of your country and risk all that you have and all that you are in her defense. I wish not only to congratulate you on your graduation, but as your Commander in Chief, I salute you! Thank you, and God bless you all.

Mr. President, you are soon in Helsinki, and next Friday you will speak from the very same stage where the Helsinki document was signed in 1975. And at that time, President Gerald Ford was criticized by going there and signing on to something that was cause of detente, which only served the Soviet interest, as it was said. How do you evaluate the document now?

The President. Well, I value it very much because it specified the agreement of a number of governments to recognize those basic rules of freedom for people. And since our country, this country here, is the first one that ever declared that government is the servant of the people, not the other way around, we heartily endorsed it.

Right now our concern, as I'm sure the concern of a great many other people is that there has not been a complete keeping of those pledges in that agreement by some of the participants -- by the Soviet Union, particularly -- in recognizing the fundamental rights of people to leave a country, return to a country, worship as they will, and so forth.

The President. I am, I think, reasonably optimistic in view of the summit meetings that we've had, and the meeting we're going to have, that we have made progress with the Soviet Union on a number of those things under the present leader.

The President. Well, I don't know whether he necessarily wants to do that and gamble that much. But we're working as hard as we can, and it's a far more complex treaty than the INF treaty, which we did sign here at the summit in Washington. But we're working as hard as we can. We'll continue to work there at the summit if it is not completed, and none of us really think that it will be because of the complexity. But I think that it is possible that we could have that, yes, while this administration is still here.

Since the last time you saw Mr. Gorbachev, your former press spokesman has said that he manufactured quotations on your behalf, including one at a summit. Your former Chief of Staff has said that astrology played a part in your scheduling, indeed, in summit planning. How do you think that may change the way Mr.

Gorbachev has heard some of the things that I have been saying about those charges, because no decision was ever made by me on the basis of astrology. And some of these other things -- the quotations by a former Press Secretary -- actually, I have to say he was not too far wrong with some of the things that were being said in our earlier summit meetings.

I remember that the General Secretary and I, together in a room, one on one, remarked about the uniqueness of our situation and that very possibly, between us, war and peace for the world could be decided, depending on what we did. And I remember also saying to him that I didn't think that we distrusted each other because of our armaments. We were armed because we distrusted each other. And therefore, while we were going to talk about weapons and reducing the number of weapons and so forth, at the same time we should recognize that we ought to try and eliminate those things that cause the mistrust between us.

Among the many discussions you will have in Moscow, probably you will talk with Mr. Gorbachev about the Middle East. What is your opinion for the future of the occupied territories? And do you know there is a projected program of a possibility of sending some European troops under the United Nations flag? What is your opinion about that in the Arab-occupied territories?

The President. Well, I don't know about the sending of troops or anything of that kind. I'd like to be a little more optimistic and say that I believe there is a desire in the Middle East to settle once and for all what is still technically a state of war between the Arab nations and Israel. We have made a proposal, and this proposal could involve putting together an international conference of nations. But we've made it plain: not an international conference to dictate a settlement but to be helpful if we can, to give advice and to make proposals that might help them arrive at a fair and just peace. And if the Soviet Union is to be a member of that conference, I think there they have a step they have to take, and that is to resume diplomatic relations with the State of Israel.

The President. There, I think, is an issue. And actually I think that a lot of that has to do with the feeling that some of the Arab States -- because I know that there is a great difference in many of the nations about who could be a proper representative for the Palestinian people and a great feeling that that could hardly be Arafat's element, since here again you have a group that refuses to recognize the right of Israel to exist as a nation.

The President. Well, yes, I think that if there's any way that outside nations could be helpful in this they should because many of the reforms that he is undertaking are aimed at the things that we have always criticized in the Soviet Union. And if there is a way to be helpful in that, and certainly to at least acknowledge our approval of what he is doing, that we should do that.

The President. Well, I think it is evident that he is running into opposition, that there are those who want to cling to what are more the Stalinist policies, and yet he is apparently going forward with the recommendations. Just recently it became public information that he had met with the heads of the Russian Orthodox Church and discussed some loosening of their opposition to worship.

Mr. President, with Mr. Gorbachev running into some kind of opposition and your term of office expiring, have you ever discussed what is solid and will definitely remain of the arms control process, for example, whoever is in the White House, whoever is in the Kremlin, or do you see the chance that this thing might falter, for example, like detente did?

The President. Well, I have to be more optimistic than that, because I would hope that whoever is there in that office, and whoever is here in this office, would recognize the truth of a statement I made once in addressing the British Parliament and the legislature in Japan and elsewhere: We have to recognize, I think, that a nuclear war cannot be won and should never be fought. Once you engage in that kind of conflict, how do you declare a victor if their country is so poisoned by radiation that there's no place for the people to live? And that's what would result if we began exchanging the weapons that we have today. I think that's what has led us to some success in the reduction of nuclear weapons, is that recognition.

Possibly in the Soviet Union it was their tragic experience with Chernobyl and to see that how an area would be made unlivable for the people who had lived all their lives there. And when you stop to think that that explosion was less than the power of one single warhead, and we're talking about exchanges of thousands of warheads.

Mr. President, on the future strategy of the arms control talks, especially among the western NATO nations, sometimes there still is a bit of confusion. The Germans, for example -- there are a few people across a political aisle who after INF believe -- or are very nervous about modernizing short-range nuclear missiles. They say the shorter the range of the nuclear missiles in central Europe the more dead are the Germans. How can you reconcile these people?

The President. Well, I know, and I have talked with the Chancellor [Helmut Kohl] many times about this. And they see the possibility of -- if such a war would occur -- they would be the battlefield, largely. And I think that has to be recognized. But at the same time, as I say, those weapons -- I have to repeat myself -- those weapons are the thing that right at the moment are kind of wiping out the imbalance in conventional weapons. And when you look at that imbalance, you have to say that the Soviet Union's military does not really represent a defensive force; it is far beyond the bounds of what is needed for defense. And so, you look at that as an offensive force. And since the nuclear weapons have been hailed as a deterrent to prevent war, I think that it is only logical that if we negotiate those battlefield tactical weapons and their reduction or elimination, that must be accompanied by the same kind of negotiations with regard to conventional weapons so that we come down to a parity and do not suddenly eliminate a form of weapon that leaves the other side with a great superiority. That might be too much of a temptation to some future leader.

In the last 2 years, France has obtained the release of 10 French hostages while 9 U.S. hostages are still held in Beirut. So, what's your idea about it? Do you think the French are more efficient than you are, or do you suspect the French to have made a deal with the terrorists?

I still think that all of us want our hostages free. I believe it's the duty of government when the citizens of a country are -- their human rights are being unjustly denied by a means of that kind of kidnaping -- that the government should take advantage of everything it can to get those people free. At the same time, we must recognize we can't do something in the form of ransom that creates an advantage for those other countries in taking hostages.

I've labored under a misapprehension here -- well, worldwide, I guess -- about the so-called Iran-contra affair. We were not dealing with the Khomeini or with the Iranian Government. Some individuals had sought a meeting with us on the basis of better relations in the event of the passing of the Khomeini and that it would be a new government. And they had an idea of a different kind of government and a relationship with us. And at one time, asking us to prove our credentials, they made the proposal of us violating our policy and selling, really, a token force of weapons to them, and also that they could use those to build some prestige for themselves with the military, which they would need if they were to become important in the next government.

I said back to them that, yes, we could do that, even though it was against our policy of providing weapons for nations that supported terrorism. But they had made it plain that they did not support terrorism. And I said we have kidnaped now some Americans held hostage by an organization, the Hizballah, that we understand has a relationship with the Government of Iran, and said maybe you would have some influence, that if we did this, you could be helpful to us to try to get some of our hostages free.

Now, we argued right in this room about it, and some people said that would appear to be trading arms for hostages. Well, no, because we weren't giving them to the Government, and we weren't -- or we weren't giving them, I should say, to the kidnapers. We were doing nothing to make an advantage for them. And I likened it to if I had a child who was kidnaped. I don't think that you should pay ransom, but if I found there was another individual that could get that child back for me in return for my doing something for him, that would be all right. And that this was much the same point.

And the truth was we got two hostages back and had two more that were scheduled to be released in the next 48 hours. And that was when the story was leaked, of what was going on, in that Lebanese paper. And all of a sudden the world media was full of this and translating it as trading arms for hostages. And I went on the air and tried to convince all of them that we weren't trading arms for hostages and tell them what the truth was, but that's what it's been made to appear.

Speaking of Iran, France is reestablishing diplomatic ties with Tehran while the U.S. is still in a situation of undeclared war in the Gulf against Iran. How do you explain such a difference between close allies?

We've been doing everything we can behind the scenes to try and bring about peace between Iraq and Iran. The U.N. proposal that was made about them coming to a peace was accepted by Iraq, but not by Iran. And our position in the Gulf -- yes, it's brought us into combat with Iranian forces, but we've had naval forces there since 1949 to ensure that that international waterway comes under the international rules of freedom of the seas. And it is Iran that has been trying to close that off and shut down an international waterway, and we don't think that that should be allowed. And that's what we're intending to do, is to try and keep it open.

The President. We feel that as long as the Soviet Union has provided support and arms and so forth and advisers to the Afghan force of their puppet government, that even though they go, we must continue to support the Mujahidin so that the people of Afghanistan can now, without the absence of the Soviet Union -- I mean without the presence of the Soviet Union, that they can bring about a government that is a government chosen by the people of Afghanistan. And we do not recognize that the government there in Kabul is anything but a puppet government established by the Soviet Union. And so, yes, as long as weapons are being supplied to that other side, we're going to do whatever is necessary to support the Mujahidin.

Mr. President, the Vice President yesterday broke publicly with you over the negotiations with Panama's General Noriega. He said he wouldn't negotiate with a drug dealer. Isn't his stand rather more consistent with the administration's hard line on drugs than your own?

The President. Well, I think that I have not changed my mind about the hard line on drugs. But you have me now in a situation in which I can't comment on what has been going on because there has been no resolution as yet. And I've never believed that when, say, negotiations are going on that you go public and tell what's being debated and negotiated.

I can see why the Vice President said what he said because the impression has been given, based not on information from us but based on rumors and news leaks and so forth, that we are in negotiation somehow over -- or with a participant in the drug trade and all. And I think he was making himself plain that you don't negotiate with people of that kind with regard to their activity in drugs.

Our goal, what we're trying to achieve, is the restoration of democracy in Panama. Right now we have a situation where, not legally but just through custom and tradition and started by a previous general, that you have a military dictatorship, in effect, in which even if the people elect a President, the dictator, using force, maintains control. And our goal is a democratic Panama with a government chosen by the people.

Well, this started a number of years ago when I first came here and I met with the military of our own country and asked, is it possible, can you foresee that our science and technology is such that we could create a defensive weapon against nuclear missiles, ballistic missiles, that could literally make them obsolete because there would be so much doubt as to whether, if they were once employed, they could ever get through that defense? And a few days later, they came back and told me that, yes, they believed such a weapon could be designed. And I said, go to it! And so the Strategic Defense Initiative was adopted. It has made such great progress -- some scientific breakthroughs -- that the people involved believe that not only can we have such a system but that it will come much earlier than we had believed was possible. There have been a number of breakthroughs that have advanced the timing on this.

And then, once you have such a weapon, I believe that that is when we could then really move worldwide, even if it meant sharing that weapon. And I would be amenable to that, that if we had such a weapon, a defensive weapon, that we could eliminate the offensive missiles. Now, the question arises naturally, well, then, why would you need that system if you'd eliminated the weapons?

Well, you can't wipe out of people's minds the knowledge of how to build a nuclear missile. And someday there could be a madman loose in the world, as we've seen in our own lifetime a number of times, who, with that knowledge, could then secretly build the only one. I've likened it to when, after World War I, the nations all met in Geneva and decided to eliminate poison gas. But everybody kept their gasmasks.

Mr. President, you deserve credit for including a Far East Asian region for elimination of INF at the Washington summit. What is your next logical step to ease the tensions in the Asian region, for example, Korean Peninsula, where, as you know, the Olympic games will be hurt?

The President. Oh, well, I think that will be a subject for us to talk about and discuss. I think that all of us have an obligation to see that in the world tensions that nothing -- if I'm answering you correctly -- in the area of terrorism or something could be employed to upset the Olympic games. And I think what that would require are those nations that probably have a more friendly relationship with North Korea than we do, by virtue of the war that was fought there, that if some of those other nations would make it plain that North Korea should not take advantage of their proximity to the games and do anything of a terrorist nature to upset those games.

Mr. President, how would you like to be remembered in history? I'm asking about the Reagan legacy, something like that -- just a remark. The two frontrunners struggling for your succession -- both of them seem to be of quite a different brand of politician, more the managerial type of candidate as compared to a Reagan revolution and inspiration and these kinds of things. Has the mood changed in America?

Now I can safely say that since everyone else has dropped out of the race. I have to say that the Vice President has been an important part of everything that we've achieved in this so-called revolution in these last 7 years or so. I could just give you a figure here of one thing from the very beginning. I had always believed that Vice Presidents in our system of government were relegated to a kind of just standing and waiting position. And I think that's a waste of talent. I have always believed that your Vice President should be like a vice president in a private corporation. He should be an executive with duties and functions.

So, one of the first jobs that I put on the Vice President was to set up a task force and find out how many government regulations imposed on the private sector, on people and on local communities and State governments and business and industry -- how many could be removed. And that task force, under his direction, was so successful that we estimate that we have eliminated 600 million man-hours a year of filling out government paperwork on the part of the citizens and businesses and the local and State governments. The book that registers -- or contains all those regulations -- is only half as thick as it used to be.

And then I put -- in the next time, in the task force when the State of Florida -- it became disgraceful, the extent to which drugs were being flooded through there into the United States -- and put him in charge of a task force there.

Federal, the State, and the local level, and including cooperation from the military. And that was so successful there that then moved him to a task force for the whole southern border, across the 2,000 miles, the border between our country and Mexico. And again success, and the figures sound so great, except that with the boundaries such as we have and the two great seacoasts, that isn't really the answer to the problem because of all of the thousands of tons of drugs and the planes and ships and trucks and so forth that we have confiscated, and the hundreds of millions of dollars that we've confiscated. As long as there is a demand, the drug dealers can get the drugs through -- with these task forces. I don't think it would be helpful to eliminate them and just let them come in free with no interference, because we're doing that. At the same time, we're trying to win the battle where it must be won, and that is in taking the user away from the drugs, not the other way around -- to convince the people that they should not.

But that all started from what you were saying about differences with the Vice President. And, no, I think that, as I say, he's been a part of all that we've done here with regard to the economy. We've had the longest period of economic expansion in the history of our country. In the last 5 years, we have created 16 million new jobs for the workers in our work force. We have the lowest unemployment rate in many years. And we have the highest rate of employment among what is considered the potential employment pool -- all of the people that could be considered as potential for jobs -- the highest percentage of them today are employed than has ever been true in our history. And as I say, the Vice President's been a part of all of the things that helped bring this about.

The President. Well, I can't help but say yes to that because the difference that I've found between him and other previous leaders that I have met with is that, yes, we can debate, and we disagree, and it is true he's made it apparent that he believes much of the Communist propaganda that he's grown up hearing about our country that -- the big corporations and whether they dictate to government or not and things of that kind. I try to disabuse him of those beliefs. But there is never a sense of personal animus when the arguments are over, and I'm reasonably optimistic, although at the same time I'm realistic. The only Russian I know is a little Russian proverb. And I've used it so many times on him that he's going to hit me over the head one day if I use it again. And that is, Dovorey no provorey -- trust but verify.

The President. Well, thank you very much. We're looking forward to it because we're celebrating, as you perhaps know, mutually the 350th anniversary of the Finnish-United States relationship and the Finnish community here in our country at that time that was established.

National Rural Health Awareness Week, we can be grateful for the significant progress made over the years by countless devoted Americans in providing rural health care. We should remember as well, however, the continuing need for citizens to redouble their efforts in this regard.

A quarter of all Americans live in the towns, villages, and farms of rural America. Their location in remote areas with frequently limited transportation, together with their employment on the land and in forests, mines, and factories, presents continuing and sometimes formidable obstacles to the delivery of health services. For instance, rural areas are finding it hard to attract enough health care providers; just 12 percent of our physicians and a declining number of professional nurses and providers of long-term care currently serve our more than 50 million rural citizens.

Fortunately, dedicated Americans are striving to overcome challenges and make good health care, including the benefits of our ever-increasing knowledge about health, nutrition, and disease and the advantages of rapidly evolving medical technology, accessible to rural citizens. Further such efforts, and further enhancement of public awareness of rural health care needs, will reaffirm our commitment to the well-being of rural citizens.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this nineteenth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

In granting its consent to the creation of this Compact, the Congress has given its approval to yet another effort at the State level to resolve concerns regarding radioactive waste. More than three-quarters of the States have now entered such compacts, demonstrating the major progress that has been achieved in addressing the problem of radioactive waste. Our continued success in this effort, along with the passage of last year's amendments to the Nuclear Waste Policy Act, underscore this Nation's commitment to take those actions needed to ensure the future availability of nuclear power as an energy supply option for this country. Continued growth in the availability of nuclear power promises significant benefits to our energy security, decreasing this Nation's reliance on insecure sources of foreign oil.

In signing this bill, I note that one of the many provisions of the Compact suffers from a constitutional defect in that it assigns Federal law enforcement responsibilities to the Appalachian States Low-Level Radioactive Waste Commission, but does not require that the Commission be appointed in a manner consistent with the Appointments Clause of the Constitution. Any effort by the Commission to enforce Federal regulations would contravene the Constitution.

I've always considered photographers, the cameramen, and the crew, my favorites among the press. [Laughter] So, I knew that, being friends, you wouldn't mind if I got a few things off my chest tonight. [Laughter] There's been a lot in the papers in recent weeks about insiders' views of the White House. Well, I've had it with all that. So, tonight I'm going to give you the view from the ultimate insider -- me. [Laughter] I'm going to tell the real story of this administration. It's been a wonderful two terms, with lots of accomplishments.

And speaking of the press, remember during the contra aid vote when the networks wouldn't let me on the air? I bet you wondered how I finally got my message out. [Laughter] It's no secret that the press and I sometimes don't get along.

Now, this is a sight I've seen many times. And you do sometimes get in the way, and you do sometimes cause a commotion. But your work has produced a permanent historical record of my two terms as President. You've been there with me.

You've captured me in moments of hope and excitement during the campaign; moments of disappointment, like when General Secretary Gorbachev and I parted there in Iceland; moments of grief, such as when we were with the families of the Challenger crew; many, many moments of joy and optimism, and of course, moments of love whenever I look in Nancy's direction. You've captured what life has meant for Nancy and me over these past 8 years. And for that, I genuinely thank you.

And you know, there's one picture you've taken time and time again: that of me saluting the troops. I do that out of respect. You here tonight do good, hard, creative work; and I respect that, too. So, as we say our farewells here tonight, this salute's for you. And now, tonight, good night, and God bless you.

The President. For starters, 1988 is an official U.S. Year of Finnish-American Friendship. I was most pleased to have welcomed Prime Minister Holkeri in Washington and to have this chance to stop in your capital. Moreover, Secretary of State Shultz, who as you know has visited Finland on several occasions during the past year, made two persuasive points. First, he told me that Finnish hospitality is too good to be missed. He has found Helsinki an excellent place to rest and prepare for the work ahead and thought that I would, too. Second, he pointed out to me that Finland is a country that has learned to live in close proximity to the Soviet Union. Finnish leaders have a unique perspective on that country, which Secretary Shultz has found informative on his previous trips. I hope to benefit in the same way from my conversation with President Koivisto and other Finnish leaders.

Koivisto, has proposed talks on confidence- and security-building measures in the Northern Sea areas. Do you think such talks could be linked to other negotiations on conventional force reductions or with proposals for a Nordic nuclear free zone?

The President. We consider freedom of navigation in international air and sea spaces vitally important to the maintenance of peace and security. Western naval and air activities, including those in the Northern Sea areas, form an essential element in current NATO defensive strategy. Unconstrained access to air and sea lines of communication constitute the lifeline between North America and all of our European friends. The strength of Warsaw Pact ground forces on the European land mass makes it all the more important that Western naval and air forces remain free from restriction on the periphery of the continent. Constraints would, in our view, weaken Western deterrence against those who might contemplate military aggression or political intimidation, thereby diminishing stability and security in Europe.

As naval and air forces tend to have global, not region-specific, commitments and responsibilities, it would seem inappropriate to regulate their activities in the context of a regional security regime. Moreover, compliance with restrictions on naval/air maneuvers over the high seas would be extremely difficult -- indeed, impossible for most countries -- to verify.

For these and other reasons, East and West have traditionally agreed to omit naval forces from conventional arms control negotiations in Europe. This is true for the Mutual and Balanced Force Reduction (MBFR) talks taking place in Vienna, for the upcoming Conventional Stability Talks (CST), and for the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe (CSCE). In the concluding document of the Madrid CSCE followup meeting, for example, the 35 participating states acknowledge that independent naval and air force activities fall outside the scope of CSCE security-related negotiations. We continue to believe this is the best course.

The final document of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe was signed in Helsinki in 1975. How do you assess the implementation, or lack of implementation, of the document? How do U.S. friends and allies around the world measure up to the human rights aspects of the document?

For the Western countries, the United States and our NATO allies as well as the neutral and nonaligned states in CSCE, the Final Act, in many respects, merely codified existing practice with regard to human rights and fundamental freedoms. The West has fully met its commitments in all three dimensions of the Helsinki process -- humanitarian, military security, and economic/scientific cooperation.

Sadly, the Eastern record has been poor. During the period 1975 - 85, Soviet performance with regard to the human rights provisions of the Final Act actually deteriorated. The Soviets continued to arrest and jail their citizens for expressing their political and religious beliefs. Prohibitions continued on religious teaching. Emigration rates decreased dramatically by the early 1980's, particularly following the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan. The invasion itself was a clear violation of the basic principles of the Final Act. Similar repression, in varying degrees, occurred in Eastern Europe, such as the declaration of martial law in Poland in 1981 and the suppression of the free trade union Solidarity. In all Eastern states, citizens who had joined together to monitor their governments' implementation of the Final Act were imprisoned, harassed, or forced into exile. Even in the security area, which the Soviets have tried to emphasize over humanitarian issues, the East did only the minimum necessary to comply with the Final Act's provisions and in some instances failed to comply at all.

However, there has been some improvement in the Soviet Union's human rights practices in the past 2 years. A number of political and religious prisoners have been released, and some limited voices of dissent have been allowed to be heard under the policy of glasnost. Emigration rates have increased, although they remain well below those of the late 1970's. There have been promises of institutional reform, although concrete steps have been slow to materialize.

Even with these improvements, the East still has far to go to meet the standards set down in the Final Act. Accordingly, at the current CSCE followup meeting in Vienna, we and our NATO allies continue to press the East to improve further its human rights performance. We have made improved performance one of our requirements for a successful conclusion to the meeting. I should note that Eastern implementation of the military confidence- and security-building measures adopted in Stockholm has been generally good. We are pressing the East to show the same spirit with regard to all of its CSCE commitments.

Now, you asked about other countries around the world. As I pointed out earlier, the Helsinki Final Act applies only to the 35 signatory states. Of course, the human rights standards embodied in the Final Act are universal principles also set forth in documents such as the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, to which all United Nations members subscribe. If we take this document as a literal checklist of what ought to be, the world has a very long way to go to meet the standards which its member nations have set for themselves.

Some progress is being made. This year we will see an investigation by the United Nations Human Rights Commission of human rights practices in Cuba, and we are seeing some improvements in other countries in the world. We and our friends and allies continue to work as hard as we can to encourage improved human rights practices throughout the world.

The United States has on occasion shown considerable irritation when Sweden, for example, has criticized American policies in Central America and elsewhere. Is it then the U.S. view that neutral countries, such as Sweden and Finland, should as a rule avoid taking stands on international issues? How should neutral countries behave?

The President. The United States is a leading proponent of free speech and firmly believes neutral countries have the same full right as any other country to express their views publicly and privately on any issue that they wish. Every country is of course individually responsible for its own foreign policies and pronouncements. We have questioned the appropriateness of foreign leaders offering public advice to U.S. legislators on issues under heated domestic partisan debate, but this is a consideration that would apply to any country, neutral or otherwise.

How does the United States plan to assure the world's unstable financial markets of the strength of its own economic policies? What kinds of agreements does the United States want with Japan and Western Europe on the revitalization of the global economy?

The United States is in the sixth year of the current expansion. Productivity is rising. Over 16 million new jobs have been created, while inflation, previously in double digits, has come down to about 4 percent per year. Real GNP grew 4 percent in 1987 (fourth quarter to fourth quarter). Real exports increased nearly 17 percent in 1987 and made a significant contribution to real growth for the first time in 7 years. We have also made considerable progress in reducing the Federal deficit; the recent agreement between the administration and Congress produced a 2-year $76 billion deficit reduction package. In addition, the United States continues to eliminate structural rigidities in its own economy through various policy measures. The deregulation of the airline industry, for example, has increased competition, expanded the market, improved consumer choice, and lowered prices. We encourage our European partners to adopt fiscal, labor, social, welfare, and industrial policies which free up resources and make them more responsive to market signals.

There are many ways in which the United States, Europe, and Japan are cooperating to sustain world growth. The major industrial nations are supporting the economic policy coordinating process adopted at the Tokyo and Venice summits. This will be reaffirmed at the Toronto summit as well. Another step involves redressing the current external imbalances. As I pointed out earlier, the United States has taken bold steps to reduce its fiscal deficit. We are also determined to continue reducing the trade deficit and have begun to see results in this area as well. The surplus countries must also do their part in this readjustment process. Economic growth remains strong in the industrial economies, while domestic demand in Europe and especially in Japan has begun to rebound.

All countries must also make a concerted effort to reduce trade barriers in all areas through negotiations in the Uruguay Round [multilateral trade negotiations], particularly in agriculture. Costly and inefficient agricultural subsidies distort comparative advantages, drain national treasuries, and ultimately cost consumers dearly. We must all do our share. I am determined to fight protectionist pressure in the United States in the belief that open markets benefit everyone and closed markets harm everyone. As the European Community moves toward a single market, both Finland and the United States have an interest in encouraging not only the European Community but all nations to resist the temptation to erect barriers which keep out the rest of the world.

Gorbachev has spoken clearly about the need for a broad range of political and economic reforms in the Soviet Union. At this point, it is not clear, and it may not be for years, whether significant change has occurred. We would like to see a Soviet Union that deals with its own people and with its neighbors through dialog rather than intimidation.

I think there has been a change in the nature of the U.S.-Soviet dialog in recent years. It used to be that we met only infrequently, and the subject was almost exclusively arms control. Now we have a regular dialog embracing a four-part agenda that includes human rights, regional affairs and bilateral matters, as well as arms reduction. This maturing relationship has already borne some fruit, including the INF agreement, the Afghanistan withdrawal accords, progress in human rights, and a great expansion of opportunities for U.S. and Soviet citizens to have contacts. We have a great many other subjects under discussion, including a treaty on 50-percent reductions in strategic nuclear arms and agreements on expanded cultural exchanges, as well as scientific and technical cooperation.

United States and Soviet Union will always have differences because our political systems and views of the role of the individual in society are so different. We must be frank with each other about that. But we can also -- and this has been at the root of our policy since I have been President -- have a constructive relationship which is sustainable over the long term. We have made progress with this four-part agenda, and I think it provides us a good blueprint for future progress.

The President. One of my highest priorities as President has been the achievement of deep reductions in strategic nuclear arms. As you know, we've made important progress toward that goal and have agreed on the basic outline of a treaty calling for 50-percent reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive nuclear arms. These reductions would make an historic contribution to international stability and security and would reduce the risk of war by establishing a framework of mutual restraint and responsibility.

The challenges of concluding such an agreement are extraordinary, and several difficult issues remain unsolved. Nonetheless, we will continue our efforts to reach agreement on a treaty that is both equitable and effectively verifiable.

As we look ahead, we must also seek constructive solutions to other priority areas of security and arms reduction, including chemical weapons and conventional forces, where the Soviets have a marked advantage. The United States and its NATO allies are committed to making concrete progress in these areas: We seek greater stability at lower levels of conventional forces in Europe and a truly global and effectively verifiable ban on chemical weapons.

Of course, arms reduction alone is not a solution to the problems of East-West relations. We must address the root causes of mistrust and tension between the superpowers, such as our differing political systems and values, our contrasting views of the role of the individual within society, and the need to protect basic rights and freedoms. Our dialog over the coming years must include all issues -- human rights, regional conflicts, bilateral matters, as well as arms reduction -- as we continue our efforts to build a safer world.

The President. I remain committed today to reducing our reliance for deterrence on ballistic missiles and ultimately to rendering them obsolete. I also support, as a long-term goal, the ultimate elimination of nuclear weapons. However, a world free of nuclear weapons is still far from becoming a reality. In the interim, I believe strongly that we should establish a stable peace which relies more on defense than on the threat of nuclear retaliation to deter war.

There are also many other factors that must be addressed before we can realistically hope to achieve the eventual elimination of nuclear weapons. For example, we must bring about a stable balance of conventional forces, a verifiable global ban on chemical weapons, greatly expanded confidence-building measures, and an overall improvement in East-West relations. Until we achieve these objectives, we must ensure that our security is protected through a safe and stable deterrent capability.

The President. I haven't given much thought to writing my memoirs. I am still too busy with my agenda for my remaining time in office. In terms of what I will list as my successes, on the domestic side, I think all Americans can take pride in the great economic success we have witnessed over the past few years. Inflation is well in the single-digit numbers, and economic growth is in its 66th consecutive month. We have restructured our tax policy, which has assisted in this economic growth.

On the foreign policy side, we have taken real steps toward the actual elimination of nuclear weapons by the signing of the INF treaty. We have witnessed a growth of democracy worldwide, particularly in the Western Hemisphere. In Central America now, for example, of the five states we have four democracies, where when I came into office there was only one. These are just limited examples of what I would consider successes not just of my administration but of the American people. But I will leave it to historians to judge the record.

The President. Historians will make the final judgment about my years as Governor of California and as President of the United States, but personally, I feel good about what I have been able to accomplish, both in and out of government.

My professional career has been varied. I have worked as a sportscaster, an actor, a labor leader, a lecturer, and a public official. This is something that is characteristic of the American way of life. The opportunity to advance oneself based on one's desires and abilities is a valued part of our existence and one to which I owe my success.

The President. I have always believed that people and nations must be judged by their actions and not their words. I have tried to speak out about the positive developments I see as much as I try to draw attention to the negative ones. My guiding principles have been candor, realism, dialog, and strength. In that regard it is fair to say I have noted some progress, such as the Soviet Government's commitment to withdrawal from Afghanistan. We are also seeing resolution of individual human rights cases and more open discussion of these issues. On the other hand, I do not understand, nor do other Americans understand, why the Soviet Government restricts, for example, the practice of religion and freedom of movement. We do not accept limitations on free speech.

I think what has changed is that both the U.S. and the Soviet people are being more candid about areas in which we agree and disagree. We must discuss not only restraint of the arms competition, but also basic issues of human rights and international behavior. Disagreements over these issues have fueled the mistrust that lies between our countries. Nations do not mistrust each other because they are armed; they arm themselves because they mistrust each other.

That is why in Moscow, as we have in our three previous meetings, General Secretary Gorbachev and I will discuss human rights and regional conflicts as vigorously and as seriously as we will discuss arms reductions. We live in an interconnected world with instant communication and a global conscience. How you treat your own citizens is of concern to the whole world. And the world watches and judges each country based not on what it wants the world to hear, but on the actions and policies that it sees. At the same time, the Soviet Union is a country of influence in many regions of the world. With that influence comes a responsibility to work towards peace and to help solve the many regional disputes which plague mankind.

The President. I am looking forward with great anticipation to visiting Moscow and in particular to talking with the people in the Soviet Union. As your question implies, the negotiations are important, but so is the opportunity to understand the other fellow's point of view. I think General Secretary Gorbachev left Washington with a deeper understanding of the American people, and I anticipate the same benefit from my meetings with the people of Moscow.

The President. No country can compete successfully in the global market today unless it unleashes the human spirit and lets individuals drive toward their own goals. Society, as a whole, benefits from the progress made by individuals. America is built on the principle of what we call free enterprise, a system which permits each individual to seek his own happiness based on his or her needs and desires.

Americans make all sorts of choices within that system, often balancing economic prosperity with job satisfaction, family, recreation, artistic achievement, and other goals. The interaction of all those personal choices makes for a strong and dynamic system.

Perestroika also can play an important role in information exchange. Your government is known for its high regard for secrecy, and you pay a price for that policy. Much of the progress made in the West comes about from information sharing. Free access to the body of knowledge possessed by the society enables our citizens to build on the advances made by others. As long as Soviet society remains off limits to the rest of the world, inhibiting the free flow of information and restricting travel in and out of the U.S.S.R., your economy will be limited in its ability to be part of the world economy.

The President. I agree that we have made significant progress. The treaty on the elimination of an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missiles has been a milestone not only for what it accomplishes in its own right but as a precedent for future agreements which will actually reduce nuclear weapons and not just restrain them.

I would like to see progress toward resolving conflicts around the world. For example, the war between Iran and Iraq has been going on for 7 years with hundreds of thousands of casualties. A generation of young lives is being bled away in this tragic conflict. Chemical weapons have been used with consequences that horrify the world. Much of the world has united in an effort to bring an end to this war by supporting U.N. Security Council Resolution 598, which calls for an immediate cease-fire across the board and withdrawal to the internationally recognized boundaries. The Security Council members, including your government, agreed that if either belligerent refused to honor this call by the U.N. Security Council there should be a second resolution mandating an arms embargo against that party. Both the United States and the Soviet Union supported Resolution 598. Iraq has now accepted the resolution and agreed to abide by its terms. Iran is resisting and insists on continuing the war. The Soviet Union is a key actor in this situation. You sell arms to both sides. If the Soviet Union strongly endorsed a second resolution and a strong effort by the United Nations to prevent arms from reaching Iran, I firmly believe we could bring this tragedy to a halt.

Ethiopia a great tragedy is imminent, as the effects of a terrible drought are being compounded by that government's policies blocking international relief efforts. The Soviet Union is that Marxist government's principal supplier of weapons and has influence there. It would be good if the Soviet Union cooperated with efforts to help prevent a manmade catastrophe.

These are urgent issues I will be discussing with General Secretary Gorbachev. We will also look at ways we can bring about settlements to conflicts in southern Africa, Cambodia, Central America, and the Middle East.

The President. Our mechanism for succession is a free and open election in which candidates from different parties compete vigorously against each other, arguing their positions in public debates, speeches, and media interviews for some months. Members of our press vigorously question the candidates. We have an election campaign underway right now. In November the American people will go into polling booths across the country and vote in complete secrecy for the candidate of their choice. In addition to electing a new President and Vice President in November, Americans will elect Senators, Members of Congress, State Governors, and local representatives. All of this is provided for under our Constitution.

I have read the constitutions of many countries, including your own. Many nations of the world have written into their constitution provisions for freedom of speech and freedom of assembly. If this is true, some ask, then why is the Constitution of the United States so exceptional? Our Constitution begins with three simple words: ``We the People.

Government tells the people of those countries what they are allowed to do. In our Constitution, we the people tell the Government what it can do. And it can do only those things listed in that document and nothing else. In America, the people are in charge.

The President. My vision is of a world free of war. A nuclear war cannot be won and should never be fought. General Secretary Gorbachev joined me in affirming that basic truth when we first met in Geneva. We have kept the peace by having enough nuclear weapons to retaliate if the other started a war. Well, that is not much of a defense. There would be no victors in that kind of war.

That is why I want to start reducing nuclear weapons. Our INF treaty is an excellent beginning, and we are making progress on a strategic arms reduction treaty, which will cut in half U.S. and Soviet strategic arsenals. At the same time we need to think about getting parity in conventional forces in Europe to make sure one country won't have an advantage over the other. There is today a serious imbalance in your favor.

This is why I am seeking to move our strategy of deterrence toward defensive systems, which threaten no one, and away from offensive systems. That is the purpose behind my Strategic Defense Initiative: to make obsolete the most threatening weapon ever invented -- the ballistic missile. I call upon the Soviet leadership to join me in these efforts toward strategic defenses and to move to a world based on defense rather than offense. The reasonableness of this proposal is demonstrated by the fact that your government has been engaged in its own strategic defense programs long before we started SDI.

The President. I hope that future generations of American and Soviet citizens will have closer relations and better understanding. But much depends on the way your government deals with the basic issue of human rights.

Cultural exchanges and individual travel are the underpinnings for establishing closer relations. I look forward to expanding these and thus broadening the scope of our mutual contacts. Americans hope for a world in which all people can enjoy the freedom they cherish. We will continue to work to fulfill our dreams for peace through understanding.

Speaking for myself, and I think speaking for the Vice President also, it gives us great pleasure to join with the Cuban-American community in commemorating the anniversary of a great day in the cause of a free Cuba: the establishment of the Cuban Republic 86 years ago. On that day, May 20th, 1902, the bonds of friendship between the peoples of Cuba and of the United States were reaffirmed. The birth of the Cuban Republic was the culmination of a long and arduous struggle, of revolts, political imprisonment, executions, and exile. Today that passion for a free Cuba remains alive in the hearts of thousands of Cubans everywhere. Cuban-Americans have demonstrated what a free people can accomplish unencumbered by tyranny, and I am confident that the time will come when the spirit of freedom will reign in Cuba itself.

Your support, your friendship has meant more to me than I can say. Having suffered personally the evils of communism, you have an acute understanding of the danger that Communist expansion poses to this hemisphere. You have stood in support of people everywhere who seek freedom, such as the people of Nicaragua. And let me assure you, as far as this administration is concerned, the freedom of Cuba is a nonnegotiable demand. We will never, ever, negotiate away the dream of every Cuban-American -- a dream that I, too, hold in my heart -- that Cuba will again join the family of free and democratic nations.

Marti said: ``One revolution is still necessary: the one that will not end with the rule of its leader. It will be the revolution against revolutions, the uprising of all peaceable men who will become soldiers for once so that neither they nor anyone else will ever have to be a soldier again.'' Well, at a time when young Cubans are shipped abroad to advance foreign designs, the rulers in Havana are necessarily worried about the new generation's interest in Marti's message.

Once each May, amid the quiet hills and rolling lanes and breeze-brushed trees of Arlington National Cemetery, far above the majestic Potomac and the monuments and memorials of our Nation's Capital just beyond, the graves of America's military dead are decorated with the beautiful flag that in life these brave souls followed and loved. This scene is repeated across our land and around the world, wherever our defenders rest. Let us hold it our sacred duty and our inestimable privilege on this day to decorate these graves ourselves -- with a fervent prayer and a pledge of true allegiance to the cause of liberty, peace, and country for which America's own have ever served and sacrificed.

During our observance of Memorial Day this year we have fresh reason to call to mind the service and sacrifices of the members of our merchant marine during World War II -- these gallant seafarers have now deservedly received veteran status.

Our pledge and our prayer this day are those of free men and free women who know that all we hold dear must constantly be built up, fostered, revered, and guarded vigilantly from those in every age who seek its destruction. We know, as have our Nation's defenders down through the years, that there can never be peace without its essential elements of liberty, justice, and independence.

Those true and only building blocks of peace were the lone and lasting cause and hope and prayer that lighted the way of those whom we honor and remember this Memorial Day. To keep faith with our hallowed dead, let us be sure, and very sure, today and every day of our lives, that we keep their cause, their hope, their prayer, forever our country's own.

May 30, 1988, as a day of prayer for permanent peace, and I designate the hour beginning in each locality at eleven o'clock in the morning of that day as a time to unite in prayer. I urge the press, radio, television, and all other information media to cooperate in this observance.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The adjustment applies only with respect to specified diseases -- primarily cancer of various organs -- that manifest themselves within 40 years after the veteran last participated in the military radiation-related activity or, in the case of leukemia, 30 years after such participation. Thus, for veterans who served in Hiroshima and Nagasaki or were prisoners of war in Japan, the period for manifestation of the disease already has passed.

The existing fair and equitable system for adjudication of veterans' claims for disability benefits requires demonstration of a connection between a veteran's disability and the veteran's military service. While this legislation bypasses the requirement for demonstration of such a connection, it does so only in specific, narrow circumstances for a truly unique group of veterans.

Enactment of this legislation does not represent a judgment that service-related radiation exposure of veterans covered by the Act in fact caused any disease, nor does it represent endorsement of a principle of permitting veterans to receive benefits funded through veterans programs which bear no relationship to their former military service.

Instead, the Act gives due recognition for the unusual service rendered by Americans who participated in military activities involving exposure to radiation generated by the detonation of atomic explosives. The Nation is grateful for their special service, and enactment of H.R. 1811 makes clear the Nation's continuing concern for their welfare.

United States participated actively and effectively in the negotiation of the Convention. It marks a significant step in the development during this century of international measures against torture and other inhuman treatment or punishment. Ratification of the Convention by the United States will clearly express United States opposition to torture, an abhorrent practice unfortunately still prevalent in the world today.

The core provisions of the Convention establish a regime for international cooperation in the criminal prosecution of torturers relying on so-called ``universal jurisdiction.'' Each State Party is required either to prosecute torturers who are found in its territory or to extradite them to other countries for prosecution.

Accordingly, certain reservations, understandings, and declarations have been drafted, which are discussed in the report of the Department of State. With the inclusion of these reservations, understandings, and declarations, I believe there are no constitutional or other legal obstacles to United States ratification. The recommended legislation necessary to implement the Convention will be submitted to the Congress separately.

Should the Senate give its advice and consent to ratification of the Convention, I intend at the time of deposit of United States ratification to make a declaration pursuant to Article 28 that the United States does not recognize the competence of the Committee against Torture under Article 20 to make confidential investigations of charges that torture is being systematically practiced in the United States. In addition, I intend not to make declarations, pursuant to Articles 21 and 22 of the Convention, recognizing the competence of the Committee against Torture to receive and consider communications from States and individuals alleging that the United States is violating the Convention. I believe that a final United States decision as to whether to accept such competence of the Committee should be withheld until we have had an opportunity to assess the Committee's work. It would be possible for the United States in the future to accept the competence of the Committee pursuant to Articles 20, 21, and 22, should experience with the Committee prove satisfactory and should the United States consider this step desirable.

Protocol will extend and supplement the legal framework of the Convention for the Suppression of Unlawful Acts against the Safety of Civil Aviation, done at Montreal on September 23, 1971, to which the United States is already a party. It provides for enhanced international cooperation in the fight against terrorism at airports serving international civil aviation. The Protocol was negotiated under the auspices of the International Civil Aviation Organization.

States Senator for over 40 years and has steadfastly supported the Nation's space program since its inception. He has demonstrated visionary leadership and has consistently worked to assure United States world leadership and preeminence in space.

The installation now to be renamed has played and will continue to play a major role in the United States space program and has been the recipient of the Senator's unwavering support from the moment the decision was made to establish that installation.

President, there's an upcoming visit to Moscow for you. This will be your first trip to our country. What feelings are you traveling to the Soviet Union with, and what do you anticipate from this upcoming summit meeting?

I'm obviously looking forward to the trip for one reason, because I have never been there. And I'm looking forward to seeing your country -- well, as much as possible with the meetings that will be going on. And we have discussed in the previous meetings with your General Secretary such matters as arms reductions, and we've been successful on the one treaty. We're both working on the present treaty that we call START -- the 50-percent reduction of intercontinental ballistic missiles -- but also some differences that we've had on our interpretation of human rights, on regional affairs -- and we're greatly heartened by the fact that your forces are withdrawing from Afghanistan -- and on bilateral issues: such things as rescue-at-sea agreements, fisheries agreements, things of that kind in which we've made great progress.

Mr. Gorbachev took steps which have great significance. Thanks to that, the threat of war has been reduced and cooperation has increased between our countries, despite the different social systems we have. What kind of opinion do you have about future prospects for movement in this same direction?

The President. Well, I have to be optimistic about it. I have read ``Perestroika'' cover to cover, and the goals that were outlined there for your own country and by your present leader were such that I think it would reduce some of the differences between us further and make it possible for future leaders of our countries to eliminate -- well, what I called for in our first meeting in Geneva, when just the General Secretary and I were talking to each other, I pointed out that we didn't mistrust each other because we were armed, we're armed because we mistrust each other, and that we had a unique opportunity, the two of us, to go to work not just to try and reduce arms but to reduce the causes of the mistrust. And I think we've carried on in that manner in the succeeding meetings.

The President. Well, the power of reason. But I think that can be achieved more quickly if we show our mutual desire for a peaceful world by eliminating some of the most horrendous of the weapons, such as the nuclear weapons. I made a statement to the parliaments of one or two other countries several years ago and have been repeating it since and have heard some of your officials say the same thing: A nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought.

The President. Well, I would think that once -- I think the weapons that are the most destabilizing are the nuclear weapons, the idea in the minds of people that once those weapons are fired devastation is going to follow and there's no way to halt them. They're more destabilizing than the people's concern about weapons that we're familiar with -- airplanes, battleships, things of this kind, artillery. And so, I think that this is the immediate problem. But then if we continue to work out our differences and a better understanding, then I think we engage in the reduction of conventional weapons.

The President. Well, I still think it can be concluded, but it would be, I think, overly optimistic, with the time limitations, to believe that it could be ready for signature as the INF treaty was here in the previous meeting. But we're going to continue negotiating. It would be nice if we could have achieved a signing ceremony there on this visit, but this treaty is far more technical and complicated than the treaty we did sign. And so, the experts on both sides who have been working on this in Geneva have not been able to make the progress that was made in the earlier treaty. But they're going to continue, I'm sure. And I think that perhaps we can advance it in our conversations, discussion, in Moscow on this. But we must -- the idea is to continue until we have the treaty that is correct, and not simply try to meet a date and sign a treaty that might not be all that we would desire.

The President. Probably not, because very frankly, I have to say I think there is a difference between this General Secretary and other leaders of your country that I had met with in the past. I don't think they had any dreams of perestroika. And yet, I felt that we had to exist in the world together. Our systems are different, we're going to be competitive in a number of ways, and that'll continue, but we can be competitive without being hostile to the point of conflict with each other. And I think this is what we're aiming at. And no, I could not have foreseen your present leader.

President, I know he would continue on this track. But I think that our people want this. I have had a visit, just the other day, here in the White House with 78 young teenagers, and half of them were from the Soviet Union and half were students of ours. They had been holding a conference in Finland, then in Moscow, and now here in the United States. And you looked out at those young people and you couldn't say, well, those are Russians and those are Americans. You just saw young people who had learned to know each other, exchange ideas, get acquainted. And I found myself saying to them, if all the young people of the world could get to know each other, there'd never be another war.

The President. Oh, my. I don't think I could recall and specify here and there. But I'm old enough to have had a great interest in the Soviet Union, and I know that in the things I studied in college, when I was getting my own degree in economics and sociology, that the declarations of Karl Marx, for example, that Karl Marx said your system, communism, could only succeed when the whole world had become Communist. And so, the goal had to be the one-world Communist state.

Now, as I say, I can't recall all of the sources from which I gleaned this, and maybe some things have been interpreted differently as in modern versions, but I know that Lenin expounded on that and said that that must be the goal. But I also know -- and this didn't require reading Lenin -- that every leader, every General Secretary but the present one had, in appearances before the Soviet Congress, reiterated their allegiance to that Marxian theory that the goal was a one-world Communist state. This man has not said that. So, I wasn't making anything up; these were the things we were told. For example, here in our government, we knew that Lenin had expressed a part of the plan that involved Latin America and so forth. And the one line that sounded very ominous to us was when he said that the last bastion of capitalism, the United States, would not have to be taken; it would fall into their outstretched hand like overripe fruit.

I'd like to say that, as it says in the Bible, everybody wants to go to paradise, but nobody is proposing to do that -- anything for us or to hurry up the process. Everything has to go by in its own time; that's our point of view.

The President. Well, wouldn't you think, though, that these two systems obviously were competitive in the world with each other in the economic situation -- industry and so forth, the difference between private ownership and government ownership of the sources of material, industry and so forth, agriculture -- well, wouldn't you think that it would make the most sense to compete legitimately, as business firms compete with each other, and see which does the better job?

Without question, when we talk about the fact that we think that sooner or later that the world is going to come to socialism, we're just talking about a historic process. Every country has to decide for itself. And we think that capitalist countries and socialist countries have to coexist peacefully on our very small planet and to cooperate with each other.

The President. Well, yes, we believe that also. But there was a time when, as I say, we were faced with declarations of the need to take over and expand. And on the part of, in this instance, of the communist philosophy, I think, as I've said earlier here, just this normal competition and find out which system is best. And then we have this one thing in which possibly we differ. And that is that we believe the people of a country have the right to determine what form of government they'll have. You have a constitution; we have a constitution. The difference between our two constitutions is very simple; it's contained in three words. Both of the constitutions announce things for the people's benefit and so forth. Your constitution says, these are the privileges, rights that the government provides for the people. Our constitution says, we the people will allow the government to do the following things. And the government can do nothing that is not prescribed by the people in that constitution. And so, where we run into conflicts sometimes in countries where there's a stirring and a division in trying to determine a government, our view is, the people must have the right to say this is the government we want. It must not be imposed on them.

Mr. President, in that connection I'd like to say that democracy is, of course, a great goal for all peoples. But if you take a specific situation now -- social opinion in the United States, the polls and Congress and so forth -- Congress is against actions that are being taken in Nicaragua. And despite that, the administration is acting in a somewhat different fashion, despite some of the opinions expressed in Congress.

The President. Yes. Of course, you must remember that each Congressman is elected only by a district -- his congressional district. This is the only job in our country that is elected by all of the people. And the responsibility that the people have laid on this office in the Constitution is that the President is responsible for our national security, and that is a duty he cannot shirk. And so, he is the final word as to what is essential to that national security. You were going to say something.

Yes, I wanted to say, going back to our conversation about coexistence -- the coexistence of capitalist and socialist governments -- I wanted to remind you that Lenin, our first leader -- it was his idea to have peaceful coexistence.

I'd like to talk about another question. In your statements, in your speeches, you frequently touch a very important question: the human rights question. As a rule, you talk about the human rights situations in other countries. I'd like today to ask you -- you, as the President of the United States, as a citizen of the United States -- are you satisfied with the situation concerning human rights in your own country?

The President. Well, I don't think -- you'll never be completely satisfied. Individuals are going to have prejudice and so forth. But we have laws in our country that make it law-breaking to implement those prejudices and to try to do things unjustly to other people.

You have to remember one great difference about our country. A man put it to me in a letter once. And that is that you could leave here and go to France to live, but you could not become a Frenchman; or you could go to live in Germany or Turkey or -- name any country -- you could not become one of them; this is the only country in the world in which anyone from any corner of the world can come here and become an American, because that's our history. We came from every corner of the world. If you meet with a group of Americans -- if we went around this room for the Americans present and asked them their background, their ancestry and so forth, you'd have quite a collection. As a matter of fact, my own background, going back to grandparents and great-grandparents, covers four different countries -- but here in this melting pot. So, the result is that the people that came here came not only with the desire for freedom, but they also brought with them many of the prejudices that existed because of national differences between various countries. And this is something we've had to guard against.

So, the human rights here are protected. People may have and do have -- there are people who have a prejudice against someone of another faith, someone of another background or race. But if they do anything to hurt that person because of that prejudice, the law takes care of them.

The President. Well, as I said earlier, the same things that we've talked about before and tried to come together in a meeting of the minds -- basically, those four major areas. Yes, that's what we'll talk about.

I recognize that one country can't dictate to another as to how they must run their own affairs, and maybe some of the things that we'll talk about are things that I believe maybe we could be -- based on our own experience -- be helpful; for example, among human rights. I was quite interested recently when the General Secretary, meeting with the leaders of your Orthodox Church, lessened some of the restrictions that government had imposed on the practice of that religion. Well, I've wondered if a further expansion of that -- you see, our country came into being because people were being denied, in other countries, the right to worship God as they saw fit. And so, they left those countries and came to this new land as pioneers in order to worship. Well, I've just wondered if there isn't a field there in your own country for more openness and the allowing of people to practice religion in the ways they chose. And here we call it separation of church and state. The government cannot deny people the right to worship, but by the same token, the churches cannot impose on government their beliefs.

In that connection, I'd like to ask you, recently in Washington -- I read about this in the U.S. press -- General Stroessner was here in the United States. He's a dictator from Paraguay. When you meet with the Soviet leaders -- or met with them in Geneva and Reykjavik and Washington, you always touched on the question of human rights. That's probably the right thing. Do you talk about that question with General Stroessner, with the leaders of Chile, South Korea, South Africa? In your conversations, do you discuss with them the question of human rights?

The President. Oh, yes, there's no question but that we believe in our getting along with these other countries, that this is an issue, for one reason, because of the background of all of our people. Government is influenced by public opinion. We are supposed -- as you mentioned earlier, we are supposed to do in the Congress and here in this office basically what -- meet the needs of the people, what the people want.

And so, when we are seeking to be neighbors and friends of another country and that country is jailing people for just their expression of political difference or wanting to practice religion and things of that kind -- we have a great many people whose heritage is in those countries. And you have to remember that even though we're all Americans -- a man doesn't give up love for his mother because he's taken a wife. And so, the people in our country all still feel a kind of heritage and relationship with the countries of their ancestry, or maybe their own if they're new immigrants who are here in the country.

One out of eight of our people have our background in your area. And those people can rise up and oppose us in some agreement that we may want to make of friendship if they feel that the country of their ancestry is being unfair in denying what they consider a human right. Now, maybe your country, you don't place that much importance on public opinion, but here in our system, it is the very basis of our system. And so, we can get along and make treaties much better with each other as governments if our people are not rebellious about something that your government is doing to what they consider their ancestry.

Soon you'll be in Moscow, and I think that you'll have the opportunity to get acquainted with the influence of public opinion in the U.S.S.R. and about freedom of religion in the U.S.S.R. Excuse me, I'd like -- our time is sort of running out, and in conclusion, I'd like to ask you a personal question, Mr.

President. The majority of Presidents in this country, when they left office, write memoirs. Are you getting ready to write your memoirs when you leave office, and if so, when are we going to get a chance to read your memoirs?

The President. Well, I've been thinking very seriously about writing a book. In view of the fact that several people who have left government have written some books, I think maybe I better straighten out the record and tell things as they really are. And so, it's possible that I will. But remember, there's another thing in our country that has become a tradition: People, not government, voluntarily provide money and funds and build what is called a Presidential library and museum, and this is happening with me. This is going forward. There is a group in the country; they've raised the millions of dollars. In California will be built this structure. Now, in that building will be the millions of papers from this administration. They will be open; scholars can come and study them and research and so forth. And there will be also many things that will be of interest to the people -- memorabilia that we've accumulated here. And this has happened with all the Presidents in the recent years. So there, too, will be a record that is open for public view. But I'll probably get around to writing a book. I don't look forward to it. I wrote a book once and found it was quite a chore.

The President. Well, thank you very much. May I just say one thing also -- in going to your country, and I would relish the opportunity, if I could, to say a few words here -- that is never discussed very much. I have a great admiration for the women of the Soviet Union, particularly in the Russian area. From the outside looking in, they seem to be a great bulwark of strength and solidity in the maintaining of the home and the things that they stand for -- the standing in lines to bring home what is necessary for the family and all of that. And I just wonder if they're getting the credit within your country that I think they deserve.

They deserve it. They don't just stand in lines, but the majority of them work together with men. They teach, they take care of children, they work in administrative posts, and so forth. And I hope that with your own eyes you will be able to see all of that when you come to our country.

But I want to say to you that this interview will be broadcast on the eve of your arrival -- I think the 27th of May. I have the impression that you'll be able to see it, because the 27th, I think, you're going to be in Helsinki, and you can see Soviet television in Finland very well. And it's going to be on one of our channels. There are going to be about 200 million Soviets that will see this interview, and it will be broadcast all over Eastern Europe, as well. So, everything that you said will reach all the Soviet people, and I think it will be a good beginning for your visit to the Soviet Union.

In conclusion, I would like one personal memory to share with you. Please don't think this is some sort of compliment, but in my office in Moscow there are a number of photographs hanging on the wall, and among them is a photograph where I was photographed with the Governor of California, Mr. Ronald Reagan, in Sacramento. It is a very precious souvenir to me. I treasure it very much. A lot of time has gone by since then, but I don't see that you've changed much. I think that you have some kind of recipe against the course of time somehow.

Yes, that was the meeting. And at that time, I asked you the same thing that I am going to ask you now, that the group should go over to the side and that you and I be photographed together. And then I will have this picture hanging on this wall, too.

You may have heard me say before that one of the things I like most about my job as President is visiting and talking with our young men and women in uniform. I've met them all over the world -- at our Army outposts along the demilitarized zone in South Korea, on board the U.S.S.

And everywhere, I've seen that their commanders are right: They're the best we've ever had. I mention this because today is Armed Forces Day. Yes, this is the day for all of us to salute the soldiers, sailors, marines, and aviators who stand sentry on the frontiers of freedom all over the world. We say thanks to the patriots who, whether under the midnight star or the noonday Sun, are always alert so that America's peace and liberty will always be safe.

Seven years ago, when we came to Washington, we found that our armed forces had been badly neglected. We found airplanes that could not fly and ships that could not sail for lack of trained people and spare parts. The military couldn't recruit enough good people or hold on to those they had.

Today that's changed. The men and women in the services are well-trained and well-equipped. Almost all new recruits have a high school diploma. Never before in peacetime have we had a military that is as well-prepared.

Just last month, the world saw what those who serve America on freedom's front -- what they can do when the chips are down. I'm speaking of the story of the U.S.S. Samuel B. Roberts, a guided-missile frigate and part of our task force to help protect passage through international waters in the Persian Gulf. The Roberts was on patrol when it hit a submerged mine. The mine blew a huge hole in the ship's hull, sent a fireball shooting up the exhaust stack and 150 feet in the air, and almost tore the Roberts in half. Luckily, no one was killed. Some might have said that she was doomed -- head for the life rafts. Well, that's not what the men of the Roberts said. They were determined to show what they could do.

Acting fast, they held the Roberts together with bolts and wire, took care of their injured, escaped the mine field, and with the help of other Navy ships got safely to harbor. The captain [Comdr. Paul X. Rinn] summed up the spirit and determination of the entire crew when he closed his report saying of the Roberts: ``We saved her, we'll fix her, and we'll fight again.'' And he signed off with their motto, ``No higher honor.'' That's the spirit, skill, and dedication that has been rebuilt in all our armed services today. ``No higher honor'' could be the motto of every American in uniform.

The men and women on duty today should know that we'll still be behind them when their service is done. They also deserve to know that, like them, we're all doing our part to keep the peace. This week I was pleased that the Senate began floor debate on the Intermediate-Range Nuclear Forces, or INF, treaty.

Senate can join with me and show both our allies and adversaries that it, too, wants to help build a brighter peace and better world. I hope the Senate will provide its consent to ratification of the INF treaty in time to bring it into force during my meetings with the General Secretary in Moscow.

On this Armed Forces Day, let's also remember the important role the armed services have been playing in supporting law enforcement agencies in the fight against drugs. I asked the Secretary of Defense this week to find even more ways to use military resources against drug smugglers. I also called for a joint task force -- executive branch and Congress -- to draw up a unified plan to fight drugs. I hope the leaders of Congress agree with me that the campaign against illegal drugs must not be hostage to headline seeking and partisan politics.

This week we had another sign of America's strength, its economic strength, which undergirds all of our national security efforts. Trade figures came out for March. America exported in March more than ever before. Against this background of good news on trade, I am going to veto the ill-advised trade bill Congress has sent me. Once my veto is sustained, we'll work hard to get a responsible trade bill, one that will strengthen, not weaken, our economy.

He was a marvel, a distinctly American marvel. Europe had never produced anything like him, neither had anyplace else on Earth. And in devoting his talents to another distinctly American marvel, the movies, Fred Astaire added immeasurably to our heritage, to our sense of ourselves.

It's important work the American Film Institute is doing, in preserving our nation's film heritage. Just think of it: A century from now, young people will still be able to see that thin, lovable, sandy-haired man, 5 feet 9 inches tall -- see the way he tilts his hat to one side and smiles, starts to dance the way nobody ever danced before. And they'll be able to say: Yes! That's part of us. That's part of America.

You know, in Hollywood, if you don't sing or dance, you become an after-dinner speaker. [Laughter] And look where I wound up. [Laughter] But I have to tell you, I was an official of the Screen Actors Guild, president of the union and -- so, I'd be out there making my personal appearances on the mashed-potato circuit, and I started out -- what would I talk about? You didn't have speechwriters, you did it yourself. And I decided that I would try to correct some of the misapprehensions about show people and about Hollywood.

He said there are two basic kinds of speeches. The first is the Mother Hubbard speech, which covers everything but touches nothing. The second is the bikini speech, which covers only the essentials. And today I'll try to stick to the second and cover only the essential points. That's obviously the 12 winners here today, who are the recipients of the 1988 ``E'' and ``E Star'' Awards for their sustained contributions to our nation's export expansion efforts. Your work is the vital machine that produces prosperity for America. Exports mean jobs for our people and you -- the growth and -- well, that's why it's always a pleasure, I was going to say -- the profits for our businesses and the jobs for our people that you mean and the growth of our economy. And I think thats why it's a pleasure to present the well-deserved ``E'' and ``E Star'' Awards.

I won't keep you here all day, but before handing out the awards, there's one other point I want to bring up. As many of you know, I launched the Export Now campaign on February 24, and I'm glad to say it's in full swing. Our aim is to make sure that all American businesses -- small, medium, and large -- are aware of the great opportunities that exist in exporting. Of course, the recent trade figures, with a genuine boom in exports, show that plenty of businesses have already received the message. But there are thousands more that are still hesitant and uncertain, and it is these we want to reach. More than 40 States are on board the Export Now campaign, and they've appointed their trade experts to work with Commerce Department offices around the country. The Export Now staff has handled over 1,000 requests for information and arranged for speakers and other participation in over 300 events nationwide. And soon we'll have solid figures on new companies that have entered exporting or present exporters and have found new markets. That will be the test of how well we're doing, but it's still too early to rack up the results.

For myself, I have no doubts that the Yankee trading spirit is alive and well. Our products are of world-class quality. Our costs are now among the lowest in the world. And we're shipping overseas everything from doughnut makers to locomotives. It's people like you who will catapult America into the Roaring Nineties. So, keep up the good work. And thank you, and God bless you. And now, with Secretary Verity's help, we'll present the awards.

Good afternoon. As you know, some 24 hours from now, I'll be leaving Washington to fly to Helsinki, Finland, on my way to Moscow to meet with General Secretary Gorbachev. I thought that on this, the eve of my fourth summit meeting with the new Soviet leader, it would be appropriate to address a few words to our fellow democracies with whom we share the dream of freedom and peace. I'd like first to discuss with you the policy that has brought this summit meeting about and that I believe has done much to advance the interests of freedom and peace throughout the world.

From the beginning, our administration has sought to pursue a policy toward the Soviet Union based on realism, on reasoned interchange with the Soviets and, yes, on strength, especially Western unity. The Soviet leaders talk, to use their phrase, of a common European home.

Well, I believe that the true homeland of Europe is one defined by transcendent beliefs -- a belief in the sacred liberty of the individual, in the importance of the family, in a just and loving God, and in democracy. The Atlantic community is not limited to a military alliance. It is composed instead of nations committed to democracy and free enterprise. Nor is it limited any longer to the West, for the community of democratic nations has spread beyond the Atlantic to encompass Japan, Australia, the Philippines, India, many countries in Latin America, and others around the world.

In dealing with the Soviet Union, the United States has remained in constant consultation with this community of free nations -- with our North Atlantic allies and other friends. NATO itself remained steadfast and united in the face of severe challenges in the early 1980's. Already we've witnessed one historic result: the signing during the Washington summit last December of the historic INF treaty. That treaty, which for the first time in history will eliminate a whole class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles, was made possible by the solidarity and, yes, courage of NATO.

Now we're applying these lessons of the INF treaty to negotiations on a strategic arms reduction treaty. We hope to reach a START agreement this year, though it is the requirements of a good treaty and not some arbitrary deadline that will determine the timetable. As we negotiate from strength, we're guided by realism -- realism about just what can be achieved in our relations with the Soviet Union and about what the Soviets themselves seek to achieve. We do not expect a quick, radical transformation of the Soviet system. We do not expect to turn a corner one day to find that all our problems have gone away because our adversary has been transformed. We must continue to fulfill our own responsibility to stand firm and vigilant, to provide the incentive for a new Soviet policy in contrast to the old; for there still remain profound political and moral differences between the Soviet system and our own.

As the birthplace of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe, or CSCE, the city I'll be visiting on my way to Moscow, Helsinki, has given its name to a process that lies at the heart of the East-West relationship. The Helsinki Final Act of 1975 codified international standards of behavior in human rights and defined a new standard of openness in social, economic, and security affairs as a benchmark of East-West relations. It's not too much to say that the 1975 Final Act redefined East-West exchanges, enshrining human rights as an issue of permanent importance. The process is now continuing in the CSCE followup meeting -- a meeting that has been underway in Vienna since 1986.

United States is committed to working with the other CSCE states to achieve a balanced result in Vienna, a result that must include significant improvement in Soviet and Eastern European practices in human rights to balance new cooperation in security and economic affairs. Balance here is the essence of the Helsinki process. As signatories of the Helsinki Final Act, the Governments of the Soviet Union, Europe, Canada, and the United States have formally and publicly committed themselves to the recognition of fundamental freedoms: freedom of religion, freedom of thought and expression, freedom of the press, and freedom of movement. Only when these freedoms are observed can the greatest resource of any nation -- the creativity, ideas, and initiative of its individual citizens -- prosper and grow.

Moscow, I will welcome the progress we've seen in the Soviet human rights record, especially since the end of 1986. More than 300 political and religious prisoners have been released from labor camps. Emigration, still too low, has improved. Many cases of divided families and separated spouses have been satisfactorily resolved. And censorship of films, books, and other creative works has eased. Yet despite this progress, the human rights situation in the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe is far from good -- repressive policies persist. Peaceful demonstrations by national minorities, refuseniks, and others are still being broken up by police.

Freedom of religion is still being denied, and members of unregistered religious groups are still being persecuted. Unofficial publications are banned. Dozens of political prisoners and religious dissenters remain imprisoned, and many prisoners of conscience are still being held in psychiatric hospitals. Freedom of movement is still restricted.

All of us who are united by our belief in democracy will continue to press the Soviet Union to improve its practices in these vital areas, in short, to grant full recognition of fundamental human rights. To raise these issues is not only our inclination by tradition and principle but, under the Helsinki Final Act, our responsibility. For our part, the United States is prepared for useful exchanges. We will listen when the Soviets criticize us, and we will discuss their concerns as openly and constructively as possible. And yet I would stress that our interchange with the Soviets has a basis; it is not neutral or value-free.

This basis is not just a matter of American standards; they are moral standards, the standards of Western civilization itself that we Americans inherited from Europe. We have fought in Europe twice in this century to help defend them. These shared standards and beliefs tie us to Europe today. They are the essence of the community of free nations to which we belong.

Soviets, has two other elements. One is Soviet policy in the regional conflicts. We're pleased to see the Soviet Army departing Afghanistan. Once that withdrawal is complete and Afghan self-determination has returned to this country, this will be an historic triumph. I will also raise other issues with him, seeking to engage Soviet cooperation in getting political solutions to other conflicts, such as southern Africa, the Iran-Iraq War, Cambodia, Central America, Ethiopia, and the Arab-Israeli conflict.

In addition, our discussions will cover the need for greater openness and a freer exchange of people. Information and ideas -- government barriers to peoples' understanding of the outside world and to contact with that outside world must be eliminated. All of us believe that people must be free to communicate with one another, whether they're journalists, scientists, academics, tourists, or high school students. And so, I'll urge General Secretary Gorbachev to join us in greatly expanding people-to-people exchanges between East and West. One matter in this regard is especially close to my heart: that of seeing more young people travel between East and West. I will discuss youth exchanges with General Secretary Gorbachev because they hold such promise for better understanding in the years to come. Young people should be free -- free to come and go as they will, free to travel to and live in each other's country, free to make friends the world over.

I was in Berlin nearly a year ago, I called upon General Secretary Gorbachev to tear down the wall dividing that city. In so many senses, dividing Europe itself, East from West, the wall is still there, a scar, a grim reminder of the division of Europe. That division is cruel. It is unnecessary. It has gone on too long. We'll work on, unrelentingly, until that division gives way to peace and freedom. The day may still be long in coming, but the United States will always remain utterly committed to bringing that full liberty into being. In the meantime, we'll stand by you in defending our common heritage and beliefs, our common homeland of freedom.

Will you raise the Cambodia question when you meet with General Secretary Gorbachev? Will you be pushing for a solution to this problem at the Moscow summit, as you did for Afghanistan at the recent Washington summit? Do you believe China has a role to play, especially in regards to the Khmer Rouge?

The President. We have been actively discussing Cambodia with the Soviet Union at various levels for a number of years now, and I raised the issue with General Secretary Gorbachev at the last summit. We believe that the Soviet Union can play a positive role in encouraging Vietnam to be responsive to efforts to resolve the Cambodian conflict. We will continue urging the Soviet Union to play such a role. Vietnam should meet directly with Prince Sihanouk and should commit itself to a firm timetable for rapid withdrawal from Cambodia. China supports Prince Sihanouk and the ASEAN [Association of South East Asian Nations] nations in their efforts to end the Vietnamese occupation of Cambodia and restore that country's sovereignty and independence. I am sure that China's policy will make a constructive contribution to settling the Cambodian conflict.

The President. Nuclear arms reduction is a vital goal, and one that we will continue to pursue energetically. But there are no shortcuts. Nuclear free zone treaties are at their best when they prevent nuclear proliferation and promote regional stability and global security, as might be the case in Latin America. In general, however, we must look with caution at the proposition that walling off a portion of the world from nuclear weapons will contribute to world peace. It could instead weaken nuclear deterrence and, in so doing, could heighten rather than reduce the risk of war. For this reason, we cannot support the proposal for a nuclear free zone in Southeast Asia.

East Asian and Pacific region has waxed and waned through history. Until recently, Soviet efforts to improve their status in the Pacific area were based almost entirely on military power. After a period of military buildup in Asia, General Secretary Gorbachev has made overtures to become more involved in the region in a nonmilitary way. Unlike our own extensive and longstanding commercial, economic, cultural, political, and military links with the region, however, the Soviet Union lacks a firm basis for greater peaceful involvement in Asia. Though Soviet rhetoric has changed under Mr. Gorbachev, Moscow's military posture in the region remains a major concern to us and our friends in Asia.

United States and most Asian nations agree about what needs to be done on a large number of real issues, such as ceasing Soviet support for the Vietnamese occupation of Cambodia; dealing with the Soviet military buildup, including Cam Ranh Bay; encouraging North Korea to open a dialog with the South Koreans to reduce tensions on the Peninsula; and resolving the Northern Territories dispute with Japan. The Soviet Union already knows it can do a great deal for peace and stability in Asia by resolving these important, tangible problems. We take every opportunity to remind them of that.

We are also working closely with our friends and allies in Asia and the Pacific on real-world issues, like economic development, security, the movement for greater democracy, and growth of trade in free-market conditions. We think that real contributions to human welfare beat lofty phrases. We will continue pursuing such contributions.

The President. Our goal is a good agreement, not a quick agreement. Our negotiators have been working long and hard in Geneva toward an equitable and effectively verifiable agreement to reduce United States and Soviet strategic nuclear arms by 50 percent. Our goal is to reduce the risk of war and strengthen strategic stability through deep cuts in strategic nuclear arsenals and reduced reliance on those weapons systems that are most destabilizing: ballistic missiles, especially heavy intercontinental ballistic missiles with multiple warheads.

Despite the considerable progress that we have made, important differences remain, and it looks increasingly unlikely that a START treaty will be ready before my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev later this month. Nevertheless, I believe that a START treaty can be concluded this year, but only with hard work and constructive negotiating by both sides. We want a treaty that makes the world a safer place for all of us. We will continue to do our part to achieve an equitable and effectively verifiable START treaty.

I am proud of the achievements we have registered in U.S.-Soviet relations in recent months, including the signing of the INF treaty and reaching an agreement that gets Soviet troops out of Afghanistan. My approach to U.S.-Soviet relations has been based on the principles of strength, realism, and dialog. This approach has served us well through three previous summits, and I remain confident it will produce a good, substantive meeting with Mr.

Gorbachev later this month. In Moscow, I intend to seek further progress in all four parts of the U.S.-Soviet agenda, covering human rights, regional issues, bilateral relations, and arms control. My goal is to bequeath to my successor next January the firm basis for a stable, sustainable relationship with the Soviet Union.

The President. We have pursued a vigorous dialog with the Soviet Union on regional conflicts in recent years. In addition to my own discussions with General Secretary Gorbachev, Secretary Shultz and our regional experts have recently had intensive exchanges with their Soviet counterparts on such topics as Afghanistan, southern Africa, the Middle East peace process, Cambodia, and the Korean Peninsula. Our goal, as laid out in my 1985 United Nations General Assembly speech, is the achievement of political settlements based on an end to the fighting, prompt withdrawal of outside forces, and facilitation of a process of genuine national reconciliation.

I had serious discussions with Mr. Gorbachev on regional issues last December and expect to follow up on them in Moscow. The Soviet Union leadership has indicated they see the Afghanistan settlement as opening the way to progress on other conflicts. I am all in favor of this and intend to press Mr. Gorbachev for details later this month. For not only do these conflicts, many of them involving Soviet client states or proxies, pose a serious threat to regional security balances, they also hold the danger of triggering superpower confrontations with negative consequences for regional states.

The United States has yet to resolve its trade problems with Japan and the newly industrialized countries of Asia. What measures would you advocate that the United States and these countries take to narrow the trade imbalances with minimum disruption to the economies of the Asian nations?

The President. We have urged Japan to boost domestic economic growth and to improve access to the Japanese market for foreign products. Japan has made progress in these areas. In 1987 the Japanese Government enacted spending measures to assure good economic growth, which marked over 4 percent last year. Firm growth has continued this year and has benefited all of Japan's trading partners as Japanese imports have increased. We also have worked with Japan to resolve some difficult bilateral economic issues, most recently in construction and science and technology cooperation, by working out agreements that provide valuable benefits for both nations. However, more remains to be done, particularly in market liberalization of the agricultural sector.

The newly industrialized economies -- Hong Kong, Korea, Singapore, and Taiwan -- of Asia have for the most part pursued an export-oriented strategy of development. The economic success they have achieved is to a large degree dependent on the relatively free access their wide range of export products have had to the U.S. market. While Hong Kong and Singapore have virtually open markets, Korea and Taiwan have in place laws and regulations which restrict or even ban U.S. exports of goods and services. Both Korea and Taiwan have taken significant steps to reduce their trade barriers, but much more remains to be done. We also have urged these four trading partners to allow their currencies to reflect the underlying strength of their economies.

If the liberal international trading system that has so benefited the United States and all the economies of East Asia is to survive, it is important that all our major trading partners take immediate action to further reduce tariff and nontariff barriers. They also should join us in making every effort to ensure the success of the Uruguay round of the ongoing multilateral trade negotiations.

Will the United States further pressure Thailand to include protection of U.S. intellectual property and computer software in Thai copyright laws? To what extent does the United States want its intellectual property protected in Thailand?

The President. The United States looks forward to continuing to work with the Royal Thai Government in a cooperative effort to improve the protection afforded all intellectual property in Thailand. I am convinced that it is in the best economic, cultural, and social interest of any nation to enhance the intellectual property conditions of its own authors and creators and to offer that enhanced protection to creators from other nations as well.

Bidong, a Vietnamese refugee transit camp, and new arrivals would be turned away. Does the United States think that Malaysia is serious or merely making a threat? What action is being taken by the United States to speed up resettlement of these refugees?

Malaysia has indicated its concern and is reviewing its policy as a result of the increasing flow of refugees to its shores in recent months. We have no information that Malaysia has decided to turn away refugees, however. The Malaysians have confirmed to us that they have plans to close Pulau Bidong refugee camp over the course of the coming years, but not in a precipitous way.

I want to remind you that we have repeatedly urged the Vietnamese Government to honor its commitment to the orderly departure program so that people do not have to resort to clandestine flight out of Vietnam. We are currently considering admission of up to 1,000 additional refugees from Malaysia who are harder to resettle because they lack family ties in the United States or elsewhere. This decision demonstrates our continuing commitment to first asylum and was made in response to the dramatic increase in Malaysia's boat arrivals in recent months.

Government is strongly committed to helping democracy and prosperity flourish in the Philippines. We have also been talking with our friends and allies in Asia and Europe about the possibility of increasing assistance and stimulating trade and investment to sustain economic growth in the Philippines. These discussions are continuing. President Aquino enjoys enormous international support, and I am confident the donor community will continue to respond generously to her government.

Major meetings were held by U.S. officials with Cypriot leaders during the past two months. Secretary of State Shultz visited Cyprus on April 8, 1988, during the course of travel to a number of Middle Eastern countries. The Secretary met with Cypriot Foreign Minister Iacovou and stressed to him our desire to be helpful in the effort to achieve a Cyprus solution. The Secretary also underlined our continuing support for the United Nations Secretary General's good offices mission.

Turkish Cypriot community leader Denktash, and other political and government leaders. Mr. Wilkinson strongly emphasized our belief that negotiations should be started as soon as possible under the aegis of the U.N. Secretary General and his representative in Cyprus, Oscar Camilion. Mr. Wilkinson also stated that the United States wishes to be helpful in the effort to start negotiations, but that the parties themselves must elect to begin the process.

During the period under review both Greek and Turkish Cypriot leaders expressed their continued interest in working with the U.N. Secretary General in pursuit of a settlement. At the same time, both parties pointed to statements and actions by the other side that they argue call into question the sincerity of such expressions.

Also, during the reporting period, the Turkish Cypriot authorities began stamping the passports of certain travelers entering the Turkish Cypriot sector across the U.N.-controlled buffer zone. The Turkish Cypriots have asserted that the new measures were established in response to long-standing Greek Cypriot restrictions on travel between the two sectors. We and others have questioned the initiative and urged maximum effort by all parties to restart serious negotiations.

United States continues to believe that the time is ripe for resuming negotiations without preconditions. An early meeting, facilitated as appropriate by the U.N. Secretary General, between the leaders of the two communities also appears desirable. At the same time, we continue to favor expanded contacts at all levels to reduce tensions and to complement, not substitute for, substantive negotiations.

It is with sincere regret that today I must disapprove and return H.R. 3, the Omnibus Trade and Competitiveness Act of 1988. We worked long and hard to produce legislation that would enhance our country's ability to meet foreign competition head-on -- to strengthen our trade laws and remove restrictions on America's great economic engine. And we came very close to developing such a bill. Unfortunately, as the process came to a close, provisions were included that simply make this bill, on balance, bad for America -- particularly working men and women. The criteria I used in reaching this decision were whether this legislation will create jobs and help sustain our economic growth. I am convinced this bill will cost jobs and damage our economic growth.

During this Administration the American economy has created 16 million new jobs. Our unemployment rate is the lowest in 14 years with more Americans working than ever before in our history. And we are experiencing the longest peacetime expansion this country has ever seen.

While this has been going on at home, many of our trading partners have had a different economic situation. Perhaps the most compelling and important comparison is that over the past decade, the United States has created more than twice as many jobs as Europe and Japan combined.

United States economy, which foreign leaders have dubbed the ``American Miracle,'' is not a freak accident or a statistical curiosity. It is the result of 7 years of consistent policies: lower tax rates, reduced regulation, control returned to State and local governments. The Washington tendency to have government be all things to all people has been reversed, and we have gotten government off the backs of the American people.

In contrast, many foreign countries remain hamstrung by archaic policies and are now trying to remove these impediments, to reform tax systems, to make labor markets more flexible, and to encourage entrepreneurs.

That is not to say that we cannot do more here at home -- we can. That is why I forwarded proposals to improve our competitive strength and why we worked hard with the Congress to try to achieve a positive, forward-looking bill.

The issue receiving the most attention in this bill is the mandatory requirement for businesses to give advance notice of closings or layoffs. I support voluntarily giving workers and communities as much advance warning as possible when a layoff or closing becomes necessary. It allows the workers, the employer, the community, time to adjust to the dislocation. It is the humane thing to do.

I object to the idea that the Federal Government would arbitrarily mandate, for all conditions and under all circumstances, exactly when and in what form that notification should take place. There are many circumstances under which such mandatory notification would actually force a faltering business to close -- by driving away creditors, suppliers, customers, and -- in the process destroying jobs. While the legislation attempts to mitigate this outcome, its ``faltering business'' exemption is too ambiguous to be workable and invites untold litigation.

These concerns are real, not simply philosophical or theoretical. The experience of the Caterpillar Company in the early 1980's, for example, is indicative of the need to be flexible to meet foreign competition and indeed to survive. They had to utilize layoffs and temporary plant closings to respond to competitive developments. And, as one executive of that company stated, they did not have the luxury then, nor do they now, of knowing with certainty what business conditions would be like 60 days in the future. Without the ability to be agile and responsive, they might have closed their doors permanently.

Caterpillar's experience is repeated many times over throughout our economy. One independent analysis shows that if this law had been in place between 1982 and 1986, the United States would have produced almost one-half million fewer jobs. And that is what this debate is about -- creating jobs and keeping them -- not losing jobs by the straightjacket of regulations.

Over a year ago, I submitted legislation that would provide assistance to workers, employers, and communities in the event of a layoff or closing. The program would serve virtually every dislocated worker who needs it with training, education, and assistance in securing a new job and provide an incentive for giving advance notice of layoffs and closings. Ironically, the one piece of that package that the Congress rejected was a direct incentive for business to give advance notices of closing and layoffs. We need labor laws that fit the flexible, fast-paced economy of the 1990's, not restrictive leftovers from the 1930's agenda. And I encourage the Congress in any subsequent trade bill to include a program that provides incentives for such notice.

While the Congress did a remarkable job in watering down or eliminating the most protectionist provisions, there remain sections of the bill that push us in the direction of protectionism. Closing our borders is not the solution to opening foreign markets. We need to demand to be treated fairly and take a strong stand against barriers abroad. In short, we need to open markets, not close them.

While there are objectionable portions of the bill, there are also desirable provisions. There is negotiating authority so that the next President will have congressional support to continue to seek agreements that open markets abroad.

That, coupled with new trade law tools to strengthen the hand of America in international trade negotiations, will mean that this country can enter the next decade with new agreements that reduce barriers and encourage trade. There are strengthened protections for intellectual property, such as copyrights, and a reduction in various handicaps to U.S. exporters. Finally, the bill would remove a major impediment to U.S. oil production by repealing the windfall profits tax.

That is why I want a trade bill, and why I like much of this bill. But I regret that the addition of a few counterproductive and costly measures outweigh the positive features of this particular legislation. I will continue to work vigorously to secure sound legislation this year.

Let me reiterate what I have said on a number of occasions. I am committed to enactment of a responsible trade bill this year. I have heard some say that there is not time to send me a second bill after my veto is sustained; my response is that there are many months left in 1988 -- time enough to set aside partisanship and finish the job. I want to sign a trade bill this year. I urge prompt action on a second bill immediately after the Congress sustains my veto.

Two months have passed since the Congress limited U.S. assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance to food, shelter, clothing, and medicine. The Congress stopped U.S. military assistance to the resistance while the Soviet bloc continued its military assistance to the Communist Sandinista regime in Nicaragua. Some thought that U.S. forbearance would bring democracy and peace to Nicaragua through negotiations between the resistance and the Sandinista regime, but it has not.

Tomorrow, as I leave on the first leg of my trip to Moscow, the resistance and the Sandinistas are scheduled to meet again. The Sandinistas will again have the opportunity to carry out the promises they have made -- beginning a decade ago with promises to the Organization of American States -- of establishment of freedom and democracy in Nicaragua. We do not need more pieces of paper bearing empty Sandinista promises and Sandinista signatures. We need deeds, not more words.

During the 60-day truce established under the Sapoa agreement signed March 23, the Sandinistas have continued, and indeed intensified, their repression of the Nicaraguan people. They have not carried out their commitments under the Guatemala accord of August 7, 1987, or under the Sapoa agreement. The Sandinistas have gone so far as to make it impossible to arrange through neutral parties to deliver food and medicine to resistance members inside Nicaragua.

The men and women of the Agency for International Development who have worked long and hard to ensure that the members of the resistance have the basic necessities of life deserve the thanks of our nation. The work of AID keeps the chance for democracy alive in Nicaragua.

United States continues to support those fighting for freedom and democracy in Nicaragua. The freedom fighters of the Nicaraguan democratic resistance deserve the continued support of the United States.

If the current stalemate in the peace process persists and the Sandinistas continue their policies of repression, then we will call upon the Congress to reconsider its February 3 decision to curtail assistance to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters.

President's 1989 budget recognizes the high priority of these education programs by proposing increases in budget authority in excess of the average of 2 percent that applies to the total for domestic discretionary programs in the bipartisan budget agreement. In addition, the transmittal includes a request for $3.4 million for the Education Department's statistics programs to finance activities as required by Public Law 100 - 297. These proposals also include $1 million in fiscal year 1989 for the National Commission on Migrant Education.

This temporary commission would study education problems of the children of migrant workers. The total package of amendments provides no significant increase to the fiscal year 1989 budget and is consistent with the bipartisan budget agreement.

In another interview a few days ago in Moscow, Mr. Gorbachev gave a remarkable characterization of your qualities as a politician, and he praised your realism. After three meetings and many talks one-to-one, how would you characterize Mr. Gorbachev, and what do you regard as his main qualities?

The President. Well, I think he's very forthright. We can get into discussions where perhaps we're disagreeing quite firmly, and yet there is no personal animus in that with him. I think he solidly represents his country. I have suspected sometimes that he, having been raised in that particular country from childhood, believes some of their propaganda about us. But as I say, we can debate and discuss, and I think he's very sincere about the progressive ideas that he is introducing there and the changes that he thinks should be made. But as I say, even if the discussion gets, well, pretty meaningful, there is no animus. When it's over, I think that there's actually a degree of friendship between us.

Department, we are moving toward an agreement that would allow American psychiatrists to visit Soviet mental hospitals to determine if dissidents are being imprisoned there. The Assistant Secretary of State for Human Rights was quoted as saying that there seems to be a genuine interest in the idea of such a visit and in bringing the problem of abuse of psychiatry to an end. Do you think that a formal agreement could be ironed out during your visit to Moscow?

The President. I'm hopeful that it can. I think that some of these things with regard to human rights is not just trying to interfere with their internal affairs at all. But in view of the fact that our country is made up of people from all over the world -- and I have used the term myself previously in discussing with them that when a man takes a wife, he doesn't stop loving his mother -- and you perhaps are aware that Americans all retain a feeling of their heritage, even those whose grandparents or great-grandparents first came to this country. I think when Americans get acquainted with each other the first thing they inquire is, you know, what is your background. And Americans are accustomed to saying well, I'm this or that. And as time has gone on, most of us have to name three or four countries in our heritage if our ancestors came a few generations back. And the result of that is that in becoming closer and developing a relationship between the two countries we are affected by public opinion and by people in our country who resent if they think that in the land of their heritage people are being treated unfairly.

So, this is one of the reasons why I'm trying to impress upon the General Secretary that if we are to develop relationships, and better relationships in trade and so forth, that can be done better if there aren't elements in our country that believe that somehow the country of their heritage is -- the government is being unfair to the people, because they still consider they have a relationship there. And so, it isn't a case of just wanting to impose our rules on them. It is to try and impress them with the need to eliminate some of the things that have grown with their system and that are unfair treatment, that are denying human rights to their own people.

Mr. President, I'm Christopher Thomas of the London Times. Could you please assess the prospects for a strategic arms treaty with the Soviet Union before you leave office on January the 20th. And do you see any possibility of another summit with Mr. Gorbachev later this year to sign such an agreement?

The President. Well, I won't rule it out. I won't say it's impossible because it does look as if a START agreement -- I don't think there's any way now that the START agreement could come to a signing point in this summit. It is a far more complex treaty than the INF treaty that we did agree upon. Now, with ratification of that, I think that this summit will advance us further in the START discussions, and those people of ours and theirs that have been negotiating in Geneva on this will continue.

And I hope that it can come about while I'm still here, and I think they feel the same way just because they believe that there would be perhaps unnecessary delay then if you had to wait while a newcomer in this office settled in and got around to working with them. And so, I would hope that we can iron out the still-undecided points before I leave. And then I could see where we might decide that it should be signed in a meeting rather than several thousand miles apart in the -- when the signatures take place. And I've wondered, then, if perhaps the -- since we will have each been to each other's country, rather than try to choose which country to do it in, maybe we'd pick a neutral locale.

Il Giornale, Milan, Italy. And I want to remind you for some of your prophecies. You said very interesting things just at the beginning your first term not just about America but about the Eastern bloc. You said they are bound to be in very difficult times if they don't change the -- will be going downstairs in the dustbin of history -- or something like that. I think you are a very good prophet -- [laughter] -- but they've changed lots of things -- perestroika, Hungary, Chinese. How do you feel like a prophet?

The President. Well, I didn't set out to be a prophet, but I just believe strongly that government can become too domineering and when -- well, I thought in our own country that we had drifted to a point where government was, in a sense, at an adversarial relationship with its own business and private sector. And so, we set out to reduce regulations that we thought were unnecessary, to return authority to our States. We are unique in the world in that we were created as a federation of sovereign States. And much of our law and so forth was left with the States and the local communities nearest to the people, and then certain things that had to be done by the Federal Government.

But this was not new with me in feeling that the central government had gone too far in imposing itself on these other elements. Franklin Delano Roosevelt, when he ran for election in 1932 -- one of his platform planks was that he would restore authority and autonomy to the States and local communities that he said had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government. So, this wasn't -- and he was of the opposite party. But this we have done. And I think it has been responsible for the longest economic expansion in our nation's history, which we're in right now.

And so, I could obviously see that, well, I disagreed with the whole theory of socialism and its advanced partner, communism, because that was a total imposition on the people. We set out, Vice President Bush was put in -- I put him in charge of a task force to investigate how many regulations we could eliminate that had been imposed on the people and on local governments and so forth. And that commission was so successful that we estimate that we have eliminated 600 million man-hours a year of complying with government paperwork throughout the country. So, I'm still critical of that system, but again I think that's not too far away from what the General Secretary is trying to do.

Mr. President, I am Boudouin Ballaert from the French paper, Le Figaro. And the question of whether the NATO allies of the United States are bearing their fair share of the Western defense burden has triggered an important foreign policy debate here in Washington and was raised recently in Brussels by Mr. William Taft. Mr. President, what's your view about the burden-sharing problem?

The President. Well, there is no question but that if we take it on a percentage of our gross national income we are perhaps having a higher figure in our defense spending than our trading partners are in NATO. And we have believed that since our Congress is making it more difficult for us to continue our rate of spending in defense that maybe our allies could increase their share somewhat. I don't think it is a problem that should cause any ill will between us, but we have in our meetings with our NATO partners suggested that it could be most helpful if they would assume a little bit more of the burden.

May I come back, Mr. President, to Eastern Europe? We had these developments in Hungary last weekend, and we had a peaceful change of power in Czechoslovakia last year. How do you see these developments? Could this be the beginning of a process which could reach the Communist hierarchy in Romania, in Bulgaria, in East Germany as well?

And this is a younger man. I don't know exactly what his beliefs and policies are, but they seem to be somewhat, well, let's say, in the same mold as the General Secretary of the Soviet Union. And I think we have to expect that, and it probably is a good thing to see happening with those countries, that glasnost is practiced in them also.

The President. Well, I would certainly try to inform him fully of all that had been accomplished in these last few years, now with this relatively new head of state. And I think I would try to convince him that this progress should continue. As I said in the first meeting, one-on-one with the General Secretary, I pointed out to him that it was rather unique that there we were in a room in Geneva, Switzerland, probably the two men in the world that had within our power to maintain the peace or to start a third world war, and neither one of us seemed to want a third world war. And there can be no denying that there is something of the ``superstate'' about our two nations, and we can have a bearing on the peace and prosperity of the world, depending on how we get along. And so, I suggested to him that we didn't mistrust each other because of our weapons, we had our weapons because we mistrusted each other, and that maybe what we should do is not just deal with arms and numbers of weapons but see if we could not get at the things that made us mistrust each other. And I think we've been doing quite a bit of that. And so, I would try to pass that on as a chore that the next President should continue.

Mr. President, your Panama policy seems to be in deep trouble. You rejected a military solution to overthrow General Noriega, and your economic sanctions have so far failed to force him out, despite inflicting grievous harm on the Panamanian economy. And now Vice President Bush is saying that he opposes the dropping of drug charges against General Noriega.

The President. Well, he and I disagree on that. I recognize how it looks to some people with regard to that as a part of our effort. And I think he's aligned with this -- that the goal must be the removal of Noriega from power. He is a military dictator. Here is a man who is able to actually drive the President of Panama into hiding for, literally, fear of his life. And he is an absolute dictator. Now that is the goal, and we tried to do that with economic measures. They didn't succeed. We are still in a position of negotiating. Our representatives are down there right now. I have to say the process is still going on. There had been no decision reached.

The disagreement, however, over whether we were doing business with a drug dealer or not was based on a rather unusual thing. And that is when lawyers in this country got an indictment against Noriega on the basis of dealing with the drug dealers, they overlooked -- you know, when I say it's unusual, it's unusual that you indict literally the head of another state -- but they overlooked the fact that the Panamanian Constitution makes it impossible to extradite this man in response to the indictment. Well, then you have to say the alternative is that he stays there in power and able to continue his drug trafficking. And if it means quashing an indictment that cannot be enforced, I would suggest that that's not too high a price to pay for getting rid of him.

Mr. President, will you explain some secret of the American mind that is about economy. It is flourishing. It is booming -- this 65 or 66th month [of] uninterrupted expansion, full employment, low inflation, everything looks fine.

The President. I made some remarks about that to an audience just a few days ago in a speech of mine. It's amazing how even much of our media can -- well, I described it like being in a hall of mirrors and coming up with a false image. We announce a figure that we had the highest amount of exports in our history just last week. And how do they get at that? They somehow say, well that, oh, we think inflation is coming back.

We took some practical steps in addition to those regulations that I mentioned. We had a complete overhaul of our tax system. Now, I'm not a genius that thought of this all at once by myself, but I know that if you look back through our history invariably tax reductions have resulted in an increase of revenue for the Government. As a matter of fact, centuries ago there was a man named ibn-Khaldun who said in the beginning of the empire, the rates were low, and the revenue was high. At the end of the empire, the rates were high, and the revenue was low.

Well, it happened. When we got our tax reform, that brought the top bracket in our income tax, for example, down from 70 percent on the people who could earn in that bracket. When we brought that down to -- well, now it's 28 percent. But first, our first move was to bring it down to 50 percent. Well, even that resulted in a great increase in the revenues from that same segment of people. Well, now, this has to mean that those people were so busy at that 70-percent rate in tax shelters that they were seeking, or in just simply not earning any more beyond a certain point because how much was taken away from them, once you made an incentive that they could keep almost three-quarters of every dollar they earned, they started earning more dollars and stopped looking for tax shelters. And the same has been through all of the brackets. That was one of the great features, I think, of our recovery. And then the other was getting government out of the way of the private sector.

Our country, I think, probably leads the world in entrepreneurship. We have created in the last 5 years 16 million new jobs. Now, most of those jobs have been created by new or small businesses -- not the great corporations with their thousands and thousands of employees, but the individual with an idea that goes into business for himself or the individual that's got a few employees and then suddenly he's got 200. Let us say that the bulk of the new jobs were in those industries that employed less than 500 people.

Well, all of this is what has resulted in what the leaders of your countries in our meetings have called the American miracle. And as a matter of fact, many of those leaders have been very frank in saying to me that they would like to be able to remove some of the restrictions and restraints on the private sector, private enterprise in your countries. And we talk about that a great deal, and maybe we're going to see some results elsewhere.

The President. Well, I would like to feel that what I had left will be continued -- the economic policies and the restraints on government. And one other thing, when we came into office, our defense capacity had been so reduced that on any given day 50 percent of our military aircraft could not fly for lack of spare parts, 50 percent of our naval vessels couldn't leave harbor for the same reason or for lack of crew.

Well, we not only did that, but at that time, there was a great wave of feeling across our country that, well, that things weren't the way they used to be, and there was a lack of patriotism. I likened it to the fact that I said I thought the people were ready for a spiritual revival. And I'm pleased to tell you that that has happened, and I get more mail and more people stopping me, if I'm out on a public appearance or something, to tell me that the thing they're grateful for is the renewal of patriotism and feeling about our country.

The President. Well, whether I do that or not, I can assure you, I am -- I've always described it this way: that you know the business that I used to be in, and I've always described that in Hollywood, if you didn't sing or dance, you wound up as an after-dinner speaker. And so, I didn't sing or dance, and I was out on what I -- all my personal appearances were out making public speeches. And I did my own speeches and talked on what I wanted to talk about.

I was making those speeches in those days in Hollywood, the top bracket of the income tax was 90 percent. And I knew what it was like to refuse a good script and not make a picture because I wasn't going to work for 10 cents on the dollar after I'd reached that bracket. So, I can assure you, I'm going to -- there are a lot of things I want to campaign for that still haven't been done.

So, I will be out there addressing the people. In America -- I don't know whether it's true in your countries -- we have a great many private organizations, and there's always a demand for speakers. So, I'll be doing that.

You know that an amendment to the Constitution came about a few years ago that limited the President of the United States to two terms; there cannot be a third. Well, now, I can't object to that while I'm in this job. It would sound like I'm doing it for myself. But as soon as I'm out of here, I'm going to try to arouse the American people to get that constitutional amendment changed, canceled, because I think it's an interference with their democratic rights. They should have the right to vote for whoever they want to vote for, for as long as they want to vote for them. And I'm going to see if I can't arouse the people to get that changed.

Our beautiful land is blessed from sea to shining sea with bountiful natural and cultural resources on Federal, State, and local lands. We are also blessed that the American people possess a unique volunteer spirit rooted in our frontier tradition.

It is truly fitting that we take a special period of time to recognize our Nation's recreational and cultural resources and how they contribute to the economic and social well-being of our communities and our country. Through our stewardship of these natural wonders and great monuments to history, we can express our love for our country, our pride in America, and our desire to preserve our resources and our heritage for the future.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fifth day of May, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

My fellow Americans and all our Ambassadors of our friends and allies who are here: On the eve of my first meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev in 1985, I told you that my mission, simply stated, was a mission for freedom and peace.

I wanted to sit down across the table from Mr. Gorbachev and try to set out with him a basis for peaceful discourse and cooperation between our two countries, at the same time working to advance the cause and frontiers of human freedom. As I approached that first meeting in Geneva, I wanted to establish a better working relationship with the Soviet Union -- one no longer subject to the dangerous highs and lows of the past; a working relationship that would be based on realities, not merely on a seeming relaxation of tensions between our two countries that could quickly disappear. To accomplish that, the United States needed to see solid and steady progress in four major areas: human rights, regional conflicts, arms reductions, and bilateral exchanges. Well, we've come a long way since then.

Now, as I depart on this trip to Moscow, fulfilling the agreement I made with General Secretary Gorbachev back in 1985 that we would visit each other's country, I can point to achievements we can all be proud of in each of the areas of our four-part agenda. The United States and the Soviet Union have signed the Geneva accords providing for the withdrawal of all Soviet troops from Afghanistan, and the first withdrawals have begun. We have signed an arms reduction treaty that will reduce the level of nuclear arms for the first time in history, eliminating an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles. We've made progress on the main points of a treaty that will cut in half our arsenals of strategic offensive nuclear weapons. Our new nuclear risk reduction centers are already transmitting messages that reduce the risk of conflict.

Our representatives have held broad-ranging discussions on human rights, and we've seen concrete steps taken. The levels of emigration have risen. Some political and religious prisoners have been released, and a number of divided families have been reunited. Somewhat more diversity of expression is permitted. There has been a recognition of religious persecution in the past and a pledge that some restrictions on the right to worship will be eased.

We have greatly expanded our bilateral exchanges. The number of travelers between our two countries is rising sharply, with unprecedented totals expected this year. There's more, of course, but I'd miss my plane if I went through the entire list. [Laughter] And yet impressive as these achievements may be, they represent only a beginning.

On human rights, I will press to see that the positive trends I've mentioned continue and the reforms are made permanent. We certainly welcome the recent signs of Soviet progress toward greater freedom of religion, greater freedom of speech, greater freedom of movement. There have been indications that this progress may be written into Soviet law and regulations so that it can be a more permanent part of Soviet life. We will be doing all we can to encourage just that.

Concerning regional conflicts, we'll be looking for Soviet actions to help advance negotiations on the Angola and Namibia problems and to support U.N. efforts to end the Iran-Iraq war. We will ask the Soviets to use their influence with the Ethiopian Government to prevent a manmade crisis of starvation there. We'll urge the Soviets to help move the Middle East peace process closer to a just and lasting solution. And we'll look for ways to help the parties resolve other regional conflicts in Africa, Asia, and, yes, Central America.

Regarding arms reductions, we'll strive to resolve the issues that still stand in the way of our agreement to cut U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive nuclear arms in half. As we make progress, our negotiators will be able to move forward in their work on the draft START treaty. We'll continue to seek ways to improve the verification procedures of two existing treaties on nuclear testing -- the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions treaty and the Threshold Test Ban treaty -- so that those treaties can be ratified. And I will urge the Soviets to move ahead at the Vienna followup meeting of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe. At these discussions, negotiators from 35 nations are working on ways to advance human rights and strengthen the confidence- and security-building measures they negotiated at Stockholm in 1986. Separately, the 23 members of the Atlantic alliance and Warsaw Pact are negotiating a mandate for new talks on conventional forces. Success here means the Soviets must make continued progress on human rights, for the security in Europe involves much more than military arrangements. It must be based on a solid foundation of respect for the rights of individuals.

Concerning the final portion of our four-part agenda, our bilateral relations, we will address both new agreements and renewals of existing agreements to extend the areas in which we cooperate. This will include everything from practical matters of nuclear safety to radio navigation and the protection of our global environment.

So, as you see from the outline of that agenda, there will be plenty of work for Mr. Gorbachev and me in Moscow next week. I don't expect it to be easy. We may have many differences, deep differences, moral differences, but we're still fellow human beings. We can still work together to keep the peace. And in working with the Soviet Union, the United States can still remain true to its mission of expanding liberty throughout the world.

Since my first meeting with Mr. Gorbachev, we have, as I've said, come a long way. My task next week will be to go still farther -- farther in the interests of peace, farther toward a universal respect for fundamental human rights, farther toward world freedom, and farther toward a safer world for all people. And now, as I embark upon this great task, I ask for your prayers. Thank you, and God bless you all.

Both reflection and action are already taking place around our land in neighborhoods where residents, business owners, concerned citizens, community groups, and government agencies are turning decay and despair into promise and prosperity.

They are using some of the most powerful sources of America's greatness -- our volunteer spirit, our spiritual strength, the love and caring of our families, our hard work and determination, our civic energy -- to create opportunities and bring renewed inspiration and hope.

Among them are the groups from which this week of observance takes its name. NeighborWorks is a national organization composed of Neighborhood Housing Services (NHS), Apartment Improvement Programs, and Mutual Housing Associations, cooperative ventures that are resident-business-government partnerships relying primarily on volunteer effort and private and local resources. They are revitalizing more than 200 neighborhoods and have generated more than $4 billion in reinvestment funds.

President, Mr. Speaker, Mr. Prime Minister, and ladies and gentlemen, let me begin by saying thank you to our hosts, the Finnish Government, the Paasikivi Society, and the League of Finnish-American Societies. It's a particular honor for me to come here today. This year -- the Year of Friendship, as Congress has proclaimed it, between the United States and Finland -- this year marks the 350th anniversary of the arrival of the first Finns in America and the establishment of a small Scandinavian colony near what is today Wilmington, Delaware -- an ancient people in a new world.

Yes, they founded a new world, but as they crossed the oceans, the mountains, and the prairies, those who made America carried the old world in their hearts -- the old customs, the family ties, and most of all the belief in God, a belief that gave them the moral compass and ethical foundation by which they explored an uncharted frontier and constructed a government and nation of, by, and for the people.

And so, although we Americans became a new people, we also remain an ancient one, for we're guided by ancient and universal values, values that Prime Minister Holkeri spoke of in Los Angeles this February when, after recalling Finland's internationally recognized position of neutrality, he added that Finland is ``tied to Western values of freedom, democracy, and human rights.'' And let me add here, that for America those ties are also the bonds of our friendship. America respects Finland's neutrality. We support Finland's independence. We honor Finland's courageous history.

We're gathered here today in this hall because it was here, almost 13 years ago, that the 35 nations of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe signed the Helsinki Final Act, a document that embodies the same ethical and moral principles and the same hope for a future of peace that Finns and so many other European immigrants gave America. The Final Act is a singular statement of hope. Its ``three baskets'' touch on almost every aspect of East-West relations, and taken together form a kind of map through the wilderness of mutual hostility to open fields of peace and to a common home of trust among all of our sovereign nations -- neutrals, nonaligned, and alliance members alike. The Final Act sets new standards of conduct for our nations and provided the mechanisms by which to apply those standards.

And beyond establishing these integrated standards, the Final Act establishes a process for progress. It sets up a review procedure to measure performance against standards. And despite the doubts of the critics -- for the past 13 years, the signatory states have mustered the political will to keep on working and making progress.

Let me say that it seems particularly appropriate to me that the Final Act is associated so closely with this city and this country. More than any other diplomatic document, the Final Act speaks to the yearning that Finland's longtime President, Urho Kekkonen, spoke of more than a quarter century ago when he said, in his words: ``It's the fervent hope of the Finnish people that barriers be lowered all over Europe and that progress be made along the road of European unity.'' And he added that this was, as he put it, ``for the good of Europe, and thus of humanity as a whole.'' Well, those were visionary words. That vision inspired and shaped the drafting of the Final Act and continues to guide us today.

Many say it hasn't, but I believe it has. In the security field, I would point to the most recent fruit of the process: the Stockholm document of confidence- and security-building measures in Europe. This agreement lays down the rules by which our 35 states notify each other of upcoming military activities in Europe; provides detailed information on these activities in advance; and lets the others know their plans for very large military activities 1 or 2 years in advance and agrees not to hold such maneuvers unless this notice is given; invites observers to their larger military activities; and permits on-site inspections to make sure the agreement is honored.

I am happy to note that since our representatives shook hands to seal this agreement a year and a half ago, all 35 states have, by and large, honored both the letter and the spirit of the Stockholm document. The Western and neutral and nonaligned states have set a strong example in providing full information about their military activities. In April, Finland held its first military activity subject to the Stockholm notification requirements and voluntarily invited observers to it. The Soviet Union and its allies also have a generally good record of implementation, though less forthcoming than the West. Ten on-site inspections have been conducted so far, and more and more states are exercising their right to make such inspections. I can't help but believe that making inspections a matter of routine business will improve openness and enhance confidence.

In Vienna all 35 signatory states are considering how to strengthen the confidence- and security-building measures in the context of a balanced outcome at the CSCE followup meeting that includes significant progress on human rights. In the economic field, as in the security field, I believe there has been progress, but of a different kind. Issues and negotiations regarding security are not simple, but military technology makes arms and armies resemble each other enough so that common measures can be confidently applied. Economic relations, by contrast, are bedeviled by differences in our systems. Perhaps increases in nonstrategic trade can contribute to better relations between East and West, but it's difficult to relate the state-run economies of the East to the essentially free-market economies of the West. Perhaps some of the changes underway in the state-run economies will equip them better to deal with our businessmen and open new arenas for cooperation. But our work on these issues over the years has already made us understand that differences in systems are serious obstacles to expansion of economic ties, and since understanding of unpleasant realities is part of wisdom, that, too, is progress.

The changes taking place in the Eastern countries of the continent go beyond changes in their economic systems and greater openness in their military activities. Changes have also begun to occur in the field of human rights, as was called for in the Final Act. The rest of us would like to see the changes that are being announced actually registered in the law and practice of our Eastern partners and in the documents under negotiation in the Vienna followup to the Helsinki conference.

Much has been said about the human rights and humanitarian provisions in the Final Act and the failure of the Eastern bloc to honor them. Yet for all the bleak winds that have swept the plains of justice since that signing day in 1975, the accords have taken root in the conscience of humanity and grown in moral and, increasingly, in diplomatic authority. I believe that this is no accident. It reflects an increasing realization that the agenda of East-West relations must be comprehensive, that security and human rights must be advanced together or cannot truly be secured at all. But it also shows that the provisions in the Final Act reflect standards that are truly universal in their scope. The accords embody a fundamental truth, a truth that gathers strength with each passing season and that will not be denied -- the truth that, like the first Finnish settlers in America, all our ancient peoples find themselves today in a new world and that, as those early settlers discovered, the greatest creative and moral force in this new world, the greatest hope for survival and success, for peace and happiness, is human freedom.

Yes, freedom -- the right to speak, to print; the right to worship, to travel, to assemble; the right to be different, the right, as the American philosopher Henry David Thoreau wrote, ``to step to the music of a different drummer'' -- this is freedom as most Europeans and Americans understand it and freedom as it is embodied in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and, yes, in the Helsinki accords. And far more than the locomotive or the automobile, the airplane or the rocket, more than radio, television, or the computer, this concept of liberty is the most distinct, peculiar, and powerful invention of the civilization we all share.

Indeed, without this freedom there would have been no mechanical inventions, for inventions are eccentricities. The men and women who create them are visionaries, just like artists and writers. They see what others fail to see and trust their insights when others don't. The same freedom that permits literature and the arts to flourish; the same freedom that allows one to attend church, synagogue, or mosque without apprehension; that same freedom from oppression and supervision is the freedom that has given us, the peoples of Western Europe and North America, our dynamism, our economic growth, and our inventiveness. Together with Japan and Australia and many others, we have lived in this state of freedom, this house of democracy, since the end of the Second World War.

The house of democracy is a house whose doors are open to all. Because of it, because of the liberty and popular rule we've shared, today we also share a prosperity more widely distributed and extensive, a political order more tolerant and humane than has ever before been known on Earth. To see not simply the immediate but the historic importance of this, we should remember how far many of our nations have traveled and how desolate the future of freedom and democracy once seemed. For much of this century, the totalitarian temptation, in one form or another, has beckoned to mankind, also promising freedom, but of a different kind than the one we celebrate today.

This concept of liberty is, as the Czechoslovak writer Milan Kundera has put it, ``the age-old dream of a world where everybody would live in harmony, united by a single common will and faith, without secrets from one another'' -- the freedom of imposed perfection.

Fifty, forty, even as recently as thirty years ago, the contest between this utopian concept of freedom on one hand and the democratic concept of freedom on the other seemed a close one. Promises of a perfect world lured many Western thinkers and millions of others besides. And many believed in the confident prediction of history's inevitable triumph. Well, few do today. Just as democratic freedom has proven itself incredibly fertile -- fertile not merely in a material sense but also in the abundance it has brought forth in the human spirit -- so, too, utopianism has proven brutal and barren.

Urals today? In Western Europe, support for utopian ideologies, including support among intellectuals, has all but collapsed, while in the nondemocratic countries, leaders grapple with the internal contradictions of their system and some ask how they can make that system better and more productive. In a sense, the front line in the competition of ideas that has played in Europe and America for more than 70 years has shifted East. Once it was the democracies that doubted their own view of freedom and wondered whether utopian systems might not be better. Today the doubt is on the other side.

Yes, as does the Final Act, we will discuss security issues. We will pursue progress in arms reduction negotiations across the board and continue our exchanges on regional issues. Yes, we will also discuss economic issues, although, as in the Helsinki process, we have seen in recent years how much the differences in our systems inhibit expanded ties and how difficult it is to divorce economic relations from human rights and other elements of that relationship. And, yes, as our countries did at Helsinki, we will take up other bilateral areas as well, including scientific, cultural, and people-to-people exchanges, where we've been hard at work identifying new ways to cooperate. In this area, in particular, I believe we'll see some good results before the week is over.

And like the Final Act, our agenda now includes human rights as an integral component. We have developed our dialog and put in place new mechanisms for discussion. The General Secretary has spoken often and forthrightly on the problems confronting the Soviet Union. In his campaign to address these shortcomings, he talks of glasnost and perestroika, openness and restructuring, words that to our ears have a particularly welcome sound. And since he began his campaign, things have happened that all of us applaud. The list includes the release from labor camps or exile of people like Andrei Sakharov, Irina Ratushinskaya, Anatoly Koryagin, Josef Begun, and many other prisoners of conscience; the publication of books like ``Dr. Zhivago'' and ``Children of the Arbat''; the distribution of movies like ``Repentance'' that are critical of aspects of the Soviet past and present; allowing higher levels of emigration; greater toleration of dissent; General Secretary Gorbachev's recent statements on religious toleration; the beginning of Soviet withdrawal from Afghanistan.

All this is new and good. But at the same time, there is another list, defined not by us but by the standards of the Helsinki Final Act and the sovereign choice of all participants, including the Soviet Union, to subscribe to it. We need look no further through the Final Act to see where Soviet practice does not -- or does not yet -- measure up to Soviet commitment. Thirteen years after the Final Act was signed, it's difficult to understand why cases of divided families and blocked marriages should remain on the East-West agenda or why Soviet citizens who wish to exercise their right to emigrate should be subject to artificial quotas and arbitrary rulings. And what are we to think of the continued suppression of those who wish to practice their religious beliefs?

Over 300 men and women whom the world sees as political prisoners have been released. There remains no reason why the Soviet Union cannot release all people still in jail for expression of political or religious belief, or for organizing to monitor the Helsinki Act.

Soviets talk about a ``common European home'' and define it largely in terms of geography. But what is it that cements the structure of clear purpose that all our nations pledged themselves to build by their signature of the Final Act?

What is it but the belief in the inalienable rights and dignity of every single human being? What is it but a commitment to true pluralist democracy? What is it but a dedication to the universally understood democratic concept of liberty that evolved from the genius of European civilization? This body of values -- this is what marks, or should mark, the common European home.

Well, I join him in this belief and welcome every sign that the Soviets and their allies are ready not only to embrace but to put into practice the values that unify and, indeed, define contemporary Western European civilization and its grateful American offspring.

There are a number of steps, which, if taken, would help ensure the deepening and institutionalization of promising reforms. First, the Soviet leaders could agree to tear down the Berlin Wall and all barriers between Eastern and Western Europe. They could join us in making Berlin itself an all-European center of communications, meetings, and travel. They could also give legal and practical protection to free expression and worship. Let me interject here that at one time Moscow was known as the City of the Forty Forties because there were 1,600 belfries in the churches of the city. The world welcomes the return of some churches to worship after many years, but there are still relatively few functioning churches and almost no bells.

Mr. Gorbachev recently said, as he put it, ``Believers are Soviet people, workers, patriots, and they have the full right to express their conviction with dignity.'' Well, I applaud Mr. Gorbachev's statement. What a magnificent demonstration of good will it would be for the Soviet leadership for church bells to ring out again not only in Moscow but throughout the Soviet Union.

But beyond these particular steps, there's a deeper question. How can the countries of the East not only grant but guarantee the protection of rights? The thought and practice of centuries has pointed the way. As the French constitutional philosopher Montesquieu wrote more than 200 years ago, ``There is no liberty if the judiciary power be not separated'' from the other powers of government. And like the complete independence of the judiciary, popular control over those who make the laws provides a vital, practical guarantee of human rights. So does the secret ballot. So does the freedom of citizens to associate and act for political purposes or for free collective bargaining.

I know that for the Eastern countries such steps are difficult, and some may say it's unrealistic to call for them. Some said in 1975 that the standards set forth in the Final Act were unrealistic, that the comprehensive agenda it embodied was unrealistic. Some said, earlier in this decade, that calling for global elimination of an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missiles was unrealistic, that calling for 50-percent reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive arms was unrealistic, that the Soviets would never withdraw from Afghanistan. Well, is it realistic to pretend that rights are truly protected when there are no effective safeguards against arbitrary rule? Is it realistic, when the Soviet leadership itself is calling for glasnost and democratization, to say that judicial guarantees or the independence of the judiciary or popular control over those who draft the laws or freedom to associate for political purposes are unrealistic?

We in the West will remain firm in our values, strong and vigilant in defense of our interests, ready to negotiate honestly for results of mutual and universal benefit. One lesson we drew again from the events leading up to the Intermediate-range Nuclear Forces treaty was that, in the world as it is today, peace truly does depend on Western strength and resolve. It is a lesson we will continue to heed.

I believe that in Moscow Mr. Gorbachev and I can take another step toward a brighter future and a safer world. And I believe that, for the sake of all our ancient peoples, this new world must be a place both of democratic freedom and of peace. It must be a world in which the spirit of the Helsinki Final Act guides all our countries like a great beacon of hope to all mankind for ages to come.

I am very pleased with the action of the United States Senate in consenting to ratification of the INF treaty. In 2 days, I will arrive in the Soviet Union to meet with General Secretary Gorbachev to discuss our four-part agenda. Today's action by the Senate clearly shows support for our arms reduction objectives.

I want to express my appreciation for the leadership demonstrated by Majority Leader Bob Byrd and Republican leader Bob Dole in securing the timely approval of this treaty. I have invited them to join me for the exchange of ratification documents in Moscow.

I continue to have concerns about the constitutionality of some provisions of the resolution of ratification, particularly those dealing with interpretation, and I will communicate with the Senate on these matters in due course.

I learned that my good friend John Duncan has announced that he will not run for reelection to the House of Representatives from the Second District of Tennessee. John was first elected to the House in 1964 to the seat held by Howard Baker's father and then his mother. John's service in the succeeding decades has demonstrated the highest dedication and commitment to the well-being of the Nation and his beloved State of Tennessee. In recent years, his leadership as ranking Republican on the House Ways and Means Committee has proved critical to ensuring fiscal responsibility in the Federal Government.

As this pretaped broadcast reaches you, I'm in Helsinki, Finland, on my way to the Soviet Union, where I arrive on Sunday. When I meet in the coming days with Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev, it will be our fourth set of face-to-face talks in 3 years. Through our conversations, U.S.-Soviet relations have moved forward on the basis of frankness and realism. This relationship has not rested on any single issue, but has been built on a sturdy four-part agenda that includes human rights, regional conflicts, arms reduction, and bilateral exchanges. What has been achieved in this brief span of time offers great hope for a brighter future and a safer world.

Western firmness and resolve, we concluded the historic INF treaty that provides for the global elimination of an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missiles. Soviet armed forces are now withdrawing from Afghanistan, an historic event that should lead finally to peace, self-determination, and healing for that long-suffering people and to an independent and undivided Afghan nation.

It is also encouraging to hear General Secretary Gorbachev speak forthrightly about glasnost and perestroika -- openness and restructuring in the Soviet Union -- words that to Western ears have a particularly welcome sound. And since he began his campaign, we can list developments that the free world heartily applauds. We've seen many well-known prisoners of conscience released from harsh labor camps or strict internal exile, courageous people like Josif Begun and Andrei Sakharov. Soviet authorities have permitted the publication of books like ``Dr. Zhivago'' and the distribution of movies such as ``Repentance'' that are critical of aspects of the Soviet past and present. Greater emigration has been allowed.

All this is new and good, but at the same time, there's another list that the West cannot ignore. While there are improvements, the basic structure of the system has not changed in the Soviet Union or in Eastern Europe, and there remain significant violations of human rights and freedoms. In Asia, Africa, and Central America, unpopular regimes use Soviet arms to oppress their own people and commit aggression against neighboring states. These regional conflicts extract a terrible toll of suffering and threaten to draw the United States and the Soviet Union into direct confrontation.

These and related concerns will be at the top of my agenda in the days ahead. I shall say, among other things, that the Soviet Union should fully honor the Helsinki accords. In view of that document, signed in Helsinki in 1975, it is difficult to understand why almost 13 years later cases of divided families and blocked marriages should remain on the East-West agenda or why Soviet citizens who wish by right to emigrate should not be able to do so. And there are other issues: the recognition of those who wish to practice their religious beliefs and the release of all prisoners of conscience.

In working for a safer world and a brighter future for all people, we know arms agreements alone will not make the world safer; we must also reduce the reasons for having arms. As I said to General Secretary Gorbachev when we first met in 1985, we do not mistrust each other because we're armed; we're armed because we mistrust each other. History has taught us that it is not weapons that cause war but the nature and conduct of the Governments that wield the weapons. So, when we encourage Soviet reforms, it is with the knowledge that democracy not only guarantees human rights but also helps prevent war and, in truth, is a form of arms control. So, really, our whole agenda has one purpose: to protect peace, freedom, and life itself.

We would like to see positive changes in the U.S.S.R. institutionalized so that they'll become lasting features of Soviet society. And I would like to see more Soviet young people come here to experience and learn from our society. And that's why we're ready to work with the Soviets, to praise and criticize and work for greater contact and for change because that is the path to lasting peace, greater freedom, and a safer world.

Now, on this return trip, you, Mr. President, have traversed the great distance that lies between our two capitals to continue our political dialog. This is a fact we duly appreciate. As this is our fourth meeting, we can already make some meaningful assessments. As we see it, long-held dislikes have been weakened; habitual stereotypes stemming from enemy images have been shaken loose. The human features of the other nation are now more clearly visible. This in itself is important, for at the turn of the two millenniums, history has objectively bound our two countries by a common responsibility for the destinies of mankind. The peoples of the world and, in the first place, the Soviet and the American people welcome the emerging positive changes in our relationship and hope that your visit and talks here will be productive, providing a fresh impetus in all areas of dialog and interaction between our two great nations.

You and I are conscious of our two peoples' longing for mutual understanding, cooperation, and a safe and stable world. This makes it incumbent upon us to discuss constructively the main aspects of disarmament: the set of issues related to 50-percent cuts in strategic offensive arms, while preserving the 1972 ABM treaty; problems of eliminating chemical weapons; reductions in armed forces and conventional armaments in Europe; cessation of nuclear testing. The world is also looking to us, Mr. President, for responsible judgments on other complex issues of today, such as the settlement of regional conflicts; improving international economic relations; promoting development; overcoming backwardness, poverty, and mass diseases; and humanitarian problems.

And of course, we shall discuss bilateral relations. Our previous meetings have shown that constructive Soviet-U.S. relations are possible. The treaty on intermediate and shorter range missiles is the most impressive symbol of that.

But even more complex and important tasks lie ahead. And so, Mr. President, you and I still have a lot of work to do. And it is good when there is a lot of work to be done and people need that work. We are ready to do our utmost in these coming days in Moscow.

President, you and Mrs. Reagan are here on your first visit to the Soviet Union, a country which you have so often mentioned in your public statements. Aware of your interest in Russian proverbs, let me add another one to your collection: ``It is better to see once than to hear a hundred times.'' Let me assure you that you can look forward to hospitality, warmth, and good will. You will have many meetings with Soviet people. They have a centuries-old history behind them. They love their land and take pride in their accomplishments. They resent things that are presently standing in their way, and they are heatedly discussing how their country can best progress. They are full of plans for the future.

Being ardent patriots, Soviet people are open to friendship and cooperation with all nations. They harbor sincere respect for the American people and want good relations with your country. Here, within the walls of the ancient Kremlin, where one feels the touch of history, people are moved to reflect over the diversity and greatness of human civilization. So, may this give greater historical depth to the Soviet-American talks to be held here, infusing them with a sense of mankind's shared destinies. Once again, I bid you welcome.

Mrs. Gorbachev: Mr. General Secretary, thank you for those kind words of welcome. We've traveled a long road together to reach this moment -- from our first meeting in Geneva in November, 1985, when I invited you to visit me in Washington and you invited me to Moscow. It was cold that day in Geneva, and even colder in Reykjavik when we met the following year to work on the preparations for our exchange of visits. We've faced great obstacles; but by the time of your visit to Washington last December, although we still had to grapple with difficult issues, we had achieved impressive progress in all the areas of our common agenda -- human rights, regional issues, arms reduction, and our bilateral relations.

We signed a treaty that will reduce the level of nuclear arms for the first time in history by eliminating an entire class of U.S. and Soviet independent [intermediate-] range missiles. We agreed on the main points of a treaty that will cut in half our arsenals of strategic offensive nuclear arms. We agreed to conduct a joint experiment that would allow us to develop effective ways to verify limits on nuclear testing. We held full and frank discussions that planted the seeds for future progress.

It is almost summer; and some of those seeds are beginning to bear fruit, thanks to the hard work we have both done since our last meeting, including monthly meetings by our Foreign Ministers and the first meeting of our Defense Ministers. We have signed the Geneva accords, providing for the withdrawal of all Soviet troops from Afghanistan, and the first withdrawals have begun. We and our allies have completed technical arrangements necessary to begin implementing the INF treaty as soon as it enters into force. For the next major step in arms control, reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive arsenals, our negotiators in Geneva have produced hundreds of pages of joint, draft treaty text recording our areas of agreement, as well as those issues yet to be resolved. Our new nuclear risk reduction centers have begun their transmissions of routine notifications to reduce the risk of conflict. Our scientists are installing the equipment for our joint experiment to verify limits on nuclear testing. Our experts have held broad-ranging discussions on human rights, and important steps have been taken in that area.

We have greatly expanded our bilateral exchanges since we signed our agreement in 1985. I hope you'll agree with me that more of our young people need to participate in these exchanges, which can do so much to lay the basis for greater mutual understanding in the next generation.

But I think the message is clear: Despite clear and fundamental differences, and despite the inevitable frustrations that we have encountered, our work has begun to produce results. In the past, Mr. General Secretary, you've taken note of my liking for Russian proverbs. And in order not to disappoint anyone on this visit, I thought I would mention a literary saying from your past, another example of your people's succinct wisdom: Rodilsiya ne toropilsiya -- It was born, it wasn't rushed.

General Secretary, we did not rush. We have taken our work step by step. And I have come here to continue that work. We both know it will not be easy. We both know that there are tremendous hurdles yet to be overcome. But we also know that it can be done because we share a common goal: strengthening the framework we have already begun to build for a relationship that we can sustain over the long term, a relationship that will bring genuine benefits to our own peoples and to the world.

It's a very great pleasure to visit this beautiful monastery and to have a chance to meet some of the people who have helped make its return to the Russian Orthodox Church a reality. I am also addressing in spirit the 35 million believers whose personal contributions made this magnificent restoration possible.

It's been said that an icon is a window between heaven and Earth through which the believing eye can peer into the beyond. One cannot look at the magnificent icons created, and recreated here under the direction of Father Zinon, without experiencing the deep faith that lives in the hearts of the people of this land. Like the saints and martyrs depicted in these icons, the faith of your people has been tested and tempered in the crucible of hardship. But in that suffering, it has grown strong, ready now to embrace with new hope the beginnings of a second Christian millennium.

We in our country share this hope for a new age of religious freedom in the Soviet Union. We share the hope that this monastery is not an end in itself but the symbol of a new policy of religious tolerance that will extend to all peoples of all faiths. We pray that the return of this monastery signals a willingness to return to believers the thousands of other houses of worship which are now closed, boarded up, or used for secular purposes.

Protestant, Catholic, Jewish, Orthodox, and Islamic. They are united with believers in this country in many ways, especially in prayer. Our people feel it keenly when religious freedom is denied to anyone anywhere and hope with you that soon all the many Soviet religious communities that are now prevented from registering, or are banned altogether, including the Ukrainian Catholic and Orthodox Churches, will soon be able to practice their religion freely and openly and instruct their children in and outside the home in the fundamentals of their faith. We don't know if this first thaw will be followed by a resurgent spring of religious liberty -- we don't know, but we may hope. We may hope that perestroika will be accompanied by a deeper restructuring, a deeper conversion, a mentanoya, a change in heart, and that glasnost, which means giving voice, will also let loose a new chorus of belief, singing praise to the God that gave us life.

In our prayers we may keep that image in mind: the thought that the bells may ring again, sounding throughout Moscow and across the countryside, clamoring for joy in their new-found freedom. Well, I've talked long enough. I'm sure you have many questions and many things on your minds, and I'm anxious to hear what you have to say.

Well, thank you all, and welcome to Spaso House. After the discussions we've just had I thought it might be appropriate for me to begin by letting you know why I so wanted this meeting to take place. You see, I wanted to convey to you that you have the prayers and support of the American people, indeed of people throughout the world. I wanted to convey this support to you that you might in turn convey it to others so that all those working for human rights throughout this vast land, from the Urals to Kamchatka, from the Laptev Sea to the Caspian, might be encouraged and take heart.

In one capacity, of course, I speak as a head of government. The United States views human rights as fundamental, absolutely fundamental to our relationship with the Soviet Union and all nations. From the outset of our administration, we've stressed that an essential element in improving relations between the United States and the Soviet Union is human rights and Soviet compliance with international covenants on human rights. There have been hopeful signs; indeed, I believe this a hopeful time for your nation.

Over the past 3 years more than 300 political and religious prisoners have been released from labor camps. Fewer dissidents and believers have been put in prisons and mental hospitals. And in recent months, more people have been permitted to emigrate or reunite with their families. The United States applauds these changes, yet the basic standards that the Soviet Union agreed to almost 13 years ago in the Helsinki accords, or a generation ago in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, still need to be met. If I may, I'd like to share with you the main aims of our human rights agenda during this summit meeting here in Moscow.

Freedom of religion -- in the words of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, ``Everyone has the right to freedom of thought, conscience, and religion.'' I'm hopeful the Soviet Government will permit all the peoples of the Soviet Union to worship their creator as they themselves see fit, in liberty.

Freedom of speech -- again in the words of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, ``Everyone has the right to freedom of opinion and expression.'' It is my fervent hope for you and your country that there will soon come a day when no one need fear prison for offenses that involve nothing more than the spoken or written word.

Freedom of travel -- I've told the General Secretary how heartened we are that during the past year the number of those permitted to emigrate has risen. We're encouraged as well that the number of those permitted to leave for short trips, often family visits, has gone up. And yet the words of the Universal Declaration go beyond these steps: ``Everyone has the right to leave any country, including his own, and to return to his own country.'' It is our hope that soon there will be complete freedom of travel.

In particular, I've noted in my talks here the many who have been denied the right to emigrate on the grounds that they held secret knowledge, even though their secret work had ended years before and their so-called secrets had long since become either public knowledge or obsolete.

The new Soviet leaders appear to grasp the connection between certain freedoms and economic growth. The freedom to keep the fruits of one's own labor, for example, is a freedom that the present reforms seem to be enlarging. We hope that one freedom will lead to another and another; that the Soviet Government will understand that it is the individual who is always the source of economic creativity, the inquiring mind that produces a technical breakthrough, the imagination that conceives of new products and markets; and that in order for the individual to create, he must have a sense of just that -- his own individuality, his own self-worth. He must sense that others respect him and, yes, that his nation respects him -- respects him enough to grant him all his human rights. This, as I said, is our hope; yet whatever the future may bring, the commitment of the United States will nevertheless remain unshakable on human rights. On the fundamental dignity of the human person, there can be no relenting, for now we must work for more, always more.

Yet I already know it is you who have strengthened me, you who have given me a message to carry back. While we press for human rights through diplomatic channels, you press with your very lives, day in, day out, year after year, risking your jobs, your homes, your all.

Sometimes when I'm faced with an unbeliever, an atheist, I am tempted to invite him to the greatest gourmet dinner that one could ever serve and, when we finished eating that magnificent dinner, to ask him if he believes there's a cook. Thank you all, and God bless you.

The General Secretary. Esteemed Mr. President, esteemed Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen, comrades, I welcome you in the Moscow Kremlin. For five centuries, it has been the site of events that constituted milestones in the life of our state. Decisions crucial to the fate of our nation were made here. The very environment around us is a call for responsibility to our times and contemporaries, to the present and to the future.

It is here that we wish to emphasize the importance of the newly discovered truth that it is no longer possible to settle international disputes by force of arms. Our awareness of the realities of the present-day world has led us to that conclusion. I like the notion of realism, and I also like the fact that you, Mr. President, have lately been uttering it more and more often.

Normal and, indeed, durable Soviet-American relations, which so powerfully affect the world's political climate, are only conceivable within the framework of realism. Thanks to realism, for all our differences, we have succeeded in arriving at a joint conclusion which, though very simple, is of historic importance: A nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. Other conclusions follow with inexorable logic. One of them is whether there is any need for weaponry which cannot be used without destroying ourselves and, indeed, all of mankind. I believe the realization of this became Reykjavik's pivotal idea.

Warsaw treaty allies firmly adhere to this position. This is our powerful support in all matters related to nuclear disarmament. They have given the Soviet leadership a clear mandate to negotiate radical nuclear arms limitations and reductions with the United States. My talks with leaders of Socialist countries and with authoritative representatives of other nations make it clear to me that there is a common desire to overcome military confrontation and to end the race in both nuclear and conventional arms.

To this, it should be added that a realistic approach is making a way for itself in all directions and on all continents. And the idea of resolving today's problems solely by political means is gaining increasing authority. There is an ever-broadening desire of the most diverse political and social forces for dialog, for exchanges, for better knowledge of each other, and for mutual understanding. If this is indeed so, if this is the will of the peoples, an effort is needed to ensure that the stocks of the ferment of realistic policies keep growing and never run out. For that, it is essential to understand each other better, to take into account the specific features of life in various countries, the historical conditions that shape them, and the choice made by their peoples.

How very true. Let me just add that seeking to resolve differences should not mean an end to being different. The diversity of the world is a powerful wellspring of mutual enrichment, both spiritual and material.

Ladies and gentlemen, comrades, the word perestroika does not sound anachronistic, even within these ancient walls, for renewal of society, humanization of life, and elevated ideals are -- at all times and everywhere -- in the interests of the people and of each individual. And when this happens, especially in a great country, it is important to understand the meaning of what it is going through.

It is this desire to understand the Soviet Union that we are now seeing abroad. And we regard this as a good sign because we do want to be understood correctly. This is also important for civilized international relations.

We see ourselves even more convinced that our Socialist choice was correct, and we cannot conceive of our country developing without socialism -- based on any other fundamental values. Our program is more democracy, more glasnost, more social justice with full prosperity and high moral standards. Our goal is maximum freedom for man, for the individual, and for society. Internationally, we see ourselves as part of an integral civilization, where each has the right to a social and political choice, to a worthy and equal place within the community of nations.

On issues of peace and progress, we believe in the primacy of universal human values and regard the preservation of peace as the top priority. And that is why we advocate the establishment of a comprehensive system of international security as a condition for the survival of mankind. Linked with this is also our desire to revive and enhance the role of the United Nations on the basis of the original goals, which the Soviet Union and the United States, together with their allies, enshrined in the charter of that organization. Its very name is symbolic: the United Nations -- united in their determination to prevent new tragedies of war, to banish war from international relations, and to affirm just principles securing a worthy life for any nation, whether large or small, strong or weak, rich or poor.

We want to build contacts among people in all forums, to expand and improve the quality of information, and to develop ties in the spheres of science, culture, education, sports, and any other human endeavor. But this should be done without interfering in domestic affairs, without sermonizing or imposing one's views and ways, without turning family or personal problems into a pretext for confrontation between states. In short, our time offers great scope for action in the humanitarian field. Nations should understand each other better, know the truth about each other, and free themselves from bias and prejudice.

As far as we know, most Americans, just like us, want to get rid of the demon of nuclear war; but they, just like us, just like all people on Earth, are becoming increasingly concerned over the risk of environmental disaster. Such a risk can only be averted if we act together. Increasingly urgent is the truly global problem of the economic state of the world -- in the North and South, in the West and East of this planet. The economic foundation of civilization will be destroyed unless a way is found to put an end to the squandering of funds and resources for war and destruction, unless the problem of debt is settled and world finances are stabilized, unless the world market becomes truly worldwide by incorporating all states and nations on an equal footing.

It is across this spectrum of issues that we approach international affairs and, of course, our relations with the United States of America. We are motivated by an awareness of the realities and imperatives of the nuclear and space age, the age of sweeping technological revolution when the human race has turned out to be both omnipotent and mortal. It was this awareness that engendered the new thinking, which has made possible a conceptual and practical breakthrough in relations between us as well.

President, this meeting, while taking stock of a fundamentally important period in Soviet-American relations, has to consolidate our achievements and give new impetus for the future. Never before have nuclear missiles been destroyed. Now we have an unprecedented treaty, and our two countries will be performing for the first time ever this overture of nuclear disarmament. The performance has to be flawless.

Union and the United States are acting as guarantors of the Afghan political settlement. This, too, is a precedent of tremendous importance. As guarantors, our two countries face a very responsible period, and we hope they both will go through it in a befitting manner. The whole world is watching to see how we are going to act in this situation.

Our main task continues to be the working out of an agreement on 50-percent reductions in strategic offensive arms while observing the ABM treaty. In our talks today, you and I devoted a lot of attention, and with good cause, to discussing the entire range of these problems. Mr. President, we are expected to ensure that the Moscow summit open up new horizons in the Soviet-American dialog, in relations between the U.S.S.R. and the U.S., for the benefit of our two nations and the entire world. This is worth any effort and any amount of good will.

I want to thank you again for the hospitality that we've encountered this evening and at every turn since our arrival in Moscow. We appreciate deeply the personal effort that you, Mrs. Gorbachev, and all of your associates have expended on our behalf.

As expressed in the great music, architecture, art -- we need only look about us this evening -- and literature that over many centuries you've given the world, we have beheld the beauty and majesty of your peoples' national experience. And without belittling the serious business before us, all of the fundamental issues that separate our governments, I hope you'll permit me tonight to say that in the eyes of the American people, your people truly are, as the folk song suggests, a people of heart and mind, a people -- to use our vernacular -- with soul. And that's why we believe there's common ground between our two peoples and why it is our duty to find common ground for our two governments.

Over the next 3 days, General Secretary Gorbachev and I will review what has been accomplished over the past 3 years and what our two nations might accomplish together in the months to come. We have a great deal to discuss on both accounts. What we have achieved is a good beginning. We have taken the first step toward deep reductions of our nuclear arsenals. We have taken the first step toward dealing with the reality that much of the tension and mistrust between our two countries arises from very different concepts of the fundamental rights and role of the individual in society. We have taken the first step to build that network of personal relationships and understanding between societies, between people, that are crucial to dispelling dangerous misconceptions and stereotypes.

The fighting continues needlessly, tragically, in too many regions of the globe. The vision of freedom and cooperation enshrined in the Helsinki Final Act remains unrealized. The American and Soviet peoples are getting to know each other better, but not well enough. Mr. General Secretary, you and I are meeting now for the fourth time in 3 years -- a good deal more often than our predecessors. And this has allowed our relationship to differ from theirs in more than a quantitative state or sense.

We have established the kind of working relationship I think we both had in mind when we first met in Geneva. We've been candid about our differences, but sincere in sharing a common objective and working hard together to draw closer to it. It's easy to disagree and much harder to find areas where we can agree. We and our two governments have both gotten into the habit of looking for those areas. We found more than we expected. I intend to pursue the search for common ground during the months left to me as President. When I pass the job on to my successor, I intend to tell him it is a search that must be continued. Based on the achievements of the last few years, I will also tell him it is a search that can succeed.

I also hope you'll permit me to mention that, as you have been a gracious host, we've tried to be gracious guests by bringing along some small expressions of our gratitude. There's one gift in particular that I wanted to mention not only in view of my own former profession but because it has, I think, something important to say to us about what is underway this week in Moscow. It is a film, not as well-known as some but an American classic. It is a powerfully acted and directed story of family and romantic love, of devotion to the land and dedication to higher principle. It is also fun, it has humor. There's a renegade goose, a mischievous young boy, a noisy neighbor, a love-struck teenager in love with a gallant soldier, an adolescent struggling for manhood, a loving, highly principled wife, and a gentle but strong father. It's about the good and sometimes difficult things that happen between man and wife, and parent and child. The film also has sweep and majesty and power and pathos. For you see, it takes place against the backdrop of our American epic, the Civil War. And because the family is of the Quaker religion and renounces violence, each of its characters must, in his or her own way, face this war and the moral dilemma it poses. The film shows not just the tragedy of war, but the problems of pacifism, the nobility of patriotism, as well as the love of peace.

I promise not to spoil its outcome for you, but I hope you'll permit me to describe one scene. Just as the invading armies come into southern Indiana, one of our States, the Quaker farmer is approached by two of his neighbors. One is also a Quaker who earlier in the story, when times are peaceful, denounces violence and vows never to lift his hand in anger. But now that the enemy has burned his barn, he's on his way to battle and criticizes his fellow Quaker for not joining him in renouncing his religious beliefs. The other visitor, also on his way to battle, is the intruding but friendly neighbor. Yet it is this neighbor, although a nonbeliever, who says he's proud of the Quaker farmer's decision not to fight. In the face of the tragedy of war, he's grateful, as he says, that somebody's holding out for a better way of settling things.

It seems to me, Mr. General Secretary, that in pursuing these summit meetings we, too, have been holding out for a better way of settling things. And by the way, the film's title is more than a little appropriate. It's called ``Friendly Persuasion.'' So, Mr. General Secretary, allow me to raise a glass to the work that has been done, to the work that remains to be done, and let us also toast the art of friendly persuasion, the hope of peace with freedom, the hope of holding out for a better way of settling things. Thank you, and God bless you.

I've been very impressed with what I've heard just now. For my contribution to this dialog I thought I would deal here briefly with the question whose answer might open up some new insights for all of us. You see, I've been told that many of you were puzzled that a former actor could become the leader of a great nation, particularly the United States. What does acting have to do with politics and statecraft? Whatever possessed the American people to entrust this high office to me? You might feel reassured to know you aren't the first to ask that question. Back in Washington, just about every member of the political opposition has been asking it for the last 8 years, and they're not the first. It's been happening ever since. Almost a quarter of a century ago, I announced that I was going to run for what turned out to be the first public office I ever held, Governor of California. Yes, I had served as president of my union, the Screen Actors Guild. Yes, in that role I'd led a successful strike by the union against the studios. And, yes, I'd campaigned actively for a number of candidates for office, including candidates for President. But I was still known primarily as an actor.

In the movie business, actors often get what we call typecast; that is, the studios come to think of you as playing certain kinds of roles, so those are the kinds of roles they give you. And no matter how hard you try, you just can't get them to think of you in any other way. Well, politics is a little like that, too. So, I've had a lot of time and reason to think about my role not just as a citizen turned politician but as an actor turned politician.

I've taken from my craft into public life. And I hope you won't think it excessively opportune if I use the words of a Soviet filmmaker to explain one of them. He was, after all, one of the world's greatest filmmakers, and so, like so many of your artists, indeed, like so many of you, belongs in a broader sense to all of humanity.

It was during the production of ``Ivan the Terrible'' when Eisenstein noted that in making a film, or in thinking through any detail of it -- which to my mind would include the acting of a part -- in his words, ``The most important thing is to have the vision. The next is to grasp and hold it. You must see and feel what you are thinking. You must see and grasp it. You must hold and fix it in your memory and senses. And you must do it at once.'' To grasp and hold a vision, to fix it in your senses -- that is the very essence, I believe, of successful leadership not only on the movie set, where I learned about it, but everywhere. And by the way, in my many dealings with him since he became General Secretary, I've found that Mr. Gorbachev has the ability to grasp and hold a vision, and I respect him for that.

I see it, political leadership in a democracy requires seeing past the abstractions and embracing the vast diversity of humanity and doing it with humility, listening as best you can not just to those with high positions but to the cacophonous voices of ordinary people and trusting those millions of people, keeping out of their way, not trying to act the all-wise and all-powerful, not letting government act that way. And the word we have for this is freedom.

In the last few years, freedom for the arts has been expanded in the Soviet Union. Some poems, books, music, and works in other fields that were once banned have been made available to the public; and some of those artists who produced them have been recognized. Two weeks ago, because of the work of the Writers Union, the first step was taken to make the Pasternak home at Peredelkino into a museum. In the meantime, some artists in exile -- the stage director Yuri Lubimov, for example -- have been permitted to return and to work, and artists who are here have been allowed a greater range.

We in the United States applaud the new thaw in the arts. We hope to see it go further. We hope to see Mikhail Baryshnikov and Slava Rostropovich, artists Mrs. Reagan and I have seen perform in Washington, perform again in Moscow. We hope to see the works of Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn published in the land he loves. And we hope to see a permanent end to restrictions on the creativity of all artists and writers. We want this not just for your sake but for our own. We believe that the greater the freedoms in other countries the more secure both our own freedoms and peace. And we believe that when the arts in any country are free to blossom the lives of all people are richer.

Faulkner said of poets -- although he could have been speaking of any of the arts -- it is the poet's privilege to help man endure by lifting his heart, by reminding him of the courage and honor and hope and pride and compassion and pity and sacrifice which have been the glory of our past. The poet's voice need not merely be the record of man. It can be one of the props, the pillars, to help him endure and prevail. Thank you for having me here today and for sharing your thoughts with me, and God bless you all.

Mrs. Gorbachev, distinguished guests and friends, it's a pleasure to host all of you tonight and to reciprocate, in a small way, the hospitality you lavished upon us yesterday evening. While the General Secretary and I had already held three meetings before this one began here in Moscow, each of those earlier encounters took place in the autumn. The days were growing short, the weather ever grayer and colder. It makes for a bracing, delightful change to have this meeting take place at the high point of spring, a time of long, light-filled days.

I know that Nancy found her springtime visit to Leningrad earlier today both magnificent and moving. The play of light upon the rivers and canals added the special splendor of the season to a city splendid in any season. And everywhere, Nancy has told me, there was a sense of history, especially of Leningrad's immense courage and sacrifice during the Second World War, surely one of the most stirring epics in the whole human story.

Here in Moscow, I've been reminded a number of times during this springtime visit of a passage in a book about your country by Laurens Van der Post. Especially struck by the city's churches, Van der Post wrote that when he caught his first sight of the Moscow skyline he saw ``the light of an unusually pure evening upon it. That light was alchemical, and it transformed Moscow into a city of gold.

The tops of the spires and pinnacles drawing the rigid forms of the skyscrapers after them into arrows of gold aimed at the arched and timeless blue.'' So, we, too, have found Moscow a city of beauties. A city, especially, whose pinnacles and spires reminded one at virtually every turn of man's ancient capacity for aspiration, for reaching out toward the light.

It's a particular pleasure to be able to welcome you to Spaso House -- a house of considerable beauty in its own right -- the residence of our Ambassadors to the Soviet Union. During the 55 years of diplomatic relations between our two nations, Spaso House has served as one of the principal settings for exchanges between us -- exchanges formal and informal alike. There have been some splendid moments within these walls. Prokofiev once conducted his marvelous ``The Love for Three Oranges'' in this very room. As wartime allies, our representatives met often under this roof. And Ambassador and Mrs. Matlock have continued the tradition of making Spaso House a centerpiece of American culture, a place to receive and talk with Soviet officials and with people from all walks of life and from all parts of the Soviet Union. But there have also been quiet times in this house -- unnaturally quiet times. Times when difficult relations between us meant that this house, this huge, magnificent house, stood virtually empty of visitors. I'm told that it was even possible to hear the Moscow Metro rumbling past, ever so faintly, deep in the Earth below.

General Secretary, ladies and gentlemen, Spaso House has, as I said, seen quiet times, yet the animated conversation of this evening has already done much to make up for them. And so, I would like to raise a glass to the continued interchange between our two nations and, if I may, to Spaso House itself, as a symbol of our relations. May this lovely home never lack for visitors and shared meals and the sounds of spirited conversation and even the peal of hearty laughter.

Two great nations have given the two of us a mandate to determine what Soviet-American relations should be like. Since our first meeting in Geneva, relations between our two countries have overcome a long, drawn out period of confrontation to reach an acceptable level from which it is now easier to move forward. In Reykjavik, in Washington, and during this present visit of yours, our dialog has been intense. Its most important result has been the now-ratified first treaty to reduce nuclear weapons. A search is continuing to find a solution for problems relating to 50-percent cuts in strategic offensive arms. The Geneva accord in Afghanistan has come into force. We now have as many as 47 bilateral agreements on cooperation.

The visit by a President of the United States to the Soviet Union is an occasion for a glance at the past and a look into the future. The history of relations between our two countries has known all kinds of things, good and bad. Of the good things, we remember particularly well the Soviet-American comradeship-in-arms in World War II. Those grim years saw the emergence of the first shoots of Soviet-American friendship. And there was not one single Soviet citizen who did not feel bitter when that glorious page in the history of our relations gave way to cold war. That was a hard test for our peoples. The world found itself in a dangerous situation. We all felt the breath of impending catastrophe. Even today, we're sometimes chilled by cold winds.

But world developments in their main tendency are turning toward a search for political solutions, toward cooperation and peace. We are, all of us, witnesses to momentous changes, though a lot still has to be done to achieve irreversible change. Although everything urges cooperation and trust, prejudices and stereotypes are still with us, as is rivalry, above all in the military sphere.

I would like to address another major world problem: the situation in the developing world, which cannot but affect our countries, too. The problems which the developing countries face have turned out to be difficult [to] the point of tragedy. Glaring backwardness, hunger, poverty, and mass diseases continue to beset entire nations. An incredibly high debt has become an excruciating and universal problem. It would seem that everybody can see its complexity, involving as it does extremely diverse and truly vital interests, and understand that a way out must be solved.

We believe that if the international community and, above all, the great powers are to be of any help the starting point and the essential thing is to recognize unconditionally the freedom of choice. We are insisting on fairness.

We have seriously studied the economic system in developing nations, and I am convinced that a way out is possible along the lines of a radical restructuring of the entire system of world economic relations, without any discrimination for political reasons. This would promote a political settlement of regional conflicts which not only impede progress in that part of the world but also cause turmoil in the entire world situation. With such an approach, our differences as to what kind of a future awaits the Third World would not take on confrontational forms. So, in this matter, too, our relationship is doomed to have an international dimension.

Turning now to our bilateral relations, we envision there opportunities and prospects primarily in light of internal evolution in both countries, but also in the context of world developments. Many Americans who are studying us and who have visited the U.S.S.R., and now, I hope, those present here as well, have been able to see for themselves the sweeping scope of change in our country. It is based on comprehensive democratization and radical economic reform. I'm gratified to note that today the President and I have had an in-depth exchange of views on this subject. We have also discussed our perestroika a number of times with other Americans. This is all to the good. It, too, is a sign of change in our relationship.

We, for our part, are trying to closely follow the profound trends in the United States. We see how little similarity there is between what is happening in our country and in yours, in two very different societies based on different values. But we do not regard this as an obstacle to identifying promising areas for mutually beneficial ties or for cooperation in the interests of the two peoples. We're in favor of competition and comparison.

And another thing, whatever the ups and downs of our dialog with America, Soviet representatives have been upholding the interests of the Soviet state. In their contacts with us, American officials have been acting in exactly the same way, vis-a-vis their own interests. The truth is that in building their relationship the Soviet Union and the United States can effectively serve their own interests only if they have a realistic view and take account of each other's interests and intentions. We must learn the difficult art of not just existing side by side but of building bridges of mutually beneficial cooperation.

Soviet and American people want to live in peace and communicate in all areas in which they have a mutual interest. The interest is there, and it is growing. We feel no fear. We are not prejudiced. We believe in the value of communication. I see a future in which the Soviet Union and the United States base their relations on disarmament, a balance of interest, and comprehensive cooperation rather than on deterring each other or upgrading their military capabilities. I see a future in which solutions to real problems are not impeded by problems historically outdated or artificially kept alive, inherited from the times of the cold war, and in which the policies of confrontation give way to a joint quest based on reason, mutual benefit, and readiness to compromise. I see a future in which our two countries, without claiming any special rights in the world, are always mindful of their special responsibility in a community of equal nations. It'll be a world that is safer and more secure, which is so badly needed by all people on Earth, by their children and grandchildren, so that they could gain and preserve the basic human rights: the right to life, work, freedom, and the pursuit of happiness. The path towards this future can be neither easy nor short. We may be standing at the threshold of a uniquely interesting period in the history of our two nations. This new meeting between the two of us, Mr. President, confirms that 3 years ago in Geneva we took the right decision.

May the years to come bring a healthier international environment. May life be triumphant. To the very good health of the President, to the very good health of Mrs. Nancy Reagan, to cooperation between our two peoples.

Note: The President spoke at 10 p.m. in the Chandelier Room at the Ambassador's residence. The President spoke in English, and the General Secretary spoke in Russian. Their remarks were translated by interpreters.

The agreement between the United States and the Soviet Union on notification of launches of strategic ballistic missiles is a practical new step designed to reduce the risk of misinterpretation, miscalculation, or accident.

In the START negotiations, both sides have proposed that there be notification of launches of ICBM's and SLBM's. Both sides launch such missiles from time to time for purposes of testing, training, and maintaining their reliability. The sides have very similar language to implement such notifications in the joint draft text of the START agreement in Geneva. Given this common approach to launch notification, the United States proposed at the meeting of Foreign Ministers in mid-May in Geneva that we separate this provision from the START treaty and reach an agreement on this subject now. Our START negotiator subsequently gave his counterpart in Geneva a draft text of an agreement. On Sunday the Soviets agreed to this concept and gave us a draft very similar to ours. Our START negotiators have completed the text, and it was signed today by Secretary Shultz and Foreign Minister Shevardnadze.

The agreement requires notification of all ICBM and SLBM launches at least 24 hours in advance. The notification would include the planned date of launch, the launch area, and the impact area. The notifications will be made through the Nuclear Risk Reduction Centers.

However, such a statement is admissible (i) in any proceeding wherein another statement made in the course of the same plea or plea discussions has been introduced and the statement ought in fairness be considered contemporaneously with it, or (ii) in a court-martial proceeding for perjury or false statement if the statement was made by the accused under oath, on the record and in the presence of counsel.

Sec. 3. The amendment of Military Rule of Evidence 410 prescribed by Section 1 of this Order shall take effect on August 1, 1981. That amendment applies to all court-martial processes taken on or after August 1, 1981: Provided, that nothing contained in that amendment shall be construed to invalidate any investigation, trial in which arraignment has been completed, or other action begun prior to that date; and any such investigation, trial, or other action may be completed in accordance with applicable laws, Executive Orders, and regulations in the same manner and with the same effect as if that amendment had not been prescribed.

The stars in varying constellations and the stripes of alternating red and white have accompanied Americans from the Marne to the Moon. The flag was flying when the British surrendered to General Washington at Yorktown, when Admiral Peary reached the North Pole, and when our soldiers battled at Iwo Jima. Recently, we saw the American flag proudly on the side of the Space Shuttle Columbia as she circled the Earth.

Yet the flag flies not only over the great events our history but also over the more personal moments of American life. Who cannot recall the vivid images of children at parades waving small flags in patriotic delight, of immigrants solemnly reciting the oath of allegiance before a flag in a judge's chambers, or of a grieving military widow clutching the folded Stars and Stripes?

When we honor our flag we honor what we stand for as a Nation -- freedom, equality, justice, and hope. Flag Day and National Flag Week are our traditional means to commemorate the Nation's beliefs as symbolized by the Stars and Stripes. In more recent times, the twenty-one days from Flag Day through Independence Day have been set aside as a period to honor America during which Americans reflect upon the Nation's character, heritage, fortifying principles and future well-being.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 1st day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

The President today also announced his intention to appoint Governor Lamar Alexander (R - Tenn.) as a member of the Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations for a term of 2 years. He will also be designated as Vice Chairman of the Commission.

I include as part of my recommendation my determination that further extension of the waiver authority, and continuation of the waivers applicable to the Socialist Republic of Romania, the Hungarian People's Republic, and the People's Republic of China will substantially promote the objectives of section 402.

This recommendation also includes my reasons for recommending the extension of waiver authority and for my determination that continuation of the three waivers currently in effect will substantially promote the objectives of section 402.

Romania -- Emigration from Romania to the United States has increased substantially since the waiver has been in effect. In 1980, more than 2,800 persons emigrated from Romania to the United States. This is nearly seven times the pre-MFN level of emigration and almost twice the 1979 level. Continuation of the waiver will also contributes to maintaining a framework for dialogue with the Romanian Government on emigration procedures, emigration to Israel, binational marriages, and other humanitarian problems.

Hungary -- In March 1978 the Hungarian Government stressed to the U.S. Government that it intended to deal with emigration matters in a responsible and humanitarian way. Since that time the actions of Hungarian authorities have been consistent with this policy. A large majority of Hungarians seeking to emigrate are able to do so without undue difficulty. Very few problem cases arise, and U.S. officials are able to discuss these constructively with the Hungarian Government. Most problem cases ultimately are favorably resolved.

People's Republic of China -- During the past year, China has continued its commitment to open emigration, exemplified by its undertaking in the September 1980 U.S.-China Consular Convention to facilitate family reunification. Our posts in China issued over 3,400 immigrant visas in FY-1980, and over 12,800 nonimmigrant visas for business, study and family visits. More than 5,000 Chinese now have come to the United States since 1979 for long term study and research. As has been the case for the past several years, the numerical limits imposed on entry to the U.S. by our immigration law continue to be a more significant impediment to immigration from China than Chinese Government exit controls. The Chinese Government is aware of our interest in open emigration, and extension of the waiver will encourage the Chinese to maintain its present travel and emigration policies.

In light of these considerations, I have determined that continuation of the waivers applicable to Romania, Hungary, and the People's Republic of China will substantially promote the objectives of section 402 of the Act.

The President today announced his intention to nominate H. Monroe Browne, of California, as Ambassador to New Zealand and to serve concurrently as Ambassador to Western Samoa. He would succeed Anne C. Martindell, who is resigning.

And the statement that I'd like to make is that last November, the American people sent a clear and resounding message to Washington that the highest order of business before the nation is to restore our economic prosperity. In recent weeks, as votes have been cast on the Federal budget, we, the elected representatives, have tried to send an equally clear message back home that we're listening and we're acting.

Today I'm pleased to announce that we're prepared to move ahead on a second front -- to reduce the burden of Federal taxes. And just as we did on the budget, we're moving ahead with a bipartisan coalition in the Congress. We believe that on economic recovery, there can be no Republicans and no Democrats, only Americans. And with me here this afternoon, these gentlemen that I have just introduced, are many of the leaders of the bipartisan coalition that we're building.

In the course of the past several days, we're reached agreement in principle on a tax plan that all of us can support, and the main elements are these: First, the plan provides for a 5-percent cut in the personal income tax rates, across the board, beginning this October. That will be followed by a 10-percent cut in mid-1982 and another 10-percent cut in mid-1983 -- for a total cut in tax rates of 25 percent over 3 years. Second, the plan provides relief from the marriage tax penalty. Third, it lowers estate and gift taxes. Fourth, it provides incentives for individuals to save and invest. Fifth, it provides for accelerated appreciation for business investment so that we can have more jobs and our products can be more competitive overseas.

Now, these tax cuts, along with others to be incorporated in our plan, are an essential companion to the budget cuts now moving through the Congress. Taken together, tax cuts and budget cuts, this package will put us back on the road to a sound economy, with lower inflation, more growth, and a government that lives within its means. Our goal is a very simple one: to rebuild this Nation so that individual Americans can once again be the masters of their own destiny. Congressmen Conable and Hance will be introducing the tax bill in the House that we fully endorse.

And now let me express a word of special appreciation to those who are with me here today from the Congress. These gentlemen and others that they represent from Capitol Hill are the leaders of a new bipartisan coalition that we're forging on behalf of the American people. We come from different backgrounds. We even come from different parties. But we're united in the belief that we must work together to rebuild this economy. The American people have suffered economically for too long, and we just want to tell them help is on the way.

And now, the great majority of us -- as a matter of fact, all but one of us -- are going to leave this podium and throw to the kind mercy of all of you for whatever questions you may have of the Secretary of the Treasury, Don Regan.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Americans enjoy a multitude of sports and recreational activities that serve to refresh the body and spirit. For many of our citizens, recreation means boating.

Those involved in recreational boating should always remember that the primary responsibility for safety rests with the individual. And while a cruise can be a wonderful experience for one person or an entire family, it can also result in tragedy.

All Americans who utilize our waterways for recreation should possess at least a minimum knowledge of safety afloat. I urge all Americans who engage in recreational boating to take advantage of the numerous safe boating courses sponsored by governmental and private organizations. I particularly urge inexperienced operators of small boats to enroll in these safety and educational programs. Learning the fundamentals of safe boating can do nothing but add to the potential pleasure and excitement of recreational boating.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 4th day of June in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

The President. Mrs. Kennedy, the Congress has authorized the presentation of a medal for you in recognition of the distinguished and dedicated service which your husband, Robert Kennedy, gave to the government and to the people of the United States.

Robert Kennedy's service to his country, his commitment to his great ideals, and his devotion to those less fortunate than himself are matters now for history and need little explanation from me. The facts of Robert Kennedy's public career stand alone. He roused the comfortable. He exposed the corrupt, remembered the forgotten, inspired his countrymen, and renewed and enriched the American conscience.

Obviously, many of you here knew him better than most. You knew him as husband, as brother, as father, and uncle. He wrote to his son, Joseph, on the day of President Kennedy's death, ``Remember all the things that Jack started. Be kind to others that are less fortunate than we and love our country.'' And it is in the final triumph of Robert Kennedy that he used his personal gifts to bring this message of hope and love to the country, to millions of Americans who supported and believed in him. ``Come my friends,'' he liked to quote the Tennyson lines, ``it's not too late to seek a newer world.'' And this is how we should remember him, beyond the distinguished public service or our own sadness that he is gone.

His friend, composer John Stuart, said about him what he said about the first fallen Kennedy and about us: that when a chill wind takes the sky, we should remember the years he gave us hope, for they can never die.

There was at once an intensity and a gentleness in him that made him a unique spark of hope in a dark time. The violence that struck him down has threatened and touched so many others. The nation and the world have felt the pain so recently. Those of us who were with Robert Kennedy when he died in 1968 felt a special sense of relief this year, Mr. President, at your own recovery from the attack against you.

And today, all the Kennedys feel a special sense of pride in the brother, husband, father, and son who went before us. He was often misunderstood in life. But people everywhere know how much he meant, for they have missed him so much all the years since his loss.

To you, Mr. President, to the Congress, and to our fellow citizens, we are grateful for this gracious tribute today. Our family is grateful to Ethel, the light of his life, who stood with him on countless platforms around the nation and around the world, a friend who has sustained our spirits in dark passages and bright days.

And I speak here for many others who loved Robert Kennedy as well. How proud our remarkable mother is of what he did and of this recognition. And if they were here, that pride would be shared by my father, by Joe and Jack and Kathleen, who always knew that while Bobby was the smallest, he had the biggest heart.

Thirteen years ago at this hour, Robert Kennedy lay dying of his wounds. And accepting this medal in his memory, I would say again what I said when we took leave of him. He was a good and decent man who saw wrong and tried to right it, saw suffering and tried to heal it, saw war and tried to stop it.

And my prayer would be the same. Those of us who loved and who took him to his rest that day continue to pray that what he was for us and what he wished for others will some day come to pass for all the world.

The President today announced the membership of the Presidential Task Force on the Arts and Humanities. The members will serve with Cochairmen Hanna H. Gray, Charlton Heston, and Daniel J. Terra, and Vice Chairman W. Barnabas McHenry. The Task Force will recommend to the President ways in which private support for the arts and humanities might be enhanced.

The President this evening reaffirmed his confidence in the integrity and competence of Dr. Lefever. The President was prepared to stand behind his nomination until final disposition by the Senate, and he deeply regrets that the nation will lose the benefit of his services.

Note: The statement was released in response to Dr. Lefever's letter to the President requesting that his nomination to be Assistant Secretary of State for Human Rights and Humanitarian Affairs be withdrawn. Earlier in the day, the Senate Foreign Relations Committee had voted 13 - 4 against favorable consideration of the nomination in the Senate.

President Reagan. I warmly welcome President Lopez Portillo on behalf of the people of the United States. But I also want to convey my personal greetings because of my personal respect and affection. The relationship we've built as individuals is indicative of a new dimension that we are bringing to the friendship between our two countries.

Our planned meeting of 2 months ago, which I was looking forward to with great anticipation, was abruptly canceled. And I want to thank you, Mr. President, for the consideration you've shown in visiting us here in Washington. You've done us a great honor in your visit to the White House.

You'll recall, Mr. President, the last time we met was in the Museum of Art, part of Mexico's rich cultural past -- that was in Ciudad Juarez. We were surrounded there by magnificent pieces of art, part of Mexico's rich cultural past. It was appropriate that we should meet in such a place, for art transcends time and material consideration.

The same is true of the friendship between the peoples of Mexico and the United States. In a world filled with neighbors who resort to violence, neighbors who've lost sight of the shared values and mutual interests, the good will between Mexico and the United States is a blossom whose beauty we meet here to cherish and protect.

God made Mexico and the United States neighbors, but it is our duty and the duty of generations yet to come to make sure that we remain friends. I welcome you today with the pledge that this administration will sincerely and diligently strive to maintain a relationship of mutual respect and cooperation between our two nations and that decisions which affect both sides of our border will be made only after the closest consultation between our governments. Our very proximity is an opportunity to demonstrate to the world how two nations, talking together as equals, as partners, as friends, can solve their problems and deepen their mutual respect.

Mr. President, you are a scholar, a man of art, and a political leader of a proud and independent nation. There are many items of importance on our agenda. I look forward to a far-reaching exchange of views that will cement the ties between us. The personal friendship that we're developing must be equaled by the closeness between our two peoples.

We are sorry that we did not meet in Tijuana as we had planned. But I am very happy that we are meeting now here at the White House, and it also pleases me enormously to see that you have totally recovered from the attempt that was brought on by absurd violence. I am very happy to see that you have enormous capacity of recovery. And in your good health and in your strength, I can see the good health and the strength of your nation.

There are few countries in the world that have so many items to deal with among themselves as the United States and Mexico. We're not only neighbors, we are also the representatives of two worlds. Literally and geographically speaking, we represent the North and the South along 3,000 kilometers of border. Therefore, there are structural matters between us that have been shaped by our history and our geography.

We also represent the relationship between the developing world and the world that has already been developed. And we're also immersed in a regional context that shapes our relationship. I come here now, sir, as a friend without any prejudice, to talk over these matters with you and to prove with my coming that there can be friendship among friends and that this friendship can have as its main pillar and basis the rule of reason.

In an absurd world, the reasonable thing to do can be the possible thing to do. And what is reasonable is based on respect and on the law. There are many problems that we have to deal with. We will be very happy to find our similarities. And when we do not have coinciding opinions -- and it is very possible that in this world of plurality there may be times when we do not have coinciding opinions -- then we will talk things over without arrogance.

Arrogance is a dangerous deviation of they who are in a weaker position. The other very dangerous aspect is submission. We will select the road of respect and the rule of reason without any submission and without any arrogance.

I feel, Mr. President, that you have great good will and a friendly feeling. I feel that you are a decent individual and an honest one. I shall make a great effort to respond to the kindnesses that you have with me.

We have established a friendship which no doubt will be both symbolic and solid. I am absolutely certain that we will [be] able to achieve what our two peoples and nations want of us. We want to be understood, and in turn, we want to understand. We want to respect, and we want to be respected. We want a solid relationship that will seek out the mutual interests of two countries that are neighbors and friends.

Following their remarks, the two Presidents met briefly in the Yellow Oval Room, and then they left the White House for an overnight stay at Camp David, Md. Following their arrival there, they met for discussions, first privately, and then with their delegations.

In accordance with the Impoundment Control Act of 1974, I herewith report four proposals to rescind a total of $114.1 million in budget authority previously provided by the Congress. The rescission proposals affect programs in the Environmental Protection Agency and the National Endowments for the Arts and Humanities. These proposals are a part of my continuing effort to help reduce government spending.

Dr. Trivelpiece is the author or coauthor of over 100 technical papers and reports. He is a fellow of the American Association for the Advancement of Science, the American Physical Society, and the Institute of Electrical and Electronic Engineers.

President Reagan. President Lopez Portillo, some years ago when I was Governor of California, I was inspecting areas in our State which had been enormously damaged by one of those natural catastrophes that we sometimes see on the Pacific coast -- great mudslides that can sweep away a man's home in a matter of moments.

One of these belonged to an old gentleman from your country, who was standing in the middle of what, before the slide, had been his living room. We were both kneedeep in mud. It must have been heartbreaking for him, because his home had obviously been newly furnished. Now it was a scene of ruin. With quiet dignity and the utmost sincerity, he said, ``Governor Reagan, mi casa es su casa'' -- my house is your house. I was deeply moved, and I realized that I was witness to what was purely and traditionally Hispanic -- personal pride and courage in the face of adversity.

From the moment of our meeting on the Friendship Bridge at Ciudad Juarez last January, I was certain that we would make our relationship more than symbolic, not only because our peoples expect certain cordiality between their leaders but because the leader of the Mexican people exemplifies so well the proud culture and heritage of his people. When you took that highly symbolic step across the boundary to grasp my hand, I knew that our future relationship would be that of personal friends.

Your concern and good wishes during my period of hospitalization were deeply appreciated. The Vice President told me of your concern for my health and of your most generous offer to travel to Washington for this meeting even though protocol called for me to visit you.

At our first meeting, you gave me a splendid example of your own artistry, drawings of horses etched on glass, drawn by you, that are now proudly displayed behind my desk in the Oval Office. And I value greatly the volumes on beautiful art of your country. But it would be difficult to match the gift that arrived at our ranch shortly before my Inauguration -- El Alamain, a magnificent horse, your personal mount. Now, that was more than friendship; you took me into your family.

Later in the book, Quetzalcoatl, perplexed by the problems of governing, said something we can both relate to: ``Despite its regularity, this world is a confused sphere of arbitrary things.'' The art of politics is sometimes frustrating, but there are other times of confidence and optimism, and your visit has been such a time.

I listened very carefully to you in our meetings, Mr. President, noting the content and the spirit with which you spoke. Your presence inspires confidence that we can calm any of the tensions that inevitably arise between two such close neighbors.

During your election campaign in 1976, you traveled through all 31 of Mexico's states, spreading new hope. The message you brought to the Mexican people is something that can serve as a cornerstone for our relationship as well. If problems arise between us, we must always remember we are the solution. There is nothing that with mutual respect and honest communication we cannot work out together.

I look forward to our next meeting in Cancun, Mexico, in October. In saluting you today, I thank you for your generosity, but more, I thank you for the continued good will between our two peoples that your visit represents.

It is true that I had always been sincere, but also cautious. I had always spoken frankly, but I have always measured the weight of each one of my words, because the relationship, for some reason or another, had always been a tense one. A relationship between neighbors that are so different are always difficult. It is difficult for the one side and for the other. But I confess for the first time now I have felt totally relaxed.

For the first time a President of the United States has used with me that very generous formula of ``my home is your home.'' And for we who understand the greatness and dignity that there is behind that expression, what I have heard from the President today has deeply moved me -- as I can understand very well that he felt deeply moved also when he heard that old man that had no roof over his head and who was offering him his home, because a home is the environment of respect for the intimacy of the human being. And when one gives one's intimacy in friendship, it is that that he is giving.

We understand this to be so, Mr. President, and we thank you for this. But I must also say that it has not only been the external behavior but also the substantive part of our relationship that has always been generous, kind, and affectionate.

If all the powerful people in the world were to truly understand what respect means to the weak people, the world would totally change. It is not only to give, not only to help; the most important thing of all is to respect. He who gives without respect is usually offensive. Very frequently I am reminded, and I remind others, that the first civic expression that we learn as children is the one that was said by one our great men and Presidents [Benito Juarez], the counterpart, so to speak, of Abraham Lincoln. He said, ``Respect for the rights of others is peace.'' The first word that we Mexicans learn in our civic behavior is the word ``respect.'' And this is the way, ladies and gentlemen, which we have been treated. We have been treated with respect and with friendship, and these are basic qualities to us.

On that basis, everything can be built. One can coincide, one can dissent; human beings are made in many and various different ways and shapes. And in our plurality, we should learn to coexist and to tolerate one another. Tolerance in itself is respect. And when a human relationship is built on respect, it is indestructible. We have spoken about many things. Fortunately, we have agreed on most of them. We have dissented on some. But with the greatest respect, we have agreed to talk about the matters on which we dissent in order to find appropriate solutions.

Intolerance has not come to cancel out opportunity, and that is very important for a good relationship between countries such as ours. It is important, because it is a representative sample of what is happening in the world -- the relationship between the countries that have been able to develop and the developing nations. And in a geographic analogy, we could say that this is an expression of the North-South relationship.

We are the most significant relationship between the North and the South. That is why, Mr. President, I have felt so happy and so grateful that you have accepted our invitation to come to Cancun, because we do not only have concepts in mind, but we have direct experiences and reciprocal experiences. I am very certain that the special characteristics of our relationship, North-South relationship, that is, United States-Mexico, can be taken to generalization and that it will be useful, that it can be useful. And this is what we fervently wish -- it can be useful for the rest of mankind.

We want appropriate communication so that political will can be expressed. And political will has been expressed here and now today in the United States as regards Mexico and with reference to Mexico as regards the United States within an environment of good will, peace, respect, and consideration for each other.

I believe, Mr. President, that in Cancun we can be a stimulating example to help and participate in the detente of this world which is so complex and at times so absurd, because if the disasters brought on by nature that create all these things for human beings are absurd in themselves -- these disasters that leave old men without a roof over their heads but still with their dignity -- nature, in that case, nature that has its own strength and will, cannot be controlled by us. But there is something that leaves man without a roof over his head and which is not nature -- and I'm talking about passions, ambition, intolerance, violence -- vices all of human will. And it is up to the will of the human being to correct these mistakes. Perhaps we can do nothing against nature, but we can do a great deal with our will if we're talking about good will, and I do believe that good will is possible. And I believe that in Cancun, we shall have the opportunity to say that is possible and to confirm that we're speaking the truth.

I just want to express my appreciation for President Lopez Portillo's changing his schedule and coming to Washington to accommodate us. The talks that we've had were frank, they were valuable, and they lead to a closer relationship between our two countries. In addition to that, I'm very proud, personally, to say that we have a warm and a close personal relationship between the two of us.

Our frank discussion revealed basic agreement on the need to strengthen the economies of the less developed nations, to bring about social and economic development of their peoples. We agreed that this was the best way to assure the region's future stability, and we'll be exchanging ideas on how best to bring about such development.

We agreed that the special nature of our relations required a special framework for doing business. We decided to form a bilateral Foreign Secretaries commission to assure integrated handling of matters of common concern. It will be cochaired by Secretary Haig and Secretary Castaneda. They will submit a report by December 31st, 1981.

Because trade problems are essentially and especially urgent, we also decided to set up immediately a Cabinet-level trade committee to recommend how to go about dealing with outstanding bilateral trade questions. The committee will be cochaired by the Mexican and United States Secretaries of Commerce and the United States Trade Representative. The committee will begin work as soon as possible. We also agreed to address outstanding fisheries problems on a similar urgent basis.

An important agreement providing for supply of substantial quantities of United States grain to Mexico during 1982 was signed by Secretary Block for the United States and Secretary de la Vega for Mexico. Attorney General Smith briefed the Mexican party in detail on the various options we're now considering to deal with the undocumented migrant problem. And I assured the President that the United States would take Mexico's interest in this problem fully into consideration, as well as the interests and rights of the individual migrants themselves.

I had the great pleasure of informing the President that the legislature has acted, the Congress has acted, and we are going forward with construction of the Otay Mesa additional border crossing to relieve the logjam that we have at the San Ysidro crossing there. It is badly needed on the California Baja border. And we agreed that it would be an important boost to tourism in both directions.

President Lopez Portillo formally invited me to participate in a meeting of heads of government, an international meeting to be held in Cancun, Mexico, in October, and I happily accepted that invitation. I look forward to the informal discussion of North-South questions which will occur at that meeting, as well as additional meetings that we have spoken of.

I want to commend Congressmen Barber Conable and Kent Hance for the introduction of a new bipartisan tax bill [H.R. 3849] this afternoon. This bill, carefully crafted during hours of discussion with members of both parties, brings with it fresh hope of economic progress for all Americans.

In recent weeks, the American people have heard a great deal about taxes, some of it perhaps confusing, but there is now only one bill before the House -- the bill introduced today -- that offers true tax relief and a new economic beginning.

The Protocols extend both Conventions through June 30, 1983. They maintain the framework for international cooperation in wheat trade matters, continue the existence of the International Wheat Council, and extend the parties' commitments to provide minimum annual quantities of cereals aid to developing countries.

I ask that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to the two Protocols so that ratification by the United States can be effected at an early date. Doing so will demonstrate our continued commitment to cooperation on international wheat trade matters and to providing food aid to needy developing nations.

Argentina taxes all income derived in Argentina, but does not tax any income derived by residents of Argentina from foreign sources. Thus, the usual treaty practice of reciprocal reductions in withholding taxes at source on dividends, interest, and royalties paid to residents of the other country has little appeal to Argentina. Argentina is reluctant to reduce its own tax at source, incurring a revenue cost for which it sees no offsetting benefit. The negotiators believe that the Convention represents a fair and reasonable compromise between the Argentine position that tax should be imposed only at source and the broader view of the United States and most other countries that tax may also be imposed on the basis of residence.

The President today is meeting with the Ambassadors to discuss his initiatives for peace in the Middle East. He wants the Ambassadors of the various countries to be aware of his commitment and the commitment of the United States to the furtherance of the peace process in that critical region of the world. He wishes the Ambassadors to convey this to their respective governments. The President will welcome their views on this matter.

The mission of Ambassador Habib continues today with the important goals as outlined by the President when he asked the Ambassador to undertake this important venture. This is to seek a reduction of the tensions and a lessening of the possibility of conflict arising out of developments in Lebanon which affect the entire region. The President regards this goal to be of utmost importance. He wishes that the Habib mission will continue in cooperation with the concerned parties, whom we hope share our sense of the mission's continued importance.

No, you represent a cross section of Americans from all backgrounds, different regions across this country. In fact, you remind me very much of that one special interest group that I mentioned on Inauguration Day -- the one special interest group that has been neglected and needs help -- that is, we the people.

Thanks to your efforts in supporting the Gramm-Latta spending resolution, you gave all of the people of this country, I think, a tremendous victory. Not a victory for one party, but for more bipartisan cooperation and less inflation for a government that will finally begin living within its means. The bottom line is that millions of Americans are renewing their faith in our political system, and all of those people have waited so long for someone in Washington to listen and care and take action. So, from all of them to all of you, simply, thank you for what you've done for your country.

Now, before you start feeling too good, let me warn you. You're not going to get out of here scot-free. [Laughter] We need your help with another vital bipartisan piece of legislation. Now, you have no idea of what I'm talking about. [Laughter] We absolutely must have across the board a 3-year, 25-percent reduction for every American taxpayer, and we're not going to settle for less.

Now, there are those who are insisting that we settle for less. They demand proof in advance that what we've proposed will work, and they refuse to accept the record of history which clearly demonstrates that tax rate reductions do work. I think we can prove that what they've been doing in the last few decades hasn't worked and never will. And I don't think it automatically follows that those who brought about the present economic mess are, simply by virtue of having done that, the best qualified to clean it up.

They never answer one question that I keep asking -- and you've probably heard me ask it. Why is it inflationary if the people keep their own money and spend it the way they want to and it's not inflationary if the government takes it and spends it the way it wants to? So, we're asked to believe that their proposal is more compassionate to the working people. But their proposal won't even match the built-in tax increase that they themselves are responsible for.

As a matter of fact, let's be honest about it. Our 25-percent, across-the-board tax cut actually is not that much of a tax cut at all. It is simply removing the imposition over the next 3 years by way of inflation which moves people up in brackets and built-in tax increases of the tax increase that will be imposed on the people without that across-the-board reduction. And theirs doesn't match that. The people over the next 3 years will get a tax increase unless this is adopted.

For too long, government has stood in the way of taking more of what our people earn, no matter how hard they try. It's almost become economics without a soul. And that's why the ultimate goal in everything that we're trying to do is to give this economy back to the American people.

Now, you're the most valuable resource we have, and you're the ones who can save our future. Some say the future is looking impossible, filled with danger and uncertainty and scarcity. Well, the future's always looked bleak til people with brains and faith and courage who dreamed and dared to take great risks found a way to make it better -- people like Robert Fulton and Eli Whitney and Thomas Edison and Henry Ford and Albert Einstein. Einstein himself gave us the formula -- everything that is really great and inspiring was created by individuals who labor in freedom.

So, our message today is simply help us pass these incentives so we can help you. We want nothing more than to turn you loose so you can make the 1980's the most exciting, successful decade our nation has ever known -- years of renaissance for American entrepreneurs, years when millions of free men and women went out and found the energy to make us secure and created a revolutionary technological breakthrough on every front, years when they rebuilt our cities and, in the process, created millions of new jobs, stronger families, and a real hope for young Americans everywhere. That's the kind of country I want to leave for our children, and I know it's what you want, too. Now, if we keep working together, just like we have, we're going to succeed and save that American dream that we all love.

The President today announced his intention to nominate William M. Bell to be a member of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission. Upon confirmation, the President intends to designate Mr. Bell Chairman.

The brave men and women who fought for our country should all know that America does remember and is grateful and will always be proud of their courage and honor on the battlefield. And it's fitting that we pay this special tribute to those who so heroically endured the hardships and torture of enemy captivity -- unusual in any war in our history, because it was the longest period that American fighting men have ever been held in captivity. Just the thought of the terrible pain that they suffered and endured should be seared in our memories forever. And let us remember, too, that 6 years after American involvement in Vietnam, in the war, we still don't have a full accounting of our missing servicemen from that conflict, an accounting that was guaranteed in the Paris peace accords that brought the fighting there to an end, an agreement which has been violated.

Recently there have been reports that Americans are still being held captive in Indochina. None of these reports, I'm sorry to say, has been verified, but the world should know that this administration continues to attach the highest priority to the problem of those missing in action. We intend to seek the fullest possible account from the governments involved.

I'm grateful that we have with us here today one of America's outstanding heroes from the Vietnam war, one of the former prisoners of war, and now the Senator from Alabama, Jeremiah Denton, accompanied by his lovely wife Jane. July 17th, it is just 16 years -- or that will be -- to the day that he was shot down over Southeast Asia. Now, lest someone think that there's a little confusion there, he was shot down on July 18th, 1965, but when it was the 18th there, on this side of the dateline it was the 17th. Jeremiah Denton. Who will ever forget on that first night in that first plane that arrived at Clark Field in the Philippines, and he was the first man we saw come down the ramp from the plane, salute our flag, ask God's blessing on America, and then thank us for bringing them home.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Throughout American history our prisoners of war have been called upon to make uncommon sacrifices. In fulfilling their duty as citizens of the United States they have defended American ideals while suffering unimaginable indignities under the absolute control of the enemy. They remained steadfast even while their treatment contravened international understandings and violated elementary consideration of compassion and morality.

All Americans ought to recognize the special debt we owe to our fellow citizens who, in the act of serving our Nation, relinquished their freedom that we might enjoy the blessings of peace and liberty. Likewise, we must remember the unresolved casualties of war -- our servicemen who are still missing. The pain and bitterness of war endure for their families, relatives and friends -- and for all of us. Our Nation will continue to seek answers to the many questions that remain about their fate.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

But I thank all of you, seriously, for the work that you've done, not only in the last election but also throughout the years of even our losing campaigns, when we were winning those moral victories. [Laughter] And our victory in November was due to the accumulated efforts that you've made, and it just took a little while for the message to get through.

But I can tell you right now that we're going to get the tax cuts also. And I jotted down here in my notes that that's because the American people are with us. And then I just happened to remember that wonderful line that Joe Louis said once during the war about the Lord, and I think maybe we ought to reverse that. We got them through because we're with the American people.

I know you've heard some of the arguments that they're using over on the other side about why we shouldn't do this, and you've probably run into some of them yourself. And when they do, just tell them that our true choice is not between tax reduction on the one hand and avoidance of large Federal deficits on the other. An economy that's stifled by restrictive tax rates will never produce enough revenue to balance the budget, just as it will never produce enough jobs or enough profits. And when they try to argue that one with you, remind them that's what John F. Kennedy said when he passed his 2-year, 23-percent tax cut. It wound up with an increase in personal savings, an increase in investment, an increase in productivity and jobs, and even an increase in the total amount of revenues that the Federal Government received at the lower rates. And that's what we think is going to happen when we get our tax cut across the board.

America is on the edge -- I think we're all aware of it -- of an era of good feelings. Our budget proposals, with the pruning of excessive regulations, steady monetary policy, can and will restore vitality to our economy. And, believe me, the better America is, the better it'll be for the Republican Party.

You know, recent accounts have described sometimes the Democrats as being in disarray. So, what else is new? [Laughter] Will Rogers, a number of years ago, made the point that he did not belong to any organized political party; he was a Democrat. [Laughter] But we mustn't be lulled into self-confidence. We've got a great chairman, Dick Richards, and his primary goal is to build our party into a strong, efficient, and majority party -- and I think that can happen in 1982.

Some historians are suggesting that the election of 1980 was a turning point, a watershed election which rearranged party loyalties for some time to come. And I think that you and I just don't want to embarrass those historians. [Laughter] Let's make that come true.

The President. It's a great ceremony by the Marine Corps. And you looked at them, and you just couldn't help but want to stand up and salute and sing the National Anthem. It was a very wonderful, wonderful ceremony to see.

During the Presidential campaign, I promised quick and decisive action. Since taking office, I have made regulatory relief a top priority. It is one of the cornerstones of my economic recovery program.

Thanks to the constructive work of my Task Force on Regulatory Relief, chaired by Vice President Bush, many needless and unproductive regulations have been eliminated. Other officials in my administration are moving forward with equal vigor and are producing tangible results. Regulatory relief actions to date have resulted in billions of dollars in savings to the American people.

The materials in this volume document some of our progress. But more needs to be done, and will be done. I am confident that the legitimate purposes of regulation can be met at considerably lower costs. We shall not rest until that goal is achieved.

The President today is announcing the approval of $1.160 million for the Safe Summer Parks and Recreation Program for Atlanta, Fulton and DeKalb Counties, Ga. This brings to a total of $4.1 million that the Federal Government has provided Atlanta in the situation regarding the number of young people that are missing or dead.

As you are aware, certain provisions of the Voting Rights Act are due to expire in August of 1982. In its 15-year history, the Act has made a massive contribution to the achievement of full constitutional and political equality for black Americans. And by virtue of amendments added in 1975, the Act has helped to insure greater equality for other minorities, especially Mexican-Americans.

I am sensitive to the controversy which has attached itself to some of the Act's provisions, in particular those provisions which impose burdens unequally upon different parts of the nation. But I am sensitive also to the fact that the spirit of the Act marks this nation's commitment to full equality for all Americans, regardless of race, color, or national origin. Because my Administration intends to maintain that commitment, the question before us in the months ahead will not be whether the rights which the Act seeks to protect are worthy of protection, but whether the Act continues to be the most appropriate means of guaranteeing those rights.

Before making a final determination on the Act's extension or revision, I want to be assured that we have received and evaluatd the considered opinions of all concerned parties. Accordingly, I would like the Department to undertake, at your direction, a comprehensive assessment of the Act's history to date; extant or likely abuses of voting rights that may require special scrutiny; the adequacy of the Department's powers under the Act; your suggestions as to whether any changes in the Act may be desirable; and the feasibility of extending the Act's coverage to voting rights infringements not now covered by the Act.

Finally, in the course of developing your assessment, I would like you to consult with concerned citizen groups, state, local, and federal officials, and others whose thoughtful views will contribute to the development of a just and sound Administration position.

I understand that you have already begun this deliberative and consultative process, and I am pleased by this. It will be necessary, however, to complete our review in sufficient time to enable Congress to enact a bill prior to the expiration of the Act's special provisions. I would therefore like to receive your report not later than October 1, 1981.

Mr. Andre has been serving as executive director, Medical Liability Commission, Chicago, Ill. Previously he was assistant director of field service, American Medical Association, acting as legislative liaison and membership services director for the southern region. Mr. Andre was chief deputy commissioner of the Indiana Bureau of Motor Vehicles, Indianapolis, Ind., and was staff director of the Indiana Public Service Commission. He was legislative assistant to Representative Henry C. Schadeberg (Wisconsin).

The provisions of the Inter-American Convention are explained in the report of the Secretary of State which accompanies this letter. In broad terms, the Inter-American Convention is designed to facilitate the settlement of international commercial disputes by arbitration rather than by court proceeding where the parties so desire, by providing that courts will enforce in appropriate cases both the agreement to arbitrate and any resulting arbitral award.

New legislation will be required as part of Title 9 (Arbitration) of the United States Code in order to implement the provisions of the Convention within the United States. The United States' instrument of ratification will be executed only after the necessary legislation has been enacted.

There is substantial support for ratification among members of the legal and business community concerned with international trade and investment. You will find enclosed as an attachment to the report of the Secretary of State letters recommending ratification of this Convention by the United States which have been received from the American Arbitration Association, the American Bar Association, the United States Chamber of Commerce, the Association of American Chambers of Commerce in Latin America, the American Foreign Law Association, and a number of state and local bar associations. We are aware of no opposition to ratification.

Last November the American people gave the elected representatives in Washington an overwhelming mandate to rescue the economy from high inflation and high unemployment. That was last November. Today, 7 months later, people are still watching, and they're still waiting. And there's no longer any reason to delay.

The first, an omnibus bill to reduce spending. A month ago, the House of Representatives approved by a 77-vote margin a long overdue and unprecedented budget resolution. That resolution ordered House committees to cut $36 billion for spending next year, some $140 billion over the next 3 years. And yet there is now clear danger of congressional backsliding and a return to spending as usual.

Some House committees have reported spending cuts they know can't be made, closing, for example, one-third of the nation's post offices. One House committee claims to have achieved savings by eliminating a day care program to provide suppers, but it also slipped into the change of the law to say that lunches can be served at suppertime.

This practice is unconscionable. The hard work of Congress in passing the bipartisan budget resolution was not an academic exercise. It was a solemn commitment that transforms a mandate from the people into a compact with the people. The Congress and the administration together must protect the integrity of that compact.

I urge the House leaders to revise the committee work so that it honestly and responsibly achieves the original spending goals. But if that proves impossible, let me be clear: My administration will have no other choice than to support the proposal of a number of Representatives in the House to offer a budget substitute on the floor that matches the resolution they voted for in May.

Some 12 days ago, I outlined the basic elements of a bipartisan tax plan that provides multiyear, across-the-board cuts in individual tax rates, and it is an essential feature of our overall economic program. A bill incorporating these principles was introduced last week by [Republican] Congressman Barber Conable and Democratic Congressman Kent Hance. I'm pleased to report from conversations with Senators and Congressmen, I'm convinced there is a gathering bipartisan consensus for this tax bill.

Therefore, I'm asking Congress today to live up to its original commitment and deliver to my desk before the August recess, not one but two bills -- a spending bill and a tax bill. Only then can we say as elected representatives that we truly deserve a rest.

The President. Well, what I meant then in my remarks at Notre Dame and what I believe now about what we're seeing tie together. I just think that it is impossible -- and history reveals this -- for any form of government to completely deny freedom to people and have that go on interminably. There eventually comes an end to it. And I think the things we're seeing, not only in Poland but the reports that are beginning to come out of Russia itself about the younger generation and its resistance to long-time government controls, is an indication that communism is an aberration. It's not a normal way of living for human beings, and I think we are seeing the first, beginning cracks, the beginning of the end.

Q. Mr. President, have you learned anything in the past 10 days that would support Israel's contention that its attack on the Iraqi nuclear plant was defensive? If it was defensive, was it proper? If it wasn't defensive, what action should the United States take beyond condemnation?

The President. Well, I did make a statement in which I condemned that and thought that there were other options that might have been considered -- that we would have welcomed an opportunity, for example, to try and intervene with the French who were furnishing the nuclear fuel and so forth.

I can't answer the last part of your question there about future action, because this is still under review. Under the law I had to submit to the Congress the fact that this did appear to be a violation of the law regarding American weapons that were sold for defensive purposes. But I've not heard back yet from the Congress, and that review is not yet complete.

On the other hand, I do think that one has to recognize that Israel had reason for concern in view of the past history of Iraq, which has never signed a cease-fire or recognized Israel as a nation, has never joined in any peace effort for that -- so, in other words, it does not even recognize the existence of Israel as a country.

But I think the biggest thing that comes out of what happened is the fact that this is further evidence that a real peace, a settlement for all of the Mideast problems, is long overdue, that the area is torn by tension and hostility. We have seen Afghanistan invaded with the Soviets, Iran invaded by Iraq, and that was in violation of a treaty. Lebanon's sovereignty has been violated routinely. Now this latest act. And I think that what it should be is a compelling move -- and this I have stated to the representatives of several Arab countries -- a compelling reason why we should once and for all settle this matter and have a stable peace.

The President. No, I can't answer that, because, as I say, this review has not been completed. But what I would have to say is I think, in looking at the circumstances that I outlined earlier, that we can recognize that very possibly in conducting that mission, Israel might have sincerely believed it was a defensive move.

Q. Mr. President, a couple of times in recent weeks your staff has told us that you were not quite ready to make a major foreign policy address and declined the opportunity to do so. In light of recent events in the Middle East and in Eastern Europe, have you given some serious thought to a foreign policy program across the board, and, if so, could you give us today some of the outlines of your foreign policy beyond your often-expressed determination to stand up to the Soviets?

The President. Well, there seems to be a feeling as if an address on foreign policy is somehow evidence that you have a foreign policy, and until you make an address, you don't have one. And I challenge that. I'm satisfied that we do have a foreign policy.

I have met with eight heads of state already, representatives of nine other nations. The Secretary of State is making his second trip and is now in China and is going to meet with the ASEAN nations in the Philippines and then go on for a meeting in New Zealand. The Deputy Secretary of State has been in Africa and is now returning by way of Europe. I have been in personal communication by mail with President Brezhnev.

I don't necessarily believe that you must, to have a foreign policy, stand up and make a wide declaration that this is your foreign policy. I've spoken about a number of areas. We are going forward with a program, a tripartite program, dealing with Central America and the Caribbean. We have tried to deal with various areas of the world -- both Asia, Africa, and in Europe. And so as to an address, I definitely did not do one at commencements, because I happen to believe, as I said at Notre Dame, that it has been traditional for people in my position to go and use a graduation ceremony as a forum for making an address that was of no interest particularly or no connection to the occasion, but just for wide dissemination. And I thought that the young people who were graduating deserved a speech, whether good or bad, that was aimed at them.

Q. Mr. President, can we return to the Mideast situation for a moment? Several of the Mideast leaders, most particularly Syria, say that because of the Israeli raid and the U.S. response to it that envoy Habib's peace mission is virtually eliminated, that it's permanently damaged. Do you agree with that, and if so, why not?

The President. I hope it isn't. I know that he's still there, and he has left Saudi Arabia now for Damascus. And I think that he's done a miraculous job so far when you stop to think that when we sent him there, they literally had the weapons cocked and ready for war. And it's been several weeks now, and no war has happpened. It would be just further tragic evidence if this latest happening should turn this off. But till he comes home and says, ``I give up,'' why, I'm going to believe that we can do it.

Q. Mr. President, how appropriate do you believe is Israel's decision not to sign the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty and not to submit to inspections by the International Atomic Energy Agency? And I have a followup.

The President. Well, I haven't given very much thought to that particular question there, the subject about them not signing that treaty or, on the other hand, how many countries do we know that have signed it that very possibly are going ahead with nuclear weapons? It's, again, something that doesn't lend itself to verification.

It is difficult for me to envision Israel as being a threat to its neighbors. It is a nation that from the very beginning has lived under the threat from neighbors that they did not recognize its right to exist as a nation.

The President. Well, our position is -- and it is unqualified -- that we're opposed to the proliferation of nuclear weapons and do everything in our power to prevent it. I don't believe, however, that that should carry over into the development of nuclear power for peaceful purposes. And so, it increases the difficulty, if you're going to encourage the one, because you have at least opened a crack in the door where someone can proceed to the development of weapons.

But I'm not only opposed to the proliferation of nuclear weapons, but, as I've said many times, I would like to enter into negotiations leading toward a definite, verifiable reduction of strategic nuclear weapons worldwide.

Q. Mr. President, at a recent White House meeting Senator Edward Kennedy asked if you'd refuse to lead the fight against his legislation on handgun control, or Saturday night specials, sales of Saturday night specials. What was your answer?

The President. Well, we had a very nice talk. And I told him that I believe that some of the things that we had tried in California served better, and that is to make the penalties for the carrying of a weapon, particularly in the commission of a crime, much stiffer than they are. California -- we added 5 to 15 years to the prison sentence for anyone carrying a gun in the commission of a crime -- convicted of that crime, whether they used the gun or not. And since, that's been augmented to include no probation -- mandatory prison sentence.

I believe in that, because my concern about gun control is that it's taking our eyes off what might be the real answers to crime. It's diverting our attention. There are today more than 20,000 gun control laws in effect -- Federal, State, and local -- in the United States. Indeed, some of the stiffest gun control laws in the nation are right here in the District, and they didn't seem to prevent a fellow a few weeks ago from carrying one down by the Hilton Hotel. In other words, they are virtually unenforceable.

Q. Mr. President, every President since Dwight Eisenhower seems to believe that if the Soviet Union and the United States actually get into a shooting war, say, in Europe, can't be contained and it would spread to a thermonuclear war. Do you agree?

The President. Well, it's a frightening possibility, and history bears it out. If we want to look for one little bit of optimism anyplace, the only time that I can recall in history that a weapon possessed by both sides was never used was in World War II -- the use of poison gas. And possibly it was because the weapon was available to both sides. But the weapons are there, and they do extend to the battlefield use as well -- the tactical weapons as well as the strategic.

Q. Sir, I have a followup. I ask the question, because I suppose that your defense strategy depends on whether you think if the Soviets invade Western Europe, a tactical nuclear war could be fought there and contained, or whether you think that it would spread inevitably to a thermonuclear exchange. What do you think?

The President. I thought I answered it. I try to be optimistic and think that the threat of both sides would keep it from happening, and yet, at the same time, as I say, history seems to be against that, that there comes a moment in desperation when one side tries to get an advantage over the other.

Q. Mr. President, about 10 days ago your Chief of Staff said on a television interview program that he thought you were committed to running for a second term. And another aide of yours, Lyn Nofziger, has said virtually the same thing. Can you tell us, sir, if you are committed to running for a second term?

The President. No, but I've neither ruled in or ruled out whether I would run again, and it's something that for the first 4 years in Sacramento I always refused to answer about. And one of the reasons I refuse to answer is because I, myself, am determined that any decisions that we make in this administration are not going to be made based on whether they might have an effect on a coming election. There will be no political ramifications to them. But I'll make that decision when we get closer to that.

Q. Mr. President, for months you said you wouldn't modify your tax cut plan, and then you did. And when the business community vociferously complained, you changed your plan again. I just wondered whether Congress and other special interest groups might get the message that if they yelled and screamed loud enough, you might modify your tax plan again?

And the suggestions that were offered in the negotiations that led to that were suggestions that I had to admit were good ones. The marriage penalty tax, the making it possible for workers to save money for their own retirement and have an income tax break for that reason, the adjustment of the investment funds, the 70-percent ceiling to 50 and so forth -- all of these things, I thought, were worth -- and to put them into the bill, they were all things -- and that including the estate tax, which you've heard me in the campaign say many times I wanted to eventually eliminate -- all of those were things that we had said would be in a second tax package when we could do it. By making the change that I made in that across-the-board cut, that provided most of the revenue that made it possible to move those up into the first.

I can't retreat, and I don't think the people want us to. The latest polls that we have show that 79 percent of the people approve of the individual tax cut and approve of it over a 3-year span. And that, I think, should be a message to anyone who's elected to office on the Hill or elsewhere.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Your administration to some extent has been called an administration or a Presidency of the wealthy. I'm wondering if you have laid out any programs in your administration, currently, that will provide for increasing the viability of minority business and other programs that relate to business development for minorities?

The President. All of these things that you just mentioned there, increasing the viability of minority business and so forth, all of these are matters of the policy of an administration and what we intend to do.

I've heard these charges about our supposedly being an administration for the wealthy. I don't see where they fit. We have watched the so-called social reforms for three of four decades now fail in trying to lift people that are not in the mainstream and that don't have their foot on the ladder of opportunity, and they failed.

As a matter of fact, what they've created is a kind of bondage in which the people are made subservient to the government that is handing out the largesse, and the only people who prosper from them is that large bureaucracy that administers them. And I believe that our economic package is aimed at stimulating the economy, providing incentive, increasing productivity so as to create new jobs. And those jobs will make it possible for those people who are now economically below the norm to get a foot on the ladder and improve themselves. And, as some of the other programs, that is a case of how you direct the administering of the programs, such as aid to small business. And I would think, for one, the minority community and the black community has the most to gain from the development of small business within their neighborhoods.

If you will compare those communities to other ethnic communities of various kinds, you will find that the money that is spent in those communities almost from the first dollar -- there is no turnover. It is spent outside that community. In the others the dollars turn over as much as five and six times before they leave that community and go out into the general economy. And it is that turnover that multiplies the effect. And right now the black community has about $140 billion that is not basically, even from the first dollar, being spent in their own communities.

Q. Mr. President, as you know, the Israeli Government has made the threat that it might take military action to wipe out the Syrian missiles in Lebanon. If that were to be done against our wishes, would you consider that a violation of the terms of the laws under which the Israelis have obtained those weapons?

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. As everyone knows, this is your first news conference since you were shot, and I think everybody has the impression that you have fully recovered. My first question is, have you fully recovered? And secondly, can you tell us how having been shot has changed you? Have you become more cautious, or are there any differences?

No, you can't spend your life worrying about that. I'm quite sure that there will be and have been changes in -- I look back now and wonder why it didn't happen 30 times before -- changes in alertness on the part of security and so forth. But it hasn't made too much of a change in how we do, and I still want to be able to see the people and meet them.

Q. Mr. President, Secretary Haig, as you know, announced in China today that the United States is lifting its ban against lethal weapons sales to the People's Republic of China. I want to know if you would explain to the American people, please, why you've decided to help the People's Republic of China rearm militarily and how you think the Soviet Union will react to your action?

The President. Well, I don't know how the Soviet Union wil react, but all we have done is -- with the People's Republic of China, we've wanted -- and I've said for a long time -- to improve relations with them, move them to the same status of many other countries and not necessarily military allies of ours, in making certain technology and defensive weapons available to them. And I think this is a normal part of the process of improving our relations there.

Q. Mr. President, do you approve of conservative fundraising groups such as NCPAC [National Conservative Political Action Committee] making these expensive television commercials targeting liberal Democrats for defeat in the next election?

The President. I don't really know how to answer that, because the game of politics is trying to win an election. And I've never seen the time when both parties have not been doing everything they can to win an election.

I think one of the things that does not set too well with me is that to campaign before there is a candidate on your side means that you're campaigning totally in a negative way. And I've always believed that you campaign by stressing what it is your candidate would do and your approval of it.

Q. If I may follow up on that, sir, is it really a sense of fair play that these groups with all their money are, in effect, ganging up on one Member of Congress to make him an object lesson for other wavering Congressmen who might not see things their way?

Q. Mr. President, you said earlier that you strongly oppose the proliferation of nuclear weapons. Yet at the same time, you are asking Congress to waive an American law so that Pakistan, which has refused to sign the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty, can receive $3 billion in American aid.

The President. Let me just say with regard to Pakistan -- and I won't answer the last part of the question -- we have had a long-time treaty with Pakistan in a mutual aid pact. But Pakistan is also in a very strategic position now in view of what has happened to Afghanistan. And I believe it is in our best interest to be supportive of Pakistan.

What has happened now is in this same way we see them putting into effect cuts that they know cannot last. In other words, we think it is designed to really destroy, in a sense, the program that we're trying to implement in putting these cuts in -- this drastic cut that has been proposed in impact aid, which would do what you have said. We're hoping that the Congressmen in the Budget Committee -- they will correct some of those things that have been done, and if not then, as I said, we'll go along with those Congressmen, many of them Democrats, who want to put in a substitute bill, and we would then meet the Senate bill in a conference committee.

Q. Mr. President, how do you assess the current situation in Poland? And the second part of that is whether the warming up on relations, especially in the strategic military area with China, has any connection in your mind with events in Poland?

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Returning once to that question of lifting of the lethal arms sales shipments to China, does that affect in any way our relationship with Taiwan, and if so, how? Does that move us in any direction either to or away from the Government of Taiwan?

The President. No, and I have not changed my feeling about Taiwan. We have an act, a law, called the Taiwan Relations Act, that provides for defensive equipment being sold to Taiwan as well as other things in the relationship. And I intend to live up to the Taiwan Relations Act.

The President. We're out? Sam, you told me that it was all right about walking away from all those upraised hands, and I have to tell you, it still bothers me very much. I'm sorry that we can't answer all the questions.

I'm trying to find out something about his boyhood, because we didn't live on the wrong side of the railroad tracks, but we lived so close to them we could hear the whistle real loud. And I know very much about the working group. I grew up in poverty and got what education I got all by myself and so forth, and I think it is sheer demagoguery to pretend that this economic program which we've submitted is not aimed at helping the great cross section of people in this country that have been burdened for too long by big government and high taxes. From 10 to 50 to 60 thousand dollars covers, certainly, all the middle class, and they pay 72 percent of the tax. And 73 percent of our tax relief or more is going to that bracket of workers. And we're going to do our utmost to keep that bottom rung of the ladder clear for those people that haven't yet started to climb.

The President. I wonder what would happen if I said that in trying to express our gratitude, I was now going to talk for about 55 minutes. [Laughter] No, I'm not. But the 444 days of the hostage crisis were trying times for this country, and they were not a time of which any world citizen can be proud. What the Iranians did was a breach of international law and the rules by which states live together.

Against the background of those difficult days, however, several acts of individual heroism reminded us of man's nobler sides. There was the courage of those participating in the daring rescue mission, some of whom gave their lives.

We're today honoring another act of courage, this one with a happier ending in which the courage and ingenuity were rewarded by success after 79 days. I'd like to sketch briefly the events of those 79 days, to describe not only Ambassador Taylor's courage but also the contribution of all the Canadian Embassy personnel in Tehran and the Canadian Government in Ottawa.

Four days after the storming of the American Embassy, Ambassador Taylor received a call from five Americans who had escaped from the Embassy when it was overrun. They were hiding, but they were afraid that they'd soon be discovered and captured. Ambassador Taylor immediately recommended to his government in Ottawa that Americans be given shelter. Without any hesitation, the Canadian Government granted the permission. Two days later, the Americans were taken to Ambassador Taylor's residence and that of another Canadian Embassy family, the John Sheardowns. Two weeks later, another American joined his five compatriots. For 79 days, they lived there pretending to be visitors. I understand they're the best-read and the most skilled Scrabble players in all of North America.

There were several tense moments in the weeks that followed. At one point, an article was imminent in a Montreal paper which would have disclosed the story of the sheltered Americans. In an admirable display of responsibility, the journalist who had written the article agreed to withdraw it from publication. However, from this article, and more immediately from an anonymous phone call to the Taylor's residence asking to speak to two of the escapees, Ambassador Taylor knew that the chances of his guests being discovered were high.

At this point, the Canadian Government in Ottawa and the Embassy began the ingenious preparations for an escape. The Canadian Government agreed to issue fictitious passports to the Americans. The Canadian Embassy staff began making flights in and out of Tehran to establish a travel pattern and to learn airport procedures.

Finally, on January 28th, 1980, the Americans packed the bags that were given them by their Canadian hosts with the clothes also given to them. Using their Canadian passports, they flew out of the country. Ambassador Taylor and three others of his staff saw them off and then left themselves. Even this brief outline of those 79 days highlights what a team effort it was.

The Canadian Department of External Affairs in Ottawa and the Canadian Cabinet responded with speed and decisiveness to help an ally. Ambassador Towe is here today representing the Canadian Government. The U.S. State Department is represented today by Ambassador Stoessel, and there were others who were working at the State Department during the crisis who played a part with discretion and skill. And here today also is Representative Daniel Akaka, the sponsor, and several of his co-sponsors, of the legislation which resulted in the gold medal which I am going to present today.

Mrs. Taylor is here with her husband and was directly involved with him in this deed. She shared the risks. She did much of the work. It was at her residence that several of the Americans were actually staying. And, finally, it's my great honor to present the medal to Kenneth Taylor whose valor, ingenuity, and steady nerves made possible this one happy chapter in the agony of those 444 days of hostage crisis.

Ambassador Taylor. Thank you. Thank you very much, President Reagan. I'm very honored to receive this recognition on behalf of all Canadians who participated in whatever we could contribute to the welfare of the U.S. citizens.

I think what I'd like to say is best expressed by Honorable Frank Annunzio, chairman of the committee, during the course of Representative Akaka's resolution. That is, he said, ``To me, the medal represents the gratitude and thanks of every American not only to Ambassador Taylor but to his staff, the Government of Canada, and indeed every Canadian.'' And it's in that sense that I'm very honored to receive the medal.

At this time, it's a very perplexing and unique situation to be a diplomat. At the same time as serious questions are being asked as to the validity of the career as opposed to earlier times, there are some who are challenging the very right of diplomats to convery their country's message and attempt to create international disorders such as we experienced in Tehran. It's therefore very reassuring and a sense of pride to all diplomats to have seen the dignity and professionalism with which U.S. citizens in Tehran conducted themselves and also the unselfish courage and heroism of the eight who lost their lives attempting to right the balance.

The presentation of the Congressional Gold Medal, President Reagan, not only means a great deal to myself and my family, but I think it underlines the very unique and very special relationship between Canada and the United States.

The United States faces the rebuffs of history with patience, determination, and a search for justice. For this, you have gained the everlasting respect of all Canadians. Moreover, your generosity, great generosity to all, your tolerance, cements the long-lasting and precious friendship which Canadians and United States citizens share.

Section 1. Establishment. (a) There is established the President's Commission on Housing. The Commission shall be composed of not more than twenty-two (22) members from private life and from State and local governments who shall be appointed by the President.

Sec. 3. Administration. (a) Members of the Commission shall serve without compensation. However, they shall be entitled to travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, as authorized by law for persons serving intermittently in the government service (5 U.S.C. 5701 - 5707), to the extent funds are available therefor.

Sec. 4. General. (a) Notwithstanding any other Executive Order, the responsibilities of the President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act, as amended, except that of reporting annually to the Congress, which are applicable to the advisory committee established by this Order, shall be performed by the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development in accordance with guidelines and procedures established by the Administrator of General Services.

Five State medical schools have been established under the Veterans Administration Medical School Assistance and Health Manpower Training Act of 1972, but due to some unavoidable delays, they may lose some of the funds that were allocated to them.

House resolution 2156 provides an additional year for the medical schools to use the moneys that were allocated by the original act. These moneys allocated to improve the health care of veterans will not be withdrawn simply because of unavoidable delays that prevented meeting of artificial deadlines set within the original legislation. We owe more than money to those who wore their country's uniform and sacrificed in our behalf, and will not waiver in our obligation to them.

The President. This is the only question I'll take on that. Let me explain something about that. We did have -- it wasn't possible for me to get out there. We did have representatives who met with the original group that came in protesting and were demonstrating, you might say. And they were satisfied that we were doing the things that they were there asking for with regard to Agent Orange and the doubling of money for research on that, helping the veterans increasing the -- we're doubling the amount also for the Veterans Treatment Centers, the Vietnam Veterans Treatment Centers, and we are also going forward witha program for what is known as effects of delayed stress. And this latter group then came in and apparently were unwilling to accept that these things had already been agreed to.

The President. I know that Secretary Pierce shares my delight that Bill McKenna has accepted the Chairmanship and Carla Hills the Vice Chairmanship of the President's Commission on Housing. And they, along with the 20 members of the Commission who'll be named today, represent a great reservoir of experience and background in this field.

Homeownership is the symbol of the family unit, the neighborhood, and is essential if we're going to have social, economic, and political stability in our land. The industry has been suffering from economic ups and downs, a roller coaster for the past two decades, and is suffering today. Our economic recovery program is the key, I think, to long-term recovery for that particular industry and for homeownership in the land.

This Commission is going to be taking a hard look at all aspects of housing -- financing, costs, construction, the Federal housing programs -- and in addition, is going to look at how much government should be in housing, and come up with options for a national housing policy, and what we can do to maximize in the private sector homeownership.

The Commission will advise the President and the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development with respect to options for the development of a national housing policy and the role and objectives of the government in future housing availability.

The President today announced the appointment of David R. Gergen to be Assistant to the President for Communications. Mr. Gergen has been serving since January as Assistant to the President and Staff Director of the White House.

Under this reassignment, Mr. Gergen will be filling a new post at the White House that will place him in charge of the White House Press Office, the Office of Communications, and the Speechwriting Office.

Mr. Gergen, 39, came to the White House staff from the American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research, where he had been serving as a resident fellow and managing editor of Public Opinion, a magazine he helped to cofound. He is currently on leave from AEI.

The President today announced the appointment of Larry Speakes to be Deputy Assistant to the President and principal Deputy Press Secretary to the President. Mr. Speakes is currently serving as Deputy Press Secretary.

It is with the deepest regret and appreciation for your long and outstanding service to our Nation that, at your request, I accept your retirement as Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States, effective July 3, 1981.

Throughout your distinguished judicial career you have shown unfailing dedication to the Court, to the highest standards of the legal profession, and to the fundamental principles and protections of our Constitution. Your opinions have reflected concern for striking appropriate balances between federal and state authority, between individual freedoms and the legitimate interests of community and government, and between preservation of our timeless values and the need to allow for reform and change. And you have expressed your views with special grace and lucidity, which will help make yours an enduring presence in our law.

When you came to the Court you swore to ``administer justice without respect to persons,'' and to ``do equal right to the poor and to the rich . . . agreeably to the Constitution and laws of the United States.'' You can leave with the assurance that you have kept your solemn oath.

Note: On the same day, the White House announced that the President and Justice Stewart had met at the White House on May 18, at which time the Justice gave the President a letter which expressed his intention to retire.

Since 1949 Dr. Van de Water has been president of Van de Water Associates, Inc., consultants to management. He is also executive vice president of Promanent International, Inc., specializing in the audiovisual presentation of professional management development programs. Dr. Van de Water created and served as the first director of the California State Bar Program for the Continuing Education of the Legal Profession. He has served as director of the executive program for UCLA's Graduate School of Management and as a member of that school's faculty for 20 years, and as adjunct professor of industrial relations and management at the Graduate School of Business Administration, University of Southern California.

Dr. Van de Water is an attorney at law and member of the California Bar. He has served as a representative of management for North American Aviation, Inc. and the Ford Motor Co. He has served on the labor arbitration and collective bargaining law committee of the American Bar Association and the labor relations committee of the United States Chamber of Commerce.

The votes taken today by the Senate Finance Committee are important first steps toward passage of a bipartisan tax reduction bill. On both votes there was widespread support from both sides of the aisle for administration objectives. I was especially gratified by the support shown for our proposed 5 - 10 - 10 reductions in individual income tax rates.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, I've been delighted to have a chance to renew a dialog with a man who I think is one of the most dynamic and experienced leaders on the world scene today. Prime Minister Lee deserves much credit not only for the outstanding progress that his country, Singapore, has made, but also for helping to forge the association of the Southeast Asian nations, what we call ASEAN, forge it into a strong and durable organization that it has become.

I count the Prime Minister as a longtime friend. We've had previous meetings, beginning with 10 years ago, and I know that he has an excellent understanding of what it is that we're trying to accomplish here in America.

We've had wide-ranging discussions involving events in several parts of the world, including Asia and Europe and the Middle East. And the Prime Minister welcomes our efforts to reinvigorate our alliances, strengthen our friendships, to consolidate the free world as we move through a very difficult period.

It's been my honor and pleasure to have him here as a distinguished visitor but also as a very good friend, and I count him among my closest associates and friends and have unlimited admiration for him.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, I was greatly privileged more than 10 years ago to have met you, and I count myself fortunate to have done so, because I thereby avoided the mistake of accepting the caricature that was purveyed up till the time the world decided that you were more than just a Governor and an actor. My admiration for you and the fact that I took your views seriously 10 years ago has been my good fortune.

I enjoyed the confidence you showed by sounding off on a wide range of issues, particularly on Asia, on ASEAN, on the evolving relationships between the United States and the countries of the West Pacific, the multiple implications of change in relationships between the countries of the Pacific Basin. Change is an inevitable facet of any dynamic world, and as we view it in historic perspective, I feel great confidence that this country, that has seen a President assassinated, has gone through the throes of 2 years of Watergate and a President that was being hounded and besieged, was able, through its constitutional processes, to throw up someone who has brought such a state of grace and confidence to Washington, to America, and to the world. And confidence in your ability to stand up for what you believe in and to find a way to overcome your economic difficulties, your inflation, your unemployment, in a way that makes it possible for you to live up to your defense commitments -- that is the crux to a safe and secure future for all of us, including the countries of ASEAN and Southeast Asia.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, I have a statement that I think is being or will be distributed, but I will, for the sound media, read it, not in its entirety, but enough of it for you to get the idea.

Forty-five days ago, the House of Representatives joined in a bipartisan commitment to bring runaway Federal spending under control. And that was an essential step toward national economic recovery, toward reducing inflation, creating more jobs, and lowering interest rates. But that was only a step. It required faithful implementation by the committees of the Congress.

And now we're approaching the crucial test. Next week, the House plans to vote on the single largest economic and budget reform package in history. During recent weeks, many House committees have made a good faith effort to help bring this Federal spending under control. And I applaud them for their efforts. But in two major instances, the bill that is emerging in the House Budget Committee has serious shortcomings.

First, many of the measures that are needed to curb the automatic spending programs have not been adopted. These reforms would target programs more directly toward the truly needy while they help to eliminate waste and abuse.

Unfortunately, the House committee has adopted only one-third of the savings that these reforms would bring. And the result, if unchallenged, will be $23 billion in additional red ink and inflationary pressure in the next several years. Doing only one-third of the job is not good enough.

Secondly, certain House committees have not yet received the message of last November that the American people want less bureaucratic overhead in Washington and less redtape tying up State and local government. Consequently, these committees rejected my proposed consolidation of 86 duplicative, regulated-ridden Federal programs into block grants.

Now, I believe that we should permit many social programs to be administered by State and local governments, which best know the needs of their people and the priorities for meeting them. Instead, some of the House committees want to hang on to the strings and the Washington bureaucracy. And this means extra administrative costs at the expense of services for the people.

I have spoken to most of the Governors in the country and many of the mayors, to the National Association of State Legislators. All of them have told me they can absorb the cuts in the categorical grants that were made if they have the flexibility that block grants would bring. And now they're going to get the cuts but without that flexibility if some in the Congress or some committees have their way.

Now, our nation's needs are too important to tolerate this ``business as usual'' attitude on Capitol Hill. For these reasons, three leaders in the House, earlier this afternoon, announced plans to offer a bipartisan amendment that would fulfill the commitment of the original Gramm-Latta resolution.

The American people have waited patiently and for 8 months for the full-scale attack on runaway spending. Adoption by the House of the bipartisan Gramm-Latta amendment next week will be a major step toward ensuring that the will of the people is carried out. And there can be no doubt that we can and we will stop this fiscal joyride in Washington. And I am going to be in full support and help of that amendment.

The President. Well, by dint of persuasion and reason, pointing out the messages that have been brought to me already from industry in the United States of billions of dollars of planned expansion and modernization that is going to take place, the kind of thing that will increase productivity and provide more jobs. And they have stated to me voluntarily that they are planning these billions of dollars of spending based on the expectations of the program that we presented.

The President. This morning, to tell him how much -- that I could go along with the bulk of what came out of the committees, but that there was just this narrow area in the entire program and asked if he would permit a one-time vote on a single amendment so that we could have a vote by the Congress one way or the other on this amendment.

Forty-three days ago the House of Representatives joined in a bipartisan commitment to bring runaway Federal spending under control. That was an essential step toward national economic recovery -- toward reducing inflation, creating more jobs, and lowering interest rates. But that was only a step. It required faithful implementation by the committees of the Congress.

Now we are approaching a crucial test. Next week, the House plans to vote on the single largest economic and budget reform package in history. During recent weeks many House committees have made a good faith effort to help bring Federal spending under control. I applaud them for their efforts. But in two major instances, the bill that is emerging in the House Budget Committee has serious shortcomings.

First, many of the measures needed to curb automatic spending programs have not been adopted. These reforms would target programs more directly toward the truly needy while they help to eliminate waste and abuse.

Unfortunately, the House committees adopted only one-third of the savings that these reforms would bring. The result, if unchallenged, will be $23 billion in additional red ink and inflationary pressure in the next several years. Doing only one-third of the job is not good enough.

I believe we should permit many social programs to be administered by State and local governments -- which best know the needs of their people and the priorities for meeting them. Instead, some House committees want to hang onto the strings and Washington bureaucracy. This means extra administrative costs at the expense of services for people.

Our nation's needs are too important to tolerate this ``business as usual'' attitude on Capitol Hill. For these reasons, three leaders in the House earlier this afternoon announced plans to offer a bipartisan amendment that would fulfill the commitment of the original Gramm-Latta resolution. After consultation with Hill leaders, I have decided today to throw my full support behind this amendment.

The American people have waited patiently 8 months for a full-scale attack on runaway spending. Adoption by the House of the bipartisan Gramm-Latta amendment next week will be a major step toward ensuring that the will of the people is carried out. Let there be no doubt: We can and we will put a stop to the fiscal joyride in Washington.

I maybe shouldn't admit this, but I went to a very small school in the Midwest, and my senior year -- it was the conference that this school was in, had a rule which you could employ someone as an athletic instructor and still leave them eligible to play -- in my senior year, on the starting 11, there were 7 physical ed instructors, and I was the swimming coach. [Laughter] For 8 years, I will also confess though that I didn't know very much about grades like A's and B's, scholastically. The eligibility requirement was a C average, and that became my top goal.

Speaking of that, there was one that I know -- there are some people, if I read the guest list correctly -- there are some people here who know this particular fellow. I found myself in football -- I was a guard -- right guard -- [laughter] -- and I was playing against a fellow who later was All-Pro Tackle with the Chicago Bears for 8 years -- George Musso. And as you will recall, in those days you played both offense and defense. So, for 60 minutes I was opposite him. He outweighed me 100 pounds -- [laughter] -- and it was a busy time. I couldn't go under him. I wouldn't do that. [Laughter] And I certainly couldn't go over him. I tried going around him once and ran into one of our men coming around him from the other side. [Laughter] It liked to kill me.

Years later, another champ, the Brown Bomber, Joe Louis, would capture our hearts. And what American can forget the pride that swept this country last year when our U.S. ice hockey team beat the Russians? The image of those boys after the victory on the ice with their country's flag in their hand, I think, is a national treasure.

We owe something else, seriously, to the world of sports. When I was broadcasting major league baseball, there was a rule barring some Americans from playing in organized baseball. And I'm proud that I was one of those in the sports-reporting fraternity who continually editorialized against that rule, that baseball was for Caucasian gentlemen only. And finally, thanks to Branch Rickey and Jackie Robinson, baseball became truly the American sport.

And I'm sure many people have forgotten any feelings of prejudice they might have had as they've cheered black athletes who were bringing home victory for their favorite team. Those players have made baseball better, they've made America better, and so have the great black athletes in all the other major sports.

If there was ever a golden age of sports, this is it. More people are attending sporting events than ever before, and there are a wider variety of sports events today. And just as important, there are more people involving themselves directly in sports. We can be proud of our country's sports tradition. And as spokesman of all our citizens, I want to thank all of you -- the sports men and women this afternoon -- for adding a bit of joy and inspiration to our lives with the achievements that you've made.

Over the last several weeks, I think we'll all agree the American people have begun to believe in the President and the Congress and believe that we can really solve the problems that face this Nation. And your vote on the Gramm-Latta measure, I think, was the principal reason for them feeling that way, and I want to thank you for that. I think I understand the courage it took for all of you to support that resolution, and I think you have the gratitude of your fellow citizens today. But the people may be disappointed. Reconciliation, which has a lot of meanings but the particular one where we're concerned right now, may turn out to be the difference between what you voted for in Gramm-Latta and what the people are actually going to get if the budget committee package goes through.

The new Gramm-Latta bipartisan reconciliation bill is true to the principles of the original resolution. It is a compromise accepting the majority of the committee recommendations -- and I must say, I think that in the majority that most of the committees did do a fine job, and there was no problem at all in accepting what they brought forth. But there were a few that brought down things that would make us fall more than $20 billion short of what we need over the next 3 years. And what we're talking about, of course, in the son of Gramm-Latta, is how to correct these so that those with the majority reports that came out of the committees could be put before the House.

I think it deserves to be put before the House for an up-or-down vote. And I called the Speaker and asked him if he would permit either a substitute or an amendment containing that package to be added to those, the majority that we would accept. I've had no answer. And apparently I know what the answer is.

Another bipartisan effort -- and I think probably we should mention this morning -- is the effort representing, again, a compromise between congressional proposals and the administration's original proposal, and that's the Conable-Hance tax reduction bill.

I have retreated from 10 - 10 - 10 retroactive to last January 1st to 5 - 10 - 10 to be effective as of this coming October 1st, but accepted -- and very willingly -- a number of changes, particularly around the business tax and others that were recommended even by some of you, but in the negotiations that have been going on. And I believe that proposal will restore the economy, stimulate savings, investment, and increase productivity.

I've just received a report the last few days from 15 of the major steel companies in the United States. These 15 companies, between them, are planning a number of modernization and rehabilitation and expansion projects that total $3.2 billion. Now, I know that some are concerned that maybe the business tax is going to inspire plants to leave where they are and move to other areas and so forth. So, I've broken down the projects to just see if there might be anything to that.

These 15 companies, with their $3.2 billion proposed spending, 12 of them will be in the Northeast in the already existing plants, 15 will be in the Midwest, and I'm including Ohio and Arkansas in the Midwest. I'm sometimes not sure whether they're in border areas, whether the East considers one East and the South considers the other South, but if you consider them Midwest, there are 15 there. Six will be in the South, three in the West, and only one project unspecified as yet. And all of this was planned and decided upon, in their report they say, with the expectation that the economic package is going to be passed. Now, what are we going to do with that package for the economy if just simply the promise of it has brought that about after all the years of the deterioration and the aging in that very basic industry?

The Conable-Hance tax program targets 70 percent of the income tax relief to the people in the $5,000 to $50,000 earning bracket, who presently pay 67 percent of the tax. I simply throw that in as an answer to those who are still attacking the bill as somehow being slanted to the more affluent. And of course we know the income tax cut isn't really very much of a cut, because there is built into the system an increase that will amount to 22 percent over the next 3 years. And our tax calls for 25-percent reduction, so we're basically just eliminating this enormous tax increase.

You know, it's always heartening to see young people in politics, and it is especially for me, because when I first became active and ran for Governor in California, it was in those riotous days of the sixties. Now, during the last election, the difference was that I couldn't help but notice that wherever we went, there was a large contingent of Teen Age Republicans who were working their hearts out in the campaign.

I understand that your organization has almost 120,000 members with clubs spread throughout the 50 States. Our country does offer an opportunity to participate in the political process. Remember, it's the activists, the ones who put out the time and effort, who determine the future. And your activities are certainly a chance to learn about government, but more than that, you're actually making history.

I want to thank you for all that you've done and what you will do for our party. And one can't help but have renewed confidence in seeing all of you today. So, good luck at your leadership conference.

And now, before I have to get back in there for some things that have still to be done today, I think you should know, if you don't already know, that some congratulations are in order. And I'm delighted to have this chance to announce today Paul Findley's -- Paul, where are you? Where's Congressman Paul Findley? Way in the back? Well, I can't ask him then if it's all right for me to tell him how many -- but let me just show how easy it is. Today Paul Findley celebrates his 60th birthday. Yes, that makes him a lot younger than the President, who also happens to be in good health. And, incidentally, Paul Findley's from Pittsfield, Illinois, represents the 20th District and is serving his 11th term here in the House.

Well, as I say -- I'm stalling now because I hate to have to leave and go back in there -- [laughter] -- but you've brightened the day considerably by being here, and you've brightened a lot of other days.

I can tell you one of the other reasons I hate to go back in there. You can hear this crack in my voice. That doesn't have anything to do with an incident of several weeks ago. I have found out that I have an allergic reaction to air-conditioning, and we're in the season in Washington where you can't live without air-conditioning and closing the windows. So, I guess I'll be this way till I get to California, which I'm going to do, beginning tomorrow morning. I'm starting on some speaking trips and will wind up in California. So, maybe I'll at least have a few days in which I can talk normally.

Well, welcome all of you here. I'm a little surprised. My schedule said that I was supposed to meet with the House Members of the minority party. You don't act like a minority party. You act more like people who know that the ideas, your ideas, are shared and supported by the majority of the American people, and I think they are. And we're delighted to have you here.

It's no secret that we've been trying hard, as you know, to build a strong, bipartisan support for the economic recovery program. I don't doubt that's what the American people want, and I think that we know that that's what the American economy needs. But it's just as important that every one of you knows how positive and decisive your own contribution has become. Because you stuck together and refused to break ranks, we succeeded in passing the tightest spending ceiling and the largest budget reduction in the history of this country on May 7th. But now we need your help, your unity more than ever.

As you know, not all of the House committees have fully implemented the spending reductions in Gramm-Latta. So, just to hit the $695 billion spending target next year and achieve a balanced budget in 1984, we need $46 billion in savings in automatic spending programs over the next 3 years. And we can do that if we're just given a fair chance to vote on the new son of Gramm-Latta amendment and if all of you will stand with us shoulder to shoulder.

Now, it isn't easy to restrict benefits, I know, in food stamps, subsidized housing, student loans, or other programs. But if we ever again want to see low inflation, low interest rates, a sound dollar, and a prosperous people, we have no choice but to make these tough decisions now. And believe me, Americans do want and will remember your leadership.

The same holds true with the block grant proposals. I can't, in good conscience, believe that we should cut over 80 health, education, and social programs by 25 percent and then leave the Federal overhead and the bureaucratic redtape intact. It's the wrong approach. I know that the 50 Governors are ready to go with us all the way on the block grants and take the cut. And they say they'll make it work if we'll give them the flexibility to run those programs as they believe they should be run when they get to their level. And I speak with some experience from having been in that spot. And I know how much of the total spending is just sheer administrative overhead and waste.

Now, let's also make it plain that we're determined to reduce tax rates over the next 3 years by 25 percent across the board for every American taxpayer. And we won't settle for less, because anything less than that is no tax cut at all. It won't provide the incentive needs to create new jobs, to make our economy grow, and to renew the feelings of hope and optimism throughout America.

I know a few shrill voices criticize the tax bill as benefits for the wealthy. Well, in point of fact, we're cutting taxes for people who pay taxes -- the people earning between 5 thousand and 50 thousand dollars now pay 67 percent of all of the income tax. They'll receive 70 percent of the total cut. It's ironic to me that some of those who now are criticizing us are the very people who approve doubling the taxes on the American people in just the last 5 years. They've actually doubled.

So, let me just remind you not to take your eye off the ball. We're trying to give the economy back to the American people. That's what they deserve, and I think they'll support us if we continue to hang tough.

Lincoln, that first Republican President, once said, ``I am not bound to win but am bound to be true.'' He said that because he believed in the uncommon wisdom of the common people. I know you do too, and that's why if all of us remain true to our principles, we can be confident that America's greatest days are still to come.

This morning I told some Democratic Congressmen -- I know that some of you have concerns that maybe some of our business cuts are going to stimulate leaving areas like the industrial Northeast and Midwest and fleeing to the Sun Belt. Well, I've just received a report from 15 steel companies, the major steel producers in this country, and those 15 steel producers have many more than 15 expansion and modernization programs that they have given the go-ahead -- to in their own plants, already established plants, not building new plants. And of all of those, 13 of them are in plants in the Northeast, 15 of them are in plants in the Midwest, if all of you agree with me that Ohio and Arkansas are in the Midwest. [Laughter] I'm never quite sure. I debated a little whether to put them in the East or Midwest and decided, being a Midwesterner, I'll settle for the Midwest. And there are five, I believe, in the West and three in the South and only one that is actually not specified as yet. But that's the total number of $3.2 billion worth of modernization and expansion in the steel industry. And they made the decision to go ahead. They have said in that report on the basis of the economic package and their belief that it is going to be adopted and that that gives them the confidence to go forward and expand in this way.

Now, what you're hearing in my voice does not have anything to do with the state of my health. I think it has to do with -- this is about the 18th time today that I've had to stand up and speak, and I'm going to get the -- well, I'm going to get off of here -- [laughter] -- and mingle. I think that'll be a lot more fun.

But Gib Garrow, Gary Nagao, Jan Zook, and Christi Bartlett, my little friend -- hi. We met sometime ago in Washington. But I'm happy to be here this afternoon. All of the distinguished ladies and gentlemen here on the platform, the Jaycees deserve a thanks, I think, from all of us, for your incredible outpouring of creative participation in more than 8,000 local communities. You have sponsored programs touching everything from the assistance to the elderly, the handicapped, the mentally retarded, to sponsoring junior athletics, organizing energy conservation efforts, conducting cardiopulmonary resuscitation -- 200 lives saved just last year alone. And, Christi, I understand the Jaycees have set their goal for raising $2\1/2\ million for muscular dystrophy in the campaign this year. And if they say they're going to do it, they'll do it.

Well, these are just a few of the reasons why the Jaycees have always been a very special group for me. So, I'm delighted to have this chance to meet with you again and here in San Antonio. I know that Texas is first in a lot of things, but I'm glad to see it's still first in hospitality.

Now, you know, I didn't come here today to bear bad tidings. You know, if you're a fisherman, the best day to go fishing is yesterday; that's when they were biting. [Laughter] But that's only true for fishing. The good news I bring is that tomorrow will be better, and for one very good reason. You believe in America and so do I. And I believe that your Jaycee spirit has become the American spirit. It's even making inroads in one of the most remote, protected areas of our country -- the Federal bureaucracy in Washington, D.C.

Now, you might have heard a rumor to the effect that we've been suggesting a few changes in Washington in recent months. All we're really trying to do is return to some basic principles which have never failed us when we've lived up to them. For example, only by making government live within its means and restricting its role in our personal lives can we unleash the spirit of individual enterprise so essential to prosperity and the preservation of freedom itself. And the way we're doing this is by changing just one little two-letter word: control by government to control of government.

Now, we've made some progress, but the advocates of a different philosophy are manning the barricades in these puzzle palaces on the Potomac. But let's be clear about where the real credit goes for our progress to date. It goes to that great group of people with a much greater force than our own, the group comprising tens of millions of people, from every profession, every background, every region of this land. They don't consider themselves Democrats or Republicans so much as just deeply patriotic Americans, concerned about their country and determined to save its future while there's still time.

But now that you've tasted victory and heard some words of praise and are beginning to feel good, I'd better warn you I have a little favor to ask. Please understand it's strictly in the national interest. I simply ask you this: Are you willing to sit back, rest on your laurels, and retire from action with the battle only half won?

I think you want spending reductions that you approved in the bipartisan budget resolution of last month, May 7th. I think you want the 3-year across-the-board tax rate reduction for every American taxpayer -- and nothing less. And as I've said before, when Congress passed that bipartisan budget resolution, they took an historic step toward bringing spending and inflation under control.

I've been criticized for saying that spending was out of control. Well, what else describes it? Consider, for example, those programs which have spending increases built into them directly by the law.

In 1967 those automatic spending programs, what we called entitlements, amounted to $57 billion -- 1967. Next year, they'll amount to a staggering $428 billion, and our elected representatives don't have any control over them. If we do nothing to change these laws, the uncontrollable spending will grow to an unbelievable level of more than half a trillion dollars by 1984.

Now, these programs have truly turned out to be good intentions run amok, budgetary time bombs set to explode in the years ahead. Their effect is to pile an enormous new debt on the backs of our children, heavily mortgage their future for the sake of temporary social cures. Any economic solution which ignores the reforms of this automatic spending program is really no solution at all.

But let me also take a moment to give credit where credit is due. I can report to the American people that this Congress made enormous progress, and for most of what they've done they deserve the gratitude of the nation. In fact, the majority of committees in the House of Representatives have taken the necessary steps which followed that resolution. They then had to take the individual programs that were contained in that single resolution and implement them, and the majority have taken the necessary steps to help us gain control of the excessive spending by reporting out of their committees the changes that we needed.

Now I'm asking those remaining committees not in that majority group and the House leadership to join me in going that last mile. Together we can take those final steps toward a balanced budget in 1984 and save our economy from the roller coaster extremes that have caused the mess we're in.

While much progress has been made, there are too many automatic spending programs that still have not been reduced sufficiently, and without those added reductions, we will have given up just on the brink of a great national victory. Without those reductions, we will have nearly $22 billion of added red ink, an unbalanced budget, and more inflationary pressure in the next few years. But more important, without those reductions, we can't guarantee the success of our economic program, and that would be the biggest tragedy of all.

I'm not here to criticize the Congress. I'm here to say that you and I and the rest of the Nation will support them if they act responsibly and courageously. We'll help them shoulder the burden of taking tough but necessary action. We can succeed only if they finish the job that's almost complete. But if they don't finish the job, America will have merely delayed the day of reckoning, a day which will cause us to slip once again into the terrible quicksand of built-in inflation, high interest rates, and government out of control.

Now, once these critically important actions on which the Congress committees have not taken action -- one of them is cutting Federal redtape and wasteful spending by consolidating 83 confusing and duplicative Federal programs into block grants. It's not fair to ask the taxpayers to send their earnings to Washington and then charge them billions of dollars more to have this same money turned around and sent right back to the local communities and the States with strings attached that make it expensive. We can cut out the middleman by putting funds in the hands of State and local governments, where the citizens of America can have greater control.

Now, I want to pause here, becuase there's something that's been bothering me the last few days. I read a report that the chairman of the Democratic Party says that he would like to kick Congressman Phil Gramm, the coauthor of the Gramm-Latta resolution, out ot the party.

As you know, Phil Gramm has been a tireless supporter of our efforts to restore economic sanity. Controlling spending and restoring economic sanity is not just a Republican issue or a Democratic issue; it's an American issue. And I don't think it's our way to threaten to kick people out of any party for doing what they believe is right.

Now, cutting the increase in the rate of spending is only one part of our economic program. Government is also taking too great a percentage of our earnings, taking it in taxes. And this percentage must be reduced if we're going to have the incentive we need to increase productivity. And we're not going to have economic recovery till we increase productivity, which means capital investment in American business and industry.

What we've proposed is not just a tax-rate cut to relieve the over-burdened citizenry. In fact, in some ways we aren't proposing a tax cut at all. We're proposing to reduce or eliminate a tax increase that is already built into our system, just as those spending increases are built in -- the biggest single tax increase in our nation's history. And it comes on top of the fact that our Federal taxes have already doubled just since 1976. How many of us have been aware of that? In these 5 years, we have doubled the tax burden in this country.

If I could paraphrase Will Roger's line about never having met a man he didn't like, it seems that some in government have never met a tax they didn't hike. [Laughter] We're living with a social security payroll tax that was increased a short time ago and which is scheduled to automatically increase several times over the next 5 years. And these increases hasve a double whammy. The rate increases, but at the same time the percentage of earnings that the rate is applied to also goes up. Thus, like the graduated income tax, we have bracket creep that penalizes workers whose wage goes up just to keep pace with the cost of living. That tax is now 13.3 percent on the first $29,700 of earnings, and the law already adopted calls for it to go to 15.3 percent of $66,900 of earnings.

Individuals -- even where the husband and wife are both working -- have no surplus to put in savings or in insurance. Investors with capital to invest have been driven to tax shelters because of the low after-tax return on investments. There's less money for research and development. The number of patents issued to American companies has been declining for the past decade, while the Japanese patent activity here in America has increased in each of the 53 U.S. patent fields.

Ironically, some of those who helped pass these tax increases of which I've spoken are now the first and largest in charging that our proposal is designed to benefit the wealthy. Well, it's not true. Those who will get the biggest percentage of reduction in their total tax burden will be the lower- and middle-income families. Our program provides incentives so that more people can share in America's prosperity.

Their other charge is that it's too risky to cut tax rates while we're running a giant budget deficit. Well, I hope I'll be forgiven for pointing out they're also the same people who helped create those deficits.

But I'm happy to say there are others in the Congress on both sides of the aisle who have come together in a coalition supporting a bipartisan tax bill coauthored by Republican Barber Conable and Democrat Kent Hance. And this bill is the result of negotiations between the people in Congress and our own administration. It's a good bill. It deserves the kind of support you gave the Gramm-Latta budget proposal.

The principle of across-the-board cuts in marginal tax rates over a 3-year period has been maintained. Now, it's true we moved back from a 30-percent cut to 25 percent over the 3 years for personal income, but this did make possible other tax cuts which I believe will be great stimulants to savings, investment, and increased productivity.

I don't feel that I can accept any further changes even though those who are unenthusiastic about tax cuts generally want to settle for a 15-percent cut in the income tax only over 2 years. In the first place, that built-in tax increase I described will amount to 22 percent over the next 3 years. And our proposal to eliminate that will give at least a small reduction over and above it of what the tax burden is today.

Now, in addition, I believe the third year is important, particularly for small business, which creates 80 percent of the new jobs and which pays the individual tax rather that the corporate tax. Individual entrepreneurs would be able to look ahead and make plans better with the assurance of 3 years of stability in the tax picture.

Now let me say a word about marginal tax rates, rates that we propose to reduce across the board. These, as you know, are the brackets above the base income tax. They dictate how much more of every extra dollar you get -- whether from a pay raise or interest on savings or income from your profession, shop, or whatever -- must go to government.

In this land, born of the desire to be free, middle-income Americans are being pushed into punitive tax brackets that were once reserved for the wealthy. Not too many years ago, only 3 percent of those who work and earn were in a 30-percent tax bracket. Today a full one-fourth of the work force is paying that marginal tax rate. And when your social security and State income taxes, where there are such, are included in the total tax burden, the average family is facing 40 to 44 percent in marginal tax rates.

No wonder a middle-class family can't find money to put aside and have the means to send their children to college. The worker finds that it's not worthwhile to put in for overtime or try to upgrade him or herself, so productivity drops and we become less competitive in the world market. We must have a change from the practice of tax and tax, spend and spend, elect and elect, and we must have it now.

It's economic nonsense to say that lowering the tax rates will add to our deficits. We've had, as I have pointed out, giant tax increases, and the deficits kept right on increasing, because government doesn't tax to get the money it needs. Government will always find more needs for the money it gets.

By contrast, we find that every time that government has a broad reduction in the tax rates, the boost in prosperity is so immediate that while the taxpayers pay less individually, government revenues go up because of that increased prosperity. And the latest example, not too many years ago, in the early sixties, when John F. Kennedy, against all the advice of the same kind of people who are opposing us now, proposed an across-the-board tax cut, and the result was exactly what we've said. Even government's income in the gross went up because of the increased prosperity.

The Conable-Hance tax bill will give almost three-quarters of the income tax relief to those earning between 10 and 60 thousand dollars a year -- three-quarters. They presently are paying 72 percent of the total income tax. In addition, the unjust penalty imposed on married couples where husband and wife are both working will be relieved. Individuals will be allowed to take a deduction of a thousand dollars a year for personal retirement programs, even if they're participating in some pension plan at the present. And of special interest to farmers and family businesses -- the estate tax exemption will be raised to $600,000, and of even greater help, there will be no estate tax for a surviving spouse.

The Conable-Hance tax tax bill calls for lowering the 70-percent ceiling on so-called unearned income to 50 percent. Capital gains tax will be lowered. And business will get the biggest tax reduction in our nation's history -- some $60 billion in depreciation allowances, et cetera.

You know, it was with sadness that I watched someone last night on the TV news suggest that our program was going to destroy America. When someone makes that kind of charge, I have another question to ask: Where on Earth has he been for the last few years? And strangely enough, the answer is right in Washington, D.C., in a most responsible leadership position in government. Inflation rates didn't reach 18 percent because of our program. Nearly 8 million people didn't get thrown out of work because of anything that happened in the last 5 months. Twenty percent interest and 15 percent mortgages didn't begin on the morning of January 20th, 1981.

You know, we survived a great depression that toppled governments. We came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in world history. Today's living Americans have fought harder, paid a higher price for freedom, and done more to advance the dignity of man than any people who ever lived. We have in my lifetime gone from the horse and buggy to putting men on the Moon and bringing them safely home. Don't tell us that we can't be trusted with an increased share of our own earnings.

You know, it's your money, not theirs. You earned it, they didn't. And it's time they let you keep more of it. All over America, people are yearning for the opportunity to produce once again, to save their money and to have saving it mean something, to live without the constant pressures of higher and higher prices. They don't ask for much, just for a chance to make a better life for themselves and their children.

Now, some have accused me of fighting too hard for these reforms and for not wanting to compromise on key principles. Well, to some of these accusations I plead guilty. For too long the government has stood in the way, taking more of what the people earn no matter how hard they are trying to get ahead. Who can blame our people for fearing that they're trapped inside an economy with no bright tomorrows, an economy that has lost its soul?

I happen to believe that our free country was not put on this Earth simply to make a government bigger. Families shouldn't have to work only to achieve survival. America was put here to extend freedom and to create richer and fuller lives for its people, and this is why our administration wants more than anything else to give the economy back to you, the American people.

Nearly a year ago, as I accepted my nomination -- or the nomination of my party for President -- I asked that we embark on a national crusade to make America great again. I never meant to do that alone. I need your help, the help of every American to lighten the burden of taxes, which are too high, and to stop feeding the government Goliath.

We must complete the task that we set out to do when we voted for Gramm-Latta. Let's remember this: America is not a second-best society. We've never accepted anything that is less than what is right. And we, with our complete economic packages, we have a chance to succeed, a chance -- without that full package, however, that we can't guarantee will end the terrible cycle of economic retreat.

If you believe, as I do, that we must end this cycle, then may I suggest that Members of Congress might be interested in hearing from you and a few million of your fellow citizens again now. Why? Well, I regret to report to you that I just learned on the way down here that a few hours ago, while I was flying down, the House Rules Committee, dominated by those who suggest that I'm destroying America, ruled that our package of amendments to correct the failure of some committees to make budget cuts necessary for the success of the program, cannot be submitted to the House on the floor for the Representatives to give a yes or no vote.

It's a sad commentary on the state of our opposition when they have to resort to a parliamentary gimmick to thwart the will of the people. It is in the hands of Congress now to decide which road we shall take, and if we take the right road, once again we can dare to do great deeds and reach for the impossible.

In my absence, it seems that the Democratic leaders of the House of Representatives have agreed to go forward with a scheme tomorrow morning that would effectively sabotage our attempts to cut Federal spending.

Instead, the leaders want to splinter that package into pieces. They are pursuing a divide and conquer strategy -- a strategy that would once again allow special interest groups to triumph over the general economic interest of the nation.

I want the American people to understand that if they want to bring real change in Washington -- if they want real reductions in spending -- this is the time to speak up. This is the time to be heard.

Urgently request your support for Rule to permit single up-or-down vote on our bipartisan budget package to save additional $20 billion consistent with Gramm-Latta I. I consider this vote on the previous question vital to our Economic Recovery Program. Gag rule to deny House consideration of our entire package is unacceptable and denies American people opportunity to be heard on runaway Federal spending. Our previous efforts will be badly damaged unless we can stay together on this issue. Therefore, I seek your support to reconfirm your vote on the May 7 Budget Resolution.

Thank you for a very kind introduction, Mr. Chairman, and the gentlemen and lady who are here at the head table. She was a surprise guest to me. She had other appointments. She heard about the telephone calls to Washington, too. So, I'm delighted that she's here.

I also am meeting you with mixed emotions only about my own situation. Normally, you stand up here well prepared in your mind as to what you're going to say, but I think that any more I will only accept speaking engagements when the Congress is in recess. [Laughter] First, I was late and caused the whole luncheon to be late, and therefore I'm late in getting started here. And I'm not quite sure now as to -- well, I know that the speech I intended to make is hardly appropriate, because I was really going to go all out on a real stern message about the games that were being played in Washington and how I needed your help because of those games.

You might have heard a rumor to the effect that we've been suggesting a few changes back there. [Laughter] And the rumor is correct. But now as a result of all those telephone calls, you know that you helped, with your support, in getting adopted someting called the Gramm-Latta bipartisan budget reduction resolution. And it was a great victory to get Congress to vote the greatest reduction in Government spending that has ever been attempted.

In learning the ways of Washington, I discovered that was just a resolution and meant that the total figure was supposed to be the budget. But then it was all going to be broken up and delivered to all the various congressional committees for them to look at each program and see whether they came back with the proper figure and what they wanted to do with it. And so it became a bill of 4,000 pages, and the committees reported in, and most of the committees in the House, of course, are dominated by, literally, those of another philosophy. But the bulk of the committee reports back were very acceptable and went with the spirit of Gramm-Latta. Phil Gramm is the Democrat Congressman who helped coauthor that measure.

And there were a few committees that in a very important part of the program made changes which literally would have broken the budget before the year was out. And I came here intending to speak about the fact that through a parliamentary procedure, they were going to present -- to prevent a vote on Gramm-Latta II. That was the amendment that would remedy what that little handful of committees had done, but which would amount to more than $20 billion of increased deficit and prevent us from balancing the budget by 1984.

I'm extremely pleased and gratified to report to you that just today, in fact within the last hour or two, the American people have won two great victories in the Congress of the United States. First of all, on the House floor, Republican Congressmen joined by 31 courageous members of the Democrat party have joined together to defeat the gag rule that would have seriously damaged our plans for reducing the budget.

Twenty-four hours ago our defeat seemed almost certain; indeed, it was being openly predicted by the other side. But we have, since that first vote, won the second one now also, which means that the next order of business for the Congress is the voting on the Gramm-Latta amendment -- the son of Gramm-Latta. The simple truth is that Congress heard the voice of the people, and they acted to carry out the will of the people.

Even as we're gathering here now, I've been informed by the most recent call that the House leadership is engaged in an internal debate on what next step they should take. Well, it's my hope that the House will move quickly now to put our package of spending cuts to a vote. Certainly, there's no reason to delay or postpone beyond their July 4th recess. But let me just reemphasize here today just how important this vote earlier this afternoon is. It means that in the crunch of heavy pressure from all sides, the Congress of the United States seems ready and eager to join in the fight to curb runaway spending.

It means that in both Houses of the Congress and, indeed, on both sides of the aisle, there are enough Members who have the wisdom and courage to cast their vote in favor of America's overall economic interest, not just our special interests. It means that for the first time in many years, we have the opportunity to forge a new coalition in this country -- a coalition built upon people from all parties and from every background who will work together for the good of the Nation. It means, in fact, that we can have a new beginning in America, a new beginning toward economic progress for all of our people.

There's good news on the second front today, too, and that is with regard to the subject near and dear to all of you here -- the struggle to reduce taxes. Just a little while ago, the Senate Finance Committee, by a margin of 19 - 1, voted resoundingly for the package of tax changes that are virtually identical to those that I embraced earlier this year. That was another victory for the Nation, and I salute Chairman Bob Dole and the other Republican and Democrat members of his committee for their very swift and judicious action.

Let me just say from the bottom of my heart that we would never have come as far as we have today without the support of you -- the American people. I know from the many phone calls and personal visits that I've had with the Members of Congress over the past few months, and even over the past few hours, just how important grassroots support is to the passage of our economic recovery program. It's your support, it's your help that has been crucial from the day that I arrived in Washington. And when it comes, let me just say, victory will belong to you -- the people.

All we're really trying to do is return to some basic principles which have never failed us when we've lived up to them. For example, only by making government live within its means and restricting its role in our personal lives can we unleash the spirit of individual enterprise so essential to prosperity and the preservation of freedom itself. And the way we're doing this is by changing just one little two-letter word -- control by government to control of government.

But now that you've tasted victory and are beginning to feel good, I'd better warn you I have a little favor to ask, and its strictly in the national interest. I simply want to ask you not to sit back and retire from action, as the battle still is not definitely won. I think you want spending reductions that you approved in that bipartisan budget resolution last month. I think you want a 3-year across-the-board tax rate reduction for every American taxpayer and nothing less.

Now, you know, I've been criticized for saying that Federal spending is out of control. But what else describes it? Consider, for example, those programs which have spending increases built into them directly by law. In 1967, the automatic spending program -- those are the things called entitlement programs, the redistribution of income -- they amounted to $57 billion dollars. Next year, they will amount to a staggering $428 billion, and our elected representatives don't have control over them. If we do nothing to change the laws, this uncontrollable spending will grow to the unbelievable level, by 1984, of more than a half a trillion dollars.

These programs have truly turned out to be good intentions run amok, budgetary time bombs set to explode in the years ahead, and the effect is to file enormous debts on the backs of our children, heavily mortgaging their future for some sake of temporary social cure. The American economic solution, which ignores reforms in these automatic spending programs, is really no solution at all.

Now, one of those critically important actions on which the Congress can now take action -- that was in that little package that they were trying to block -- is to cut the Federal redtape and wasteful spending by consolidating 83 confusing and duplicative Federal programs into block grants. It's not fair to ask the taxpayers to send their earnings to Washington and then charge them billions of dollars more to have this same money turned around and sent right back with strings attached. We can do better than that, and we can do it by cutting out the middleman and putting those funds in the hands of State and local governments where the citizens of America can have greater control of it.

Now I mentioned Phil Gramm, one of those courageous Democrats. I was saddened to learn the other day that the Chairman of the Democratic National Party has said that he would like to kick Congressman Phil Gramm, coauthor of that Gramm-Latta bill, out of the party. As you know, Phil's been a tireless supporter, as I've told you, and it's not a Democrat or Republican issue. It's an American issue. And I don't think it's our way to threaten to kick people out of any party for doing what they believe is right.

But, you know, cutting the increase in spending, that's only one part of the program, and this is where I get down to that further request. The Government is taking too great a percentage of the gross national product in taxes. This percentage must be reduced if we're going to have the incentive we need to increase productivity. And we're not going to have recovery till we increase productivity, which requires capital investment of American business and industry.

Now, before I go on with that tax thing, let me just tell you something that's happened in the last few days. Fifteen of the major steel-producing companies in the United States have sent me a report, voluntarily, that they're going forward, all of them together -- well, not together, but I mean individually, but together in collection of what they're doing for the steel industry -- with improvement and modernization of existing plants to the extent of $3 billion, 200 million. And they have already done that, and they said they are going forward with it simply on the expectation of our recovery program. People who doubt whether the program will work: It's working before it's even been voted into effect. And I'm most grateful to them for what they're doing, and I know that it's going to mean a great deal. And it must be a reflection of what's happening in industry all over the country.

We're living with a social security payroll tax that was increased some short time ago, which is scheduled to increase automatically several times in the next 5 years, and those increases have a kind of double whammy. At the same time that the percentage or that the rate increases, the percentage of earnings that that rate is applied to also goes up, so that like the income tax, we have a bracket creep, penalizing workers whose wages go up to keep pace with the cost of living. That social security payroll tax now is 13.3 percent of $29,700. In 1937 they said it would never be greater than $3,000 that would be taxed. The law, already adopted, calls for it to go to 15.3 percent of $66,900 of income.

Like the budget reforms that we seek, the tax package that will help stimulate the economy by providing capital investment to modernize and expand our industrial machine, individuals, even with husband and wife both working, have no surplus to put in savings accounts or insurance. Investors with capital to invest have been driven to tax shelters because of the low after-tax return on investment. There's less money for research and development. The number of patents issued to American companies has been declining for the past decade, while Japanese patent activity, here in America, has increased in each of the 53 United States patent fields.

Now, ironically, some of those who helped pass the tax increases of which I've spoken are now the first and the loudest in charging that our proposal is designed to benefit the wealthy. Well, that's not true. Those who will get the biggest percentage of reduction in their total tax burden will be the lower- and the middle-income families. Our program provides incentives so that more people can share in our prosperity.

The other charge is that it's too risky to cut tax rates when we're running a giant budget deficit. Well, I hope I'll be forgiven for pointing out that they are also the same people who helped create those deficits. But I'm happy to say there are others, as we've learned today, on both sides of the aisle, who can come together and support the bipartisan tax bill that's coauthored by Republican Barber Conable and Democrat Kent Hance. And this bill is the result of negotiations between Members of Congress and our own administration.

The principle of across-the-board cuts and the marginal tax rates over a 3-year period has been maintained in that bill. Now, it's true that I slid back from a 30-percent cut to 25 percent in 3 years for personal income, but this made possible the other tax cuts which I believe will be great stimulants to saving, investment, and increased productivity.

Some of the other tax cuts -- I could have won an Oscar for my appearance of reluctance in giving into them. [Laughter] But I don't feel I can accept any further changes, even though those who are unenthusiastic about the tax cuts have said they would settle for a 15-percent cut over 2 years. Well, in the first place, that built-in tax increase will amount to 22 percent over 3 years. Our proposal will eliminate that and give at least a small reduction.

In addition, I believe the third year is important particularly for small and independent business, which creates 80 percent of the new jobs and which pays the individual tax rather than the corporate tax. Individual entrepreneurs can look ahead and make plans better with the assurance of 3 years of stability in the tax picture.

Now, let me say just a word about those marginal tax rates that we propose to reduce. In this land, born of a desire to be free, middle-income Americans are being pushed into punitive tax brackets once reserved for the wealthy. Not too many years ago, only 3 percent of those who work and earn were in a 30-percent bracket. Today, a full one-fourth of the work force is paying that marginal tax rate. And when your social security and State income taxes are included in the total tax burden, the average family finds they're facing a 40- to 44-percent marginal tax rate. No wonder middle-class families find they can't put money aside or have means to send their children to college. The worker finds it isn't worthwhile to put in overtime or to try to upgrade him or herself. Productivity drops, and we become less competitive in the world market.

Now, it's economic nonsense to say that lowering the tax rates will add to our deficits. We've been having tax increases -- the most recent, the biggest in our history, as I said -- but we're also running the biggest deficits, because government doesn't tax to get the money it needs. Government will always find needs for the money it gets.

By contrast, we find that every time government has had a broad reduction in tax rates, the boost in prosperity is so immediate that while taxpayers pay less individually, government revenues actually go up because of the increased prosperity. And the latest example, in the early sixties, was John F. Kennedy's program, and the same voices were raised against that tax reduction that are raised today.

In addition, the unjust penalty imposed on married couples where husband and wife are both working will be relieved. Individuals will be allowed to deduct $1,000 a year for personal retirement programs even if they are already involved in another pension program. And of special interest to farmers and family-owned businesses, the estate tax exemption will be raised to $600,000, and of even greater help, there will be no estate tax at all for a surviving spouse.

The Conable-Hance bill calls for lowering the 70-percent ceiling on so-called unearned income to the 50-percent ceiling. Capital gains will be lowered, and business will get the biggest tax reduction in our nation's history -- some $60 billion in depreciation allowances, et cetera.

You know, for those doom-criers to try and scare us -- and I know I've said this before -- but we survived, we the living Americans, a great depression that toppled governments; we came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in world history. Today's living Americans have fought harder, paid a higher price for freedom, and done more to advance the dignity of man than any people who ever lived. We have in my lifetime gone from the horse and buggy to putting a man on the Moon and bringing him safely home. Now, don't tell us that we can't be trusted with an increased share of our own earnings.

All over America people are yearning for the opportunity to produce once again, to save their money and have their savings mean something, to live without the constant pressures of higher and higher prices. They don't ask for much, just a chance to make a better life for themselves and their children. Some have accused me of fighting too hard for these reforms and for not wanting to compromise on key principles. Well, to some of those charges I plead guilty. But for too long, government has stood in the way by taking more of what our people earn no matter how hard they try to get ahead. Who can blame our people for fearing they're trapped inside an economy with no bright tomorrows, an economy that has lost its soul?

And that's why we have to revive the spirit of America, the American Revolution, the spirit of another revolution right here a few years ago, of Propositon 13. We're not demanding the impossible. You're just demanding, I think, some of the same opportunities the Founding Fathers risked their lives, property, and sacred honor for more than 200 years ago -- a commitment that if you work and save more tomorrow than you did today, your reward will be higher than it was today. More of every dollar's earnings will be yours to keep, more of your added wages, your added interest. And those are what we mean by incentives. Those are what will unlock the spirit and the energy of our people, to drive Americans to dream and dare to take greater risks for a greater good, unlock the spirit of a Fulton and a Ford and the Wright brothers and Lindberg and all of our astronauts.

We did it before, and we can do it again. We can solve the energy crisis and pioneer technological breakthroughs and rebuild our cities and, in the process, strengthen our families and create new jobs and a real hope for young Americans everywhere.

Yes, we can do all that and save the American dream, but only on one condition -- that we always remember we owe our progress to the unique form of government that allows us the freedom to choose our own destiny, a government that answers to ``We the people.'' And with your help, I think that we're going to do that in Washington.

The President today announced his intention to nominate James C. Miller III to be a member of the Federal Trade Commission. Upon confirmation, the President intends to designate Dr. Miller Chairman. Dr. Miller will continue to fulfill his duties on the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief until his designation as Chairman of the FTC.

Today the House of Representatives gave the American people a major victory in the war against inflation. By passing the Gramm-Latta spending control amendment, despite intense political pressure, an emerging coalition of Democrats and Republicans demonstrated that bipartisan cooperation is for real and that America can once again have a government that lives within its means.

Today's vote was a profile in political courage and should inspire the gratitude of us all. It will renew the faith of millions of Americans who have waited so long just for those in Washington to listen and care and take action.

Let there be no misunderstandings: The victory of the Gramm-Latta amendment was absolutely essential in order to meet our spending targets next year and balance the budget by 1984. There will be a need for additional spending restraints in the future, but without this vote today, we would have faced more than $20 billion in additional deficits over the next 3 years.

The Senate has already produced a spending bill that is highly satisfactory. So, while we must still await a House-Senate conference, today's vote ensures that the final outcome will carry us a long way toward our budgetary goals.

In 1950 - 56 Mr. Walker was employed in Texas with private industry, serving successively as assistant manager of a grocery store, claims adjuster of an insurance company, a newspaper reporter, and television announcer.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 27th day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

I remember a year ago I was in California when I received your invitation at the same time that I received a clipping that I had not answered your invitation. Now, at that moment it was almost impossible for me -- well, it was impossible to find a way -- not even Air Force One could have bridged from California to Florida. But I'm delighted that this time, as you say, there was better staff work and I was able to get the invitation in plenty of time.

There are many things that we need to discuss, and I thank you for the invitation to do so. Let us talk today about the needs of the future, not the misunderstandings of the past; about new ideas, not old ones; about what must become a continuing dialog, not a dialog that flows only at intermittent conventions that we both attend.

Part of that continuing dialog took place last Tuesday when I met with Ben Hooks and Margaret Bush Wilson in the Oval Office. Our discussion was candid and useful. The wide range of our conversation showed that there is a great deal to be gained when we take time to share our views. And while our communication should always deal with current issues of importance, it must never stray far from our national commitment to battle against discrimination and increase our knowledge of each other.

A few isolated groups in the backwater of American life still hold perverted notions of what America is all about. Recently in some places in the nation there's been a disturbing reoccurrence of bigotry and violence. If I may, from the platform of this organization, known for its tolerance, I would like to address a few remarks to those groups who still adhere to senseless racism and religious prejudice, to those individuals who persist in such hateful behavior.

If I were speaking to them instead of to you, I would say to them, ``You are the ones who are out of step with our society. You are the ones who willfully violate the meaning of the dream that is America. And this country, because of what it stands for, will not stand for your conduct.'' My administration will vigorously investigate and prosecute those who, by violence or intimidation, would attempt to deny Americans their constitutional rights.

Another kind of terror has recently plagued the city of Atlanta. Not long ago in a speech before the Congress I read the now famous ``pajama letter'' from Peter Sweeney. If only my letters from children could all be as lighthearted as Peter's. Other letters are more poignant. When little girls in Atlanta write asking that I make things right so they won't be scared anymore, even a President of the United States can feel a little helpless.

We committed the resources of the FBI and a number of Federal agencies to help Mayor Jackson. I appointed Vice President Bush to head this Federal task force, and its work will continue until this tragic episode is over. Not counting manpower and equipment, we've provided over $4 million to this cause. I know that all of us wish we could tell the children of Atlanta that they need no longer fear, and until we can say that, however, we will not be satisfied until those children can once again play safely in their schoolyards and parks.

Our dialog must also include discussions on how we can best protect the rights and privileges of all our citizens. My administration will root out any case of government discrimination against minorities and uphold and enforce the laws that protect them. I emphasize that we will not retreat on the nation's commitment to equal treatment of all citizens. Now, that, in my view, is the primary responsibility of National Government. The Attorney General is now carefully studying the decennial redistricting plans being submitted under the current Voting Rights Act. As soon as we have all the information there will be a decision regarding extension of the act.

Until a decision is announced, you should know this: I regard voting as the most sacred right of free men and women. We have not sacrificed and fought and toiled to protect that right so that now we can sit back and permit a barrier to come between a secret ballot and any citizen who makes a choice to cast it. Nothing -- nothing will change that as long as I am in a position to uphold the Constitution of the United States.

In the months ahead, our dialog also will include tough and realistic questions about the role of the Federal Government in the black community. I'm not satisfied with its results, and I don't think you are either. And the failures of the past have been particularly hard on the minority poor, because their hopes have failed as surely as the Federal programs that built those hopes. But I must not be the only one who questions about government policies.

Can the black teenager who faces a staggering unemployment rate feel that government policies are a success? Can the black wage earner who sees more and more of his take-home pay shrinking because of government taxes feel satisfied? Can black parents say, despite a massive influx of Federal aid, that educational standards in our schools have improved appreciably? Can the women I saw on television recently -- whose family had been on welfare for three generations and who feared that her children might be the fourth -- can she believe that current government policies will save her children from such a fate?

We ask these tough questions, because we share your concerns about the future of the black community. We ask these questions, because the blacks of America should not be patronized as just one more voting bloc to be wooed and won. You are individuals as we all are. Some have special needs. I don't think the Federal Government has met those needs.

I've been listening to the specific needs of many people -- blacks, farmers, refugees, union members, women, small business men and women, and other groups -- they're commonly referred to as special-interest groups. Well, in reality they're all members of the interest group that I spoke of the day I took the oath of office. They are the people of America. And I'm pleased to serve that special-interest group.

The people of the inner cities will be represented by this administration every bit as much as the citizens of Flagstaff, Arizona, Ithaca, New York, or Dixon, Illinois, where I grew up. Anyone who becomes President realizes he must represent all the people of the land, not just those of a home State or a particular party. Nor can he be just President of those who voted for him.

But it doesn't matter what groups we belong to, what area we live in, how much or how little we earn; the economy affects every single one of us regardless of our other interests and affiliations. We have proceeded full throttle on our economic recovery program, because a strong, growing economy without inflation is the surest, most equitable way to ease the pressures on all the segments of our society.

The well-being of blacks, like the well-being of every other American, is linked directly to the health of the economy. For example, industries in which blacks had made sufficient gains in employment -- substantial gains, like autos and steel -- have been particularly hard hit. And ``last hired, first fired'' is a familiar refrain to too many black workers. And I don't need to tell this group what inflation has done to those who can least afford it. A declining economy is a poisonous gas that claims its first victims in poor neighborhoods, before floating out into the community at large.

Therefore, in our national debate over budget and tax proposals, we shall not concede the moral high ground to the proponents of those policies that are responsible in the first place for our economic mess -- a mess which has injured all Americans. We will not concede the moral high ground to those who show more concern for Federal programs than they do for what really determines the income and financial health of blacks -- the nation's economy.

Now, I know you've been told that my proposal for economic recovery is designed to discriminate against all who are economically deprived. Now, those who say that could be confused by the misstatements that have been made by some who are either ignorant of the facts or those who are practicing, for political reasons, pure demagoguery.

Rebuilding America's economy is an absolute moral imperative if we're to avoid splitting this society in two with class against class. I do not intend to let America drift further toward economic segregation. We must change the economic direction of this country to bring more blacks into the mainstream, and we must do it now.

America will be. That is the philosophy the people proclaimed in last November's election. America will be. And this time, she will be for everyone. Together, we can recreate for every citizen the same economic opportunities that we saw lift up a land of immigrant people, the kind of opportunities that have swept the hungry and the persecuted into the mainstream of our life since the American experiment began.

To a number of black Americans, the U.S. economy has been something of an underground railroad; it has spirited them away from poverty to middle-class prosperity and beyond. But too many blacks still remain behind. A glance at the statistics will show that a large proportion of the black people have not found economic freedom. Nationwide, for example, 43 percent of black families in 1979 had money incomes under $10,000.

Harriet Tubman, who was known as the ``conductor'' of that earlier underground railroad, said on her first escape from slavery, ``When I found I had crossed that line, I looked at my hands to see if I was the same person. There was such a glory over everything.'' Even after a century the beauty of her words is powerful. We can only imagine the soaring of her soul, what a feeling that must have been when she crossed into freedom and the physical and mental shackles fell from her person.

Harriet Tubman's glory was the glory of the American experience. It was a glory which had no color or religious preference or nationality. It was simply, eloquently, the universal thirst that all people have for freedom.

Well, there are poor people in this country who should experience just such an elation if they found the economic freedom of a solid job, a productive job -- not one concocted by government and dependent on Washington winds; a real job where they could put in a good day's work, complain about the boss, and then go home with confidence and self-respect. Why has this Nation been unable to fill such a basic, admirable need?

The government can provide subsistence, yes, but it seldom moves people up the economic ladder. And as I've said before, you have to get on the ladder before you can move up on it. I believe many in Washington, over the years, have been more dedicated to making needy people government-dependent rather than independent. They've created a new kind of bondage, because regardless of how honest their intention in the beginning, those they set out to help soon became clients essential to the well-being of those who administered the programs.

An honest program would be dedicated to making people independent, no longer in need of government assistance. But then what would happen to those who made a career of helping? Well, Americans have been very generous, with good intentions and billions of dollars, toward those they believed were living in hardship. And yet, in spite of the hopes, the government has never lived up to the dreams of poor people. Just as the Emancipation Proclamation freed black people 118 years ago, today we need to declare an economic emancipation.

Now, much has been said and written -- not all of it flattering -- about the savings I've proposed in the budget which were adopted by the House last Friday. I can assure you that the budget savings we've advocated are much more equitable than the tremendous cuts in social programs, made by inflation and the declining economy, which can't find jobs for almost 8 million men and women who are unemployed.

Those cuts are exacted without regard to need or age. Let me give some examples. In the prosperity of the 1960's, an era of only a few Federal programs costing very little, the number of people living in poverty was reduced by nearly 50 percent. During the ``stagflation'' of the 1970's with many Federal programs with huge budgets, the number living in poverty was reduced by only 6 percent.

Now, these are hard economic facts which are hard to take, because they show massive amounts of government aid and intervention have failed to produce the desired results. A strong economy returns the greatest good to the black population. It returns a benefit greater than that provided by specific Federal programs. By slowing the growth of government and by limiting the tax burden and thus stimulating investment, we will also be reducing inflation and unemployment. We will be creating jobs, nearly 3 million additional new jobs by 1986. We will be aiding minority businesses, which have been particularly hard hit by the scarcity of capital and the prohibitive interest rates. And these concerns are what the bipartisan tax cut proposal currently before the Congress is all about.

I said the other day in our conversation in the Oval Office that the income a year or two ago -- I don't have the most recent figure -- for the black community was something like $140 billion. Now, in most neighborhoods what really brings prosperity is when the income of that neighborhood is then multiplied by turning over several times within that community. I must tell you that in the black communities in America the turnover is less than once before the dollars, those $140 billion, go out into the community at large. And that has to be changed.

In the convention last summer Benjamin Hooks -- the one that I missed -- well, no, this was the Republican Convention; I made that one -- [laughter] -- Benjamin Hooks said to the assembled delegates, ``We must decide as a nation if we're to become prisoners of our past or possessors of an enlightened and progressive future.'' Those are the very words I want to say to you today.

We cannot be tied to the old ways of solving our economic and racial problems. But it is time we looked to new answers and new ways of thinking that will accomplish the very ends the New Deal and the Great Society anticipated. We're not repealing the gains of black people. We're solidifying those gains and making them safe for your children and grandchildren.

It's time that we found ways to make the American economic pie bigger instead of just cutting an ever smaller pie into more but smaller slices. It's time we welcomed those Americans into the circle of prosperity to let them share in the wonders of our society, and it's time to break the cycle of dependency that has become the legacy of so many Federal programs that no longer work -- indeed, some of which never did work.

Let me give you an idea of how bountiful this famous economic pie could have been by now. If productivity had not stopped growing and then started downhill after 1965, the gross national product today would be $850 billion bigger -- enough to balance the budget, cut personal and social security taxes in half, and still provide every American with an extra $2,500 in spending money. And all of this would have happened with the compliments of the private sector.

Now, you wisely learned to harness the Federal Government in the hard pull toward equality, and that was right, because guaranteeing equality of treatment is government's proper function. But as the last decade of statistics I just read indicated, government is no longer the strong draft horse of minority progress, because it has attempted to do too many things it's not equipped to do. I ask you if it isn't time to hitch up a fresh horse to finish the task. Free enterprise is a powerful workhorse that can solve many problems of the black community that government alone can no longer solve.

The black leadership of this Nation has shown tremendous courage, both physical and intellectual, and great creativity as it sought to bring equality to its people. You in this audience are the inheritors of that proud black heritage. You are the black leaders of today, and I believe you possess the very same courage and creativity. I ask you to use that courage and creativity to examine the challenges that are facing not just blacks but all of America.

I ask you to question the status quo as your predecessors did and look for new and imaginative ways to overcome minority problems. I'm talking about the kind of courage and questioning your chairman, Margaret Bush Wilson, showed in taking the heat for the NAACP's controversial 1978 energy statement -- a statement which shook the elitists of our country back into the real world, at least for a time. What I'm asking you to consider requires not so much a leap of faith, but a realization that the Federal Government alone is just not capable of doing the job we all want done for you or any other Americans.

In the months ahead, as the administration is free to turn attention from the economic program to other needs of America, we'll be advancing proposals on a number of issues of concern to this convention. The inner cities, for example, should be communities, neighborhoods, not warehouses of despair where children are bused out and ineffectual Federal funds are bused in. I believe that with the aid of commonsense government assistance and the use of free enterprise zones, with less reliance on busing and more reliance on better, basic education, and with an emphasis on local activism, such as you represent, communities can be reinvigorated.

Certainly, we're all inspired by the wonderful example of Marva Collins in Chicago, the gallant lady who has the educational grit to make Shakespeare admirers out of inner-city children. She just proves to me what a friend of mine, Wilson Riles, California's superintendent of education, used to say: ``The concept that black children can't learn unless they're sitting among white children is utter and complete nonsense.'' Now, Dr. Riles was not suggesting that integration isn't a good and proper thing; it is. And it's good for all of us when it's brought about with commonsense and attention to what is best for the children.

We plan to take a look, a comprehensive look, at the education of blacks from primary school upward and strengthen the base of black colleges, which are a sound educational investment. They are more than that. They're a proud tradition, a symbol of black determination and accomplishment, and I feel deeply they must be preserved. We've increased the share of Department of Education Title III funds spend on black colleges, and that trend will continue.

We have equal concern for the black business leaders of today. Minority business development, as I indicated earlier, is a key to black economic progress. Black-owned businesses are especially important in neighborhood economies where the dollars, as I said, spent have a beneficial multiplier effect.

I didn't come here today bearing the promises of government handouts, which others have brought and which you've rightly learned to mistrust. Instead, I ask you to join me to build a coalition for change.

Seventy-two years ago the famous call went forth, the call for a conference emphasizing the civil and political rights of blacks. And the result of that call, of course, was the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People. Well, today let us issue a call for new perspectives on the economic challenges facing black Americans. Let us issue a call for exciting programs to spring America forward toward the next century, an America full of new solutions to old problems.

We will link hands to build an era where we can put fear behind us and hope in front of us. It can be an era in which programs are less important than opportunities. It can be an era where we all reach out in reconciliation instead of anger and dispute.

Let us care. Let us work to build a nation that is free of racism, full of opportunity, and determined to loosen the creative energies of every person of every race, of every station, to make a better life. It will be my honor to stand alongside you to answer this call.

The President. Prime Minister Fraser, the American people welcome you to our country with a deep and a heartfelt warmth reserved for only the best of friends. Nancy and I are pleased to be able to welcome you and Mrs. Fraser as representatives of a country with whom we are proud to be allied and the American people are grateful to have as friends.

Robert Louis Stevenson wrote, ``We are all travelers in what John Bunyan calls the wilderness of this world. And the best that we find in our travels is an honest friend -- they keep us worthy of ourselves.'' The people of Australia are honest and loyal friends, independent of mind and will, who bring strength of character and courage to the international community. America's proud to have such an ally in a world where freedom and democracy are constantly challenged.

Australians have fought side by side with Americans in every major war in this century. They've opened their hearts and homes to us when we were away from home, and they have stood with us in good times and bad. And America is grateful to have such steadfast friends.

You, Mr. Prime Minister, are a world leader who has made Australia a force for peace. Under your government Australia has done much to bring independence and economic growth to developing countries as close to you as Southeast Asia and as far away as Africa. And there you played the key role in Commonwealth consultations leading to the independence of Zimbabwe. Together with New Zealand, Australia and America have shared a bond of the tripart ANZUS alliance, for 30 years working together to maintain peace and security in the East Asian and Pacific regions.

You have said, Mr. Prime Minister, that the liberty we enjoy has no guarantee. And most importantly, liberty requires an understanding by ordinary people of what is at stake. The survival of the whole way of life depends on their commitment.

I was particularly impressed, deeply so, when, Mr. Prime Minister, I heard your powerful declaration in your speech before the B'nai B'rith here in Washington last September. You reminded us that a people without an objective are a people lost. A people without faith are a people destroyed. A people without conviction will not survive. It is liberty which provides the objective, liberty which allows faith, liberty which sustains conviction. But liberty is not an inevitable state, and there is no law which guarantees that once achieved it will survive. Its preservation requires skill, determination, and strength.

Mr. Prime Minister, the Australian example is an inspiration for free people everywhere. You may be assured that America will remain vigilant, will keep herself strong, and will always be a dependable partner in the quest for stability, freedom, and peace. Australia is indeed a friend who keeps us worthy of ourselves.

Prime Minister Fraser, I look forward to our meetings today as an opportunity to enhance our cooperation with one of our closest allies, but it will also be a pleasure to get to know the Frasers -- get to know them better, strengthening the personal friendship between our two lands.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, for my wife and myself, the Australian party who are with me, thank you very much indeed for your warm and generous welcome. I'm looking forward, indeed, to the discussions that we shall be having.

Australia and the United States, as you've pointed out, Mr. President, share a commitment to the values of freedom and of democracy. And we know that these values are not mere words; they stand for our way of life, for the attitudes we have towards people and the kind of opportunities we want for our children.

We share a faith in the enterprise and judgment of free men and women. Both our countries were built by immigrants from across the seas, pursuing dreams of liberty and of independence. The dream of freedom can have the same powerful good in the world today as it had at the foundation of this great Republic. And the world certainly needs strong and confident voices speaking for freedom.

You have come, Mr. President, to your great office at the end of what has been, in many ways, a decade of adversity. You embody through your eloquence and courage the determination to overcome that adversity. In your Inaugural Address you urged America to begin an era of renewal. The energy and ingenuity of the American people, their capacity to rise to a challenge give me confidence that they will respond, are responding, to your call. Indeed the clear evidence that they're doing so already must be encouraging to all of us.

The future of the course of freedom around the world depends so greatly on the leadership of the United States. There are so many things that will not be done unless the United States is prepared to do them. There is so much that only the world's greatest democracy can do. But we're well aware that powerful as you are, other countries also have a role and a duty. All the democracies need that confidence in themselves, that sense of larger purpose, that willingness to play a part which can create the will to work together and to prevail.

There are obvious limits, Mr. President, to what a nation of 14 million people can do. But, Mr. President, Australians are a people given to forming our own views, and it's this spirit of independence that makes us determined to be active in improving the condition of mankind and to contribute effectively to the cause of peace and of freedom.

The relationships between Americans and Australians have always been warm and spontaneous, and the alliance between our countries reflects that friendship. But it does, I suggest, more than that. It is built on the bedrock of mutual interests. As countries whose people fought and died in two World Wars, we share an abiding commitment to world peace. As countries bordering the same ocean, we share a central concern for stability and prosperity in the Asia-Pacific region. And as two of the world's democracies, we share a concern for liberty and the open society.

Mr. President, it used to be said of one great democratic statesman, that he was at his most effective and formidable on the rebound. I trust that far before the end of your Presidency as Western economies recover, as Western defenses strengthen, as Western will is remobilized, we will have demonstrated that the same is true of democracy itself.

We in Australia, along with the rest of the civilized world, admired greatly the courage and composure that you showed, Mr. President, throughout the ordeal that followed the attempt on your life some weeks ago. And you have shown by personal demonstration that given old-fashioned strength of character, it is possible to dominate events, rather than to surrender to those events. In doing so, you transformed an ugly and potentially tragic event into one from which decent men and women could draw confidence and strength.

I thank you again, very much, Mr. President, for your welcome to Tammy and to myself and to the Australian party today. I'm looking forward very much to getting to know you and Mrs. Reagan and to having our discussions.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, our talks this morning have been wide-ranging. We've touched on the defense strategies in Southeast Asia, the Indian Ocean; peacekeeping efforts in the Middle East; need for richly endowed countries, such as ours, to be sensitive and helpful toward other nations not as blessed with natural resources, space, and security; nuclear nonproliferation; and some of the legal issues resulting from extraterritorial application of our own United States laws. But all of our discussions left me with two enduring feelings: that Australia is a friend for the long pull, where people see things basically as we do, but who will always have the courage and the friendship to tell us when they think we're wrong.

Prime Minister Malcolm Fraser and I lead countries whose best days lie in the future. Our friendship and cooperation will hasten the day when more of the people of the world can share what we're so fortunate to enjoy -- freedom, strength, and confidence in the future.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President and ladies and gentlemen, the discussions that we've had this morning I regard as being particularly useful and constructive, quite clearly from the policies that have been implemented in the United States under the President's charge. You'd expect, I think, that Australia would be in a fair measure of agreement on a number of those policies, the economic policies and the strengthening of the dollar and the strengthening of the economy of this country. We'd like to say all strength to your arm, Mr. President, because an economically strong United States is important to the entire free world.

And the policies in relation to East-West, and again, a strong United States is important not only to the American people but to Australian people and to free people everywhere. And so again, Mr. President, all strength to your arm.

We've discussed, as you've indicated, a wide range of issues. And I was particularly delighted, Mr. President, with your willingness to see what can be done to remove the rough edges at the extraterritorial reach of United States law, and we have agreed that as -- when it will be convenient for both our Attorneys General, for them to consult to see how this might best be achieved. And thank you very much for directing that that review take place.

We've discussed at length major North-South issues -- economic relationships between wealthy countries, such as the United States and Australia and many others, and the developing countries or the least developed countries of this world. And I hope I'm not putting words into your mouth, Mr. President, in saying that I believe that we both recognize that it's important for the peace and stability of the world that we try and make progress in these major issues, that we try and see that more and more peoples of the world have opportunities to live a decent life in dignity and self-esteem. And you have told me of some of the things that you have in mind to help achieve that particular objective.

But Australia, like America, is a country where anything can happen and where anything can be achieved because people are free. ``Australian history,'' Mark Twain wrote, ``is full of surprises and adventures and incongruities and contradictions and incredibilities, but they're all true. They all happened.'' [Laughter] Well it's the same way here, but that's our secret. We do not stagnate in a planned and withering government-dominated existence. We're free to be all that we can imagine.

A few moments ago at the table, I was asking Mrs. Fraser -- just checking out my memory to make sure it was correct, and that is a very wonderful day that is observed annually in Australia in commemoration of the Battle of the Coral Sea, the turning point in World War II, where once again, as we've been so often, we were allied. And I have on my desk the tribute that was rendered at one of those particular days of commemoration by an Australian and his recognition of the blood bond between Americans and Australians who died together to turn that war around and to make Australia safe. I didn't dare read it here because I don't think I could have gotten through it tonight.

But the dynamics of the Australian way of life make her an even more powerful ally, and the vitality of her people make her an even stronger friend. So I would like to propose a toast to the Prime Minister of Australia and Mrs. Fraser, to the continued friendship and cooperation between our two countries, and to Her Majesty the Queen.

Thank you very much, Mr. President, for your kind and gracious remarks. But may I first, with your permission, let your guests here this evening into a small secret between us, which is a source of special pleasure to me? Ladies and gentlemen, the President is exploiting one of my weaknesses, and I freely confess it. He's given me a magnificent fishing rod. [Laughter] I'm not sure whether there's some message in this. I don't know whether he should be encouraging me to wade in deep waters. But I'm sure that if I do, he'd want me to make a big catch. And when I catch a fish with this particular rod, I'll always be wondering who it is on the end of it. [Laughter] That's got a particular relevance for certain people in Australia. Mr. President, it's a splendid gift, and I thank you very much indeed for it.

I speak as one dedicated to the principles of small government, low inflation, and short afterdinner speeches. [Laughter] And fortunately, what I have to say can be said simply and briefly. It's been a great pleasure to meet you, Mr. President, and to exchange views with you today. We weren't able to raise many arguments. I wasn't altogether surprised at that, because I had watched from afar and read what you'd had to say and had seen what you'd been doing, and I applaud it.

You and I, your government and mine, your country and mine share basic values and principles. We have confidence in the enterprise and judgment of free men and women living in open societies and conducting their own affairs without too much government interference. We maintain that the role of governments we lead and of all other governments should be a limited one and wish that that were more widely recognized in more countries, I think, around the world.

We know that the market economy has delivered the goods in the past and believe that it can continue to deliver them while allowing people the greatest freedom of choice. We believe that liberty is worth defending, and we're not inhibited in saying so. We believe that nothing is gained and a good deal is lost by pretending that tyranny is not tyranny, even if we have to deal with those who perpetrate it. And we know that in an imperfect world, those who wish to remain free must also remain strong and united. This, I suggest, is not a bad basis of agreement to be getting on with.

I happen to believe that the future of free societies is going to depend crucially on the quality of leadership they produce in the immediate future. That leadership must both recognize danger and stimulate confidence, for in recent years, our societies have simultaneously suffered from comforting illusions about their enemies and from doubt and uncertainty about themselves.

The feeling of these illusions and doubts has become, I suspect in both our countries in past years, a major intellectual growth industry. The trend must be reversed, and reversing will require courage, imagination, and staying power.

Leadership is more than a matter of position papers, options, and management. It is a matter of poise, of inner conviction, of the self-assurance that comes from being at ease with one's self -- of what Ernest Hemingway summed up as ``grace under pressure.'' It is also being able to embody and express the deepest aspirations of ordinary men and women, because that is what our kind of governments is all about, and that is what we stand for and that is our purpose.

It is that sort of leadership that free people throughout the world are looking for, and it is that sort of leadership that you, Mr. President, just by being yourself, have begun to provide. And this is clear from the spirit beginning to show in this United States.

Mr. President, until today I've observed your Presidency from a considerable distance. And they say that distance, or should I say a long shot, lends color to the view. But in this instance, I'm feeling that things look much better even closeup.

For your own sake and for the sake of the free world, I wish you well, Mr. President, over the next 3\1/2\ years. And I ask everyone here to join me in drinking to your health and to the health of this great country and of all the American people.

Last January 20 saw again a change in Administration under our Constitution, the oldest written document of its type in continuous force in the world. The peaceful and orderly transfer of power in response to the sovereign will of our people is sometimes taken for granted by Americans. Yet events in some other areas of the world should remind us all of the vital, revolutionary ideal of our Founding Fathers: that governments derive their legitimacy from the consent of the peoples they govern.

During Captive Nations Week, Americans should realize our devotion to the ideal of government by consent, a devotion that is shared by millions who live in nations dominated today by a foreign military power and an alien Marxist-Leninist ideology.

This week, Americans should recall the series of historical tragedies -- beginning with the broken promises of the Yalta Conference -- that led to the denial of the most elementary forms of personal freedom and human dignity to millions in Eastern Europe and Asia.

In recent years, we have seen successful attempts to extend this oppression to Africa, Latin America and Asia -- most recently in the brutal suppression of national sovereignty in Afghanistan and attempts to intimidate Poland.

During Captive Nations Week, we Americans must reaffirm our own tradition of self-rule and extend to the peoples of the Captive Nations a message of hope -- hope founded in our belief that free men and women will ultimately prevail over those who deny individual rights and preach the supremacy of the state; hope in our conviction that the human spirit will ultimately triumph over the cult of the state.

While we can be justly proud of a government that is responsive to our people, we cannot be complacent. Captive Nations Week provides us with an opportunity to reaffirm publicly our commitment to the ideals of freedom and by so doing maintain a beacon of hope for oppressed peoples everywhere.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 30th day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

Rights Settlement Act of 1982.'' I take this action with sincere disappointment. I am well aware of the hard work of the Arizona Congressional leaders that went into the development and passage of this legislation. I also understand their desire to resolve the litigation that has hung over the head of the City of Tucson and the many private parties involved for the past seven years.

This settlement was negotiated among the Tribe, the City of Tucson, the State of Arizona, the affected commercial interests and other defendants with assistance from the Arizona Congressional delegation. The result of this negotiation was that the United States Government, which was absent from the negotiation table, would bear almost the entire financial burden of the settlement at a potential initial cost of $112 million and a potential annual cost of approximately $5 million.

Government. I can only in good conscience approve legislation intended to implement a settlement if the United States has been a major party in the negotiations and if the contribution by the defendants in the litigation involved is significant.

I pledge the full cooperation of my Administration to the States and local governments that are facing the difficult task of equitably resolving Indian water rights suits. I cannot, however, pledge the Federal Treasury as a panacea for this problem.

H.R. 5118 is a multi-million dollar bailout of local public and commercial interests at the expense of Federal taxpayers throughout the nation. It is a prime example of serious misuse of Federal funds. It asks the Federal Government to pay the settlement share of the mining companies and other local water users whose share should more properly be borne by the defendants themselves.

I therefore must return this legislation to you without my approval. I will only approve legislation that implements a true negotiated settlement. Such a settlement is one in which all parties that are making contributions or concessions have agreed to those contributions or concessions at the negotiating table. I look forward to receiving such legislation from the Congress. I am asking the Secretary of the Interior to coordinate participation by my Administration in any such negotiations.

Since the Revolutionary War, when General George Washington complained of the treatment accorded to captured soldiers of the Continental Army, the United States has recognized the uncommon hardships experienced by our soldiers held prisoner during times of war. Called upon to defend American ideals while undergoing extreme adversity in violation of fundamental moral standards and the international codes and customs for the treatment of prisoners of war, our soldiers have fulfilled their duty to their services and country.

Similarly, our country has recognized the acute suffering experienced by the families of our soldiers held captive or missing in action. The uncertainty these service families live with day-to-day surely touches the heart of every American.

Recognition Day and on this day we should recognize the special debt owed to our fellow citizens who gave up their freedom and their families in the service of our country. We must also remember our still-missing servicemen, for whose families, relatives and friends the anguish and bitterness of war are enduring aspects.

Mr. Saint-Paul. Mr. President, let us speak before of the Versailles summit. The President of my country, Francois Mitterrand, among other European leaders, would like to reach a better harmony between the dollar, the Japanese yen, and the European money. Do you foresee a possible compromise about this question?

The President. Well, I don't know that it's so much a compromise as I believe that what is necessary to have a stable exchange is to have more stable economies for all of us. And I hope that out of our talks we can find ways to approach the problems that face all of us economically in such a way as to be going more in the same direction.

Here, we, in our own country, have undertaken to curb inflation and have had, I think, a remarkable success in that for the last 3 months it has been running at less than 1-percent rate here -- and for the last 6 months, only 2.8 percent.

The exchange -- the idea -- we're opposed, as you know, to government intervention on an ongoing basis in exchange rates in our floating exchange. We would like to see a study made of the history, recent history of government intervention and what its record has been. At the same time, we will support intervention for extreme disruptions and dislocations in the exchange rate.

Mr. Telmon. Mr. President, I remember that last year in Ottawa, you were promising -- you were predicting that the U.S. interest rates would have decreased in 6 months. Are you going to do the same statement this year in Versailles?

The President. I think I could safely say that because, while at that time we had not yet put our economic program in place, we got the most of what we were asking from our Congress. And the interest rates did come down. They are down about 25 percent, but that's not nearly enough.

When we started in office, this administration started, we inherited interest rates that were the highest they had been in our country in more than a hundred years. We did come down, as I say, about 25 percent, but with the increase in unemployment, they have stayed much too high.

I am hoping that the Congress will be more forthcoming with regard to the new budget than they were last week, because I believe that when we get another budget of the kind we had last year that shows continued reductions in the rate of increase in government spending here, we will see another drop in the interest rates before the end of the year.

Mr. Bell. Mr. President, there hasn't been an economic summit, I think, which didn't end with a ringing declaration against protectionism, and we expect that to happen now, although protectionism seems to be creeping onwards. I wonder if, whether on this issue as on others, it's going to make all that much difference whether you go to Versailles or whether you don't.

What the world really needs today is a greater extension of free trade, removing the obstacles to that free trade. And this is also very important with regard to the developing nations, the lesser developed nations that all of us have met with regard to helping, as we met at Cancun.

One of the things that they need is to know that there is an open market for their product, whether it be agricultural produce or whether it be something manufactured. And I am going to strive hard to preach the sermon that protectionism actually ends up in a restraint of trade, and open trade means more jobs for all our people.

The Soviet Union is having its economic problems, too. And I just believe that now is a time not to continue subsidizing them with cheap credit so they can continue their military buildup. But is it time to approach them and point out that there is a different way?

But none of the countries of the Western World represent a threat to the Soviet Union, none of us have any desire to be aggressive where they're concerned. But maybe we could through restraining credit and refusing any longer to subsidize their military buildup, that we could persuade them to come closer to becoming a member of the family of nations -- Europe and here and in Asia -- that want peace and want a trade relationship worldwide.

And so, what I will be proposing is not some return to the cold war as such, but a temporary period of restraint while we show them what we have to offer; on the other hand, if they will give up their expansionist policies and their obvious militarism.

The President. Well, the reasons given for our not being able to convince them -- at least given by our allies -- was that these were contracts that in many instances had already been put in place before the present administration's leaders were in office. And so they felt bound by contract to go along with this.

I think the credit is a different matter. And again, I say it doesn't make much sense to be forced into programs of costly arms buildup on our side simply to meet a threat that comes from one place and one alone, the Soviet Union, which, in the recent years of detente, during what was supposed to be a detente, has gone forward with the greatest military buildup in the history of man. And maybe we need to get their attention.

Mr. Saint-Paul. Mr. President, my question could be a followup now. Do you confirm your intention of having a summit with Leonid Brezhnev, and will this summit depend on the Soviet attitude in the world?

I look forward to a meeting. He has expressed at one time in a communication with me a willingness for such a meeting. There has been no effort to pin down a time, a place, although I have invited him, and I've had no formal rejection of my expression of hope that he would join all of us at the United Nations following this meeting in Europe, when the United Nations takes up the problem of disarmament -- or reduction of arms, and that I expressed the hope that he and I could -- if he came to New York -- could have a meeting at that time.

If that is not to be and he cannot do that in his own schedule, then, yes, I would like to go forward and have such a meeting in which we could discuss the deeds that all of us might use to reveal our peaceful intent.

Mr. Telmon. Mr. President, how much have the peace movements in Europe, in Japan, and now also in the United States influenced your decision? And how much -- how do you evaluate the importance of these movements?

The President. Well, I think it shows the desire of a great many people for peace and to be out from under the shadow over the world of nuclear annihilation. Actually, it didn't influence me. As a matter of fact, they're kind of following the leader because way back during the campaign, when I was campaigning against the incumbent President, on a number of occasions I publicly expressed my intention, if I occupied this office, to seek a program of arms reduction as differing from the recent years' efforts at arms limitation, but outright, sizeable arms reduction. And all I can say is that I'm with them.

I may disagree with some of the things they propose, such as if they are proposing again a freeze at the present levels, because we have now on the table in Geneva a treaty that we're discussing with the Soviet Union that would take the nuclear weapons, the intermediate weapons, entirely away from Europe. We have set the date, June 29th, for the beginning of the negotiations with the Soviet Union -- and they've agreed to it -- to discuss the reduction of the strategic nuclear weapons. And, of course, for some time we've all been discussing -- all the nations -- a reduction of conventional weapons. That's taken place in Vienna.

So, the only place where I might disagree is if some of those peace movements are demanding only a freeze at the present level. I don't think there'd be much accomplishment in freezing the Soviet Union into a position of superiority over all the rest of us.

Mr. Bell. Mr. President, I have a question I'd like to ask you about the Falklands and the extent of your commitment on Britain's side, for the British seem poised to repossess the islands now. Do you want them to go through with that and score their victory, or are you asking us to hold back, for there to be a negotiation and Argentina be left with some of the fruits of aggression?

The President. Well, now, I could be presumptuous in one way if I answered directly some of that. I recognize that both sides have lost men, but England in responding to this -- a threat that all of us must oppose, and that is the idea that armed aggression can succeed in the world today -- you have lost many fine young men, as has the other side, and a number of your vessels and planes.

I don't know exactly -- at what is the right moment for a negotiated settlement to that problem. I would hope it could come before there is further loss of life on either side. And we stand ready to do anything we can, as we have for all these many weeks, to bring about a peaceful solution and resolution of this problem. And we'll continue to offer our help, do whatever we can. Whether that can take place without further military action or not, I don't know.

But we -- I think all of us hope and pray that no more blood needs to be shed or should be shed in arriving at a proper settlement, and, again, as I say, observing the principle that armed aggression, as originally took place there, must not be allowed to succeed.

Mr. Bell. Could we take this forward, Mr. President, to the future of the islands, that after spending so much blood, so many ships sunk, there will be a disposition on the part of the British, perhaps, to hang on in there for the foreseeable future. Will you be with us then as you are now?

The President. Well, that question poses a hypothesis that I don't think I'm at a position to answer. I do know that there had been many attempts at negotiation before this armed invasion of the Falklands took place, in which your country has suggested a solution to the dispute over sovereignty and has evidenced a willingness to find some fair answer, particularly fair to the people who are presently living there on the islands.

Now, I would not like to put myself in the position of saying what that solution should be, except to say that I do believe and I know that Prime Minister Thatcher has expressed many times the desire to do what is best for those people presently living on the Falklands.

We finally had to say, in the face of intransigence on the part of the Argentines with regard to meeting any peaceful solution, that we could not deny the principle involved, that we cannot approve of armed aggression being allowed to succeed, certainly with regard to territorial claims.

I have said for a long period of time that I don't believe our country has ever approached, particularly the neighbors in Latin America, in the way that we should to erase some misunderstandings and all, forget some past history, and to have a mutually beneficial relationship as we have with our allies in other parts of the world.

The President. I don't think there's any question about how far we go. We are committed to the preservation of freedom in Western Berlin, and that island of freedom, I think, is a symbol to the whole world of what is at stake and what is at issue between the East and West.

The President. I got in some trouble recently answering a gentleman's question, a member of the press, in a group meeting about -- he asked a hypothetical question, and I should have stopped short of a hypothetical answer when he said did I believe that there could be such a thing as a limited nuclear war. And I don't think that I will make that mistake again of answering.

I just believe that our goal must be peace, and this is what everything we're doing is leading toward, is a deterrent toward war of any kind. And if we don't have war of conventional kind, then we'll never have to worry about how much of a nuclear war you could have.

The President. Well, I'm curious as to what's in their mind, and do they really understand what I represent? Or are they going by some imagery that has been concocted for them in which they think I'm a threat to peace? And if so, I hope that all of you will convey to them that I'm the first one in a great many years that has persuaded the Soviet Union to sit down in actual arms reduction talks, and that I'm dedicated to that.

Mr. Kronzucker. On the other hand, you are aware for sure that a lot of Germans -- there's even now a poll -- a high percentage of the Germans are looking forward to your visit, and they think they will enjoy it. Mr. President, the nearer this travel to Europe comes, the more conciliatory it seems is your approach to those points that are critical to the Alliance.

The President. No, I don't think -- it's just that now that we're going there, maybe they're paying more attention to what I've been saying. But as I say, I'm not saying anything any different than I said back when I was campaigning for this office.

I know that there has been some misconstruing of some remarks that I made early in a press conference with regard to the Soviet Union. And it's been portrayed that I accused them of all sorts of things -- actually, in answer to a question I was quoting what they say about themselves and their right to practice any morality or immorality that furthers their cause. I was quoting them, not making an accusation. So I don't retract anything that I said.

But again, as I say, I believe the answer is the reduction of arms and, again, not naively or pretending that the Soviet Union, that we can have a detente while they go on with their programs of expansion and all. No. Seeking to persuade them to, by deed, prove their contention that they want peace also.

Mr. Saint-Paul. I've got the chance to ask my very simple question, Mr. President. Before starting tomorrow, what will you say to young Europeans today, and what image would you like to give to Europe during your trip now?

The President. Well, as someone who believes very much in that alliance which has kept the peace for almost 40 years now, with all the criticism that has been leveled upon it even by members of it, at times; a believer in that. A belief that our fate is tied to that of Europe. We're not an outsider coming in trying to do something helpful for others. That alliance is important to us as it is to the nations of Europe. Also a belief that we can have better trade relations, freer trade relations, that our economic problems are similar in all our countries and that the answer must be reducing and eliminating inflation, freer trade that will provide jobs for those people in all our countries who at the moment cannot find jobs. And if I can be seen as honestly wanting and trying sincerely for all those things there, that'll be enough.

The President. Well, we have believed, there again, that the answer to the problem of Israel and the Israeli-Arab conflict must be the same type of thing that happened between Egypt and Israel, that other, more moderate Arab States, to begin with, must acknowledge the right of Israel to exist as a nation and then, bilaterally, make their peace with Israel. And we've been trying -- we can't impose a peace structure on the countries of the Middle East -- but we have been trying to establish ourselves as wanting to be fair and wanting a just and fair solution to the dispute between the Arab States and Israel and that, therefore, we could be depended on as long as we're wanted and our help is sought to try for a fair and just peace.

I recognize that there are some Arab States that are not moderate and that will represent a problem. But I believe that even most of those, if not all, would follow the lead if the more moderate Arab States should accept Israel's right to exist and be willing to do as Egypt did and seek a peace.

Mr. Kronzucker. Mr. President, thank you very much, also on behalf of my colleagues, in spite of the fact that this room, the library, turned to a steambath under the lights. And we wish you a successful trip to Europe.

America's 1572 symphony and chamber orchestras are among this Nation's finest cultural and artistic resources. Each year, our orchestras provide inspiration and enjoyment to more than 23 million people throughout the country.

Orchestras contribute more to their community than fine concert music. Today, orchestras serve their communities in many ways. They reach audiences beyond the concert hall through regional and national tours, free outdoor concerts and benefit performances. In addition, orchestras offer educational programs which introduce school age children to the lasting beauty of music.

The success of America's orchestras has been the result of the combined effort of skilled professionals and dedicated volunteers. It is their partnership with the government and the private sector which enables them to promote and produce music in their communities.

These orchestras provide the opportunity for American trained musicians and conductors to promote the performance of American music. The American orchestra both builds and preserves our Nation's heritage.

I think one of the highest duties that goes with this office is to carry on the pursuit of peace and prosperity for our people. For more than three decades that pursuit has led to consultation and cooperation with our neighbors here on this continent, and with Japan, and with our friends and allies in the Western World, in Europe, those nations that share our democratic ideals.

Together we've weathered threats of aggression and internal disagreements, but we've maintained a sense of unity and a commitment to freedom, and we're still being tested, possibly more now than ever before. It's important, for that reason, to meet and renew our bond.

Now, I know there are some who question the value of the Alliance, who view it as cumbersome and at times unresponsive to the need for action. And there are those people still in our land who yearn for the isolationist shell. But because we've rejected those other courses back over the recent decades, there has been peace for almost 40 years on the Western front.

American strength and the revitalization of our economy. We put the economic recovery program and the defense plan into place. This country never sought the leadership that was thrust upon us at the end of World War II, but what we have done, I think, in this last year, is reaffirm to our friends abroad and to possible adversaries that we accept that responsibility.

In meeting with the industrial democracies in Versailles, we should see more clearly where and how we mean to have a better economic future. That summit meeting is an opportunity to work for real, sustained, noninflationary growth after nearly a decade of stagnation, low productivity, and investment and energy vulnerability. We've been in the longest period of sustained inflation, worldwide inflation, in the history of the world. I intend to propose regular and closer consultation among us so we can together pursue economic policies that move in the same direction, first, to reduce inflation, and then to have greater monetary and fiscal discipline.

We must look for ways to strengthen the international trading system with more reliance on the free market. It's time that we take a stand against the increasing drift in so many parts of the world, and even here at home, toward protectionism.

Now, if it is, as it appears to be, that we're destined to play a leadership role, then we shall do so with one purpose in mind -- to affirm and protect the fundamental values of our people and the people of those countries that are allied to us in this determination to be free. Our societies are a reflection of all that is good and decent in humankind.

Something will happen on this trip also in Bonn. There will be a ceremony, and Spain will become a member of NATO and the North Atlantic Alliance. I wonder if any of us have really thought about the significance of that. Over and above our welcome to another democracy to join us in that alliance, when have we ever seen or will we ever see a nation ask to join the Warsaw Pact? It just won't happen. For that matter, where else in the world can people take to the streets to demonstrate their opposition to nuclear warfare?

There's been near a decade of troubling events and uncertainty among the allies and ourselves, but today there is a regrowth of unity and purpose. And I hope that this trip will contribute to that and increase it.

So, that's my reason for going. And I can only tell you that I shall be more proud than I've ever been of anything to be there representing the United States, with an opportunity once again to express to all of them and to the world what it is we think we represent, what it is we want for all the people of the world.

No, incidentally, I couldn't leave here without just saying to all of you, now that we have you here and in a group, God bless you all, and thank you for all that you've been doing. I know that what we've been doing doesn't read well in the Washington Post or the New York Times, but believe me, it reads well in Peoria.

Act of 1974 (hereinafter ``the Act'') be further extended for twelve months. Pursuant to subsection 402(d)(5) of the Act, I have today determined that further extension of such authority, and continuation of the waivers currently applicable to the Socialist Republic of Romania, the Hungarian People's Republic, and the People's Republic of China will substantially promote the objectives of section 402 of the Act. However, I am concerned about Romania's emigration record this year and suggest it be reexamined. My determination is attached to this Recommendation and is incorporated herein.

Romania: Emigration from Romania to the United States has increased substantially since the waiver has been in effect. In 1981, nearly 2,400 persons emigrated from Romania to the U.S. This is nearly six times the pre-MFN level of emigration and represents an optimum number of emigrants under U.S. immigration procedures in effect that year.

However, I am gravely concerned about the Romanian Government's failure to improve its repressive emigration procedures and the significant decrease in Romanian Jewish emigration to Israel, which is disturbing. This emigration has dropped from an annual rate of 4,000 prior to the 1975 extension of MFN to Romania, to the current (1981) low level of 972. Furthermore, contrary to the 1979 agreement with American Jewish leaders, Romania continues to maintain a considerable backlog of unresolved long-standing emigration cases. This backlog at present involves at least 652 cases. Also, contrary to the 1979 agreement, the Romanian Government has not improved its emigration procedures. The process is cumbersome and plagued with obstacles for those who merely wish to obtain emigration application forms. All these factors demonstrate Romania's negativistic emigration policy which clearly contravenes the intent and purpose of the Jackson-Vanik Amendment.

In waiving the prohibition of MFN renewal for Romania this year, I have weighed the above factors within the context of the satisfactory state of overall U.S.-Romanian relations. However, I intend to inform the Romanian Government that unless a noticeable improvement in its emigration procedures takes place and the rate of Jewish emigration to Israel increases significantly, Romania's MFN renewal for 1983 will be in serious jeopardy.

Hungary: Hungary's performance during the past year has continued to reflect a positive approach to emigration cases. The majority of Hungarians seeking to emigrate receive permission to do so without great difficulty. Few problem cases arise and these can be discussed constructively with the Hungarian Government. Most difficult cases ultimately are favorably resolved. The relatively liberal Hungarian domestic situation seems to defuse any pent-up demand to emigrate and the actual number of citizens who apply to leave Hungary is apparently small.

Foreign Service posts in China issued over 6,920 immigrant visas in FY - 1980, and over 15,293 nonimmigrant visas for business, study, and family visits. The comparable figures for 1980 were 3,400 and 15,893, respectively. More than 8,000 Chinese are now in the United States for long-term study and research (approximately half of this number is privately sponsored). As has been the case for the past several years, the numerical limits imposed on entry to the U.S. by our immigration law continue to be a more significant impediment to immigration from China than Chinese Government exit controls. The Chinese Government is aware of our interest in open emigration, and extension of the waiver will encourage the Chinese to maintain liberal travel and emigration policies.

States, Mr. Ronald Reagan. Mr. Reagan has already been in France in his personal capacity -- on a personal visit -- but it's the first time that we've had the very great pleasure of receiving here officially the first of the Americans.

We have had an exchange of views during this lunch, which has been a friendly occasion, but it has also been a working lunch. And we have been accompanied by our aides. And I wish simply to say that -- for France, I want to say this to the French press and also to the foreign press -- that we are extremely happy that this day should have come about. For France it is a great event, a great day that we should have in our midst Mr. Ronald Reagan.

Ladies and gentlemen, as the President has said, we resumed here discussions that began a few weeks ago in Washington. We touched upon the areas of tension that concern us both, the Falklands, Central America, the Middle East. We did not get into heavy discussions, because those are reserved for the meetings at Versailles that begin tomorrow, when we will be there with our colleagues from the other nations in the alliance and the other industrial nations.

So, this has been a combination of a very happy resumption of a personal friendship, as well, as I say, just touching upon some of the events which will be thoroughly discussed in the next 2 days, 3 days.

And I just want to take this opportunity to thank President Mitterrand and the people of France for the warm hospitality that we have enjoyed and are enjoying here and thank him for hosting again the eighth in this series of meetings between the leaders and representatives of the industrial nations.

I come to Europe and to this summit with a spirit of confidence. Our administration has embarked upon a program to bring inflationary government spending under control, restore personal incentives to revive economic growth and to rebuild our defenses to ensure peace through strength. This has meant a fundamental change in policies, and understandably the transition has not been without difficulties. However, I'm pleased to report that these policies are beginning to bear fruit.

Our reason for both actions are simple: A strong America and a vital, unified alliance are indispensable to keeping the peace now and in the future, just as they have been in the past. At the same time, we've invited the Soviet Union to meet with us to negotiate for the first time in history substantial, verifiable reductions in the weapons of mass destruction, and this we are committed to do.

You and your country have also been working to set a new course. While the policies you've chosen to deal with economic problems are not the same as ours, we recognize they're directed at a common goal: a peaceful and a more prosperous world. We understand that other nations may pursue different roads toward our common goals, but we can still come together and work together for a greater good. A challenge of our democracies is to forge a unity of purpose and mission without sacrificing the basic right of self-determination. At Versailles, I believe we can do this. I believe we will.

But we can solve them. It is we, not the foes of freedom, who enjoy the blessings of constitutional government, rule of law, political and economic liberties, and the right to worship God. It is we who trust our own people rather than fear them. These values lie at the heart of human freedom and social progress. We need only the spirit, wisdom, and will to make them work.

Mr. President, just as our countries have preserved our democratic institutions, so have we maintained the world's oldest alliance. My true friends, who may disagree from time to time, we know that we can count on each other when it really matters. I think there's no more fitting way to underscore this relationship than to recall that there are more than 60,000 young Americans -- soldiers, sailors, and marines -- who rest beneath the soil of France.

If you will allow me, there was a young American -- his name was Martin Treptow -- who left his job in a small town barbershop in 1917 to come to France with the famed ``Rainbow Division'' of World War I. Here on the western front he was killed trying to carry a message between battalions under heavy artillery fire.

The challenges we face today do not require the same sacrifices that Martin Treptow and so many thousands of others were called upon to make. But they do require our best effort, our willingness to believe in each other and to believe that together, with God's help, we can and will resolve the problems confronting us.

I pledge to you my best effort. Let us continue working together for the values and principles that permit little people to dream great dreams, to grow tall, to live in peace, and one day to leave behind a better life for their children.

Saint-Exupery wrote that a rockpile ceases to be a rockpile the moment a single man contemplates it bearing within him the image of a cathedral. Mr. President, let us raise our glasses to all the cathedrals yet to be built. With our friendship, courage, and determination, they will be built.

President Mitterrand. Mr. President, Madam, I would like to say welcome, welcome to our country. And our country is a country which enjoys receiving a visit from friends. And we're also proud that you should be here and that you should be here on the occasion of your first trip to France and, indeed, your first trip to Europe. So, during this visit we will keep you here with us for 3 days, and the Prime Minister and myself, we will then have the privilege of seeing you again in Bonn.

We have had several occasions already to meet and to talk together, and we will move forward towards a mutual knowledge of each other. And we have been able to talk of the matters which are of importance for our countries and, indeed, for the whole world. And I have always appreciated, Mr. President, your wise counsel, the very marked attention that you have devoted to what has been said around you and your openmindedness. And it is clear that when the fate of mankind is at stake and also, well, mankind to some extent for which we are responsible, you and I, it is on those occasions that your attention is particularly dedicated.

It is not a matter of chance that we should in fact be the members of the oldest alliance in the world. Think of the time that has elapsed, the generations that have gone by, the events that have taken place -- the contradictions, perhaps, in our approaches to the things of the world. And yet, despite all these differences, when the time of need came, we were there, both of us, in order to defend the cause of liberty, the liberty for the individual citizen within each country and the liberty for all the citizens in the whole world, and the liberty, in fact, of friends.

It was not a matter of pure chance nor a matter simply of the combination of various interests which led to the presence of French soldiers by the side of American soldiers when it was a question of fighting for the independence and liberty of your country. Nor was it a matter of chance or of interest merely when many years later American soldiers fought side by side with French soldiers for the independence and the liberty of France. It is because, perhaps without really realizing it, during those two centuries many people reacted and reflected in the same way as the almost synonymous hairdresser that you were mentioning earlier, who later became a soldier, in fact felt that on their shoulders rested the weight of the whole world.

It was simply because they felt that they were responsible, and this man alone realized in his innermost conscience and awareness that in fact what he decided in his intimate knowledge of himself and what was right in his eyes, that in fact that that would govern the way the rest of the world would think likewise.

And where else really does one learn responsibility? Surely it is only in the political democracies where in fact one entrusts to no one else the decisions that have to be taken by each and every individual. And who can really be fully responsible more than the person who realizes and fully appreciates that it is the force of the mind that is decisive and that will always win the day over the mechanical forces, however powerful they may be, even the forces of economics.

So, one can say that the world can be built if one thinks right and if one wants it. And we have an excellent opportunity of proving this in the next 3 days -- without too much ambition, but all the same we need a lot of ambition in the positions that arise. But to move with a sense of solidarity and consistency towards justice and, therefore, towards peace is already something, perhaps, that is important.

Now, the least we can do, of course, is to discuss economics. And if the seven countries which will be meeting with the European Economic Community are to attain the strength that they need in order to defend the ideas which they consider to be right, then it is important not to divorce the economic powers from the other resources that are ours. It is important that we should be able to guarantee peace which, after all, is based on agreement among ourselves. But in order to be able to do that, it is essential that we should not be, in fact, fighting within ourselves.

I, like you are yourself, I am confident that we can, in fact, control and dominate the crisis which we are living in. The methods that we may employ within our countries may indeed be somewhat different. But the aims are the same, and our methods can and must in fact converge in the form of common actions that we can engage in together.

Now, by the presence of force and power, we should be able to view with equinimity and indeed serenity the threats that may be before us. But at the same time, we will only use force in order to ensure the protection and the achievement of the peace which is so necessary. And so it is that force must be there in order to back, just start the necessary negotiations. And that indeed is what you have just done, saying what you have said just before the opening of the very important talks concerning disarmament, talks that are to be held with the very great power that -- with you and with others, such as ourselves -- is responsible for the fate of the world.

And I hope that we will be able to extend our efforts too, further, in order to help those billions of human beings who are no longer really the Third World, but a sort of world which is in the process of moving towards development, a world which needs us just as we need them, in order that our century should have a future.

Well my dear Ron, perhaps the remarks that you were making yourself earlier have led me somewhat far afield from the tone that should be the tone of this evening, that is continuing -- because it has not yet reached its end. And it is a tone, of course, of happiness, the happiness of being together, the joy of being together. And so in a moment, I will be raising my glass to your health, to the health of Mrs. Reagan. And I have had the very great pleasure of having long talks with Mrs. Reagan. We started our talks in London, as we will recall, and indeed we also talked about you. [Laughter] I've also raised my glass to the people of the United States, our friends, our faithful friends, just as we are their loyal allies. And it is our function to say on all occasions what we think just as it is our duty to, at all times, show our wholehearted solidarity.

And I'm not only speaking on behalf of the French guests present here tonight -- who represent what you might call in American terms, as far as the political scene is concerned, a sort of ``cocktail'' -- [laughter] -- but vis-a-vis the President of the United States and indeed the world, they are representatives of the whole nation of France -- and it is on their behalf, on behalf of everyone, that I would like again to raise my glass to your health. And I would say, good luck to your action and also good luck to the work that we are going to undertake in the next 2 days -- the conquest of liberty and peace.

I just wish that we had the time to greet each one of you personally, but the schedule doesn't permit that. I think we've been a little behind schedule ever since we took off in Marine One from the lawn at the White House two days ago.

Well, I just want you to know that you're never forgotten back in the States, and we appreciate very much your hard work and, now, more recently, your hospitality. The success of the summit and this visit to Paris will be, in great measure, due to your efforts.

If I may, I'd like to speak for a moment on a subject which concerns me greatly and each one of you in a very personal way -- terrorism. All of us have been moved by the tragic events of the past months, especially with the death of Colonel Ray on the streets of Paris and the attack on Chris Chapman.

I know that some of you here today were colleagues of Colonel Ray. You have our deepest sympathy. From experience, I know it's no fun being a target no matter where on Earth you're standing -- even outside the Hilton Hotel. But the safety of our diplomats is of paramount concern to us. President Mitterrand has also put in motion steps to control the threat of terrorism. We're encouraging him, as are the other world leaders who share my concerns, encouraging him to continue this effort.

You know your jobs are not easy. The delicate nature of diplomacy makes many demands upon you. But France and the United States are old friends and close partners. And if our partnership is growing stronger, which I'm convinced it is, that is certainly a tribute to your professional skills, which I'm convinced is equally true about not only growing stronger but due to your skills.

I wish there was more time. I wish we could have a dialog instead of a monolog, and we could tell you whether things still looked the same at home. They do; Congress is still in a state of confusion. [Laughter] But we are grateful to all of you and welcome just this opportunity for a brief moment to be able to come by and say hello and thank you to each one of you.

Following his appearance at the Embassy, the President went to the Hotel de Ville, the Paris townhall, for a meeting with Mayor Jacques Chirac. He then flew by helicopter to the grounds of the Palace of Versailles and was met by President Francois Mitterrand at the Grand Trianon, where he stayed during the Versailles Economic Summit Conference.

The two Presidents met briefly at the Grand Trianon and then attended a reception for heads of delegation in the Salon de Famille. The President later attended a dinner for heads of delegation in the Salon de Jardin at the Grand Trianon.

I bring to France greetings and best wishes from the American people. I carry their hopes for continued Western unity to secure a prosperous and lasting peace, and I've come to express our commitment to policies that will renew economic growth.

But today touches French and American memories in a special way. It brings to mind thoughts quite apart from the pressing issues being discussed at the economic summit in Versailles. On this day, 38 years ago, our two peoples were united in an epic struggle against tyranny.

The French Resistance fought valiantly on, disrupting communications and sabotaging supply lines. But the Nazis held Europe in a stranglehold, and Field Marshal Rommel was building his Atlantic wall along France's coast.

Late the night of June 5th, as fog enshrouded the Normandy coastline, over 2,000 planes took off from English fields to drop soldiers by parachute behind enemy lines. By the early hours of June 6th, the massive allied armada, 5,000 ships, had begun to move across the cold and choppy water of the English Channel. D-Day had begun.

Today, endless rows of simple white crosses mark their seacoast graves. The rusty helmets still buried in the sand and the ships and tanks still lying off the shore are testaments to their sacrifices.

D-Day was a success, and the Allies had breached Hitler's seawall. They swept into Europe, liberating towns and cities and countrysides, until the Axis powers were finally crushed. We remember D-Day because the French, British, Canadians, and Americans fought shoulder to shoulder for democracy and freedom -- and won.

During the war, a gallant French leader, Charles de Gaulle, inspired his countrymen, organizing and leading the free French forces. He entered Paris in triumph, liberating that city at the head of a column of allied troops, a victory made possible by the heroes of Normandy. ``Nothing great will ever be achieved without great men, and men are great only if they're determined to be so,'' de Gaulle said.

The freedom we enjoy today was secured by great men and at great cost. Today, let us remember their courage and pray for the guidance and strength to do what we must so that no generation is ever asked to make so great a sacrifice again.

Benjamin Franklin concluded an alliance without which our Revolution's outcome might have been very different. And in 1783 the Treaty of Versailles, which led to the formal recognition of America's independence from England, was signed here.

I can assure you our partners are as determined as we are to overcome economic ills and create incentives for employment, investment, and productivity. And they also realize that economic growth is essential to the long term well-being of the industrial countries.

In our meetings, we are trying to work out ways we can reach those goals together and without stepping on each others' toes. Yes, the countries attending the summit do have economic problems, but look how far we've come.

Out of the ruins of the last great wars, we have built thriving democracies, solid friendships, and fundamentally sound economies. We have a right to be proud of our contributions to the economic strength of these industrial democracies. Today is the 35th anniversary of the Marshall plan, a program that shines as an example of how we've worked for the betterment of our sister democracies. I think it's appropriate that this anniversary occurs here among our friends. Our presence demonstrates America's continuing commitment to the democracies of Europe, Japan, and Canada.

And then back on the plane, and we're off to England, a nation whose American ties are as thick as its fog. The next summit we attend is the NATO gathering in Bonn, West Germany. As you know, NATO's origins go back to the North Atlantic Treaty of 1949 which provided for a defensive military alliance of Western Europe and North America, as well as political and economic cooperation. It is this Alliance and its deterrent strength that has kept the peace for the past 33 years. At the NATO summit, we'll work to preserve that peace by strengthening our defenses and demonstrating the Alliance's firm resolve.

The happiest event of the meeting will be Spain's addition to the list of NATO members. A democratic country has freely chosen to join other nations in an alliance for their common defense. This has real significance. Did any nation in Eastern Europe freely choose to join the Warsaw Pact? Not one.

One lesson of D-Day is as clear now as it was 38 years ago: Only strength can deter tyranny and aggression. The dawn that rose on the English Channel that June morning revealed a horizon alive with thousands of ships, the largest armada in history. From England, the long-awaited message went around the world. Under the command of General Eisenhower, allied naval forces supported by strong air forces began landing allied armies on the northern coast of France. It was a simple statement, but the operation had been years in the planning.

Well, it was a mighty endeavor, an endeavor of liberty, sacrifice, and valor. As we honor these men, I pledge to do my utmost to carry out what must have been their wish -- that no other generation of young men would ever have to repeat their sacrifice in order to preserve freedom.

In connection with the escalation of violence, the United States Government has ordered a reduction in force of U.S. Embassy personnel in Beirut. In the next 72 hours, all dependents will leave, and an Embassy staff of approximately 50 will be reduced by one-half.

The President last night sent a personal letter to Prime Minister Menachem Begin of Israel expressing the President's hopes that the Government of Israel would seriously consider that no further action be taken that could widen the conflict.

We have made similar appeals to every government in the area with some influence over the situation or the parties which have been engaged in the fighting. I would characterize it as we have pulled out all stops to bring about an end to the fighting and a restoration of the cessation of hostilities which was arranged by Ambassador Habib in July of 1981.

Secretary-General for a cessation of the hostilities at dawn this morning. We continue to be deeply and profoundly concerned by the mounting loss of lives caused by this ongoing spiral of violence and counterviolence.

We renew our call on all parties to refrain at once from further violence. We continue to call on all with influence on the parties to exert all their efforts to effecting a speedy end to this tragic violence. We will continue to confer closely with all parties to bring an end to the fighting. I can assure you we're exerting ourselves to the utmost to restore peace to the region.

Since World War II our peoples in Europe, Canada, Japan, and the United States have worked together to lay the foundation for global prosperity. Together, we built the international institutions which have seen us through the greatest economic expansion in the history of the world. This weekend at Versailles, that spirit of partnership was very much alive.

We did not ignore the serious difficulties facing our economies. These problems will not go away overnight, but they will be overcome. Beating inflation, convincingly and enduringly, is the key to a strong recovery of growth and employment. This was agreed. And I was pleased to report to my colleagues that in the U.S. we are conquering inflation and are convincing our people that we will not return to the inflationary policies of the past.

In times of economic stress, it is always tempting to seek simple solutions at the expense of others. At Versailles, we resisted this temptation. Instead, we concentrated on ways and means to strengthen our economic performance individually and collectively. We have agreed to reinforce the international institutions which assure cooperation and coordination. In doing so, we are looking to a future with low inflation, greater employment opportunities, rising standards of living through advancing technology, and smoothly functioning international economic relations.

In our informal political discussions, we addressed the major critical issues before the West. We know that the economic growth we seek would be hollow without the collective capacity to defend our democratic principles and our freedom.

We addressed our shared concerns in East-West relations. The continuing buildup of Soviet military power is a major challenge, heightened by Soviet actions in Poland, Afghanistan, and Southeast Asia -- issues I look forward to discussing in greater depth at the Bonn summit. At the same time, we agreed that the serious economic problems and impending succession in the Soviet Union provide us with major opportunities to work out a more constructive East-West dialog.

We must maintain dialog with the Soviet Union, based on reciprocity and restraint. In that spirit, my colleagues have endorsed U.S. initiatives for arms control, particularly the negotiations on reducing strategic arms which will begin on June 29.

The tragedy in the Falkland Islands has been a serious concern to us all. Throughout the crisis, we have all been impressed by the British resolve, and in various ways, we have demonstrated our support for the United Kingdom. The United States continues to believe that we must end the fighting in the South Atlantic and achieve a political settlement.

On other matters, we urged restraint on all parties in Lebanon. Increasing bloodshed in that region is something we all abhor. We have also called for a political settlement in the Iran-Iraq conflict which would preserve the territorial integrity of both nations. And we agreed to improve our coordinated fight against international terrorism.

A year ago in Ottawa, we ended the first series of economics summits that began in France. With this summit at Versailles, we have begun a new cycle. We thus reaffirm our strong commitment to economic and political cooperation. In the spirit of partnership with our fellow democracies, I want to say that I very much look forward to welcoming these nations to the United States next year.

Note: The statement was issued following a gathering of the heads of delegation to the conference, at which time French President Francois Mitterrand delivered a declaration on the outcome of the conference on their behalf. The session took place in the Salle du Congress at the Palace of Versailles.

The President prepared for each day's sessions by meeting first in his suite at the Grand Trianon with members of the White House staff and then with Secretary of State Alexander M. Haig, Jr., Secretary of the Treasury Donald T. Regan, and members of the White House staff.

On Sunday evening, following the presentation of the declaration, the President attended a dinner for the delegations in the Galerie des Glaces at the Palace of Versailles. The dinner was followed by an opera in the Palace's Opera House and fireworks in the Palace Gardens. The President then returned to the Grand Trianon, where he spent the night before flying to Rome, Italy, the following day.

Europe, consistent with our political and security interests. This includes actions in three key areas. First, following international discussions in January, our representatives will work together to improve the international system for controlling exports of strategic goods to these countries and national arrangements for the enforcement of security controls. Second, we will exchange information in the OECD on all aspects of our economic, commercial and financial relations with the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe. Third, taking into account existing economic and financial considerations, we have agreed to handle cautiously financial relations with the U.S.S.R. and other Eastern European countries, in such a way as to ensure that they are conducted on a sound economic basis, including also the need for commercial prudence in limiting export credits. The development of economic and financial relations will be subject to periodic ex-post review.

Cooperation to develop new energy technologies, and to strengthen our capacity to deal with disruptions, can contribute to our common energy security. We shall also work to strengthen our cooperation with both oil-exporting and oil-importing developing countries.

This is truly a city of peace, love, and charity, where the highest to the humblest among us seek to follow in the footsteps of the fishermen. As you know, Your Holiness, this is my first visit to Europe as President. And I would like to think of it as a pilgrimage for peace, a journey aimed at strengthening the forces for peace in the free West by offering new opportunities for realistic negotiations with those who may not share the values of freedom and the spirit we cherish.

Certain common experiences we've shared in our different walks of life, Your Holiness, and the warm correspondence we've carried on, also, gave our meeting a special meaning for me. I hope that others will follow. Let me add that all Americans remember with great warmth your historic visit to our shores in 1979. We all hope that you'll be back again with your timeless message. Ours is a nation grounded on faith, faith in man's ability through God-given freedom to live in tolerance and peace and faith that a Supreme Being guides our daily striving in this world. Our national motto, ``In God We Trust,'' reflects that faith.

Liberty has never meant license to Americans. We treasure it precisely because it protects the human and spiritual values that we hold most dear: the right to worship as we choose, the right to elect democratic leaders, the right to choose the type of education we want for our children, and freedom from fear, want, and oppression. These are God-given freedoms, not the contrivances of man.

We also believe in helping one another through our churches and charitable institutions or simply as one friend, one good Samaritan to another. The Ten Commandments and the Golden Rule are as much a part of our living heritage as the Constitution we take such pride in. And we have tried -- not always successfully, but always in good conscience -- to extend those same principles to our role in the world.

To us, in a troubled world, the Holy See and your pastorate represent one of the world's greatest moral and spiritual forces. We admire your active efforts to foster peace and promote justice, freedom, and compassion in a world that is still stalked by the forces of evil. As a people and as a government, we seek to pursue the same goals of peace, freedom, and humanity along political and economic lines that the Church pursues in its spiritual role. So, we deeply value your counsel and support and express our solidarity with you.

Your Holiness, one of the areas of our mutual concern is Latin America. We want to work closely with the Church in that area to help promote peace, social justice, and reform, and to prevent the spread of repression and godless tyranny. We also share your concern in seeking peace and justice in troubled areas of the Middle East, such as Lebanon.

We seek a process of reconciliation and reform that will lead to a new dawn of hope for the people of Poland, and we'll continue to call for an end to martial law, for the freeing of all political prisoners, and to resume dialog among the Polish Government, the Church, and the Solidarity movement which speaks for the vast majority of Poles. While denying financial assistance to the oppressive Polish regime, America will continue to provide the Polish people with as much food and commodity support as possible through church and private organizations.

Dante has written that, ``The infinite goodness has such wide arms that it takes whatever turns to it.'' We ask your prayers, Holy Father, that God will guide us in our efforts for peace on this journey and in the years ahead and that the wide arms of faith and forgiveness can some day embrace a world at peace, with justice and compassion for all mankind.

In you, the President of the United States of America, I greet all the people of your great land. I still remember vividly the warm welcome that I was given by millions of your fellow citizens less than 3 years ago. On that occasion, I was once more able to witness firsthand the vitality of your nation. I was able to see again how the moral and spiritual values transmitted by your Founding Fathers find their dynamic expression in the life of modern America.

As I speak to you today, it is my hope that the entire structure of American life will rest ever more securely on the strong foundation of moral and spiritual values. Without the fostering and defense of these values, all human advancement is stunted and the very dignity of the human person is endangered.

Throughout the course of their history, and especially in difficult times, the American people have repeatedly risen to challenges presented to them. They have given many proofs of unselfishness, generosity, concern for others, concern for the poor, the needy, the oppressed. They have shown confidence in that great ideal of being a united people with a mission of service to perform.

At this present moment in the history of the world, the United States is called, above all, to fulfill its mission in the service of world peace. The very condition of the world today calls for a far-sighted policy that will favor those indispensable conditions of justice and freedom, of truth and love, that are the foundations of lasting peace.

In many parts of the world, there are centers of acute tension. This acute tension is manifested above all in the crisis of the South Atlantic, in the war between Iran and Iraq, and, now, in the grave crisis provoked by the new events in Lebanon. This grave crisis in Lebanon likewise merits the attention of the world because of the danger it contains of further provocation in the Middle East, with immense consequences for world peace.

There are, fortunately, many factors in society that today positively contribute to peace. These positive factors include an increasing realization of the interdependence of all peoples, the growing solidarity with those in need, and a greater conviction of the absurdity of war as a means of resolving controversies between nations.

During my recent visit to Britain, I stated in particular that the scale and the horror of modern warfare, whether nuclear or not, makes it totally unacceptable as a means of settling differences between nations. And for those who profess the Christian faith, I offer it as motivation the fact that when you are in contact with the Prince of Peace, you understand how totally opposed to His message are hatred and war.

The duty of peace falls especially upon the leaders of the world. It is up to the representatives of governments and peoples to work to free humanity not only from wars and conflicts but from the fear that is generated by ever more sophisticated and deadly weapons.

Peace is not only the absence of war; it also involves reciprocal trust between nations, a trust that is manifested and proved through constructive negotiations that aim at ending the arms race and at liberating immense resources that can be used to alleviate misery and feed millions of hungry human beings.

All effective peacemaking requires foresightedness, for foresightedness is a quality needed in all peacemakers. You, your own great nation is called to exercise this foresightedness as are all the nations of the world. This quality enables leaders to commit themselves to those concrete programs which are essential to world peace -- programs of justice and development, efforts to defend and protect human life, as well as initiatives that favor human rights. On the contrary, anything that wounds, weakens, or dishonors human dignity in any aspect imperils the cause of the human person and at the same time the peace of the world.

The relations between nations are greatly affected by the development issue which preserves its full relevance in this day of ours. Success in resolving questions in the North-South dialog will continue to be the gates of peaceful relations between values, political communities, and continue to influence the peace of the world in the years ahead.

A truly universal concept of the common good of the human family is an incomparable instrument in building the edifice of the world today. It is my own conviction that a united and concerned America can contribute immensely to the cause of world peace through the efforts of her leaders and the commitment of all her citizens. Dedicated to the high ideals of her traditions, America is in a splendid position to help all humanity enjoy what she herself is intent on possessing.

With faith in God and belief in universal human solidarity may America step forward in this crucial moment in history to consolidate her rightful place at the service of world peace. In this sense, Mr. President, I repeat today those words that I spoke when I left the United States in 1979. My final prayer is this: that God will bless America so that she may increasingly become and truly be and long remain one nation under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all.

But, again, there's little more I can say except to thank you and to say, once again, I'm sure that many of us, millions and millions in the world, have had our faith renewed, and our belief, that in times of great need, God does send someone here to help us in those times. And I think in this holy man, He has once again done that when the need was so very great. And we're all grateful, and thank God for him.

In my time at the White House, I don't remember as beautiful and moving a gesture as the kiss you planted on our flag that March morning. That kiss touched all the citizens of my country. We were deeply honored.

Yes, we live in difficult times that test our beliefs. The independence and freedom of people the world over are threatened by the expansion of totalitarian regimes and by the brutal crimes of international terrorism. But let me say I am optimistic. The West simply needs to believe in itself and in its own leadership to succeed.

Italy and her people are abundant in that leadership. Italy has made hard but self-confident choices in recent years. The Atlantic Alliance is firm in large part because of Italian determination to assume major responsibilities within NATO for our common defense. Prospects for peace are improved because of Italy's contribution to such efforts as the Sinai Multi-National Force.

These issues have required difficult decisions. They have required political decisiveness beyond the ordinary. So, I want to pay special tribute to you, President Pertini, Prime Minister Spadolini, Foreign Minister Colombo, and to the entire Italian Government for the resolution you've shown and the example that you have given.

In return, I want to assure you that the United States stands behind you in defending the values of the West. The Atlantic Alliance is still the heart of our foreign policy, and that heart beats for peace and freedom.

Note: The President spoke at approximately 3 p.m. in the Hall of Mirrors at the Quirinale Palace, the residence of the Italian President. He spoke in response to a toast proposed by President Pertini.

United States of America, Ronald Reagan, paid a visit to Rome on June 7th, 1982. The visit provided an opportunity for the two Presidents to have a productive exchange of views. Two useful meetings were held between President Reagan and the President of the Council of Ministers, Giovanni Spadolini. President Reagan took the opportunity to thank President Pertini for his recent state visit to the United States and conveyed to him the warm good wishes of the American government and the American people. President Pertini expressed to President Reagan his appreciation for the warm reception he enjoyed in the United States.

Presidents Reagan and Pertini reviewed the threat which international terrorism presents to the free world and noted with satisfaction the successes of the Italian and other Western governments in combatting this menace. The two Presidents also reviewed international trouble spots including Afghanistan, Poland, and Central and South America; the two reaffirmed their strongest commitment to the preservation and restoration of freedom and justice for all men. They noted their shared hope for a cessation of hostilities in the South Atlantic. The two Heads of State concluded their meeting with an affirmation of the strength of U.S.-Italian bonds and a review of those common values on which the two societies have been built.

Minister of Foreign Affairs Emilio Colombo and Secretary of State Alexander Haig, reviewed a number of questions facing the two countries, including the 1979 decision by NATO to place intermediate range nuclear forces in Europe, together with the offer to the Soviet Union for simultaneous negotiations on control and limitation of such weapons; and the overall Middle East situation, with special attention to the two most urgent questions in that area at the moment; the Lebanese situation where it is of the utmost urgency to bring a cessation of the fighting. On the Iran-Iraq conflict -- the two sides agreed on the need for a political settlement respecting the territorial integrity of both nations.

In addition they reviewed the validity of both countries' participation in the Sinai multinational force and the prospects for the dialogue on Palestinian autonomy. They also examined East-West relations, including questions of trade and credit and issues related to economic and monetary cooperation between the two countries. The two Heads of Government reaffirmed their commitment to a policy aiming at a growing level of economic and commercial relations between the two countries in order to fight against inflation, promote growth and thereby employment.

President Reagan reviewed his proposals for the worldwide reduction of strategic nuclear weapons and for the reduction of intermediate-range nuclear forces in Europe. Prime Minister Spadolini noted with approval the recent announcement that the START talks will begin in Geneva on June 29. The two said they shared the aspirations of many of the young people who were marching for peace, took note of the institutions and policies which have kept the peace in Europe for almost forty years, and urged the Soviet Union to respond positively to proposals which have been made by the United States.

The two governments agreed to begin regular meetings to discuss cultural and information matters with the desire to improve cultural programs and in order to examine means of strengthening relations in these fields. The first cultural and information talks will be held in Washington in October.

The Prime Minister. We are here today to welcome and to honor our great ally, the United States of America. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, it's a privilege and a pleasure to have you both here with us. It's rare enough to have an American President as a guest at Number 10, but my researchers have been unable to find out when we last had the honor of the First Lady at Number 10 as well.

President and Mrs. Reagan, your presence gives me and, indeed, many of our guests a chance to repay as best we can the hospitality you bestowed on us when we were your first official guests from abroad at the beginning of your Presidential term of office. I realize, of course, that you've both become accustomed recently to taking your meals in rather grander places -- [laughter] -- the Palace of Versailles and Windsor Castle. As you can see, this is a very simple house, one which has witnessed the shaping of our shared history since it first became the abode of Prime Ministers in 1732.

Mr. President, some of us were present this morning to hear your magnificent speech to members of both Houses of Parliament in the historic setting of the Royal Gallery. It was, if I may say so, respectfully, a triumph. We are so grateful to you for putting freedom on the offensive, which is where it should be. You wrote a new chapter in our history -- no longer on the defensive but on the offensive. It was, if I might say so, an exceedingly hard act to follow. [Laughter] But I will try to be brief.

Much has been said and written over the years, Mr. President, about the relations between our two countries. And there's no need for me to add to the generalities on the subject today, because we've had before our eyes in recent weeks the most concrete expression of what, in practice, our friendship means. I refer to your awareness of our readiness to resist aggression in the Falklands even at great sacrifice and to our awareness of your readiness to give support to us even at considerable costs to American interests.

It is this preparedness on both sides for sacrifices in the common interest and, indeed, in the wider interest that characterizes our partnership. And I should like to pay tribute to you, Mr. President, and to you, Mr. Secretary Haig, whom I also greet here heartily today, and through you to the American people for your predictably generous response.

You recognized how central your allies were to American interests, and vice versa. But no country, however strong, can remain an island in the modern world. And I want you to know how fully we reciprocate your conviction about the need for a dynamic, two-way alliance.

May I also stress what you stand for in international economic life, your commitment to an open world trade system, whatever the immediate pressures for restriction. That is our role, too, and we will strive for it alongside you.

Mr. President, both before and since you took office, I've come to know you as a personal friend who can be relied on in times of danger, who's not going to compromise on the values of the free world, who seeks the reduction of world tensions and the strengthening of world security, who will do everything possible to encourage creative enterprise and initiative, who wants the individual to flourish in freedom, in justice, and in peace.

But I've found in my 3 years in office, as I'm sure my predecessors did -- and we're delighted to see some of them here today -- that there is one further characteristic that is dominant to those concerned with policy. I refer to our ability to discuss with you problems of common interest -- which means in today's world practically everything -- to discuss them freely and candidly, not necessarily always agreeing, but giving and taking advice as family friends, without exciting anxiety or envy.

Churchill. You well know that in Parliament Square, as well as Winston Churchill, there stands the statue of Abraham Lincoln who, in his most famous speech of all at Gettysburg -- and I was very worried this morning when the Chancellor, too, quoted Gettysburg. And I thought, ``Has he trumped my ace again!'' [Laughter] But you know we all adore the Lord Chancellor who, in his own inimitable way, put everything we felt so much.

But you know that speech at Gettysburg -- every sentence is a quote. He gave one of them. May I say another of them which, I believe, fits in with the cause which you and I share. You'll remember that Abraham Lincoln, on that famous occasion, said: The world will little note nor long remember what we say here, but it can never forget what they did here. It is for us the living to be dedicated here to the unfinished work that they who fought here have thus far so nobly advanced.

It is in that spirit and mindful of that unfinished work, that I ask you all to rise and drink a toast to the enduring alliance between the United States and the United Kingdom, coupled with the names of the President and Mrs. Reagan. The alliance, the President, and Mrs. Reagan: to your health, success, and happiness.

When you were our guests in Washington last year, Madam Prime Minister, you said you had come across the Atlantic with a message. ``Britain,'' you said, ``stands with America. When America looks for friends, Britain will be there.'' Well, your words touched the hearts of our people. We were very grateful. So let me tell you that we, too, have crossed the ocean with a message: America stands with Britain, and I mean that.

The President. These are difficult days for both our peoples. We're gripped by recession, concerned about aggression and instability in the world. No longer can we rest on comfortable assumptions about our economies or our security. Together and independently, our two countries have acted to renew and protect our way of life. We're restoring incentives and opportunities in our marketplaces by reducing excessive taxation and regulation. By lifting the heavy hand of government, we're placing our faith in the working men and women of Britain and the United States.

Our two countries have been united in commitment to free trade, and we are both making economic sacrifices for the sake of Western security. But an important challenge still looms before us: the protection of our personal freedoms and national interests in the face of hostile ideologies and enormous military threats. We must find the right balance of deterrent forces and arms reductions to secure a lasting peace for generations to come.

The United Kingdom is a great symbol of Western thought and values. The British people are known for their vision and dedication. Yours has been an empire of ideas, nourishing freedom and creating wealth around the globe. Here is, as I said earlier today, the birthplace of representative government, constitutional rights, and economic freedom -- a body of ideas that has raised the standard of living and improved the quality of life for more people in less time than any that ever came before.

Nancy and I thank you for this warm reception among friends. I would like to propose a toast and, again, similar in that it's to the bonds between our people, but also to the Right Honorable Margaret Thatcher, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, and Mr. Thatcher, and to the Queen.

We hope these will be enjoyable days for you in Britain, as enjoyable as our stays have always been in the United States. We shall never forget the warmth and hospitality of your people in 1976 as we walked through the crowds in Philadelphia, Washington, New York, and Boston to take part in the celebrations of the Bicentennial of American Independence.

Two hundred years before that visit, one of my ancestors had played a seemingly disastrous role in your affairs. [Laughter] Yet, had King George III been able to foresee the long-term consequences of his actions, he might not have felt so grieved about the loss of his colonies.

Out of the War of Independence grew a great nation, the United States of America. And later there was forged a lasting friendship between the new nation and the country to whom she owed so much of her origins. But that friendship must never be taken for granted, and your visit gives me the opportunity to reaffirm and to restate it.

Our close relationship is not just based on history, kinship, and language, strong and binding though these are. It is based on the same values and the same beliefs, evolved over many years in these islands since Magna Carta and vividly stated by the Founding Fathers of the United States.

This has meant that over the whole range of human activity, the people of the United States and the people of Britain are drawing on each other's experience and enriching each other's lives. Of course, we do not always think and act alike, but through the years our common heritage, based on the principles of common law, has prevailed over our diversity. And our toleration has moderated our arguments and misunderstandings.

These past weeks have been testing ones for this country, when, once again, we have had to stand up for the cause of freedom. The conflict in the Falkland Islands was thrust on us by naked aggression, and we are naturally proud of the way our fighting men are serving their country. But throughout the crisis, we have drawn comfort from the understanding of our position shown by the American people. We have admired the honesty, patience, and skill with which you have performed your dual role as ally and intermediary.

In return, we can offer an understanding of how hard it is to bear the daunting responsibilities of world power. The fact that your people have shouldered that burden for so long now, never losing the respect and affection of your friends, is proof of a brave and generous spirit.

Our respect extends beyond the bounds of statesmanship and diplomacy. We greatly admire the drive and enterprise of your commercial life. And we, therefore, welcome the confidence which your business community displays in us by your massive investment in this country's future. And we also like to think we might have made some contribution to the extraordinary success story of American business.

In darker days, Winston Churchill surveyed the way in which the affairs of the British Empire, as it then was, and the United States would become, in his words, ``somewhat mixed up.'' He welcomed the prospect. ``I could not stop it if I wished,'' he said. ``No one can stop it. Like the Mississippi, it just keeps rolling along. Let it roll.'' How right he was. There can be few nations whose destinies have been so inextricably interwoven as yours and mine.

America, of cooperation among the industrial democracies. Your visit tomorrow to Bonn underlines the importance to both our countries of the continued readiness of the people of the Western Alliance to defend the ways of life which we all share and cherish. Your stay in my country reflects not only the great traditions that hold Britain and the United States together but above all, the personal affection that the British and American people have for one another. This is the bedrock on which our relationship stands.

The President. Your Majesty, Your Royal Highness, Nancy and I are honored to be your guests at this beautiful and historic castle. It was from here that Richard the Lion-Hearted rode out to the Crusades, and from here that his brother, King John, left to sign the Magna Carta. It's a rare privilege to be even a momentary part of the rich history of Windsor Castle.

As we rode over these magnificent grounds this morning, I thought again about how our people share, as you have mentioned, a common past. We are bound by so much more than just language. Many of our values, beliefs, and principles of government were nurtured on this soil. I also thought of how our future security and prosperity depend on the continued unity of Britain and America.

This place symbolizes both tradition and renewal, as generation after generation of your family makes it their home. We in America share your excitement about the impending birth of a child to the Prince and the Princess of Wales. We pray that God will continue to bless your family with health, happiness, and wisdom.

It's been said that the greatest glory of a free-born people is to transmit that freedom to their children. That is a responsibility our people share. Together, and eager for peace, we must face an unstable world where violence and terrorism, aggression and tyranny constantly encroach on human rights. Together, committed to the preservation of freedom and our way of life, we must strengthen a weakening international order and restore the world's faith in peace and the rule of law.

Of course there is always a very great welcome in Britain for a visit by our great ally and friend, the United States. But this visit has been something more than an ordinary welcome. It's been an extraordinarily warm welcome, which I think we must attribute to the way in which President Reagan has appealed to the hearts and minds of our people.

The reception he's had, not only from Parliament -- which was a triumph -- but also from the people of this country who listened to his speech before Parliament, that reception has been one of great affection and one which recognizes that here is a leader who can put to the uncommitted nations of the world the fact that we in Britain and the United States have a cause in freedom and justice that is worth striving for and worth proclaiming. And we do indeed thank him for that and congratulate him most warmly on everything -- all the speeches and everything he's done -- since he has been with us for this very brief visit. It is a triumph for him as well as a great joy to have our ally and friend with us.

We have, of course, discussed matters of defense in the context of East-West relations. Once again we take a similar view. We cannot depend upon the righteousness of our cause for security; we can only depend upon our sure defense. But we recognize at the same time that it is important to try to get disarmament talks started so that the balance of forces and the deterrents can be conducted at a lower level of armaments. In this, again, the President has seized the initiative and given a lead, and we wish those talks very well when they start. And we'll all be behind him in what he is doing.

This morning we have also discussed the question of what is happening in the Middle East. We have discussed it in a very wide context. As you would expect, we are wholly agreed on the United Nations Security Council Resolution 508, that there must be cessation of hostilities coupled with withdrawal. And the United Kingdom is wholly behind Mr. Habib in the efforts he is making to bring that about. We have discussed it also in the very much wider context of the whole difficult problems of the Middle East, which we've all been striving to solve for so many years now.

Finally, I would like once again to record our thanks to our American friends, to the President and to Mr. Secretary Haig for the staunch support they've given us and continue to give us over the Falkland Islands and their realization that we must make it seem to the world over that aggression cannot pay. They have been most helpful, most staunch, and not only we but the whole of the British people thank them for it.

Well, I have no words to thank Prime Minister Thatcher for those very kind words that she said with regard to us. Let me just say that Nancy and I will be leaving here with warm hearts and great gratitude for the hospitality that has been extended to us and the pleasure that we've had here in addition to the worthwhile meetings and the accomplishments that have already been outlined.

Lebanon -- and found ourselves in agreement with regard to the U.N. Resolution 508, the hope for a ceasefire and a withdrawal of all the hostile forces there, and had a chance again to reiterate our support of the British position in the Falklands, that armed aggression cannot be allowed to succeed in today's world.

We had what we think were worthwhile meetings at the economic summit in Versailles. And now we go on to the NATO meeting, and our goals there we are also agreed upon: solidarity of the members of the Alliance; strength, dialog, and the urging of restraint on the Soviet Union; and responsibility and our agreement on going forward with realistic arms control that means arms reduction, not just -- as in the past -- some efforts to limit the increase in those weapons, but to bring about a realistic, verifiable decrease and thus further remove the possibility of war.

And, again, let me just finish by saying that this has been a most important meeting for us and a very heartwarming experience every minute that we've been here. And we leave strengthened with the knowledge that the great friendship and the great alliance that has existed for so long between our two peoples -- the United Kingdom and the United States -- remains and is, if anything, stronger than it has ever been.

The presence of North American armed forces in Europe and the United States strategic nuclear commitment to Europe remain integral to Allied security. Of equal importance are the maintenance and continued improvement of the defence capabilities of the European members of the Alliance. We will seek to achieve greater effectiveness in the application of national resources to defence, giving due attention to possibilities for developing areas of practical co-operation. In this respect the Allies concerned will urgently explore ways to take full advantage both technically and economically of emerging technologies. At the same time steps will be taken in the appropriate fora to restrict Warsaw Pact access to Western militarily relevant technology.

Force Reductions in Vienna have agreed on a new initiative to give fresh impetus to these negotiations. We will also play an active part in wider international talks on arms control and disarmament; at the Second United Nations Special Session on Disarmament which has just opened in New York, we will work to give new momentum to these talks.

We will continue to play our part in the struggle against hunger and poverty. Respect for genuine non-alignment is important for international stability. All of us have an interest in peace and security in other regions of the world. We will consult together as appropriate on events in these regions which may have implications for our security, taking into account our commonly identified objectives. Those of us who are in a position to do so will endeavour to respond to requests for assistance from sovereign states whose security and independence is threatened.

While noting the important part which our economic relations with the Warsaw Pact countries can play in the development of a stable East-West relationship, we will approach those relations in a prudent and diversified manner consistent with our political and security interests. Economic relations should be conducted on the basis of a balanced advantage for both sides. We undertake to manage financial relations with the Warsaw Pact countries on a sound economic basis, including commerical prudence also in the granting of export credits. We agree to exchange information in the appropriate fora on all aspects of our economic, commerical and financial relations with Warsaw Pact countries.

We recall that the rights and responsibilities of the Four Powers relating to Berlin and Germany as a whole remain unaffected and confirm our support for the political objective of the Federal Republic of Germany to work towards a state of peace in Europe in which the German people regains its unity through free self-determination.

Atlantic Alliance taking part in its integrated defence structure, hereby set out our detailed positions on defence. We welcome the intention of Spain to participate in the integrated defence structure, and the readiness of the President of the Spanish Government to associate himself with this document, while noting that the modalities of Spanish participation have still to be worked out.

Noting that developments beyond the NATO area may threaten our vital interests, we reaffirm the need to consult with a view to sharing assessments and identifying common objectives, taking full account of the effect on NATO security and defence capability, as well as of the national interests of member countries. Recognising that the policies which nations adopt in this field are a matter for national decision, we agree to examine collectively in the appropriate NATO bodies the requirements which may arise for the defence of the NATO area as a result of deployments by individual member states outside that area. Steps which may be taken by individual Allies in the light of such consultations to facilitate possible military deployments beyond the NATO area can represent an important contribution to Western security.

Disarmament in Europe as part of a balanced outcome of the Madrid CSCE Follow-up meeting would open the way to increased transparency and enhanced stability in the whole of Europe from the Atlantic to the Urals.

We appeal to all states to co-operate with us in these efforts to strengthen peace and security. In particular we call on the Soviet Union to translate its professed commitment to disarmament into active steps aimed at achieving concrete, balanced and verifiable results at the negotiating table.

Each year, more than one million children are the victims of child abuse and child neglect. These children represent every racial, religious, and socio-economic group, and the suffering they endure poses a threat to our families and to our society as a whole.

Most instances of child abuse and child neglect are not caused by inhuman, hateful intent but by the accumulation of stresses experienced by parents attempting to meet their responsibilities. If parents can get help in coping with the pressures in their lives and if communities support preventive programs to assist parents and others responsible for the care of their children, young lives can be saved and suffering prevented.

I especially invite the Governors of the States and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico; the heads of voluntary and private groups; and the offices of local, State, and Federal government to join in this observance. I urge them to encourage activities whose purpose is to prevent and treat child abuse and child neglect.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Washington -- the Senate having passed a budget, the House not having passed it -- and at 11 o'clock last night received the telephone call. The House, too, has passed a budget. And when the two get together in conference, I can guarantee you that while there may be some alterations here and there, basically the budget for the military of the United States will be what is necessary to enable you to do the job you're doing.

And over this last week I've met with Presidents and Prime Ministers, even a Queen, but being with you, the men and women of our Armed Forces, is one of the proudest moments of this entire trip. I'm proud of all of you who are serving in Europe. And I bring you not only my personal gratitude but that of all the folks back home.

We think of you often, and needless to say you're regularly in the hearts and minds of -- of course, your families, your friends, and your sweethearts -- but you're in the hearts of a lot of Americans who don't know you by name. They just know that you are their G.I. Joes and Jills, and they love you, too. And, of course, I must say too here, you, the families who are here with your men, you deserve a special word of thanks and gratitude for what you're doing here in their behalf and thus in the behalf of all of our country. You, too, are serving nobly.

There are now some 300,000 of you here in Europe, American men and women defending freedom far from home. I know that as one individual out of all those thousands, you may not realize how your day-to-day work fits into the big picture. Well, in the few minutes I have today, I'd like to tell you how you fit into the scheme of history -- why you're here and why each individual's contribution is so important.

I know it's hard to keep your eye on history when the hours are long and you're homesick, and it's very hard to take the long view when your sergeant keeps telling you to move faster and grunt harder. [Laughter] But you're here because you're vital to freedom -- the crowning glory of our civilization. America wouldn't be America without freedom, and we can't keep it without you. It's never more than one generation away from extinction. Every generation has to ensure that it will be there and passed it on to the next.

At this very moment, the forces of the Soviet Union and the Warsaw Pact are poised only a few miles from here. They aren't there to protect the people of Eastern Europe. The Iron Curtain wasn't woven to keep people out; it's there to keep people in. The most obvious symbol of this is the Berlin Wall. And, you know, if I had a chance I'd like to ask the Soviet leaders one question -- in fact, I may stuff the question in a bottle and throw it over the wall when I go there today. I really want to hear their explanation. Why is that wall there? Why are they so afraid of freedom on this side of the wall? Well, the truth is they're scared to death of it because they know that freedom is catching, and they don't dare leave their people have a taste of it.

The huge number of Soviet tanks that rumble through the countryside, the Soviet missiles that peer over the border, they aren't there for defense. They're there to threaten the West and divide the Alliance. Well, our forces and those of NATO have a different idea. Our forces have a different assignment. We don't seek to make Europe captive. We seek to keep Europe free.

The people of West Germany, through their government, have time and again asked that we stand together in defense of freedom -- both theirs and ours. And President Carstens' recent visit to the U.S. Second Armored Division was symbolic of our unity. Just as the Europeans support your presence here, I, too, as President want to support you by giving you what you need to do your job. I'm determined that you will have fair pay, new equipment, top-notch training, and the best leadership.

It's part of a noble cause, the defense of freedom and dignity. And you, you in uniform, you are the peacemakers. Because you are doing what you're doing, we have a chance to preserve peace, and I promise you that is going to be the goal as long as this administration is in Washington.

You know, there've been four wars in my lifetime. I don't want to see another. I'm going to tell you a story about one of those wars, only because it tells the difference between two societies, ours and that society the other side of the wall.

It goes back to a war when a B - 17 bomber was flying back across the channel badly shot up by anti-aircraft fire. The ball turret that hung beneath the belly of the plane had taken a hit, was jammed. They couldn't get the ball turret gunner out while they were flying, and he was wounded.

The Congressional Medal of Honor, posthumously awarded. That citation that I read when I was serving in that same war stuck with me for many years and came back to me just a few years ago when the Soviet Union gave its highest honor, a gold medal, to a man, a Spaniard living in Moscow. But they don't give citations. They don't tell you why; they just give the medal. So, I did some digging to find out why he was their highest honoree. Well, he had spent 8 years in Cuba before going to Moscow. And before that he had spent 23 years in Mexico in prison. He was the man who buried a pickaxe in the head of -- Leon Trotsky's head. They gave their highest honor for murder. We gave our highest honor to a man who had sacrificed his life to comfort a boy who had to die.

It was one of Germany's greatest sons, Goethe, who said that ``there is stong shadow where there is much light.'' In our times, Berlin, more than any other place in the world, is such a meeting place of light and shadow, tyranny and freedom. To be here is truly to stand on freedom's edge and in the shadow of a wall that has come to symbolize all that is darkest in the world today, to sense how shining and priceless and how much in need of constant vigilance and protection our legacy of liberty is.

This day marks a happy return for us. We paid our first visit to this great city more than 3 years ago, as private citizens. As with every other citizen to Berlin or visitor to Berlin, I came away with a vivid impression of a city that is more than a place on the map -- a city that is a testament to what is both most inspiring and most troubling about the time we live in.

Thomas Mann once wrote that ``A man lives not only his personal life as an individual, but also consciously or unconsciously the life of his epoch.'' Nowhere is this more true than in Berlin, where each moment of everyday life is spent against the backdrop of contending global systems and ideas. To be a Berliner is to live the great historic struggle of this age, the latest chapter in man's timeless quest for freedom.

As Americans, we understand this. Our commitment to Berlin is a lasting one. Thousands of our citizens have served here since the first small contingent of American troops arrived on July 4th, 1945, the anniversary of our independence as a nation. Americans have served here ever since -- not as conquerors, but as guardians of the freedom of West Berlin and its brave, proud, people.

Today I want to pay tribute to my fellow countrymen, military and civilian, who serve their country and the people of Berlin and, in so doing, stand as sentinals of freedom everywhere. I also wish to pay my personal respects to the people of this great city. My visit here today is proof that this American commitment has been worthwhile. Our freedom is indivisible.

The American commitment to Berlin is much deeper than our military presence here. In the 37 years since World War II, a succession of American Presidents has made it clear that our role in Berlin is emblematic of our larger search for peace throughout Europe and the world. Ten years ago this month, that search brought into force the Quadripartite Agreement on Berlin. A decade later, West Berliners live more securely, can travel more freely and, most significantly, have more contact with friends and relatives in East Berlin and East Germany than was possible 10 years ago.

These achievements reflect the realistic approach of Allied negotiators, who recognized that practical progress can be made even while basic differences remain between East and West. As a result, both sides have managed to handle their differences in Berlin without the clash of arms, to the benefit of all mankind.

The United States remains committed to the Berlin agreement. We will continue to expect strict observance and full implementation in all aspects of this accord, including those which apply to the eastern sector of Berlin. But if we are heartened by the partial progress achieved in Berlin, other developments make us aware of the growing military power and expansionism of the Soviet Union.

Union is engaged in the greatest military buildup in the history of the world. It has used its new-found might to ruthlessly pursue it goals around the world. As the sad case of Afghanistan proves, the Soviet Union has not always respected the precious right of national sovereignty it is committed to uphold as a signatory of the United Nations Charter. And only one day's auto ride from here, in the great city of Warsaw, a courageous people suffer, because they dare to strive for the very fundamental human rights which that Helsinki Final Act proclaimed.

The citizens of free Berlin appreciate better than anyone the importance of allied unity in the face of such challenges. Ten years after the Berlin agreement, the hope it engendered for lasting peace remains a hope rather than a certainty. But the hopes of free people -- be they German or American -- are stubborn things. We will not be lulled or bullied into fatalism, into resignation.

We believe that progress for just and lasting peace can be made, that substantial areas of agreement can be reached with potential adversaries when the forces of freedom act with firmness, unity, and a sincere willingness to negotiate.

To succeed at the negotiating table, we allies have learned that a healthy military balance is a necessity. Yesterday, the other NATO heads of government and I agreed that it is essential to preserve and strengthen such a military balance. And let there be no doubt: The United States will continue to honor its commitment to Berlin.

Our forces will remain here as long as necessary to preserve the peace and protect the freedom of the people of Berlin. For us the American presence in Berlin, as long as it is needed, is not a burden; it is a sacred trust.

Ours is a defensive mission. We pose no threat to those who live on the other side of the wall. But we do extend a challenge, a new Berlin initiative to the leaders of the Soviet bloc. It is a challenge for peace. We challenge the men in the Kremlin to join with us in the quest for peace, security, and a lowering of the tensions and weaponry that could lead to future conflict.

Several times in the 1950's and `60's the world went to the brink of war over Berlin. Those confrontations did not come because of military forces or operations alone. They arose because the Soviet Union refused to allow the free flow of peoples and ideas between East and West. And they came because the Soviet authorities and their minions repressed millions of citizens in Eastern Germany who did not wish to live under a Communist dictatorship.

So, I want to concentrate the second part of America's new Berlin initiative on ways to reduce the human barriers -- barriers as bleak and brutal as the Berlin Wall itself -- which divide Europe today.

If I had only one message to urge on the leaders of the Soviet bloc, it would be this: Think of your own coming generations. Look with me 10 years into the future when we will celebrate the 20th anniversary of the Berlin agreement. What then will be the fruits of our efforts? Do the Soviet leaders want to be remembered for a prison wall, ringed with barbed wire and armed guards whose weapons are aimed at innocent civilians -- their own civilians? Do they want to conduct themselves in a way that will earn only the contempt of free peoples and the distrust of their own citizens? Or do they want to be remembered for having taken up our offer to use Berlin as a starting point for true efforts to reduce the human and political divisions which are the ultimate cause of every war?

We in the West have made our choice. America and our allies welcome peaceful competition in ideas, in economics, and in all facets of human activity. We seek no advantage. We covet no territory. And we wish to force no ideology or way of life on others.

The time has come, 10 years after the Berlin agreement, to fulfill the promise it seemed to offer at its dawn. I call on President Brezhnev to join me in a sincere effort to translate the dashed hopes of the 1970's into the reality of a safer and freer Europe in the 1980's.

I am determined to assure that our civilization averts the catastrophe of a nuclear war. Stability depends primarily on the maintenance of a military balance which offers no temptation to an aggressor. And the arms control proposals which I have made are designed to enhance deterrence and achieve stability at substantially lower and equal force levels. At the same time, other measures might be negotiated between the United States and the Soviet Union to reinforce the peace and help reduce the possibility of a nuclear conflict. These include measures to enhance mutual confidence and to improve communication both in time of peace and in a crisis.

Past agreements have created the hot line between Moscow and Washington, established measures to reduce the danger of nuclear accidents, and provided for notification of some missile launches. We are now studying other concrete and practical steps to help further reduce the risk of a nuclear conflict which I intend to explore with the Soviet Union. It is time we went further to avert the risk of war through accident or misunderstanding.

We shortly will approach the Soviet Union with proposals in such areas as notification of strategic exercises, of missile launches, and expanded exchange of strategic forces data. Taken together, these steps would represent a qualitative improvement in the nuclear environment. They would help reduce the chances of misinterpretation in the case of exercises and test launches. And they would reduce the secrecy and ambiguity which surround military activity. We are considering additional measures as well.

We will be making these proposals in good faith to the Soviet Union. We hope that their response to this Berlin initiative, so appropriate to a city that is acutely conscious of the costs and risks of war, will be positive. A united, resolute Western Alliance stands ready to defend itself if necessary. But we are also ready to work with the Soviet bloc in peaceful cooperation if the leaders of the East are willing to respond in kind.

Let them remember the message of Schiller that only ``He who has done his best for his own time has lived for all times.'' Let them join with us in our time to achieve a lasting peace and a better life for tomorrow's generations on both sides of that blighted wall. And let the Brandenburg Gate become a symbol not of two separate and hostile worlds, but an open door through which ideas, free ideas, and peaceful competition flourish.

My final message is for the people of Berlin. Even before my first visit to your city, I felt a part of you, as all free men and women around the world do. We lived through the blockade and airlift with you. We witnessed the heroic reconstruction of a devastated city, and we watched the creation of your strong democratic institutions.

When I came here in 1978, I was deeply moved and proud of your success. What finer proof of what freedom can accomplish than the vibrant, prosperous island you've created in the midst of a hostile sea. Today, my reverence for your courage and accomplishment has grown even deeper.

You are a constant inspiration for us all -- for our hopes and ideals, and for the human qualities of courage, endurance, and faith that are the one secret weapon of the West no totalitarian regime can ever match. As long as Berlin exists, there can be no doubt about the hope for democracy.

West, free from oppressed, stands the character of the Berliners themselves. You have endured in your splendid city on the Spree, and my return visit has convinced me, in the words of the beloved old song that ``Berlin bleibt doch Berlin''  -- Berlin is still Berlin.

In Berlin this morning I looked across that tragic wall and saw the grim consequences of freedom denied. But I was deeply inspired by the courage and dedication to liberty which I saw in so many faces on the western side of that city.

The purpose of my trip to Bonn was to consult both with leaders of the German Government and our colleagues from other nations. Both aspects of the visit have been a great success. We didn't seek to avoid the problems facing the West in the coming years. We met them head-on and discovered that, as always, what unites us is much deeper and more meaningful than any differences which might exist.

Diplomacy is important, but friendship leaves an even more lasting impression. Your friendship for us has been an especially moving experience. Nancy and I are personally very touched by your hospitality. We know, however, that this greeting was meant not only for us but for the entire American people.

These trips, these meetings have been arduous; they have been long; they've been tiring to all of us. But I think they've been successful. And here today is an evidence of why they have to be successful -- because what was at issue and what is at stake in all that we were trying to accomplish in those meetings is visible here in these young people. We must deliver to them a world of opportunity and peace. And with that as a goal and with that as our inspiration, we cannot fail.

German-American friendship is truly one of the lasting foundations of Western cooperation and peace and freedom in the world. And this visit has convinced me that ours is a friendship that cannot be shaken.

Thank you very much. Thank you, George, all the representatives of the Senate and the House who've been working so hard while we've been gone, the members of the Cabinet. And to those employees of government, Cabinet members here on the platform and who were with us on the plane, who went on this trip as part of the team, I think you'd have been proud of all of them and how hard they worked.

But I have to tell you: This is a very great surprise to us. And adding to the surprise is the fact that here it is still daylight, and it's only 43 minutes past midnight. [Laughter] But it's great to be home, especially since we don't have to get in a car and go someplace and make another speech.

I was especially pleased at the breadth of support it commanded from Republicans of all regions and 63 responsible House Democrats. And I want to tell you that this morning, after getting that word -- and when I brought the word to my colleagues from the other countries that we were meeting with, our allies -- their joy. They were looking forward to this as much as I was and as much as the American people were.

So, my congratulations to Bob Michel and all the other responsible Members of the House for a job well done. And now let's hope the House and Senate conference committee can finish its work quickly so that we can get on with economic recovery here at home and around the world.

As I say, in greeting these ladies and gentlemen when I got off the plane, proud as I am of all that were with us and on the team and worked so hard and so many hours, I'm proud of all of you, George, who were here running the store at home.

After visiting six major cities in Europe, one thing stands out clearly, and we sometimes lose sight of it: America has a lot of friends in the world. Yes, there were demonstrators who didn't agree with some of our policies, but I can tell you that in every city the streets were lined, wherever we went, with people cheering America, and most of them waving American flags. And this morning we addressed 25,000 people at the Charlottenburg Castle in Berlin, standing there in the garden.

America is once again respected by allies and potential adversaries alike. At the economic summit meeting at Versailles, we reaffirmed our commitments to the fight against inflation, to expanded trade, and to economic development. We agreed on cooperative approaches to the tough economic problems faced by our countries and on a more vigilant and restrained approach to trade with the Soviet bloc.

We approved a new Western proposal for the reduction of conventional arms in Europe, and we formalized what we had been working for a year to achieve -- a clear consensus on the need to improve our defenses, while confirming our willingness to negotiate in good faith with the Soviet Union for a more secure peace. NATO is more confident now, confident in its ability both to preserve its strength and to promote peace.

In Rome, I consulted with His Holiness The Pope in our continuing quest for peace, and I had an opportunity to meet with the leaders of Italy, a country that has been as strong and consistent as any in its support for the Alliance and the policies of the United States.

The preservation of our free institutions is, after all, the most important reason for our efforts to strengthen the Alliance. As I listened to our European friends, I learned a great deal about their approaches and concerns. Yes, we have our differences, but I am firmly convinced that our values are the same, our objectives are the same, and when we have different ideas about reaching those objectives we can work them out.

As this trip began, the United States was doing all that it could to bring an honorable end to conflict in the South Atlantic. And today, as this trip concludes, the United States is once again trying to bring peace to the Middle East. Clearly, our responsibilities as a great people span the globe. The nations of the West all look to us for leadership in preserving freedom and peace. This is not a burden that we sought, but it is one we shall never shirk.

I brought a message to our allies that the United States will remain a firm and reliable partner. I said in Bonn, that they are not alone; we are with them. And tonight I come home with a message from our allies, one impressed upon me at every stop along the way: Americans, we are not alone; they are with us, too.

When we arrived at Tempelhof, and there were hundreds and hundreds of our young men and women in uniform, and those with their families that are with them and their children that were with them, and meeting and greeting them, seeing them, I have never known such pride. And I can tell you, you have every reason to be proud of them, also. And they're proud to be there on the ramparts of freedom, doing what they're doing.

The broad range of economic sanctions which we introduced against the Warsaw Government last December has had a strong impact on the Polish economy, a fact which is acknowledged by Polish officials. With each passing day, the impact of these sanctions grows, particularly in light of the unwillingness of Warsaw's allies to provide substantial assistance. We made it clear when we introduced these sanctions that they were reversible if and when Polish authorities restored the internationally recognized human rights of the Polish people. In addition, we stated that the United States Government stands ready to provide assistance to such a Poland to help its economic recovery. But the United States cannot and will not take these steps until the Polish Government has ended martial law, released all political prisoners, and reopened a genuine dialog with the church and Solidarity.

United States will continue to help provide humanitarian assistance to the Polish people through such organizations as Catholic Relief Services, CARE, and Project HOPE. Let us hope that the authorities in Warsaw will move to bring about a genuine process of reconciliation in Poland before the gap between the authorities and the people becomes even more threatening.

I was deeply grieved to learn of the death of His Majesty King Khalid of Saudi Arabia, who ruled his country with honor, dignity, and wisdom, and whose goodness and understanding commanded the respect of all. I extend my personal condolences and sympathy, as well as those of the American people, to His Majesty King Fahd, the Royal Family, and the people of Saudi Arabia, a country with which we have enjoyed more than a half-century of warm, constructive, and mutually beneficial relations.

Established to provide outstanding Americans with firsthand experience in the process of governing the Nation, the White House Fellowships program is open to U.S. citizens in the early stages of their careers from all occupations and professions. Federal Government employees are not eligible, with the exception of career Armed Forces personnel.

In addition to their job assignments as special assistants to the Vice President, Cabinet officers, and to members of the President's principal staff, the fellows participate in an extensive education program that includes off-the-record seminar meetings with ranking government officials, scholars, journalists, and leaders from other segments of private life.

The independence of Lithuania, Latvia, and Estonia was extinguished in 1939 as a result of a nefarious deal struck between the Soviet Union and Nazi Germany. Hitler handed Stalin the three Baltic republics as a bonus to secure his cooperation in the destruction of Poland and to obtain a secure eastern frontier which enabled him to launch war against the western democracies.

Subsequently, hundreds of thousands of Baltic nationals were deported to the Soviet Union where many of them perished in prisons and forced labor camps. The darkest day of that great human tragedy occurred on June 14, 1941, when their homes and jobs were taken by Russian settlers.

Today, some of the survivors of these mass deportations are citizens of the United States. Their aspirations for a better future for the peoples of Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania have helped to bring new meaning to our nation's commitment to freedom for all people. The United States has never, over the intervening forty-one years, recognized the forcible incorporation of the Baltic States into the Soviet Union.

As a nation, we remain dedicated to the furtherance and preservation of the fundamental human rights and freedoms of all people and take note on this special day of our hope that the blessings of liberty will one day be part of the national life of the courageous people of Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

The United States welcomes the cease-fire which is now in place in the Falkland Islands. We hope the tragic loss of life which has thus far occurred in this crisis can now be brought to an end. For its part, the United States continues to stand ready to assist in any way it can to help resolve this conflict.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15th day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Humanities. The Committee shall be composed of the Chairman of the National Endowment for the Arts; the Chairman of the National Endowment for the Humanities; the Secretary of the Treasury; the Secretary of the Interior; the Secretary of Education; the Administrator of General Services; the Director of the Institute of Museum Services; the Director of the International Communication Agency; a member designated by the Secretary of State; and not more than twenty persons who are not full-time officers or employees of the Federal Government (``non-Federal members''), who shall be appointed by the President and shall be selected from among private individuals and State and local public officials who have a demonstrated interest in and commitment to support for the arts or the humanities. In addition, the Majority Leader of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives are each invited to designate a member of the Committee for appointment by the President, and the Librarian of Congress, the Secretary of the Smithsonian Institution and the Director of the National Gallery of Art are invited to serve as members of the Committee.

Sec. 2. Functions. The Committee shall analyze, and make recommendations to the President and to the National Endowment for the Arts and the National Endowment for the Humanities with respect to, (i) ways to promote private sector support for the arts and the humanities, especially at the State and local levels; (ii) the effectiveness of Federal support for the arts and the humanities in stimulating increased private sector support, taking into account the economic needs and problems of the arts and the humanities and their relationship with the private sector; (iii) the planning and coordination of appropriate participation (including productions and projects) in major and historic national events; and (iv) ways to promote the recognition of excellence in the fields of the arts and the humanities. In performing these functions, the Committee shall collect, maintain and make available for appropriate distribution data on the sources and levels of public and private sector support for the arts and the humanities, and on the availability of cultural resources locally. The Committee's functions shall not conflict with the responsibilities of the National Council on the Arts and the National Council on the Humanities.

Sec. 3. Administration. (a) Members of the Committee shall serve without additional compensation for their work on the Committee. However, members of the Committee who are not full-time officers or employees of the Federal Government may be allowed travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, as authorized by law for persons serving intermittently in the Government service (5 U.S.C. 5701 - 5707), to the extent funds are available therefor.

President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act, as amended, except that of reporting annually to the Congress, which are applicable to the Committee, shall be performed by the Chairman of the National Endowment for the Arts, in accordance with guidelines and procedures established by the Administrator of General Services.

For one thing, I am glad to have the chance to thank him for all that he did to help me 2 years ago when I was looking for a job. [Laughter] Now, I know the fact that he gave me a hand is not a reason why anyone should vote for someone. You should just simply elect as Governor of Texas the present Governor, Bill Clements, because he's the best man for the job.

This is a political dinner, but it's not a partisan dinner, and that figures. Last year and, again in just the last few weeks, a number of Texas Democrats in the Congress showed they had the courage and the common sense to put the welfare of this State and this nation before partisanship, even in an election year. They have my appreciation and respect and, I'm sure, yours also.

Both the Senate and the House have passed budget resolutions not too dissimilar, which means the conference committee should have little trouble in reconciling what differences there are. This budget resolution, like the one last year, sets us on a course of declining deficits, which should in the next few years bring us back to spending within our means, and then -- and, oh, what a dream this is of mine -- we can look forward to starting to reduce that trillion-dollar debt that was piled up over 40 years of economic irresponsibility.

Have we forgotten all those bromides that came to us under the title of ``The New Economics'' in those decades? ``A little inflation was good for us. It was necessary to maintain prosperity.'' With regard to the debt: ``No need to worry -- we owe it to ourselves.'' The interest on the present debt, whoever we owe it to, is enough to balance the budget -- more than a hundred billion dollars.

Now, frankly, I'd like nothing better than to be able to offer a budget proposal that actually called for less spending than we had the year before. The last time that happened in this country of ours was 1 year during the 8 years of Dwight David Eisenhower. Now, this could be done if we were willing to destroy the so-called safety net, which protects those who, through no fault of their own, must have our help. I have pledged this we will not do, nor do I think that Americans, the most generous people in all the world, would want us to take that help away from the people that need it.

Another way would be to reverse our defense buildup, which has been made necessary by the dangerous decline in our security over the recent years, and this I cannot do without violating my constitutional responsibility to protect our national security. And I am grateful to your Senator John Tower for the powerful support that he has given me every day that I've been there in meeting that responsibility for our national security.

Let me nudge your memory back a little further, about 4 years farther. President Ford has already told you some of the comparisons of what things were like in 1976 and then what happened to them. But in 1980 I was campaigning in cities where even then the unemployment rate was anywhere from 15 to 20 percent -- in the Midwest and up in the Northeast and some of the industrial States where already the trouble had started. In poll after poll at that time, the people declared that inflation was the number-one problem in need of immediate solution. But as our administration picked up the mess, we were told by the pundits that inflation was so deeply entrenched that it could not be pried out of the economy for at least another 10 years.

Well, being new to the job, we just didn't believe 'em. While we were submitting our budget plan for 1982 we managed to squeeze several billions of dollars out of the 1981 budget that was already in place.

Now, we didn't get all that we wanted in our economic recovery program in '82, either in savings or tax cuts, but we got about three-fourths of it, and I figured that was a pretty good chunk. But some diehards are now declaring the present recession was caused by our program, just as Gerald Ford told us. May I just point out, we had the recession before we got the program. But the voices keep right on carping.

So far we've only had a 5-percent cut in individual income tax rates, plus some business tax breaks and new incentives for saving. In a few weeks, the income tax rates will be reduced another 10 percent across the board. In the meantime, however, the personal savings rate has increased, meaning a bigger capital pool for investment. Real wages are showing positive growth for the first time in 3 years, and retail sales continue to show an increase.

And while we have an unemployment rate of 9.5 percent, which must be lowered, for the last 6 months inflation -- and Jerry told you what it was when we started -- inflation has been running at an annualized rate of only 2.8 percent -- and for the last 3 months, less than 1 percent. Now, that's quite a drop and we've only used up 1\1/2\ of those 10 years the pundits told us that we had to get it down. This drop in inflation has meant over a thousand dollars in increased purchasing power for an average family of four with a fixed income of $15,000.

When the special pleaders start campaigning against our budget cuts as penalizing the poor, when they assail our tax program as favoring the rich, that defense spending is too high, here are a few points you might like to remember in conversations you may have in this election year.

President Kennedy's tax cut program, which was phased in over 2 years and proved greatly beneficial to this country -- oh, they told him, all of his advisers, he shouldn't do that, that it'd lose billions of dollars in revenue. Well, we gained billions of dollars in revenue by making the country more prosperous. But that was phased in over 2 years and gave 36 percent of the relief to corporations and 64 percent to individuals. Our program is phased in over 3 years and gives corporations 20 percent of the total and individuals 80 percent. I just say this because there's been a little demagoguery going around in Washington recently.

In giving all these figures, please don't think I'm trying to minimize the tragedy of unemployment, which plagues us and which has been steadily increasing since 1979. As one who entered the job market in the depths of the Great Depression in 1932, I bleed for the man or woman able and willing to work but who can find no job opening. But we believe that economic recovery, not government social programs, is the best and most permanent solution to the problem of unemployment. The best social program we can have is a job.

There have been seven recessions in recent decades, and now the eighth. And the traditional liberal cure for each one has been to give it a quick fix -- the artificial stimulant of government spending programs. And every time that was done, the cure was temporary and led to another recession, and another recession was worse than the one before.

In this recession, while the unemployment rate is higher, it is not accompanied by higher and higher inflation as the others were. Unemployment is concentrated in those industries most affected by high interest rates. And those rates are down now about 25 percent from what they were, the 21\1/2\ that the President told you about when we took over. They must come down more. And with inflation as low as it is, they can. I believe final passage of the '83 budget will send the signal the money market needs to hear.

In the meantime, there are other facets to our recovery program. George Bush has done a great job heading up a task force to eliminate unnecessary government regulation. He and his task force have reduced that blizzard of paperwork which came out of those regulations and which contributed about a hundred billion dollars a year to the cost of goods and services. By the end of this fiscal year, they will have eliminated 200 million manhours of paperwork simply by eliminating 23,000 pages of the regulations listed in the Federal Register.

In the areas of waste and fraud, during the last year the Inspectors General have really earned their title of being ``meaner than junkyard dogs.'' Just this afternoon before I climbed on the plane to come down here, I got their latest 6-months report -- every 6 months. This was the third report since I've been there that they've given us. In these 6 months, the 6 months that ended March 31st, they issued over 54,000 audit reports and handled over 13,000 investigations. And the results are the kind of news that I know you'd like to hear: $5.8 billion in direct savings and better use of funds in just 6 months. There were over a thousand convictions and over 900 indictments.

Government had usurped resources and functions that properly belonged to State and local governments. In the 50 years since then, the Federal Government has come close to making States mere administrative districts of a Federal Government. Well, this, too, we're determined to change.

We have met continuously with local officials, State legislators, and Governors to work out a new federalism plan whereby functions that properly belong at State and local levels, plus the resources to fund them can be turned back to those governments that are closest to the people.

That's why the cause that brings you here tonight is so important. If government services that play an important part in your everyday life are going to be taken out of the hands of bureaucrats on the shores of the Potomac and returned to Texas, then you want someone in charge here who will see that they're properly administered.

Governor Bill Clements has demonstrated with hard work and leadership that State government can work and work well. He's reduced the number of State employees and cut taxes at the same time and has brought in corporate executives to lend their expertise to make State government more efficient. He has launched an effort to control waste and fraud. Texas parents can be grateful that he's put a new emphasis on basics and discipline in the classroom. And in that connection, I hope you will agree with something that we've set in motion -- has nothing to do with the budget -- a constitutional amendment to once again let God back into the classroom and permit voluntary prayer there.

With protection of young people in mind, Bill declared war on crime and went on the offensive against drugs. And finally, a subject close to my heart: Bill Clements has been one of the most responsive Governors in the 50 States in our efforts to promote volunteerism. Building on that frontier spirit for which Texas is famous, he has been encouraging people to get involved, to help one another, to take more responsibility for their family and community. He's promoted the use of volunteers and direct citizen involvement in mental health and human resource programs.

Rome -- [laughter]. But I have, as the President told you, just returned from Europe, where I met with our allies and discussed our common defense and economic concerns. I was never more aware of how important a strong and vibrant America is to the rest of world and to the future freedom of mankind.

Not too long ago, our friends and adversaries had begun to doubt our resolve. Our defenses were permitted to erode. We seemed paralyzed by self-doubt and a loss of confidence. Well, those days of self-doubt are over. While we didn't agree on everything, our allies understand our commitment, our sense of purpose, our strength of character.

Now, I know that a great many of the peace demonstrators are truly sincere. Indeed, I think all of us share their desire for peace. But I'm equally sure that those who plan and promote some of the demonstrations have motives of their own. And I will believe in their sincerity when they promote or demand a peace demonstration on the other side of the Iron Curtain.

You who live here in Texas, a place where the spirit of freedom has played such a significant role, you serve to remind the rest of us about the true value of freedom. While many States look to government programs or Federal assistance, you stress individual responsibility and free enterprise. What you've created here has captured the imagination of the world. Entrepreneurs, laborers, and men and women looking for opportunity are flocking here not expecting a handout, but knowing that with hard work they can improve their lives. That's what Texas is and, I hope, will always be about.

Like just about everything else in Houston, aviation activity has grown tremendously in recent years. Despite the major expansion at both Hobby and Intercontinental Airports, this thriving metropolitan area needs additional capacity, especially for general aviation.

I am happy to announce that we are doing something to meet this need today: We have decided to convey to the city of Houston, at no cost, large portions of the land occupied by Ellington Air Force Base.

The continued use of this property as an airport is the most practical and economical way to solve the severe airport capacity problem in the Houston-Galveston metropolitan area. As a civil airport, this property will be put to efficient, practical use for the benefit of the greater Houston community as well as the national transportation system. Houston has made a firm commitment to invest in improvements for the airport property.

Ellington was declared surplus to the Air Force's needs back in 1976. Since then, there has been some competition between Houston and the neighboring city of Pasadena, Texas, both of which requested land for an airport. In selecting Houston, we hope that the airport is one that both cities -- and all the people of this area -- can share.

Two points should be made about the transfer of the property. First, the exact acreage to be transferred for the airport has not been determined, but it will include whatever is necessary for safe, efficient operations, the needs of the community, and the Nation's airspace system. Second, my administration has initiated a policy of seeking fair-market value when we dispose of surplus Federal property. Our Federal property is a capital asset, and we must improve our management of it. Last February, I signed an Executive order that will help meet this goal by establishing a Property Review Board at the White House to oversee Federal property sales. To underscore our commitment, the members of this Board include several of my senior advisers. We intend to take the proceeds from property sales and place them in a special account in the Treasury -- an account that will be used exclusively to offset the national debt. Thus, we will be looking for buyers for the remaining parts of the property that are not needed for the airport.

Houston has a proud past and a bright future. Aviation has long been a part of the growth and development of this great State and this magnificent, dynamic city. The new general aviation airport to be situated here will enable more people to fly to the Houston area for business and for pleasure, and to enjoy all that the area has to offer.

China with respect to mutual exemption from taxation of transportation income of shipping and air transport enterprises, signed at Beijing on March 5, 1982. I also transmit the report of the Department of State on the Agreement.

Chinese enterprises will be exempt from United States Federal income tax on income derived from the operation of ships and aircraft in international traffic. The exempt income includes income from the leasing of ships, aircraft and containers used in international traffic.

As with other treaties of this kind, the provisions of the Agreement do not affect the United States taxation of residents and citizens of the United States, or China's taxation of its residents and citizens.

You're each a special representative of the United States. In your work and daily lives, you symbolize for the world the values, the ideals, and the good will of the American people. And we're very proud to have you represent us.

Your work here, of course, has two goals -- to represent America's interest, but you also are peacemakers, easing the tensions and securing the rule of law in the world. But those two goals are really the same, because the United States believes that it is only in a peaceful world -- one in which there is respect for individual human rights -- that we can prosper. And I can sympathize, however, with the frustrations that you encounter.

I've already this morning -- General Assembly, quoted Dag Hammarskjold that he used to tell a story about the ancient Chinese peacemakers, followers of the philosopher Sung Tzu some 350 years B.C., and I think you'll recognize their trials. Constantly rebuffed but never discouraged, they went 'round from state to state helping people to settle their differences, arguing against wanton attack, and pleading for the suppression of arms -- that the age in which they lived might be saved from its state of continual war. To this end, they interviewed princes and lectured the common people -- nowhere meeting with any great success, but obstinately persisting in their task til kings and commoners alike grew weary of listening to them. And yet, undeterred, they continued to force themselves on the people's attention.

Well, the former Secretary-General would end his tale by saying that the original storyteller tempered his pessimism with a mild sense of humor and a stong sense of proportion in seeing his own time in the long perspective of history.

Your jobs are certainly not easy. Every day you confront delicate and complicated tasks. But remember, although it may seem sometimes that no one's listening, that the peacemakers aren't making much progress, through your efforts and those of your colleagues, mankind has one of its first real chances to live together in peace with the universal recognition of human rights.

On that trip that Al mentioned in Europe, one of the highspots was meeting with a group of your colleagues. They happened to be in uniform. And you may wonder why I would say ``your colleagues.'' Well, I happen to think that they, too, are the peacemakers. That's why they're there -- to deter war and to prove that there are values that we must defend at all costs.

And we got off the airplane in Tempelhof, the airport, and there were hundreds of them there, many with their families and their little children. And I want to tell you, I grew 2 inches taller just with pride alone. They're just great. And if you've had any questions about them, let me tell you that they're putting up with the frustrations, too, but there's nothing wrong with their esprit de corps. They're all American and a yard wide, every one of them. And it was a thrilling moment.

It also was thrilling, though, to drive down the streets, and even though you seem to read more about demonstrations than what I'm going to talk about -- this wasn't written about so much, but the streets would be lined as if for a parade. And these would be people of foreign countries.

So, just remember that sometime when the going is very rough and you're particularly frustrated, before you push the typewriter off the desk -- [laughter] -- just stick with the rest, because we're going to get the job done, thanks to you.

The Secretary-General. President Reagan, Excellencies, ladies and gentlemen, it is a great honor to welcome you, Mr. President, to the United Nations. Your address this morning was a most heartening statement of the American commitment to the role of disarmament which has brought together the representatives of practically every country in the world.

The United States of course has a particularly important role to play in these endeavors. If past history suggests a skepticism about the potential success of disarmament efforts, the circumstances in which we live today point to the necessity of success. The peril entailed for all in ever more destructive nuclear weapons, the utilization of more and more resources for arms, the fear to which you have recently alluded, Mr. President, in which we now exist, all of these compel us to approach the limitation and reduction of arms as something which can and must be achieved.

The negotiations which are underway in Geneva between the United States and the Soviet Union on intermediate-range nuclear missiles and those which will begin at the end of this month on the strategic systems are especially welcome as part of this process. We can be more confident about the fate of the world if these talks succeed.

Disarmament and international security are inextricably related. There can be no doubt that equitable and verifiable reduction in nuclear and conventional arms can contribute to the increased confidence of our nations which durable peace requires. But it is equally true that armed conflicts such as those we have witnessed in these days threaten international security and escalate the arms race.

United Nations Charter, in the drafting of which the United States had such a major role, declared that all members shall settle their international disputes by peaceful means. The United Nations possesses the machinery to help resolve such disputes if only it is used resolutely and effectively.

I am deeply convinced, Mr. President, that if every one of the current and recent armed conflicts had been resolved by peaceful means available under the charter with our resolved ones, this could ultimately have been in the best interests of all the parties involved. This could also be in the interest of international security as a whole, since we all have witnessed the danger of such conflicts escalating beyond their original confines and involve new combatants in an increasingly threatening spiral.

Franklin D. Roosevelt -- whose centenary we celebrate this week -- that this United Nations was formed. Under his inspired guidance and long before the end of World War II, the United Nations took the lead in planning for a new international organization to preserve the future peace. The historical commitment of the United States of the United Nations is as valid and as necessary today as it was then.

I would like to suggest that, notwithstanding the serious differences, differences that exist among these powers, it is in their interest and in the interest of the world as a whole to cooperate in strengthening the capacity of the United Nations to resolve, through peaceful means, present and future conflicts. Only in this way can they ensure that the responsibility they accepted in the founding of this organization are fully met.

Mr. President, the United Nations first took shape in Washington on Dumbarton Oaks 38 years ago. Through all of the ensuing years the active and constructive participation of the United States and the problems of the organization have reflected the original American commitment to the concept of a world organization through which peace, social justice, and economic cooperation could be pursued.

The United States is the largest financial contributor to the United Nations. It extends its hospitality to the United Nations headquarters and numerous United Nations organizations. As humanitarian and peace-keeping needs have arisen, American assistance and American initiative has always been forthcoming.

I wish to take this occasion to express the most sincere appreciation for all of the support which the United Nations has rendered. This continuing cooperation and commitment is indeed necessary in order to achieve the purposes and principles of the United Nations Charter.

Mr. President, your steadfast, personal commitment to these principles is exemplified by your presence with us today. I know that your deeply held belief in the worth of the charter, the dignity and worth of the human person, is a source of strength and inspiration to us all. Your dedication to the fundamentally human value of respect for the individual and your conviction that the life of opportunity and fulfillment can be assured for all humankind are profoundly encouraging. It is indeed such hope and confidence as you have generated that we need to meet the aspirations of the world's people for peace, freedom, and justice.

The President. Well, Mr. Secretary-General, Mr. President, Your Excellencies, honored guests, it's a privilege for me to be with you today, because it provides an opportunity to express this country's continued commitment to the principles on which the United Nations was founded some 37 years ago.

This body was born out of the brutality and chaos of a terrible war, a war that had engulfed the planet with a ferocity of destruction such as mankind had never known before. My longevity has given me a perspective on the founding of the United Nations that was useful in the preparation of the remarks that I made today -- and some attention called to that longevity on occasion -- but I do remember the U.N.'s first days and our hopes at that time that this would be a forum for all mankind, replacing armed conflict with debate. We hoped that when necessary, it could do what had to be done to prevent aggression.

And yesterday, Mr. Secretary-General, you presided over a convocation honoring the centenary of a great American leader -- Franklin Roosevelt. I recall the inspiration of his declaration with Winston Churchill of the four freedoms at a time when the freedom-loving people of the world were sorely in need of inspiration. In a very real way, this, an institution dedicated to peace, was his dream. I can asure you today, however imperfect the reality may be, Americans still dream that dream.

Much has happened in these last 37 years. Our countrymen can be proud that from the first day, the U.N. has had from the United States the utmost moral, political and -- you, yourself, generously remarked -- financial support. But I should point out that even in a time of domestic entrenchment, American financial support has not and will not decline.

Nevertheless, it has been and can be a force for great good. While it hasn't solved every problem or prevented every conflict, there have been shining accomplishments. More than a few are alive and live decently because of this institution.

Perhaps now we have a more mature view of the United Nations. While recognizing its limitations, we don't overlook its real potential and the opportunities, opportunities that for the sake of humanity we cannot afford to waste.

Secretary-General to prevent, contain, and resolve the conflicts in the South Atlantic, in Lebanon, and in Iran and Iraq. You may be new to your job, Mr. Secretary-General, but your vigor and commitment during this trying time have impressed all those who love peace.

As President of the United States, the preservation of peace is a mandate second only to the preservation of my country's freedom and independence. With the destructive power of today's weapons, keeping the peace is not just a goal; it's a sacred obligation. But maintaining peace requires more than sincerity and idealism -- more than optimism and good will. As you know well, peace is a product of hard, strenuous labor by those dedicated to its preservation. It requires realism, not wishful thinking.

For our part, we take the issue of arms control and disarmament -- the purpose of this special session -- very seriously. The tangible proposals we've made and that I spoke of this morning for nuclear and conventional arms reduction should underline our dedication to making this a safer and a more peaceful world. To this end, we seek to reestablish a balance and an actual reduction of strategic weapons.

An unpleasant reality, but true nonetheless, is the fact that many words must be spoken before progress between nations can be made. So, let us get on with the words. Yet, its been said that through their deeds, you shall know men. So, let us get on with the deeds of peace as well.

George invited us to drop by here before we went home after being at the United Nations earlier today. I'm always delighted to speak to Republican delegates. I have sort of developed a taste for that in the summer of 1980. [Laughter] But I'll tell you what I like about my fellow Republicans -- their optimism and their dedication. And George is that kind of a Republican.

I remember back there when everyone told us to write off New York in 1980 and not to waste our time or effort here because there was no chance. And it was George Clark [New York State Republican chairman] who said, ``Not on your life, nothing doing,'' and he was right. And you know what happened.

Yes, we can have a brighter tomorrow. Yes, we can make government work. Yes, we can solve our problems. We can have a safe and strong America. We can live together in harmony no matter what our race or religion. And when it comes to our country, ``yes'' is the only word we understand, 'cause that's what we've grown up with as a country. The colonists said it, that they could seek a better world. The pioneers said, yes, we can open up the prairies and the frontiers.

We have an important job ahead, and it's getting our message across. It won't be easy. It's a tremendous job to do. But in spite of everything you hear, the issues really are with us. And it's up to us and to leaders like yourselves to become familiar, to know what the answers are and the arguments are when the battle gets underway. The issues are with us because we're trying to solve the problems that are facing this nation. And on November 2d, we'll have to get that story across.

But let me just say a word about those issues and the comparison with where our opponents stand. The liberal leadership of the other party is going to have to explain why they, for 2 years in a row, fought right down to the wire -- and have in the last few weeks -- against reducing spending as if that were some kind of a sin against the body politic. It's the liberal leadership of that same party who first of all didn't want to give you the tax cuts that are scheduled for the next 2 years, but now want to take them away from you on the grounds that somehow they're responsible for the recession. Well, the truth is we had the recession before we had the program.

And that same leadership has tried to protect every lord and fiefdom in the Federal bureaucracy, and we have reduced the size of the Federal Government by tens of thousands of people. George Bush is heading up a task force with regard to those regulations that I talked about during the campaign, all those unnecessary regulations. And do you know what he's accomplished with that task force so far in just eliminating unnecessary regulations? The savings to the people of America in manhours of work filling out papers for the Federal Government have been reduced by 200 million manhours.

I think we offer the people hope, hope that once again we have the chance and the answer to making America great again. We can set things right, and with people like yourselves here, I know we're going to do it.

Let me just -- a few of the buzzwords, and then Nancy and I are going to have to run for that helicopter out there. But you've heard the term over and over again -- ``budget cuts.'' And more and more you're seeing the sobsister complaints about that we are throwing people out into the streets and there is no safety net and we're not doing what we should do for the people who must have our help. Well, in the first place, there have been no budget cuts. I wish there were. I wish we were in a situation where we could reduce the budget to less than it was the previous year, but we couldn't do that and preserve the safety net for those people who need help.

But let me just give you some things you might use in an argument about whether we are mistreating the people who need help. Oh, I know of 8,000 individuals whose social security checks have been eliminated -- 8,000 of them. We found out they'd been dead for an average of 7 years. [Laughter] They were still getting their check.

They tell us that we're wasting money on defense, that we shouldn't be spending all that money on defense. Well, I want to tell you, we had a few fellows out there with empty guns as a result of what had happened in the 4 years before we got here. We had airplanes that wouldn't fly for lack of spare parts and ships that couldn't leave harbor. Well, things are different now. And I want to tell you -- [applause] -- but did we, as they say, bankrupt the people for defense spending? In 1962, 46 percent of John F. Kennedy's budget was for defense. In 1983, less than 30 percent of our budget will be for defense.

Voting is one of the most cherished of our birthrights as American citizens. When practiced, it enriches our democracy; when threatened, it must be protected. Today's responsible action by the Senate sends a strong, bipartisan message: No American's vote shall be defiled, diluted, or denied.

The Voting Rights Act, and the amendments added to it in 1975, have significantly contributed to the achievement of full constitutional and political equality for black Americans, and for other minorities, especially Mexican Americans. I strongly believe there has also been a good-faith effort by the great majority of our people, in all regions, to ensure the provisions of this act are fully respected.

The President today decided that the United States should provide an additional $10 million in humanitarian relief to persons affected by the strife in Lebanon. These funds will come from existing appropriations. They are in addition to the $5 million the President made available last week and the $20 million the President has requested from Congress.

I have reviewed the sanctions on the export of oil and gas equipment to the Soviet Union imposed on December 30, 1981, and have decided to extend these sanctions through adoption of new regulations to include equipment produced by subsidiaries of U.S. companies abroad, as well as equipment produced abroad under licenses issued by U.S. companies.

The objective of the United States in imposing the sanctions has been and continues to be to advance reconciliation in Poland. Since December 30, 1981, little has changed concerning the situation in Poland; there has been no movement that would enable us to undertake positive, reciprocal measures.

We agree that Israel must not be subjected to violence from the north, and the United States will continue to work to achieve these goals and to secure the withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon.

President of the United States, for his invitation to come to visit with him again, after my first visit in September 1981, in the White House and hold a discussion, a very fruitful discussion with the President and his advisers.

Everybody of you knows that we face now a situation in the Middle East which calls for activity, great attention, and understanding. I have read in some newspapers in this great country that Israel invaded Lebanon. This is a misnomer. Israel did not invade any country. You do invade a land when you want to conquer it or to annex it or, at least, to conquer part of it. We don't covet even 1 inch of Lebanese territory. And, willingly, we will withdraw our troops, all of our troops, and bring them back home as soon as possible. ``As soon as possible'' means as soon as arrangements are made that never again will our citizens -- men, women, and children -- be attacked, maimed, and killed by armed bands operating from Lebanon, and armed and supported by the Soviet Union and its satellites.

There is hope to believe that such arrangements will be made and that all foreign forces, without exception, will be withdrawn from Lebanon, and there will be an independent, free Lebanon based on its territorial integrity. And the day is near that such a Lebanon and Israel will sign a peace treaty and live in peace forever.

Thailand, and Vietnam. And still, given the way things are in this town, I have a feeling his new assignment will be the most hair-raising of them all. [Laughter] General, with all the flak you'll be getting, it might be a good idea to start wearing a helmet again. [Laughter] But our new man possesses that unique blend of the seasoned combat leader and the perceptive strategist, a blend that makes him a true soldier-statesman and worthy of the title Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.

General Vessey, in selecting a man of your caliber we also honor your profession and all those with whom you serve. And perhaps this is a good time to recognize General Bolte, who was your Division Commander in Italy during World War II and who is here. General, it's nice to have you here. General Bolte, thank you for turning out such a fine soldier as Jack Vessey.

Army Chief of Staff, Dwight Eisenhower, who said that ``our foreign policy is not difficult to state. We are for peace first, last, and always. . . .'' The truth of those words can't be challenged, but it's especially fitting for a former soldier to have said them. No one wants peace more than the soldier, for the soldier understands better than anyone the pain and destruction of war. And I know that General Vessey must carry inside him the sorrows of buddies lost on foreign fields and the memories of young men under his command who never returned home.

States has a dual approach to international stability. On the one hand, we're committed to strengthening our defense readiness and military capabilities. At the same time, we also hope to enhance our security through negotiations on intermediate-range missiles, on strategic nuclear weapons, on the prevention of accidental war, and on conventional force reductions. And I'm proud of that agenda for peace.

The 50 States Project reflects President Reagan's campaign commitment with the 50 Governors in an effort to identify and correct State laws which discriminate against women. The groundwork for the program was begun in May 1981 with a Presidential letter to the Governors seeking their assistance in identifying and correcting discriminatory State laws. In October 1981, the Governors' representatives met at the White House to exchange information and promote cooperation between the States. In her new capacity, Ms. Duggin will work to carry out the project in all 50 States.

Public Liaison. Her responsibilities include outreach to the black community and youth organizations. Before joining the White House staff, she served as a field coordinator with Wright McNeill and Associates, which directed the Black Community Involvement program for the Republican National Committee.

Work on this Convention was initiated in 1978 by the United States to develop a new organization to address Atlantic salmon conservation, restoration and management issues through international cooperation. The Convention will provide an effective forum for salmon producing states and salmon harvesting states to work together cooperatively in solving critical salmon conservation and management problems in the Atlantic region. It will focus attention on worldwide Atlantic salmon conservation and management programs and augment current domestic and international efforts to restore these valuable resources.

Costa Rica is an old and valued friend of the United States. Its dramatic tradition has made that country a natural partner of the United States in the Caribbean and, in fact, in the whole hemisphere. Our meeting is in keeping with my policy of working very closely with our democratic friends in this hemisphere. And I most appreciated the President's views on his country's prospects and problems.

We discussed the prospects for democracy in the region. We noted that fair and free elections have been held this year in his own country, Costa Rica, and Colombia, where they've long been a tradition, and Honduras, El Salvador, and the Dominican Republic as well. We've also discussed the threat to this welcome development by forces of the extreme right and the extreme left, the latter aided and abetted by Nicaragua and Cuba.

President Monge. I've expressed my deep appreciation to President Reagan for this invitation to come here in representation of the government and the people of Costa Rica. And I pointed out in my words of appreciation to the President that this was a great indication of the sympathy and the support for Costa Rican democracy, that is, the fact that this invitation was extended to me the very day that I took office this past May 8th.

It has been my privilege to come here to reiterate and to ratify an alliance that has existed from the very early days of our country with the United States of America. And so, this small democracy without an army has always been a sincere ally of this great power called the United States of America, because we have always identified with the ideals and the conceptions of freedom of justice and for the good of all of the peoples throughout the Earth.

And so, this alliance has become a matter of great importance for our countries throughout the past, but never more than now. In this dramatic occasion, its importance is of really dramatic significance, because we are caught in a pincer now -- that is, the democratic forces -- between the extremes of political thinking now more than ever before. I have conveyed to President Reagan the harsh realities of our present economic and social crisis and a true information as to the fact that there is, indeed, a massive offensive on the part of totalitarian Marxism-Leninism in the area of Central America and the Caribbean.

I have repeated to President Reagan our need for solidarity and for assistance in order to enable us to overcome these economic difficulties and social problems that we are undergoing at the present time and in order to preserve in peace this democratic base which is Costa Rica.

And so, I confirm that in order to defend democracy, something that is one of my deep convictions -- that in order to defend democracy, the best tool we have in this unceasing struggle is an unceasing struggle against poverty, a struggle in favor of social justice, a struggle for economic growth. And I believe that no matter how harsh or difficult the circumstances may be, that we, as I told President Reagan, feel optimistic. And I think that at the end of the day that the validity of these concepts in the conscience of our peoples will be intact, that is, these shared ideals of freedom, of justice, and of peace that have always been defended by the people of the United States and the people of Costa Rica.

Thank you very much, President Reagan, for having accepted my ratification of this alliance between tiny Costa Rica and the powerful United States for the continuation of the struggle for freedom and justice for the good of our peoples.

We are justly proud of our public schools, which now offer a free education through the primary and secondary school levels to all American children willing to take advantage of it. At the same time, we must remember the important role that has been played since the beginning of our nation by the diverse nonpublic schools which also offer an education to American children. Now, as they did prior to the establishment of our public school system, parents cherish their ability to choose from a wide range of educational opportunities for their children. It is of great importance to the continued vitality of our society that parents have a meaningful choice between public education and the many forms of private education that are available.

While it would be desirable for the reasons I have already mentioned to extend such tax relief for higher education tuition expenses as well, the large losses in federal tax revenues which would result make it impossible to recommend such legislation at this time. Today's proposal makes an important start by providing this relief where it is most necessary.

I bring you greetings from a former Director of this Agency, Vice President George Bush, who couldn't be here with us this morning. And I want to give him credit, because I'm going to tell a story of his. And it's always dangerous telling a trade joke to members of the trade, because the chances are too good that they've heard it. But I'm going to take the chance anyway. It's one of the few stories that I can tell now since ethnic jokes are a no-no. This one is an Irish joke, and my name is Reagan, so I can tell the story. [Laughter] But it has to do something with the occasion and with your line of work.

Well, today I speak again of those heros, the men and women who are locked in a dangerous, sometimes deadly conflict with the forces of totalitarianism, the men and women whose best accomplishments, whose greatest deeds can never be known to their countrymen, but only to a few of their superiors and ultimately only to history. These men and women, these heroes of a grim twilight struggle are those of you who serve here in the Central Intelligence Agency.

Whether you work in Langley or a faraway nation, whether your tasks are in operations or analysis sections, it is upon your intellect and integrity, your wit and intuition that the fate of freedom rests for millions of your countrymen and for many millions more all around the globe.

But because you're human and because you deal daily in the dangers that confront this nation, you must sometimes question whether some of your countrymen appreciate the value of your accomplishments, the sacrifices you make, the dangers you confront, the importance of the warnings that you issue.

And that's why I have come here today; first, to sign an important piece of legislation that bears directly on your work, an act of Congress whose overwhelming passsage by the representatives of the American people is a symbol of their support for the job that you do every day. But even more than this, I've come here today to say to you what the vast majority of Americans would say if they had this opportunity to stand here before you. We're grateful to you. We thank you. We're proud of you.

The bill I'm about to sign is one that has received from both Houses of Congress the most careful attention and serious debate. And I would be remiss if I didn't cite for the public record the names of those who were instrumental in its passage. This effort actually began several years ago. In the 97th Congress, the chairmen of the Senate and House Committees on Intelligence, Senator Barry Goldwater and Representative Edward Boland, worked diligently for its passage. So too did many Members of the House and Senate, Republicans and Democrats alike, some of whom are here with us today.

I especially want to state my deepest admiration for Senator John Chafee, whose outstanding leadership guided this bill through the Senate. And as always, Howard Baker must be thanked for his leadership, which I have come to admire very much. And finally, I only wish that the late Representative John Ashbrook, who took the lead on the House floor, could be with us here to witness this signing. The Intelligence Identities Protection Act is his legislative monument.

As I've said, the enactment of the Intelligence Identities Protection Act is clear evidence of the value this nation places on its intelligence agencies and their personnel. It's a vote of confidence in you by the American people through their elected representatives. It's also a tribute to the strength of our democracy.

The Congress has carefully drafted this bill so that it focuses only on those who would transgress the bounds of decency; not those who would exercise their legitimate right of dissent. This carefully drawn act recognizes that the revelation of the names of secret agents adds nothing to legitimate public debate over intelligence policy. It is also a signal to the world that while we in this democratic nation remain tolerant and flexible, we also retain our good sense and our resolve to protect our own security and that of the brave men and women who serve us in difficult and dangerous intelligence assignments.

During the debate over this bill, some have suggested that our focus should be not on protecting our own intelligence agencies, but on the real or imagined abuses of the past. Well, I'm glad that counsel was rejected, for the days of such abuses are behind us. The Congress now shares the responsibility of guarding against any transgression, and I have named a new Intelligence Oversight Board and Foreign Intelligence Advisory Board to assist me in ensuring that the rule of law is maintained in areas which must remain secret and out of the normal realm of public scrutiny.

Beyond this, I have full confidence that you'll do your job vigorously and imaginatively while making sure that your activity is lawful, constitutional, and in keeping with the traditions of our way of life. And while you're at your job and while I'm President and while these Congressmen stand at watch, we'll work together to see to it that this powerful tool of government is used to advance, not abuse, the rights of free people.

Today, after nearly a decade of neglect and sometimes overzealous criticism, our intelligence agencies are being rebuilt. This is altogether in keeping with the American tradition. Such activities have been crucial to our survival as a nation. The sacrifice of Nathan Hale, whose statue stands near here, is a national legend. And in our own time, the valiant performance of our intelligence agencies at crucial battles like Midway and Normandy is a matter of historical record.

Third Reich with secret agents. He did so against the advice of our more experienced allies, who said it was an impossible task. It was only 35 years later that the story of those efforts were fully brought to light in a book called ``The Piercing of the Reich,'' by Joseph Persico.

As some of you know by now, the name of that young lawyer who performed the impossible task of putting 103 missions into Germany is William Casey, and he is now your DCI. He's a close friend to whom I owe a great personal debt, and I know that debt grows greater every day with the job that you and he are doing together.

Bill's leadership, and I know that together you're writing another important and inspiring chapter in the history of those who've worked in America's intelligence agencies. We'll need this kind of excellence from you, for the challenges in the months and years ahead will be great ones.

As some of you may know, I've spoken recently about the fading appeal of totalitarianism and about the internal decay of the Soviet experiment. And some have asked in response why I place such an emphasis on the strength of our military and of intelligence agencies if indeed it is our adversaries who are approaching the point of exhaustion. Well, the answer to that is not difficult.

History shows that it is precisely when totalitarian regimes begin to decay from within, it is precisely when they feel the first real stirrings of domestic unrest, that they seek to reassure their own people of their vast and unchallengeable power through imperialistic expansion or foreign adventure.

So, the era ahead of us is one that will see grave challenges and be fraught with danger, yet it's one that I firmly believe will end in the triumph of the civilized world and the supremacy of its beliefs in individual liberty, representative government, and the rule of law under God.

And that's why we must now summon all the nations of the world to a crusade for freedom and a global campaign for the rights of the individual, and you are in the forefront of this campaign. You must be the cutting edge of freedom in peace and war, and in the shadowy world in between, you must serve in silence and carry your special burden. But let me assure you, you're on the winning side, and your service is one which free men will thank you and future generations honor you.

Today I congratulate the responsible Members of the House and Senate who resisted intense political pressure to give the American people what they have waited many months to receive: a bipartisan recovery budget that recommits this government to a clear course toward lower growth of spending, steadily declining deficits, and eventually, the ability to live again within our means.

Passage of this bipartisan budget resolution is a clear repudiation of those who said the Congress could not and would not act responsibly in an election year. It is a victory for the common sense and quiet courage of America's finest legislators -- Republican and Democrat -- who refused to take the low road and return to the discredited, quick-fix policies of the past.

The Congress has now sent an important signal to America's markets and to the world. By voting to reduce projected deficits over the next 3 years by more than $375 billion, the first important hurdle blocking our path to lower interest rates has been cleared.

But let there be no misunderstanding: Even steeper hurdles remain. The Congress must follow through with tough implementing actions to make the budgetary commitment meaningful and actually control government spending.

We have come too far and worked too hard in correcting the mistakes of the past to turn back now. The American people expect us to work together for lasting economic recovery. We must not betray their trust.

I was delighted that we could continue our conversations from Paris, London, and Bonn on the whole host of issues where our cooperation is so close. In that connection, incidentally, I note that we have now met four times in this month in as many cities. It's customary when two political figures get together to describe their talks as far-ranging. But in our case, that statement is both figuratively and literally true. I'm going to have to check the history books, but four separate meetings in four different places in less than 4 weeks may well be unprecedented in our bilateral relations.

Seriously, I did have, as I always do, an exceptionally useful discussion with the Prime Minister which covered a number of critical issues. The fighting in the South Atlantic has stopped since we last met. We believe that a fundamental principle of international society -- that force not be used to settle disputes -- was at stake in that conflict. We also discussed other issues, including a number of economic questions, the future of East-West relations and the crucial role played by the events in Poland. We share the commitment to arms control negotiations with the Soviet Union.

And we also agree that the work accomplished at the two summit meetings in which we participated earlier this month, Versailles and Bonn, demonstrated anew the vitality and cohesion of the Western democracies. Clearly, there's much more in our free and pluralistic societies that unites us than divides us, and that's our major strength when we face a determined and totalitarian adversary.

With respect to the tragic situation in the Middle East, we consulted about what we could do to promote a lasting and just peace in that region that's so important to us -- especially in Lebanon and to bring an end to the human suffering there.

The Prime Minister has come to us at a particularly auspicious moment -- the birth of an heir to the throne of the United Kingdom. And we have every hope that she will carry back to London our fondest good wishes, those of the American people, Nancy and myself, to their Royal Highnesses the Prince and Princess of Wales, and to their little son.

Mr. President -- can I just add a few words to what the President has already said. I was very anxious to come and talk to the President so that we could get up to date with a number of things that have happened since we last met on his very highly successful visit to Europe and his particularly successful visit to Britain.

As he pointed out, since then, the fighting in the Falkland Islands has been concluded, which was a tremendous relief to us all. And we hope that things will steadily continue to improve there. We also discussed matters such as Lebanon, where there is a great tragedy taking place, which is of concern to us all. And naturally, of course, we discussed East-West matters and a number of economic things.

I've just noticed today that in some of the questions I have been asked by some of you ladies and gentlemen and some others there's often been a little bit of an attempt to try to indicate some differences either between the United States and Britain or some sort of attempt to divide us on some things. I can only report to you that those attempts will never succeed, because we can't be divided. Our relationship and the alliance is far too staunch and far too deep for that.

I'm just very grateful, too, for what the President said about the new royal birth. It does indicate the great continuity that there is in Britain, the tremendous patriotism which one gets in almost all countries, but it's a patriotism in a way of the kind we have here in the States as well; not only love of your country because you belong to it but because it stands for certain things, and it's those that makes you patriotic. I will, of course, take back your very warm message to our people, and I'm certain they'll be delighted with your good wishes.

The Constitution provides the structure of our federal system and a system of checks and balances that applies equally to each branch of government, to relations between the states and the Federal Government, and, as importantly, to each of us. It protects the rights of all Americans to ``life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness'' and limits governmental authority to ensure these liberties are faithfully protected -- both by and from the state.

On this day and throughout this week, we should reaffirm our commitment to this ``compact'' which gives ``stability to the present and certainty to the future.'' And, as we approach the 200th anniversary of the Constitution, we must remember that an active and informed citizenry is not just a right; it is an obligation.

Americans to observe that week with programs that stress the importance of the Constitution to our individual freedoms and form of government. I call upon all citizens to join in studying the events and documents surrounding the adoption of our Constitution in 1787 so that its bicentennial may be celebrated with renewed learning of the history and purpose of this Charter of Freedom.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 23rd day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

I want to thank Carlton Turner, the Vice President and Nancy and these ladies and gentleman who are gathered here in front today, because they're all very much a part of the effort in fighting drug abuse. And I know what they're up against. I'm also aware of the good job that they've all been doing recently. So, one reason that they're here is so I can tip my hat to them.

It's a matter in this drug abuse of getting out and doing something about a problem that for too long has been mainly discussed and debated. And I have heard from Nancy -- and I'm very proud of what she's been doing -- with regard to the various parent groups that have sprung up throughout the country, in visiting and learning there of their efforts and the success that they've had with regard to young people. And she's told me how effective education and prevention can be, and I know that she's going to continue in those efforts as all the others are.

And while I'm at it, I'd like to commend the cooperative efforts of law enforcement and health agencies at all levels which have been fighting a long, hard battle against the drug problem. And I also heartily applaud the education and prevention efforts, as I said before, of the parents' movement.

So, I asked all these people to get together here today -- as they probably haven't gathered in a group before -- to deal with the drug problem facing this nation. As in other areas of this administration, I want to seek new approaches. I want to get away from the fatalistic attitude of the late seventies and assert a positive approach that involves as many elements of this society as possible -- State and local officials, volunteer groups, parents, teachers, students, independent agencies, and law enforcement officials. I know that you who are here with us today have already laid the groundwork for this, and I'd like to ask you to report back to Dr. Turner within 2 weeks with what suggestions you may have for continuing and for our strategy.

Drugs already reach deeply into our social structure, so we must mobilize all our forces to stop the flow of drugs into this country, to let kids know the truth, to erase the false glamour that surrounds drugs, and to brand drugs such as marijuana exactly for what they are -- dangerous, and particularly to school-age youth.

We can put drug abuse on the run through stronger law enforcement, through cooperation with other nations to stop the trafficking, and by calling on the tremendous volunteer resources of parents, teachers, civic and religious leaders, and State and local officials.

We're rejecting the helpless attitude that drug use is so rampant that we're defenseless to do anything about it. We're taking down the surrender flag that has flown over so many drug efforts; we're running up a battle flag. We can fight the drug problem, and we can win. And that is exactly what we intend to do. And I, therefore, am now going to sign the order.

House. Earlier, he had met in the Roosevelt Room with the heads or representatives of 18 Federal departments and agencies with responsibilities in the areas of drug abuse, law enforcement, and health-related aspects of drug use.

Today I am returning to the House of Representatives, without my approval, H.R. 5922, an act providing supplemental appropriations for several Federal programs in urgent need of additional funds in Fiscal Year 1982. Unfortunately, in addition to providing the urgent supplemental appropriations requested by the Administration, the Congress has added other unrequested, non-urgent funds that would increase the 1983 deficit by $1.3 billion and would add at least $5 billion to Federal spending in the next few years. The bill also establishes a housing subsidy program that sets a bad precedent for other Federal programs. For these reasons, I cannot approve this legislation. I urge the Congress to act quickly to send me a clean bill for signature containing only those items urgently needed to continue 1982 activities.

I share the heartfelt Congressional concerns about the particular problems confronting the housing industry. But we will not promote a housing recovery by going even deeper in debt. More red ink spending will only make the housing recession worse.

It is my belief this bill will do little to increase construction of new housing; most of the aid will go for homes that would be built and purchased anyway. The bill does not increase available financing, but shifts funds to housing that would otherwise be used by, and create jobs in, other sectors of the economy. My concern also is that the bill would add to the Federal deficit and generate upward pressures on interest rates -- aggravating the very situation it seeks to help.

Furthermore, we cannot justify singling out one industry for special relief. The recession and high interest rates have created hardship and unemployment for farmers, small businesses, the thrift industry, automobile manufacturers and dealers and many others. This Government must convince a skeptical country -- the business community, taxpayers, investors and workers -- that lasting recovery is a fundamental commitment that will not be derailed by a return to excessive Federal spending and borrowing.

My Administration has taken a number of steps to remove tax, regulatory and administrative burdens on housing finance and construction. We have proposed legislation to extend Federal Housing Administration insurance to a number of innovative mortgage financing instruments to encourage private market use of these flexible instruments. We have removed regulatory restrictions limiting the use of pension funds in mortgage credit markets. We have provided an additional $3.4 billion of subsidized housing funds in 1982 to allow up to 70,000 additional units of new rental housing for low income households to begin construction this summer. We are revising our regulations on the use of tax exempt financing for housing to allow states and localities to use this financing vehicle to the full extent authorized by the Congress.

More fundamentally, we have established a long-term program designed to provide incentives and to create conditions for sustained non-inflationary economic recovery. That recovery is getting underway. Housing permits have risen in six of the last seven months and are now 31 percent above their October low. Housing starts rose by 22 percent in May and are 27 percent above their October low. The key to sustaining this upturn is lower interest rates. This, in turn, depends on public confidence that the Congress will control Federal spending and reduce Federal deficits -- thus leaving an adequate supply of funds for housing and business investment.

Therefore, I am returning H.R. 5922 without approval and urge the Congress to enact immediately a 1982 supplemental appropriations bill that addresses only those items I have indicated need urgent attention and excludes these objectionable additions. I look forward to prompt Congressional action on a revised bill which will assure continuity in the operations of Federal agencies and be consistent with continued progress toward economic recovery.

The central purpose of the Smithsonian Institution is to provide knowledge, and through that knowledge, understanding. ``The increase and diffusion of knowledge'' among all mankind is its mandate, and in pursuing this mandate for the past 136 years Smithsonian scholars and scientists have explored and shed new light upon the universe, upon the geology and biology of our planet, upon the history and art of the United States, and upon the cultures of peoples throughout the world from the earliest times to the present.

In this panoply of knowledge and human and natural diversity, however, there is an important segment to which full justice has not been done: that vast and rich array of civilizations stretching from Japan and Korea through Southeast Asia, the Middle East, and all of Africa.

Congress placed responsibility for the National Museum of African Art with the Institution. At a time, however, when an understanding of non-Western cultures has assumed new urgency, it is apparent that the Smithsonian's existing facilities are inadequate to meet the need: The Freer Gallery needs more space for its programs, the National Museum of African Art needs and deserves modern facilities among the other Smithsonian museums on the Mall, and the Smithsonian as a whole needs facilities in which the achievements of all non-Western cultures can be studied, discussed, and exhibited.

Institution's traveling exhibitions in this and other countries) an understanding of the great cultural achievements of the peoples and civilizations of Africa, the Near East, and Asia. In emphasizing the rich diversity of these civilizations as well as the interrelationships of mankind, the new center will make a fundamental contribution to the global understanding upon which our future depends.

Today, I have the extremely disappointing task of again returning to the Congress, without my signature, a bill providing supplemental appropriations for several Federal programs in need of additional funds in Fiscal Year 1982. I use the word ``again'' because H.R. 6682, like its predecessor H.R. 5922, contains excessive and unrequested budget authority totalling nearly $1 billion. For this reason, I cannot approve this legislation.

A key to lasting economic recovery is to bring interest rates down and keep them down. We can only do that by convincing skeptical markets that this Government has the will to control Federal spending and borrowing across the board. The American people need deeds, not just promises, to be convinced deficits will be reduced.

H.R. 6682 without approval and urge the Congress to enact immediately a 1982 supplemental appropriations bill that addresses only those items I have indicated need urgent attention. Again, I look forward to prompt Congressional action on a revised bill that will assure continuity in the operations of Federal agencies and be consistent with continued progress toward economic recovery.

This afternoon we held the latest in a series of National Security Council meetings focused on arms control. At the conclusion of the meeting I gave final approval to the instructions the American negotiating team will carry to Geneva, where negotiations will begin next Tuesday, June 29, on Strategic Arms Reductions Talks (START).

Our team will be headed by Ambassador Edward L. Rowny, an outstanding soldier-diplomat, who has participated actively in developing the far-reaching START proposals we have made, and in which the entire world is placing so much hope.

An historic opportunity exists to reverse the massive buildup of nuclear arsenals that occurred during the last decade. We must do all we possibly can to achieve substantial reductions in the numbers and the destructive potential of the nuclear forces. As our proposals emphasize, we must seek especially to reduce the most destabilizing elements of the strategic arsenals. We must ensure reductions that are verifiable, that go to equal levels, and that enhance stability and deterrence and thereby reduce the risk of nuclear war.

I do not underestimate the formidable nature of this task. But I believe it is in the interest of the peoples of the United States, the Soviet Union, and the entire world to engage fully in this effort.

It's an announcement that I make with great regret regarding a member of our administration who has served this country for 40 years, above and beyond the call of duty; who has served me so well and faithfully; whose wisdom and counsel I have respected and admired for all the time that our administration has been here, but who now is resigning and leaving government service after all this great time. And with great regret, I have accepted the resignation of Secretary of State Al Haig.

It is with the most profound regret that I accept your letter of resignation. Almost forty years ago you committed yourself to the service of your country. Since that time your career has been marked by a succession of assignments demanding the highest level of personal sacrifice, courage and leadership. As a soldier and statesman facing challenges of enormous complexity and danger, you have established a standard of excellence and achievement seldom equalled in our history. On each occasion you have reflected a quality of wisdom which has been critical to the resolution of the most anguishing problems we have faced during the past generation -- the conclusion of the Vietnam war, the transfer of executive authority at a time of national trauma and most recently, advancing the cause of peace among nations.

The nation is deeply in your debt. As you leave I want you to know of my deep personal appreciation, and in behalf of the American people I express my gratitude and respect. You have been kind enough to offer your continued counsel and you may be confident that I will call upon you in the years ahead. Nancy joins me in extending our warmest personal wishes to you and Pat.

Your accession to office on January 20, 1981, brought an opportunity for a new and forward looking foreign policy resting on the cornerstones of strength and compassion. I believe that we shared a view of America's role in the world as the leader of free men and an inspiration for all.

In recent months, it has become clear to me that the foreign policy on which we embarked together was shifting from that careful course which we had laid out. Under these circumstances, I feel it necessary to request that you accept my resignation. I shall always treasure the confidence which you reposed in me. It has been a great honor to serve in your Administration, and I wish you every success in the future.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Justin Dart to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Communications Satellite Corporation until the date of the annual meeting of the Corporation in 1985. He would succeed Jesse Hill, Jr., term expired.

You are about to undertake one of the most important tasks of our age -- the negotiation of an effective and equitable strategic arms reduction agreement. Your efforts in this endeavor are vital to the citizens of the United States and the Soviet Union, and to all mankind.

Despite more than a decade of intensive negotiations, nuclear weapons continue to accumulate, and the strategic relationship between the Soviet Union and the United States has steadily become less stable. A major reason for this has been the massive buildup of the Soviet Union's ballistic missile force over the past 15 years.

An historic opportunity now exists for both the United States and the Soviet Union to reverse this process, and to reduce substantially both the numbers and the destructive potential of nuclear forces. Such reductions to equal levels must immediately focus on the most destabilizing elements of the strategic balance if we are to promptly enhance deterrence and stability and thereby reduce the risk of nuclear war. Further, the achievement of this goal should greatly reduce the nuclear anxiety that has become such a conspicuous feature of public concern throughout the world.

I do not underestimate the monumental nature of the task of effectively reducing forces. But while the task is formidable, the importance of undertaking these negotiations is fully appreciated by the American and, I believe, by the Soviet people. We must learn from the shortcomings of earlier efforts for, as you are well aware, the American people will not accept an agreement unless it is equal and verifiable, and contributes to stability.

The proposals you take to Geneva represent a practical, phased plan which will protect the legitimate security interests of both sides. It is designed to enhance deterrence and to achieve stability by reducing nuclear forces on both sides to equal levels in a verifiable manner. Its provisions significantly reduce the forces of both the Soviet Union and the United States and, therefore, contain benefits for both sides, as well as for the rest of the world.

I know that you and your delegation will present these proposals clearly and persuasively, along with the fundamental considerations that lie behind them. And, I want the Soviet delegation to know that concerns and proposals put forward by them will be given careful consideration by us.

For our part, the United States is ready to move forward rapidly toward an agreement reducing strategic nuclear arms, and I am confident that if our efforts are met with the same seriousness of purpose by the Soviet Union, we can seize the historic opportunity that lies before us.

As the two leading nuclear powers in the world, the United States and the Soviet Union are trustees for humanity in the great task of ending the menace of nuclear arsenals and transforming them into instruments underwriting peace. I am convinced that this can be done if both nations fully accept the principle that the only legitimate function of nuclear arms is to deter aggression.

This act ensures equal access to the political process for all our citizens. It securely protects the right to vote while strengthening the safeguards against representation by forced quota. The legislation also extends those special provisions applicable to certain States and localities, while at the same time providing an opportunity for the jurisdictions to bail out from the special provisions when appropriate. In addition, the bill extends for 10 years the protections for language minorities.

Let me say how grateful I am to these gentlemen up here, the Members of the House and Senate from both sides of the aisle, and particularly those on the Senate Judiciary Committee, for getting this bipartisan legislation to my desk.

In this connection, let me also thank all the other organizations and individuals -- many who are here today -- who worked for this bill. As I've said before, the right to vote is the crown jewel of American liberties, and we will not see its luster diminished.

The legislation that I'm signing is the longest extension of the act since its enactment and demonstrates America's commitment to preserving this essential right. I'm proud of the Congress for passing this legislation. I'm proud to be able to sign it.

I am signing into law today H.R. 6631, a bill which authorizes emergency humanitarian assistance to the unfortunate victims of the hostilities in Lebanon. Providing help to people in need is a tradition in which the American people should take great pride. The suffering in Lebanon continues to mount even as an international humanitarian effort, of which the United States is a part, attempts to aid the hurt, hungry, and homeless people in Lebanon.

I am grateful to the Congress for acting so quickly to authorize assistance for Lebanon, and hope that it will soon make available the $20 million I requested on June 16 for the relief effort. In the meantime, I have authorized the use of $2 million from the Refugee Emergency Fund, and the State Department is reprograming another $10 million of appropriated funds to meet the most urgent relief needs. As the full impact of this tragedy becomes known, the United States will continue to do its share in the international effort to relieve the suffering of the people in Lebanon.

Time has not altered the basic duties and responsibilities of the majority of our Armed Forces personnel since the very foundation of our country was laid in 1776. For more than two hundred years, the American men and women who have so proudly served -- and are currently serving -- as Noncommissioned Officers and Petty Officers have been regarded as the backbone of the Armed Forces of the United States.

We all should recognize the great sacrifices and significant contributions made to the Nation by our fellow citizens whose traditional role of service to the Nation as soldiers, sailors, airmen, marines, and coast guardsmen is older than the Nation itself. Their spirit and devotion to duty is evident in the long list of recipients of the Medal of Honor and other decorations of personal valor. They are the heart of our Armed Forces which sustain our freedom and way of life. The duties they perform in accomplishing their mission are a necessary and permanent part of this country's defense mechanism. Upon their shoulders lies the defense of our Nation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 30th day of June in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

As parents fulfill their responsibility to love, encourage, and guide their children, youngsters have the opportunity to develop the self-esteem and competence that equip them to make sound decisions when they become adults.

National Children's Day provides a time for us to recognize the value, vitality, and potential of our young people. It is a day to recommit ourselves to nurturing our youth and to helping them achieve a healthy and happy future. We must strive to encourage our children to take advantage of opportunities for positive educational experiences and training, for the manner in which our children grow and learn will dramatically affect how our Nation is able to meet its future challenges.

Tomorrow, July 1st, marks the beginning of brighter days for everyone who works, saves, and helps our economy grow. For starters, social security recipients will receive their 7.4-percent cost-of-living increases. Many older Americans have been cruelly misled into believing that they would be denied their social security benefits. I said when I campaigned for this office and I've said as President, we'll protect those benefits and we will protect the integrity of social security.

Tomorrow marks the keeping of another important commitment -- the second stage of the tax cut. Those who pay taxes will see their tax rates cut by 10 percent across the board. There'll be another 10-percent cut next year. Together with reductions in the marriage penalty, an increase in the child care credit, and a strong new incentive for retirement savings, American families finally have the means to plan ahead and get ahead. The personal savings rate was 4.6 percent the first quarter last year, when we came into office. It's averaged 5\1/2\ percent so far this year, and that's before this new cut goes into effect.

These tax incentives must be preserved. They are essential to lasting economic recovery. It's ironic to hear the same people who hit us with the biggest tax increase in our history now insisting on scrapping the third year of the tax cut and indexing and doing this in the name of fairness. With their notion of fairness, low- and middle-income Americans would lose nearly 40 percent of their entire tax reduction.

Well, our loyalty lies with little taxpayers, not big taxspenders. What our critics really believe is that those in Washington know better how to spend your money than you, the people, do. But we're not going to let them do it, period.

A year and a half ago, we inherited 21\1/2\-percent interest rates, double-digit inflation, and a trillion-dollar debt -- the worst economic mess in postwar history. I told the American people it would be tough. There was no quick fix or magic wand. But if we believed in ourselves, if we stuck together, we could turn the economy around and have a future filled with opportunity and hope.

We've brought interest rates down, although certainly not nearly enough. While prices are still increasing, these increases are only half what they were a year ago. The buying power of Americans is growing for the first time in years. And we've had the first increase in real wages in 3 years.

Interest rates and unemployment may remain stubbornly high for a time, and too many Americans are still hurting economically. But we are beginning to make progress. And if we stick to our plan, if we keep the Congress from going back to its runaway spending, the recovery will take hold, strengthen, and endure.

Also, is there a difference between the Soviet slaughter of Afghans, which the United States has condemned so often, and the killing of Lebanese and the displaced people of Palestine? If so, what's the difference?

There's no question but that we had hoped for a diplomatic settlement and believed there could have been a diplomatic settlement in the Middle East, in that situation. We were not warned or notified of the invasion that was going to take place. On the other hand, there had been a breaking of the cease-fire, which had held for about 11 months in that area.

I think there are differences between some of these things that are going on and things like just the outright invasion of Afghanistan by a foreign power determined to impose its will on another country. We have a situation in Lebanon in which there was a force, the PLO, literally a government within a government and with its own army. And they had pursued aggression themselves across a border by way of rocket firing and artillery barrages. But the situation is so complicated and the goals that we would like to pursue are what are dictating our conduct right now.

We want the bloodshed to end; there's no question about that. We didn't want it to start. But we've seen Lebanon for 7 years now divided into several factions, each faction with its own militia, not a government in control. We have seen, as I've said, this PLO, and we've seen the invasion of other forces, the presence of the Syrians, as well, in Lebanon.

The President. Yes, and I signed a bill this morning for $50 million in aid for Lebanon there, where several hundred thousand of those Palestinians are. I don't think they were all displaced from one area, and they have been refugees now into ongoing generations.

I think -- when I say PLO, one has to differentiate between the PLO and the Palestinians. And out of this, also, we have another goal -- and it's been our goal for quite some time -- and that is to, once and for all, when these other things are accomplished -- once and for all, to deal with the problem of the Palestinians and settle that problem within the proposals and the suggestions that were made in the Camp David accords.

Q. Mr. President, by all accounts Secretary of State Haig offered to resign several times. Why did you accept his offer this time? And what are you going to be doing to make sure that the sort of problems that led to his resignation don't occur again?

The President. Well, once again you ask a question upon which, when I accepted his resignation, I made a statement that I would have no further comments on that or take no questions on it. He only once offered to -- or came in with a resignation and submitted his resignation to me.

Whatever else has been heard was never -- that was never in any conversation between us. And he presented his resignation, and I, with great regret and sorrow -- and that's not just a platitude; I really mean it -- accepted that resignation.

I must say at the same time I also stated -- and I will state again -- his service to his country and his service to our administration has been all that could be desired, and I have profited and benefited by his wisdom and his suggestions. And he made his letter of resignation plain.

Q. Mr. President, looking to the future, there were some problems in this area -- in the foreign policy area. Can you say if there are going to be any changes or if anything will be done differently, so that the sort of problems that led to his resignation won't reoccur?

And I must say, fortunately for the country, for the administration, as Secretary Haig leaves, his replacement is a man with great experience and a man of unquestioned integrity, and I think we're all fortunate that we have been able to have such a replacement.

My system has been one -- and always has been one -- not of having a synthesis presented to me of where there are conflicting ideas and then it's boiled down and I get a single option to approve or disapprove. I prefer debate and discussion, a debate all those who have an interest in a certain issue and a reason for that interest, to have their say, not be -- sit around as ``yes'' men. And then I make my decision, based on what I have heard in that discussion. And that will be the procedure we'll follow.

The President. Certainly I'm going to be sticking with him. All the allegations that were brought, the many, many allegations -- and he asked for a special prosecutor; he asked to appear before a grand jury. And the grand jury found nothing that caused them any concern or to take any action.

Now, why should someone become an embarrassment who has been attacked and undergone what he has undergone all these months, and then a thousand pages of investigatory report says there was never any substantiation for those charges, as he had said in the beginning: There would be none. I think that it would be the most unfair thing in the world for anyone to think that he has been anything but unfairly and unjustly assailed.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. What I wanted to ask you is whether you felt -- even though you won't discuss the reasons for Secretary Haig's resignation or why you accepted it -- whether you feel that coming at the time of this crisis in the Middle East, that you should have accepted his resignation. What could have propelled you to accept the resignation in the middle of such a crisis? And do you think it has undermined our ability to conduct foreign policy with confidence abroad?

I just have to say that there is no easy time for a Secretary of State to resign. I don't know of a time that we've been here in which there has not been some crisis, something of that kind going on -- and there are several hotspots in the world other than these that we've touched upon. So, there just is no easy time for that to happen.

The President. I would respond by saying that I think that we've been pursuing a foreign policy that is sound, that we've had great successes in a number of areas with this. Granted, we have some problems in the world that we would like to be helpful in, and we've not secured -- or been of the help that we would like to have been. But when we came here, our own national defenses were in disarray. We have started the rebuilding of those defenses.

There was great question, with the terrible tragedy in Egypt, that the Camp David first call for the return of the Sinai might not be carried out. It was carried out. We have just had 11 months of cease-fire, thanks to the herculean efforts of Phil Habib, who has been there and performing yeoman service keeping the lid on that situation.

We offered our help and, again, Secretary Haig did a superhuman job in trying to prevent bloodshed in the South Atlantic situation regarding the Falklands. We were unable to succeed in that to persuade the aggressive party to leave the islands and then have a peaceful solution to the problem. But I wouldn't refuse to do it again in a like situation. I thought we had a proper place in trying to solve that.

But in the southern part of Africa, the independence of Namibia -- this was dead in the water. We have made great progress there, and we're very optimistic about what might take place. I think there was disarray with our European allies. I think that has been largely eliminated, and they have confidence in us once again.

Q. Mr. President, what steps are you prepared to take if Israel resumes fighting in Lebanon, moves in on the PLO and West Beirut. And what is the United States prepared to do for the Palestinians, whose legal rights you apparently told President Mubarak of Egypt the U.S. supports?

The President. This is a question, again, where I have to beg your tolerance of me. With the delicacy of the negotiations that are going on in the -- trying to achieve those three major points that I mentioned -- there's just no way that I can comment on or speculate about what might happen, because I don't want anything that might in any way affect those negotiations, all of which involve the very things that you're asking about. And I just have to remain silent on those.

Q. Mr. President, your proposal to grant tax credits on income tax to the parents of the children who attend private schools is now under attack, as you know, on the Hill. The critics say that this will cost a billion and a half dollars a year eventually. It will help the rich. It'll help schools that discriminate. And they also say this is just a political ploy for certain votes. And are you really planning to fight for the passage of this bill at this session of Congress?

And for those who say that -- first of all, that this benefits the rich, the overwhelming majority of parents or families with children in independent or parochial schools in America today have incomes of under $25,000. Forty percent of the students in the Catholic schools of Chicago are black. This whole measure is simply a recognition of the unfairness of people, who in an effort to -- they hope to improve the education or get the kind of education that they particularly want for their children, are willing to pay the full burden of the taxes that support the public school system.

What would hurt the public school system is if all of the independent schools closed, and those thousands and thousands of youngsters were dumped on the public school system, which doesn't have the facilities or the means to take care of them. That would be quite a dislocation.

But these parents are willing to pay for one system of education by taxes that they do not use at all and then out of their own pockets pay for another system of education to educate their own children, which relieves some of the burden on the taxpayers. They don't impose on them. And I just think it's simple fairness to give them some kind of a break. And, as I say, the economics of it points out that this is benefiting those people at the lower and middle-income ranges.

Q. Mr. President, in 1976, when another Secretary of State left under another President, you were critical of the explanations given and called for a fuller explanation. With all due respect, sir, don't you think that the American people deserve to know more of the reasons that led to the departure of Secretary Haig?

The President. Lou, if I thought that there was something involved in this that the American people needed to know, with regard to their own welfare, then I would be frank with the American people and tell them. And I think, if we're recalling the same previous resignation -- I think there were some things that indicated that maybe there was something where there were sides in which the American people needed to know for their own judgment.

I know that this was the day and the decision day, the day of reckoning. I don't think, however, that the effort over the last 10 years -- while there's been a difference in how to handle the problem of discrimination against women, I don't think that the effort was wasted because they didn't get the constitutional amendment. The only debate has been over the method of eliminating or erasing discrimination.

But in these 10 years, I think that their effort has brought to the attention of the people this problem. I know it did for me when I was Governor to the extent that in California we found 14 statutes that did discriminate. And we eliminated those 14 statutes or altered them; we removed the provisions in them that were discriminatory.

Now, I believe in equal rights. And when I came here I asked the 50 Governors individually if each one of them would appoint someone in their own State to start looking, searching for statutes and regulations to do what we had done there in California -- and this included in California to see if there are more that we didn't find. I promised to appoint and have appointed a person in our government here and our administration also to bring this together into a concerted movement and to keep helping move it along. And I found that there was a task force in the Justice Department -- and I think that maybe we've made it more active since we've been here -- to do the same thing with regard to Federal laws and regulations and to eliminate those that are discriminatory.

And now I know that many say that they will continue to try for an amendment. And I just wonder if any of them have ever thought how much of that effort and the resources that are employed in that, if used in behalf of this program that I've just mentioned, if they could not achieve what it is they want to achieve and much faster, just as we did in California, and eliminate.

I would like to say this: No, I've given no green light whatsoever. And an impression that I know some of the neighboring states there have had from the beginning is that somehow we were aware of this and we gave permission or something. No, we were caught as much by surprise as anyone, and we wanted a diplomatic solution and believe there could have been one.

The President. I think also -- his not having heard the conversation between Prime Minister Begin and myself -- that what he called a promise actually was in a discussion in which, to be more accurate, the Prime Minister had said to me that they didn't want to and that they had not wanted to from the beginning.

Q. Mr. President, the British Government today took steps to enable British companies to get around the U.S. embargo on sale of gas pipeline equipment to the Soviet Union. Some of your advisers, including Mr. Haig, have argued all along that this embargo is going to be counterproductive and is going to be damaging to U.S. interests in Europe. And I'm wondering if you have any second thoughts about the U.S. embargo or if you intend to take any additional steps to force our European allies to go along with it?

This is simply a matter of principle. We proposed that embargo back at the time when the trouble began in Poland, as -- and as we believe firmly that the Soviet Union is the supporter of the trouble in Poland and is the one to deal with on that. And we said that these sanctions were imposed until -- and we specified some things that we felt should be done to relax the oppression that is going on of the people of Poland by their military government. Now, if that is done, we'll lift those sanctions. But I don't see any way that, in principle, we could back away from that, simply because the Soviet Union has sat there and done nothing. And this is the reason for it.

I understand that it's a hardship. We tried to persuade our allies not to go forward with the pipeline for two reasons. One, we think there is a risk that if they become industrially dependent on the Soviet Union for energy -- and all the valves are on the Soviet side of the border -- that the Soviet Union can engage in a kind of blackmail when that happens.

They have put their people literally on a starvation diet with regard to consumer items while they poured all their resources into the most massive military buildup the world has ever seen. And that buildup is obviously aimed at the nations in the alliance. And they, the Soviet Union, now hard-pressed for cash because of its own actions, can perceive anywhere from 10 to 12 billion dollars a year in hard cash payments in return for the energy when the pipeline is completed -- which I assume, if they continue the present policies, would be used to arm further against the rest of us and against our allies and thus force more cost for armaments for the rest of the world. And for these two reasons, we tried to persuade our allies not to go forward.

In some instances they claim that the administrations before them -- see, there's others that have had administrations before them -- had made contracts which they felt were binding on their country and so forth. We offered to help them with a source of energy closer to home, Norway and the Netherlands, and gas fields that apparently have a potential that could meet their needs.

Q. May I ask you to address a political question? Earlier this week, one of your Cabinet members was quoted as saying about you, ``I've told him time after time that he has to stop telling those guys around him that he's not going to run again.'' Are you telling those guys around you that you're not going to run again? Or will you tell us that you are?

The President. Well now, Ann, you know that it is far too early to make a decision on a matter of that kind. But I can answer your question more completely. No, I have not been telling anyone around me that I won't run again. I have, at times, even expressed the idea to them that it would be unlike me, I think, to walk away from an unfinished job. And I've suggested that they shouldn't waste their time reading the ``Help Wanted'' ads.

The President. I can't give you an answer on that, what is going on right now, the -- we did our best, as I said before, to try to bring about a peaceful settlement. It didn't happen. There was armed conflict, and there has been a victor and a vanquished. And now it's hardly the place for us to intervene in that. We'll stand by ready to help if our help is asked for.

Q. Mr. President, I don't know if I'll succeed where others have failed before. I understand your reluctance to discuss the Haig resignation, but two specific questions have seemed to arise from that resignation. Do you think that there were mixed signals sent to the Middle East which resulted in the PLO getting one impression, that you were pressing the Israelis to withdraw, while the rest of the administration was trying to maintain pressure on the PLO to evacuate and disarm?

And the second one is, did you sort of blindside your own State Department when you suddenly made the decision to take your most severe option on the pipeline, leaving the State Department dangling to explain to Western Europe?

The President. No, there was no blindsiding on that -- I'll take the last part first. That was fully discussed and has been several times in the Cabinet. There were differences of opinion about the extent to which we would do it or whether we would do it at all. And I had to come down, as I did at the first, on the side of what I thought was principle.

As to conflicting signals, no. I know there have been rumors about that. No, we have been in constant communication through the State Department with Phil Habib and taking much of our lead from his reporting of what's going on there and what we can or can't do that might be helpful.

And, well, naturally there are times such as -- I've had conversations with ambassadors, but everything that is discussed is then related to whoever was not present -- National Security Council, national security adviser, State Department -- so that at all times and there has never been any dual track or confusion with regard to our communications.

Q. Mr. President, when you signed the extension of the Voting Rights Act the other day, some minority leaders expressed skepticism over your administration's commitment to that civil rights legislation, possibly because it took you a very long time to embrace the language of the bill. My question is, what initiatives, if any, are you going to take to make very certain that that law is enforced?

The President. I'm going to take every initiative there is. It's my responsibility to see that it is enforced. I think the one prime responsibility at the Federal level is to guarantee the constitutional rights of every citizen no matter where in the land that citizen may be if those rights are being violated.

It didn't take me long. There was quite a bit of legislative debate in the Congress about that bill and some provisions. I had said from the beginning if they wanted to just send me the original bill, I would -- and I offered then at the very beginning to extend it for the longest period it's ever been extended, 10 years.

I appointed, as Governor of California, to executive and policymaking positions more members of the minority community than all the other 32 Governors that had preceded me in California history. Right now, after 17 months, we have been proceeding along the same line here in our own government. And, incidentally, in response to another question here with regard to the sexual discrimination, I think we're ahead of just about anyone at this point with regard to the appointment of women to high positions in our government. But as a student, I fought this when I encountered it. As a sports announcer, I did as much as I could do at a time when prejudice was deeply embedded in the world of professional sports. I have given you the record as Governor and since then.

Israeli military official -- has apparently made that statement publicly, and we know no more about it than what we ourselves have read in the press. But the review is going forward and the review that would lead to what the law requires, that we must inform the Congress as to whether we believe there was a question of this being an offensive attack or whether it was in self-defense.

I am proud of the team we have brought to Washington to work on trade issues. We have come to believe through our experience that the executive branch can -- and should -- be better organized to tackle the issues on this front.

In addition to his responsibilities for White House administration and management, Mr. Rogers will continue to serve as Director of the Office of Administration (a statutorily independent agency within the EOP). In his new position Mr. Rogers will continue to report to the President through Richard G. Darman and James A. Baker III.

Prior to joining the White House staff, Mr. McManus was corporate counsel to Pfizer, Inc., a multinational health care company, and general counsel of its international chemicals division. He previously served in the Department of Commerce during the Ford administration.

Jack Dempsey was a champion who never lost his title in the hearts of the American people. He was a true winner, remembered as much for his dignity, easy manner, and generous nature as for his remarkable skills in the boxing ring. He was one of the golden athletes of that golden era of American sports, the 1920's. Our attachment to America's colorful past is weakened by his passing.

The President. I have just had lunch with the crew of the space shuttle. And it was quite a lunch -- squeezed it from a plastic bag. [Laughter] No, we really didn't, but I wanted to meet with Captain Crippen, Captain Hauck, Colonel Fabian, Dr. Ride, and Dr. Thagard to let them know how much we look forward to the flight of the seventh space shuttle.

And I know, come June 18th about 7:32 a.m., you're also going to be first in the hearts of your countrymen. A little bit of every American will be up there with you, and needless to say, you'll carry our pride and our prayers as you head into space.

